

I ain't got no motherfuckin' friends
That's why I fucked yo' bitch, you fat motherfucker!

First off, fuck yo' bitch and the clique you claim
Westside when we ride, come equipped with game
You claim to be a player, but I fucked your wife
We bust on Bad Boys, niggas fucked for life
Plus, Puffy tryna see me, weak hearts I rip
Biggie Smalls and Junior M.A.F.I.A. is some mark-ass bitches
We keep on comin' while we runnin' for your jewels
Steady gunnin', keep on bustin' at them fools, you know the rules
Lil' Caesar, go ask your homie how I'll leave ya
Cut your young-ass up, leave you in pieces, now be deceased
Lil' Kim, don't fuck around with real G's
Quick to snatch yo' ugly ass off the streets, so fuck peace!
I'll let them niggas know it's on for life
Bad Boy murdered on wax and killed
Fuck with me and get yo' caps peeled, you know

See, grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, uh
Who shot me? But you punks didn't finish
Now you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga, I hit 'em up!

Check this out, you motherfuckers know what time it is
I don't know why I'm even on this track
Y'all niggas ain't even on my level
I'ma let my little homies ride
On you bitch-made ass Bad Boy bitches, feel it!

Get out the way yo, get out the way yo
Biggie Smalls just got dropped
Little Moo', pass the MAC
And let me hit him in his back
Frank White needs to get spanked right for settin' traps
Little accident murderer
And I ain't never heard of ya
Poisonous gats attack when I'm servin' ya
Spank ya, shank ya whole style when I gank
Guard your rank 'cause I'ma slam your ass in the paint
Puffy weaker than the fuckin' block I'm runnin' through, nigga
And I'm smokin' Junior M.A.F.I.A. in front of you, nigga
With the ready power
Tucked in my Guess under my Eddie Bauer
Your clout petty/sour
I push packages every hour; I hit 'em up!

Grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, uh
Who shot me? But you punks didn't finish
Now you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga, I hit 'em up!

Peep how we do it, keep it real as penitentiary steel
This ain't no freestyle battle, all you niggas gettin' killed
With your mouths open
Tryna come up off of me, you in the clouds, hopin'
Smokin' dope, it's like a sherm high
Niggas think they learned to fly
But they burn, motherfucker, you deserve to die
Talkin' about you gettin' money, but it's funny to me
All you niggas livin' bummy — why you fuckin' with me?
I'm a self-made millionaire
Biggie, remember when I used to let you sleep on the couch
And beg a bitch to let you sleep in the house?
Now it's all about Versace, you copied my style
Five shots couldn't drop me, I took it and smiled
Now I'm back to set the record straight
With my AK, I'm still the thug that you love to hate
Motherfucker, I hit 'em up!

I'm from N-E-W Jers' where plenty of murders occurs
No points or commas, we bring drama to all you herbs
I'll bring you fake G's to your knees, coppin' pleas in de Janeiro
Little Kim, is you coked up or doped up?
Get your little Junior Whopper click smoked up
What the fuck, is you stupid?
I take money, crash and mash through Brooklyn
With my click lootin', shootin' and pollutin' your block
With a 15-shot cocked Glock to your knot
Outlaw MAFIA clique movin' up another notch
And your pop stars popped and get mopped and dropped
All your fake-ass East Coast props brainstormed and locked

You's a beat biter, a Pac style taker
I'll tell you to your face you ain't shit but a faker
Softer than Alize with a chaser
About to get murdered for the paper
E.D.I. Mean approach the scene of the caper
Like a loc, with Little Ceas' in a choke
Gun totin' smoke, we ain't no motherfuckin' joke
Thug Life, niggas better be knowin'
We approachin' in the wide open, gun smokin'
No need for hopin', it's a battle lost
I got 'em crossed as soon as the funk is boppin' off
Nigga, I hit 'em up!

Now you tell me who won
I see them, they run, ha ha
They don't wanna see us
Whole Junior M.A.F.I.A. clique dressin' up tryna be us
How the fuck they gonna be the mob
When we always on our job?
We millionaires, killin' ain't fair
But somebody gotta do it
You little young-ass motherfuckers
Don't one of you niggas got sickle-cell or somethin'?
You're fuckin' with me, nigga
You fuck around and have a seizure or a heart attack
You better back the fuck up
Before you get smacked the fuck up
This is how we do it on our side
Any of you niggas from New York that wanna bring it, bring it!
But we ain't singin', we bringin' drama
Fuck you and yo' motherfuckin' mama!
We gon' kill all you motherfuckers!
Now when I came out I told you it was just about Biggie
Then everybody had to open their mouth
With a motherfuckin' opinion
Fuck Bad Boy as a staff, record label and as a motherfuckin' crew!
And if you wanna be down with Bad Boy, then fuck you too!
All you motherfuckers, fuck you too!
All of y'all motherfuckers, fuck you, die slow!
Motherfucker, my .44 make sho' all y'all kids don't grow!
You motherfuckers can't be us or see us
We motherfuckin' Thug Life-riders, Westside 'til we die!
Out here in California, nigga, we warned ya
We'll bomb on you motherfuckers! We do our job!
You think you mob? Nigga, we the motherfuckin' mob!
Ain't nothin' but killers and the real niggas
All you motherfuckers feel us
Our shit goes triple and 4-quadruple
You niggas laugh 'cause our staff got guns under their motherfuckin' belts
You niggas can't feel it, we the realest
Fuck 'em, we Bad Boy killers!



Little something for my godson Elijah
And a little girl named Corin

Some say the blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
I say the darker the flesh, then the deeper the roots
I give a holla to my sisters on welfare
2Pac cares if don't nobody else care
And I know they like to beat you down a lot
When you come around the block, brothers clown a lot
But please don't cry, dry your eyes, never let up
Forgive, but don't forget, girl, keep ya head up
And when he tells you you ain't nothin', don't believe him
And if he can't learn to love you, you should leave him
‘Cause, sister, you don't need him
And I ain't tryin' to gas you up, I just call 'em how I see 'em
You know what makes me unhappy?
When brothers make babies
And leave a young mother to be a pappy
And since we all came from a woman
Got our name from a woman and our game from a woman
I wonder why we take from our women
Why we rape our women — do we hate our women?
I think it's time to kill for our women
Time to heal our women, be real to our women
And if we don't we'll have a race of babies
That will hate the ladies that make the babies
And since a man can't make one
He has no right to tell a woman when and where to create one
So will the real men get up?
I know you're fed up, ladies, but keep ya head up

Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things are gonna get easier
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things'll get brighter
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things are gonna get easier
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things'll get brighter

Ayo, I remember Marvin Gaye used to sing to me
He had me feelin' like black was the thing to be
And suddenly the ghetto didn't seem so tough
And though we had it rough, we always had enough
I huffed and puffed about my curfew and broke the rules
Ran with a local crew and had a smoke or two
And I realize Mama really paid the price
She nearly gave her life to raise me right
And all I had to give her was my pipe dream
Of how I'd rock the mic and make it to the bright screen
I'm tryin' to make a dollar out of fifteen cents
It's hard to be legit and still pay the rent
And in the end it seems I'm headin' for the pen
I try to find my friends, but they're blowin' in the wind
Last night my buddy lost his whole family
It's gonna take the man in me to conquer this insanity
It seems the rain'll never let up
I try to keep my head up and still keep from gettin' wet up
You know, it's funny, when it rains it pours
They got money for wars but can't feed the poor
Say there ain't no hope for the youth
And the truth is it ain't no hope for the future
And then they wonder why we crazy
I blame my mother for turnin' my brother into a crack baby
We ain't meant to survive, ‘cause it's a set-up
And even though you're fed up, huh, you got to keep ya head up

Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things are gonna get easier
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things'll get brighter
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things are gonna get easier
Keep ya head up, ooh, child
Things'll get brighter

And uh, to all the ladies havin' babies on they own
I know it's kinda rough and you're feelin' all alone
Daddy's long gone and he left you by your lonesome
Thank the Lord for my kids even if nobody else want 'em
‘Cause I think we can make it; in fact, I'm sure
And if you fall, stand tall and come back for more
‘Cause ain't nothin' worse than when your son
Wants to know why his daddy don't love him no mo'
You can't complain you was dealt this
Hell of a hand without a man, feelin' helpless
Because there's too many things for you to deal with
Dyin' inside, but outside you're lookin' fearless
While tears is rollin' down your cheeks
You steady hopin' things don't fall down this week
‘Cause if it did, you couldn't take it
And don't blame me — I was given this world, I didn't make it
And now my son's gettin' older and older
And colder from havin' the world on his shoulders
While the rich kids is drivin' Benz
I'm still tryin' to hold on to survivin' friends
And it's crazy, it seems it'll never let up
But please, you got to keep ya head up



Makaveli in this, Killuminati
All through your body
That blows like a 12-gauge shotty, feel me!
And God said he should send his one begotten son
To lead the wild into the ways of the man
Follow me! Eat my flesh, flesh of my flesh!

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la

I ain't a killer, but don't push me
Revenge is like the sweetest joy next to gettin' pussy
Picture paragraphs unloaded, wise words bein' quoted
Peeped the weakness in the rap game and sewed it
Bow down, pray to God, hopin' that he's listenin'
Seein' niggas comin' for me
Through my diamonds, when they glistenin'
In these killing fields, Hail Mary, catch me if I go
Let's go deep inside the solitary mind of a madman
Screams in the dark, evil lurks, enemies see me flee
Activate my hate, let it break to the flame
Set trip, empty out my clip, never stop to aim
Some say the game is all corrupt and fucked in this shit
Stuck, niggas is lucky if we bust out this shit
Plus, Mama told me never stop until I bust a nut
Fuck the world if they can't adjust, it's just as well, Hail Mary

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la

Penitentiaries is packed with promise-makers
Never realize the precious time that bitch niggas is wastin'
Institutionalized, I live my life a product made to crumble
But too hardened for a smile, we're too crazy to be humble
We ballin', catch me, father, please
‘Cause I'm fallin' in the liquor store
Pass the Hennessy, I hear you callin', can I get some more?
Hell, 'til I reach Hell, I ain't scared
Mama checkin' in my bedroom, I ain't there
I got a head with no screws in it, what can I do?
One life to live, but I got nothin' to lose
Just me and you on a one-way trip to prison, sellin' drugs
We all wrapped up in this livin', life as thugs
To my homeboys in Clinton Max doin' their bid
Raise hell to this real shit and feel this
When they turn out the lights, I'll be there in the dark
Thuggin' eternal through my heart; now hail Mary, nigga!

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la

They got a APB out on my thug family
Since Outlawz run these streets like these scandalous freaks
Our enemies die now, walk around half-dead
Head down, K-blasted off of Hennessy and Thai chronic
Mixed in, now I'm twisted, blistered and high
Visions of me thug-livin' gettin' me by
Forever live, and I multiply, survived by thugs
When I die they won't cry unless they comin' with slugs

Peep the whole scene and whatever's goin' on around me
Brain kind of cloudy, smoked out, feelin' rowdy
Ready to wet the party up
And whoever in that mothafucka, nasty new street slugger
My heat seeks suckers on the regular
Mashin' in a stolen Black Ac' Integra
Cocked back, 60 seconds 'til the draw, that's when I'm deadin' ya
Feet first, you've got a nice gat, but my heat's worse
From a thug to preachin' church
I gave you love, now you eatin' dirt
Needin' work, and I ain't the nigga to put you on
‘Cause word is bond; when I was broke, I had to hustle 'til dawn
That's when the sun came up, there's only one way up
Hold your head and stay up
To all my niggas, get your pay and weight up

If it's on, then it's on, we rape break beat-breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate?
To this shit I don't got be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on, then it's on, we rape break beat-breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate?
To this shit I don't got be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now? Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la

We've been travelin' on this weary road
Sometimes life can be a heavy load
But we ride, ride it like a bullet
Hail Mary, hail Mary
We won't worry, everything will curry
Free like the bird in the tree
We won't worry, everything will curry
Yes, we free like the bird in the tree
We runnin' from the penitentiary
This is the time for we liberty
Hail Mary, hail Mary!

Westside, Outlawz
Makaveli the Don, solo
Killuminati, The 7 Days



I see no changes, wake up in the morning and I ask myself
Is life worth livin'? Should I blast myself?
I'm tired of bein' poor and, even worse, I'm black
My stomach hurts so I'm lookin' for a purse to snatch
Cops give a damn about a negro
Pull the trigger, kill a nigga, he's a hero
"Give the crack to the kids, who the hell cares?
One less hungry mouth on the welfare!"
First ship 'em dope and let 'em deal to brothers
Give 'em guns, step back, watch 'em kill each other
"It's time to fight back," that's what Huey said
Two shots in the dark, now Huey's dead
I got love for my brother
But we can never go nowhere unless we share with each other
We gotta start makin' changes
Learn to see me as a brother instead of two distant strangers
And that's how it's supposed to be
How can the Devil take a brother if he's close to me?
I'd love to go back to when we played as kids
But things change… and that's the way it is

That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah
That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah

I see no changes, all I see is racist faces
Misplaced hate makes disgrace to races
We under, I wonder what it takes to make this
One better place, let's erase the wasted
Take the evil out the people, they'll be actin' right
‘Cause both black and white are smokin' crack tonight
And the only time we chill is when we kill each other
It takes skill to be real, time to heal each other
And although it seems heaven-sent
We ain't ready to see a black president
It ain't a secret, don't conceal the fact
The penitentiary's packed, and it's filled with blacks
But some things will never change
Try to show another way, but you stayin' in the dope game
Now tell me, what's a mother to do?
Bein' real don't appeal to the brother in you
You gotta operate the easy way
"I made a G today," but you made it in a sleazy way
Sellin' crack to the kids
"I gotta get paid!" — well hey, but that's the way it is

That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah
That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah

We gotta make a change
It's time for us as a people to start makin' some changes
Let's change the way we eat
Let's change the way we live
And let's change the way we treat each other
You see the old way wasn't workin'
So it's on us to do what we gotta do to survive

And still I see no changes; can't a brother get a little peace?
It's war on the streets and a war in the Middle East
Instead of war on poverty
They got a war on drugs so the police can bother me
And I ain't never did a crime I ain't have to do
But now I'm back with the facts, givin' it back to you
Don't let 'em jack you up, back you up
Crack you up and pimp-smack you up
You gotta learn to hold your own
They get jealous when they see you with your mobile phone
But tell the cops they can't touch this
I don't trust this, when they try to rush I bust this
That's the sound of my tool
You say it ain't cool, my mama didn't raise no fool
And as long as I stay black I gotta stay strapped
And I never get to lay back
‘Cause I always got to worry 'bout the payback
Some buck that I roughed up way back
Comin' back after all these years
"Rat-a-tat-tat-tat-tat," that's the way it is

That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah
That's just the way it is
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is, aww yeah

Some things'll never change



When I was young, me and my mama had beef
Seventeen years old, kicked out on the streets
Though back at the time I never thought I'd see her face
Ain't a woman alive that could take my mama's place
Suspended from school, and scared to go home, I was a fool
With the big boys breakin' all the rules
I shed tears with my baby sister, over the years
We was poorer than the other little kids
And even though we had different daddies, the same drama
When things went wrong we'd blame Mama
I reminisce on the stress I caused, it was hell
Huggin' on my mama from a jail cell
And who'd think in elementary, hey
I'd see the penitentiary one day?
And runnin' from the police, that's right
Mama catch me, put a whoopin' to my backside
And even as a crack fiend, Mama
You always was a black queen, Mama
I finally understand
For a woman it ain't easy tryin' to raise a man
You always was committed
A poor single mother on welfare, tell me how you did it
There's no way I can pay you back, but the plan

Sweet lady, don't you know we love ya?

Now, ain't nobody tell us it was fair
No love from my daddy, ‘cause the coward wasn't there
He passed away and I didn't cry, ‘cause my anger
Wouldn't let me feel for a stranger
They say I'm wrong and I'm heartless, but all along
I was lookin' for a father, he was gone
I hung around with the thugs
And even though they sold drugs
They showed a young brother love
I moved out and started really hangin'
I needed money of my own, so I started slangin'
I ain't guilty, ‘cause even though I sell rocks
It feels good puttin' money in your mailbox
I love payin' rent when the rent is due
I hope you got the diamond necklace that I sent to you
‘Cause when I was low you was there for me
And never left me alone, because you cared for me
And I could see you comin' home after work late
You're in the kitchen, tryin' to fix us a hot plate
You just workin' with the scraps you was given
And Mama made miracles every Thanksgivin'
But now the road got rough, you're alone
You're tryin' to raise two bad kids on your own
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan

Sweet lady, don't you know we love ya?

Pour out some liquor and I reminisce
‘Cause through the drama I can always depend on my mama
And when it seems that I'm hopeless
You say the words that can get me back in focus
When I was sick as a little kid
To keep me happy there's no limit to the things you did
And all my childhood memories
Are full of all the sweet things you did for me
And even though I act crazy
I gotta thank the Lord that you made me
There are no words that can express how I feel
You never kept a secret, always stayed real
And I appreciate how you raised me
And all the extra love that you gave me
I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night, there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if you hold on
It's a struggle every day, gotta roll on
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan

Lady, lady



I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
Let's get ready to rumble!

Now, you know how we do it, like a G
What really go on in the mind of a nigga
That get down for theirs
Constantly, money over bitches
Not bitches over money
Stay on your grind, nigga
My ambitions as a ridah
My ambitions as a ridah

So many battlefield scars while driven in plush cars
This life as a rap star is nothin' without guard
Was born rough and rugged, addressin' the mass public
My attitude was "fuck it," because motherfuckers love it
To be a soldier, must maintain composure at ease
Though life is complicated, only what you make it to be
Uh, and my ambitions as a ridah
To catch her while she hot and horny, go up inside her
Then I spit some game in her ear, "Go to the telly, hoe!"
Equipped with money in a Benz ‘cause, bitch, I'm barely broke
I'm smokin' bomb-ass weed, feelin' crucial
From player to player the game's tight, the feeling's mutual
From hustlin' and prayers to breakin' motherfuckers to pay up
I got no time for these bitches, ‘cause these hoes try to play us
I'm on a meal ticket mission, want a mill, so I'm wishin'
Competition got me ripped on that bullshit they stressin'
I'ma rhyme though, clown hoes like it's mandatory
No guts, no glory, my nigga, bitch got the game distorted
Now it's on and it's on because I said so
Can't trust a bitch in the business, so I got with Death Row
Now these money-hungry bitches gettin' suspicious
Started plottin' and plannin' on schemes to come and trick us
But thug niggas be on point and game tight
Me, Syke and Bogart strapped up the same night
Got problems, then handle it, motherfuckers see me
These niggas is jealous
‘Cause deep in they heart they wanna be me
Uh, yeah, and now you got me right beside ya, hopin' you listen
I catch you payin' attention to my ambitions as a ridah

I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
Let's get ready to rumble

It was my only wish to rise
Above these jealous coward motherfuckers I despise
When it's time to ride I was the first off this side, give me the 9
I'm ready to die right here tonight and motherfuck they life
That's what they screamin' as they drill me, but I'm hard to kill
So open fire, I see you kill me, witness my steel
Spittin' at adversaries, envious and after me
I'd rather die before they capture me, watch me bleed
Mama, come rescue me, I'm suicidal, thinkin' thoughts
I'm innocent, so there'll be bullets flyin' when I'm caught
Won't get a chance to do me like they did my nigga Tyson
Thuggin' for life, and if you right, then nigga die for it
Let them other brothers try, at least you tried for it
When it's time to die, to be a man and pick the way you leave
Fuck peace and the police, my ambitions as a ridah

I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
Let's get ready to rumble

My murderous lyrics, equipped with spirits of the thugs before me
Pay off the block, evade the cops ‘cause I know they comin' for me
I been hesitant to reappear, been away for years
Now I'm back, my adversaries been reduced to tears
Question my methods to switch up speeds
Sure as some bitches bleed
Niggas'll feel the fire of my mother's corrupted seed
Blast me, but they didn't finish, didn't diminish my powers
So now I'm back to be a motherfuckin' menace, they cowards
That's why they tried to set me up
Had bitch-ass niggas on my team, so indeed they wet me up
But I'm back reincarnated, incarcerated
At the time I contemplate the way that God made it
Lace 'em with lyrics that's legendary, musical mercenary
For money I'll have these motherfuckers buried
I been gettin' much mail in jail, niggas tellin' me to kill it
Knowin' when I get out they gon' feel it
Witness the realest! A hoo-ridah when I put the shit inside
The cry from all your people when they find her
Just remind ya, my history'll prove authentic
Revenge on them niggas that played me
And all the cowards that was down with it
Now it's your nigga right beside ya, hopin' you listenin'
Catch you payin' attention to my ambitions as a ridah

I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
Let's get ready to rumble



California love
California knows how to party
California knows how to party
In the city of L.A.
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin', we keep it rockin'

Now let me welcome everybody to the Wild Wild West
A state that's untouchable like Eliot Ness
The track hits your eardrum like a slug to your chest
Pack a vest for your Jimmy in the city of sex
We in that sunshine state where the bomb-ass hemp be
The state where you never find a dance floor empty
And pimps be on a mission for them greens
Lean mean money-making-machines servin' fiends
I been in the game for 10 years makin' rap tunes
Ever since honeys was wearin' Sassoon
Now it's '95 and they clock me and watch me
Diamonds shinin', lookin' like I robbed Liberace
It's all good, from Diego to the Bay
Your city is the bomb if your city makin' pay
Throw up a finger if you feel the same way
Dre puttin' it down for Californ-i-a

California knows how to party
In the city of L.A.
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin'

Shake, shake it, baby
Shake, shake it, mama
Shake it, Cali
Shake it, shake it, baby
Shake it, shake it, shake it, shake it

Out on bail, fresh out of jail, California dreamin'
Soon as I step on the scene, I'm hearin' hoochies screamin'
Fiendin' for money and alcohol, the life of a Westside player
Where cowards die and the strong ball
Only in Cali where we riot, not rally, to live and die
Dressed in Locs and Khaki suits, and ride is what we do
Famous because we program
Worldwide, let them recognize from Long Beach to Rosecrans
Bumpin' and grindin' like a slow jam
It's Westside, so you know the Row won't bow down to no man
Say what you say, but give me that bomb beat from Dre
Let me serenade the streets of L.A.
From Oakland to Sac-town, the Bay Area and back down
Cali is where they put their mack down; give me love!

California knows how to party
In the city of L.A.
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin'


Shake, shake it, baby
Shake, shake it, mama
Shake it, Cali
Shake it, shake it, baby
Shake it, shake it, shake it, shake it

Shake it, Cali
Uh, uh, West Coast
Uh, yeah, uh, uh, Long Beach in the house
Uh, yeah, Oaktown
Oakland definitely in the house
Frisco, Frisco

And you know L.A. up in here

Pasadena, where you at?
Yeah, Inglewood
Inglewood always up to no good

Even Hollywood tryin' to get a piece, baby

Sacramento, Sacramento where you at?

Throw it up, y'all! Throw it up, throw it up!
I can't see ya
Let's show these fools how we do it over on this Westside
'Cause you and I know it's the best side
Yeah, that's right
West Coast, west Coast



How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on
How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on

As I bail through the empty halls, breath stinkin' in my jaws
Ring, ring, ring — quiet, y'all, incomin' call
Plus this my homie from high school, he gettin' by
It's time to bury another brother, nobody cry
We used to do 'em as adolescents, do you recall?
Raised as G's, loc'ed out, and blazed the weed
Get on the roof, let's get smoked out, and blaze with me
Two in the morning and we still high, assed out
Screamin', "Thug 'til I die!" before I passed out
But now that you're gone, I'm in the zone
Thinkin' I don't wanna die all alone, but now you gone
And all I got left are stinkin' memories
I love them niggas to death, I'm drinkin' Hennessy
While tryin' to make it last
I drank a fifth for that ass when you passed, 'cause life goes on

How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on
How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on

Yeah nigga, I got the word it's hell
You blew trial and the judge gave you 25 with an L
Time to prepare to do fed time, won't see parole
Imagine life as a convict that's gettin' old
Plus with the drama, we're lookin' out for your baby's mama
Takin' risks, while keepin' cheap tricks from gettin' on her
Life in the hood is all good for nobody
Remember gamin' on dumb hotties at yo' party
Me and you, no truer two, while schemin' on hits
And gettin' tricks that maybe we can slide into
But now you buried — rest, nigga, 'cause I ain't worried
Eyes blurry, sayin' goodbye at the cemetery
Though memories fade
I got your name tatted on my arm so we both ball 'til my dyin' days
Before I say goodbye
Kato and Mental, rest in peace! Thug 'til I die!

How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on
How many brothers fell victim to the streets?
Rest in peace, young nigga, there's a heaven for a G
Be a lie If I told you that I never thought of death
My niggas, we the last ones left, but life goes on

Bury me smilin' with G's in my pocket
Have a party at my funeral, let every rapper rock it
Let the hoes that I used to know
From way befo' kiss me from my head to my toe
Give me a paper and a pen, so I can write about my life of sin
A couple bottles of gin, in case I don't get in
Tell all my people I'm a Ridah
Nobody cries when we die, we Outlawz, let me ride
Until I get free
I live my life in the fast lane, got police chasin' me
To my niggas from old blocks, from old crews
Niggas that guided me through back in the old school
Pour out some liquor, have a toast for the homies
See, we both gotta die, but you chose to go before me
And brothers miss you while you gone
You left your nigga on his own; how long we mourn? Life goes on

Life goes on, homie
Gone on, 'cause they passed away
Niggas doin' life
Niggas doin' 50 and 60 years and shit
I feel you, nigga! Trust me, I feel you
You know what I mean?
Last year we poured out liquor for ya
This year, nigga, life goes on
We're gonna clock now
Get money, evade bitches, evade tricks
Give playa haters plenty of space
And basically just represent for you, baby
Next time you see your niggas, we gon' be on top, nigga
You gon' be like, "Goddamn, them niggas came up!"
That's right, baby, life goes on
And we up out this bitch
Hey, Kato! Mental!
Y'all niggas make sure it's poppin'
When we get up there, man, don't front
Life goes on
Hold me no more, hold me no more
Yes it do, yes it do, yes it do



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

You try to plant somethin in the conrete, y'knowhatImean?
If it GROW, and the and the rose petal got all kind of
Scratches and marks, you not gon' say, "Damn, look at
All the scratches and marks on the rose that grew from concrete"
You gon' be like, "Damn! A rose grew from the concrete?!"
Same thing with me, y'knahmean? I grew out of all of this
Instead of sayin, "Damn, he did this, he did this,"
Just be like, "DAMN! He grew out of that? He came out of that?"
That's what they should say, y'knowhatImean?
All the trouble to survive and make good out of the dirty, nasty
Y'knowhahatImean unbelievable lifestyle they gave me
I'm just tryin to make somethin..

When no one even cared
The rose it grew from concrete
Keepin all these dreams
Provin nature's laws wrong
It learned how to walk without havin feet
It came from concrete

Did you hear about the rose that grew from a crack in the concrete?
Provin nature's laws wrong it learned how to walk without havin feet
Funny it seems but, by keepin its dreams
It, learned to breathe FRESH air
Long live the rose that grew from concrete
When no one else even cared
No one else even cared..
The rose that grew from concrete

Did you hear..
Did you hear about the rose that grew from a crack in the concrete?
Provin nature's laws wrong
It learned to walk without having feet
Funny it seems but by keeping its dreams
It learned to breathe FRESH air
Long live the rose that grew from concrete
When no one else, even cared

Keepin all these dreams
Provin nature's laws wrong

You see you wouldn't ask why the rose that grew from the concrete
Had damaged petals. On the contrary, we would all celebrate its
Tenacity. We would all love it's will to reach the sun
Well, we are the roses - this is the concrete - and these are
My damaged petals. Don't ask me why, thank God nigga, ask me how!
Hahahaha..



Between you and Biggie it was like, who's going to rule the
Nigga kingdom and shit, basically, know what I'm saying?
I was like, this is like a fucking election
It is that
You know what I am saying
Me and Biggie's situation is smaller than that, it's like…

And I wonder if they'll laugh when I'm dead?
Why am I fighting to live if I'm just living to fight?
Why am I trying to see when there ain't nothing in sight?
Why am I trying to give when no one gives me a try?
Why am I dying to live if I'm just living to die?

Check it, I grew up a fuckin' screw-up
Got introduced to the game, got a ounce and fuckin' blew up
Choppin' rocks overnight
The nigga Biggie Smalls tryna turn into the black Frank White
We had to grow dreads to change our description
Two cops is on the milk box missin'
Show they toes, you know they got stepped on
A fistful of bullets, a chest full of Teflon
Runnin' from the police, picture that
Nigga, I'm too fat, I fuck around and catch a asthma attack
That's why I bust back, it don't phase me
When he drop, take his Glock and I'm Swayze
Celebrate my escape, sold the Glock, bought some weight
Lay back, I got some money to make, motherfucker

And I wonder if they'll laugh when I'm dead?
Why am I fighting to live if I'm just living to fight?
Why am I trying to see when there ain't nothing in sight?
Why am I trying to give when no one gives me a try?
Why am I dying to live if I'm just living to die?

But still I'm havin' memories of high speed when the cops crashed
As I laugh, pushin' the gas while my Glocks blast
We was young and we was dumb, but we had heart
In the dark, will we survive through the bad parts?
Many dreams is what I had, and plenty wishes
No hesitation in extermination of these snitches
Envious bitches, they still continue to pursue me
A couple of movies, now the whole world's tryna screw me
Even the cops tried to sue me, so what can I do?
But stay true, sippin' 22's of brew
And now media is tryna test me
Got the press askin' questions, tryna stress me
Misery is all I see, that's my mind state
My history with the police will shake the crime rate
My main man had two strikes, slipped, got arrested, and flipped
He screamed "Thug Life!" and emptied the clip
Got tired of runnin' from the police

And I wonder if they'll laugh when I'm dead?
Why am I fighting to live if I'm just living to fight?
Why am I trying to see when there ain't nothing in sight?
Why am I trying to give when no one gives me a try?
Why am I dying to live if I'm just living to die?

They wanted a new regime. And my regime includes East coast, includes West coast

I was more shocked than anything
You know what I'm sayin'?
But I wasn't more shocked of him dying
I was more shocked of him… Pac is a strong dude, yo
I know dude, you know what I'm sayin'? Real strong
So when they was like he got shot, I was just more like, "Again?" you know what I'm sayin'?
He always getting shot, or shot at
He going to pull through this one again
Make a few records about it, and it's going to be over
You know what I'm sayin'?
But when he, when he died, I was just like, "whoa", you know what I'm saying? Kinda took me by
I mean, even though we was going through our drama
I would never wish death on nobody
You know what I'm sayin'?
Because there ain't no coming back from that



Change, shit, I guess change is good for any of us
Whatever it take for any of y'all niggas
To get up out the hood
Shit, I'm wit'cha, I ain't mad at cha
Got nothin' but love for ya, do your thing, boy
Yeah, all the homies that I ain't talk to in a while
I'ma send this one out for y'all
Know what I mean? 'Cause I ain't mad at cha
Heard y'all tearin' up shit out there
Kickin' up dust, givin' a motherfuck
Yeah, niggas, 'cause I ain't mad at cha

Now we was once two niggas of the same kind
Quick to holla at a hoochie with the same line
You was just a little smaller, but you still rolled
Got stretched to Y.A. and hit the hood swoll
'Member when you had a Jheri Curl, didn't quite learn
On the block, wit'cha Glock, trippin' off sherm
Collect calls to the crib, sayin' how you've changed
Oh you a Muslim now? No more dope game
Heard you might be comin' home, just got bail
Wanna go to the mosque, don't wanna chase tail
It seems I lost my little homie, he's a changed man
Hit the pen and now no sinnin' is the game plan
When I talk about money all you see is the struggle
When I tell you I'm livin' large you tell me it's trouble
Congratulations on the weddin', I hope your wife know
She got a playa for life, and that's no bullshittin'
I know we grew apart, you probably don't remember
I used to fiend for your sister, but never went up in her
And I can see us after school, we'd bomb
On the first motherfucker with the wrong shit on
Now the whole shit's changed and we don't even kick it
Got a big money scheme and you ain't even with it
Knew in my heart you was the same motherfucker that
Go toe to toe when it's time to roll, you got a brother's back
And I can't even trip, 'cause I'm just laughin' at cha
You tryin' hard to maintain, then go ahead, 'cause I ain't mad at cha

I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha

We used to be like distant cousins, fightin', playin' dozens
Whole neighborhood buzzin', knowin' that we wasn't
Used to catch us on the roof or behind the stairs
I'm gettin' blitzed and I reminisce on all the times we shared
Besides bumpin' and grindin', wasn't nothin' on our mind
In time we'd learned to live a life of crime
Rewind us back to a time was much too young to know
I caught a felony, lovin' the way the guns blow
And even though we separated, you said that you'd wait
Don't give nobody no coochie while I'll be locked up state
I kiss my mama goodbye and wipe the tears from her lonely eyes
Said I'll return but I gotta fight, the fate's arrived
Don't shed a tear, 'cause Mama, I ain't happy here
I blew trial, no more smiles for a couple years
They got me goin' mad, I'm knockin' busters on they backs
In my cell, thinkin', "Hell, I know one day I'll be back."
As soon as I touch down
I told my girl I'd be there, so prepare to get fucked down
The homies wanna kick it, but I'm just laughin' at cha
'Cause you's a down-ass bitch and I ain't mad at cha

I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha

Well, guess who's movin' up, this nigga's ballin' now
Bitches be callin' to get it, hookers keep fallin' down
He went from nothin' to lots, ten carats to rock
Went from a nobody nigga to the big man on the block
He's Mr. Local-Celebrity, addicted to movin' ki's
Most hated by enemies, escape in the luxury
See, first you was our nigga, but you made it so the choice is made
Now we gotta slay you while you faded, in the younger days
So full of pain while the weapons blaze
Gettin' so high off that bomb, hopin' we make it to the better days
'Cause crime pays, and in time you'll find a rhyme'll blaze
You'll feel the fire from the niggas in my younger days
So many changed on me, so many tried to plot
That I keep a Glock beside my head, when will it stop?
'Til God return me to my essence
'Cause even as an adolescent, I refused to be a convalescent
So many questions and they ask me if I'm still down
I moved up out of the ghetto, so I ain't real now?
They got so much to say, but I'm just laughin' at cha
You niggas just don't know, but I ain't mad at cha

I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
Hell nah, I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
And I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't mad at cha



Big Syke, Newt, Hank, Beugard, Big Sur
Y'all know how this shit go
All eyes on me
Motherfuckin' OG
Roll up in the club and shit, is that right?
All eyes on me
All eyes on me
But you know what?

I bet you got it twisted, you don't know who to trust
So many playa-hatin' niggas tryin' to sound like us
Say they ready for the funk, but I don't think they knowin'
Straight to the depths of hell is where those cowards goin'
Well, are you still down? Nigga, holla when you see me
And let these devils be sorry for the day they finally free me
I got a caravan of niggas every time we ride
Hittin' motherfuckers up when we pass by
Until I die, live the life of a boss playa
'Cause even when I'm high, fuck with me and get crossed later
The futures in my eyes, 'cause all I want is cash and thangs
A five-double-oh Benz, flauntin' flashy rings
Uhh, bitches pursue me like a dream
Been known to disappear before your eyes just like a dope fiend
It seems, my main thang was to be major paid
The game sharper than a motherfuckin' razor blade
Say money bring bitches, bitches bring lies
One nigga's gettin' jealous, and motherfuckers die
Depend on me like the first and fifteenth
They might hold me for a second, but these punks won't get me
We got four niggas, in low riders and ski masks
Screamin' THUG LIFE every time they pass; all eyes on me

Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
All eyes on me
'Cause even gettin' high
All eyes on me
Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
'Cause even gettin' high

So much trouble in the world, nigga
Can't nobody feel your pain
The world's changin' everyday, time's movin' fast
My girl said I need a raise, how long will she last?
I'm caught between my woman and my pistol and my chips
Triple beam, got some smokers on, whistle as I dip
I'm lost in the land, with no plan, livin' life flawless
Crime boss, contraband, let me toss this
Needy hookers got a lot of nerve
Let my bucket swerve, I'm takin' off from the curb
The nervousness neglect make me pack a TEC
Devoted to servin' this, Moët and pay checks
Like Akai satellite, nigga, I'm forever ballin'
Sucker, duck and get busted, no emotion
My devotion is handlin' my business, nigga, keep on coastin'
Where you goin', I been there, came back as lonely, homie
Steady flowin' against the grain, niggas still don't know me
It's about the money in this rap shit, this crap shit
It ain't funny, niggas don't even know how to act, shit
What can I do? What can I say? Is there another way?
Blunts and gin all day, twenty-fo' parlay
My little homie G, can't you see I'm busta-free?
Niggas can't stand me; all eyes on me

Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
All eyes on me
'Cause even gettin' high
All eyes on me
Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
'Cause even gettin' high
All eyes on me

The feds is watchin', niggas plottin' to get me
Will I survive? Will I die? Come on, let's picture the possibility
Givin' me charges, lawyers makin' a grip
I told the judge I was raised wrong and that's why I blaze shit
Was hyper as a kid, cold as a teenager
On my mobile, callin' big shots on the scene major
Packin' hundreds in my drawers; fuck the law!
Bitches, I fuck with a passion, I'm livin' rough and raw
Catchin' cases at a fast rate, ballin' in the fast lane
Hustle 'til the mornin', never stopped until the cash came
Live my life as a thug nigga until the day I die
Live my life as a boss playa, 'cause even gettin' high
These niggas got me tossin' shit
I put the top down, now it's time to floss my shit
Keep your head up, nigga, make these motherfuckers suffer
Up in the Benz, burnin' rubber
The money is mandatory, the hoes is for the stress
This criminal lifestyle, equipped with a bulletproof vest
Make sure your eyes is on the meal ticket, get your money
Motherfucker, let's get rich and we'll kick it; all eyes on me

Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
All eyes on me
'Cause even gettin' high
All eyes on me
Live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I die
Live the life of a boss playa
'Cause even gettin' high
All eyes on me

Pay attention, my niggas! See how that shit go?
Nigga walk up in this motherfucker and it be like, "Bing!"
Cops, bitches, every-motherfuckin'-body
I got bustas, hoes, and police watchin' a nigga, you know?
He he he, it's like what they think
I'm walkin' around with some ki's in my pocket or somethin'
They think I'm goin' back to jail, they really on that dope
I know y'all watchin', I know y'all got me in the scopes
I know y'all know this is Thug Life, baby!
Y'all got me under surveillance, huh?
All eyes on me, but I'm knowin'



Up out of there
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Eh, light that up, Snoop! Why you actin like that?
Ahh shit, you done fucked up now
You done put two of America's most wanted in the same motherfuckin' place at the same motherfuckin' time
Y'all niggas about to feel this
Break out the Champagne glasses and the motherfuckin' condoms, have one on us, a'ight?
A toast to the gangsters

Picture perfect, I paint a perfect picture
Bomb the hoochies with precision
My intention's to get richer
With the S-N double-O-P, Dogg, my fuckin' homie
You's a cold-ass nigga on them hogs

Sho 'nuff, I keep my hand on my gun
'Cause they got me on the run
Now I'm back in the courtroom, waitin' on the outcome
"Free 2Pac" is all that's on a nigga's mind
But at the same time, it seems they tryin' to take mine
So I'ma get smart and get defensive and shit
And put together a Million March for some gangsta shit

So now they got us laced
Two multi-millionaire motherfuckers catchin' cases
Bitches get ready for the throw down
The shit's about to go down
Me and Snoop about to clown
I'm losin' my religion
I'm vicious on these stool pigeons
You might be deep in this game
But you got the rules missin'
Niggas be actin' like they savage
They out to get the cabbage
I've got nothin' but love for my niggas livin' lavish

I've got a pit named Petey, she Nigerina
I've got a house out in the hills right next to Chino
And I think I've got a black Beamer
But my dream's to own a fly casino
Like Bugsy Siegel, and do it all legal
And get scooped up by the little homie in the Regal
It feels good to you, baby-bubba
You see, this is for the G's and the keys, motherfucker

Now follow as we ride
Motherfuck the rest, two of the best from the Westside
And I can make you famous
Niggas been dyin' for years, so how could they blame us?
I live in fear of a felony
I never stop bailin' these motherfuckin' G's
If you got it, better flaunt it
Another warrant for two of America's most wanted

Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party

Now give me fifty feet
Defeat is not my destiny, release me to the streets
And keep whatever's left of me
Jealousy is misery, sufferin' is greed
Better be prepared when you cowards fuck with me
I bust and flee, these niggas must be crazy, what?
There ain't no mercy
Motherfuckers who can't fade the thugs
You thought it was, but it wasn't, now disappear
Bow down in the presence of a boss player

It's like Cuz/Blood gang-bangin'
Everybody in the party doin' dope-slangin'
You gotta have papers in this world
You might get your first snatch before your eyes swirl
You doin' your job every day
And then you work so hard 'til your hair turns gray
Let me tell you about life and about the way it is
You see, we live by the gun, so we die by the guns, kids

They tell me not to roll with my Glock
So now I got a throw-away
Floatin' in the black Benz, tryin' to do a show a day
They wonder how I live with five shots
Niggas is hard to kill on my block
Schemes for currency and dough-related
Affiliated with the hustlers, so we made it
No answers to questions, I'm tryin' to get up on it
My nigga Dogg with me, eternally the most wanted

Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
It ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
It ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
It ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
It ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' gangsta party)
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party

Biatch! Where you at? Where you at?
Ain't nothin' but a gangsta party
Yeah, Death Row




It's just me against the world
Nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby
I got nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world
Stuck in the game
Me against the world, baby

Can you picture my prophecy?
Stress in the city, the cops is on top of me
The projects is full of bullets
Though bodies is droppin' there ain't no stoppin' me
Constantly movin' while makin' millions
Witnessin' killings, leavin' dead bodies in abandoned buildings
Can't reach the children, 'cause they're illin'
Addicted to killin' and the appeal from the cap peelin'
Without feelin', but will they last or be blasted?
Hard-headed bastard, maybe he'll listen in his casket
I'm losin' my homies in a hurry, they're relocatin' to the cemetery
Got me worried, stressin', my vision's blurry
The question is will I live, no one in the world loves me
I'm headed for danger, don't trust strangers
Put one in the chamber whenever I'm feelin' this anger
Don't wanna make excuses
'Cause this is how it is, what's the use?
Unless we're shootin', no one notices the youth
It's just me against the world, baby

Me against the world
It's just me against the world
It's just me against the world
Me against the world
'Cause it's just me against the world, baby
Me against the world
I got nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby
I got nothin' to lose

Could somebody help me? I'm out here all by myself, see
Ladies in stores, Baby Capone's, livin' wealthy
Pictures of my birth on this Earth is what I'm dreamin'
Seein' Daddy's semen, full of crooked demons
Already crazy and screamin', I guess them nightmares as a child
Had me scared but left me prepared for a while
Is there another route for a crooked Outlaw?
Veteran, a villain, a young thug, who one day shall fall

Everyday there's mo' death, and plus I'm dough-less
I'm seein' more reasons for me to proceed with thievin'
Scheme on the schemin' and leave they peeps grievin'
'Cause ain't no bucks to stack up
My nuts is backed up, I'm about to act up
Go load the MAC up, now watch me klacka
Tried makin' fat cuts, but yo, it ain't workin'
And evil's lurkin', I can see him smirkin' when I gets to pervin'
So what? Go put some work in and make my mail
Makin' sales, riskin' 25 with a L, but oh well

Me against the world
With nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world
It's just me against the world, baby
Me against the world
I got nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world
It's just me against the world, baby
With nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby
Me against the world
Me against the world
I got nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby

With all this extra stressin'
The question I wonder is after death, after my last breath
When will I finally get to rest through this oppression?
They punish the people that's askin' questions
And those that possess steal from the ones without possessions
Don't settle for less, even the genius asks his questions
Be grateful for blessings
Don't ever change, keep your essence
The power is in the people and politics we address
Always do your best, don't let the pressure make you panic
And when you get stranded
And things don't go the way you planned it
Dreamin' of riches, in a position of makin' a difference
Politicians are hypocrites, they don't wanna listen
If I'm insane, it's the fame made a brother change
It wasn't nothin' like the game; it's just me against the world

Me against the world
Nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby
Me against the world
Got me stuck in the game
It's just me against the world
Nothin' to lose
It's just me against the world, baby
Me against the world

Hahaha, that's right
I know it seem hard sometimes
But, uh, remember one thing
Through every dark night, there's a bright day after that
So no matter how hard it get
Stick your chest out, keep your head up, and handle it



Only God can judge me now
Only God can judge me now

Perhaps I was blind to the facts, stabbed in the back
I couldn't trust my own homies, just a bunch of dirty rats
Will I succeed? Paranoid from the weed
And hocus pocus, I try to focus, but I can't see
And in my mind I'm a blind man doin' time
Look to my future, ‘cause my past is all behind me
Is it a crime to fight for what is mine?
Everybody's dyin', tell me what's the use of tryin'
I've been trapped since birth, cautious ‘cause I'm cursed
And fantasies of my family in a hearse
And they say it's the White man I should fear
But it's my own kind doin' all the killin' here
I can't lie, ain't no love for the other side
Jealousy inside, make 'em wish I died
Oh my Lord, tell me what I'm livin' for
Everybody's droppin', got me knockin' on Heaven's door
And all my memories of seein' brothers bleed
And everybody grieves, but still nobody sees
Recollect your thoughts, don't get caught up in the mix
‘Cause the media is full of dirty tricks

Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me now
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me


I hear the doctor standin' over me, screamin' I can make it
Got a body full of bullet holes, layin' here naked
Still I can't breathe, something's evil in my IV
‘Cause everytime I breathe I think they killin' me
I'm havin' nightmares, homicidal fantasies
I wake up stranglin', dangled in my bed sheets
I call the nurse ‘cause it hurts to reminisce
How did it come to this? I wish they didn't miss
Somebody help me, tell me where to go from here
‘Cause even thugs cry, but do the Lord care?
Try to remember but it hurts
I'm walkin' through the cemetery, talkin' to the dirt
I'd rather die like a man than live like a coward
There's a ghetto up in Heaven and it's ours
"Black Power!" is what we scream
As we dream in a paranoid state
And our fate is a lifetime of hate
Dear Mama, can you save me? And fuck peace
‘Cause the streets got our babies, we gotta eat
No more hesitation, each and every black male's trapped
And they wonder why we suicidal running 'round strapped
Mr. Police, please try to see
That there's a million motherfuckers stressin' just like me

Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me now
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me

That which does not kill me can only make me stronger
That's for real
And I don't see why everybody feel as though
That they gotta tell me how to live my life
You know?
Let me live, baby, let me live

Pac, I feel ya, keep servin' it on the reala
For instance, say a playa-hatin' mark is out to kill ya
Would you be wrong for buckin' a nigga to the pavement?
He gon' get me first, if I don't get him fool start prayin'
Ain't no such thing as self-defense in the court of law
So judge us when we get to where we're goin wearin' a cross
That's real, got him, lurked him, crept the fuck up on him
Sold a half a million tapes, now everybody want him
After talkin' behind my back like a bitch would
Tellin' them niggas, "You can fade him"
Punk, I wish you would
It be them same motherfuckers in your face
That'll rush up in your place to get your safe
Knowin' you on that paper chase
Grass, glass, big screen and leather couch
My new shit is so fetti, already sold a ki or ounce
Bitch, remember 2Pac and 4-Tay
The same two brothers dodgin' bullets, representin' the Bay
Pac, when you was locked down
That's when I'll be around
Start climbin' up the charts, so sick, but they tried to clown
That's why they ride the bandwagon
Still be draggin', sellin' lies
Don't think I don't see you haters, I know y'all in disguise

Guess you figure you know me, ‘cause I'm a thug
That love to hit the late night club drink and buzzed
Been livin' lavish like a player all day
Now I'm bout to floss 'em off, player shit with 4-Tay

Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me now
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me
Only God can judge me, only God
Only God can judge me

Only God man
That right?
That’s real
Hahahahahaha
Fuck everybody else, you know what I’m sayin'?
Man, look here, man
My only fear of death
Is comin' back to this bitch reincarnated, man
That’s for the homie mental
Hehehehe
We up out



Round and round
Still clown with the Underground, when we come around
Round and round

Back to get wrecked, all respect
To those who break their neck to keep their hoes in check
‘Cause, oh, they sweat a brother majorly
And I don't know why your girl keeps pagin' me
She tell me that she needs me, cries when she leaves me
And every time she sees me, she squeeze me—lady, take it easy!
Hate to sound sleazy, but tease me
I don't want it if it's that easy
Ayo, bust it, baby got a problem saying "bye-bye"
Just another hazard of a fly guy
You ask "Why?", don't matter, my pockets got fatter
Now everybody's lookin' for the latter
And ain't no need in being greedy, if you wanna see me
Dial the beeper number, baby, when you need me
And I'll be there in a, jiffy
Don't be picky, just be happy with this, quickie
But when you learn you can't tie me down

What you mean you don't know?
Round and round, around we go
I get around, the Underground just don't stop for hoes
Round and round
I get around, still down with the Underground
Round and round, around we go
I get around, yeah, ayo Shock, let them hoes know
Round and round

Now you can tell from my everday fits I ain't rich
Just cause I'm a freak don't mean that we could hit the sheets
Baby, I can see, that you don't recognize me
Never knew a hooker that could share me; I get around

Well, I've been hangin', sangin'
Tryin' to do my thang, oh, you heard that I was bangin'
Your homegirl you went to school with? That's cool
But did she tell you about her sister and your cousin?
See, weekends were made for Michelob
But it's a Monday, my day, so just let me hit it, yo
And don't mistake my statement for a clown
We can keep in the down low long as you know that I get around

Round and round, around we go
2Pacalypse Now don't stop for hoes, I get around
Round and round
Round and round, around we go
Why I ain't call you? Hahahah, please!
Round and round

Finger tips on the hips as I dip
Gotta get a tight grip, don't slip; loose lips sink ships
It's a trip, I love the way she licks her lips, see me jockin'
Put a little twist in her hips ‘cause I'm watchin'
Conversations on the phone 'til the break of dawn
Turn them off! Time to set it off, get you wet and soft
Somethin' is on your mind, let it off
You don't know me, you just met me, you won't let me
It's a lot of real G's doin' time
Cause a groupie bent the truth and told a lie
You picked the wrong guy, baby, if you're too fly
You need to hit the door, search for a new guy
Cause I only got one night in town
Break out or be clowned, baby doll, are you down?
I get around

Round and round, around we go
Round and round, around we go, uhh
Round and round, around we go
Round and round, around we go
Round and round, round we go
Round and round, round we go
Round and round, round we go, whoa
Round and round we go
Round and round
Round and round
Round and round
Round and round



Uh, hit 'em with a little ghetto gospel

Those who wish to follow me
I welcome with my hands
And the red sun sinks at last
Into the hills of gold
And peace to this young warrior
Without the sound of guns

If I could recollect before my hood days
I sit and reminisce, thinkin' of bliss and the good days
I stop and stare at the younger
My heart goes to 'em, they tested with stress that they under
And nowadays things change
Everyone's ashamed of the youth 'cause the truth look strange
And for me it's reversed
We left 'em a world that's cursed, and it hurts
‘Cause any day they'll push the button
And all good men like Malcolm X or Bobby Hutton died for nothin'
Don't it make you get teary? The world looks dreary
When you wipe your eyes, see it clearly
There's no need for you to fear me
If you take your time and hear me
Maybe you can learn to cheer me
It ain't about black or white, ‘cause we human
I hope we see the light before it's ruined; my ghetto gospel

Those who wish to follow me
I welcome with my hands
And the red sun sinks at last
Into the hills of gold
And peace to this young warrior
Without the sound of guns

Tell me, do you see that old lady? Ain't it sad?
Livin' out of bag but she's glad for the little things she has
And over there, there's a lady, crack got her crazy
Guess who's givin' birth to a baby?
I don't trip or let it fade me
From out of the fryin' pan we jump into another form of slavery
Even now I get discouraged
Wonder, if they take it all back, will I still keep the courage?
I refuse to be a role model
I set goals, take control, drink out my own bottles
I make mistakes but learn from every one
And when it's said and done, I bet this brother be a better one
If I upset you, don't stress
Never forget that God isn't finished with me yet
I feel His hand on my brain
When I write rhymes I go blind and let the Lord do his thang
But am I less holy
'Cause I chose to puff a blunt and drink a beer with my homies?
Before we find world peace
We gotta find peace and end the war in the streets
My ghetto gospel

Those who wish to follow me
I welcome with my hands
And the red sun sinks at last
Into the hills of gold
And peace to this young warrior
Without the sound of guns

Lord, can you hear me speak?
To pay the price of bein' hellbound



I shall not fear no man but God
Though I walk through the valley of death
I shed so many tears
If I should die before I wake
Please God walk with me
Grab a nigga and take me to Heaven

Back in elementary, I thrived on misery
Left me alone, I grew up amongst a dyin' breed
Inside my mind couldn't find a place to rest
Until I got that Thug Life tatted on my chest
Tell me, can you feel me? I'm not livin' in the past
You wanna last? Be the first to blast
Remember Kato, no longer with us, he's deceased
Call on the sirens, seen him murdered in the streets
Now he rest in peace
Is there a heaven for a G? Remember me
So many homies in the cemetery, shed so many tears

I suffered through the years
And shed so many tears
Lord, I lost so many peers
And shed so many tears

Now that I'm strugglin' in this business, by any means
Label me greedy gettin' green, but seldom seen
And fuck the world 'cause I'm cursed
I'm havin' visions of leavin' here in a hearse
God, can you feel me?
Take me away from all the pressure and all the pain
Show me some happiness again
I'm goin' blind, I spend my time in this cell, ain't livin' well
I know my destiny is Hell—where did I fail?
My life is in denial and when I die
Baptized in eternal fire, shed so many tears

Lord, I suffered through the years
And shed so many tears
Lord, I lost so many peers
And shed so many tears

Now I'm lost and I'm weary, so many tears
I'm suicidal, so don't stand near me
My every move is a calculated step
To bring me closer to embrace an early death
Now there's nothin' left
There was no mercy on the streets
I couldn't rest, I'm barely standin'
About to go to pieces, screamin' peace
And though my soul was deleted, I couldn't see it
I had my mind full of demons tryin' to break free
They planted seeds and they hatched, sparkin' the flame
Inside my brain like a match, such a dirty game
No memories, just a misery
Paintin' a picture of my enemies killin' me in my sleep
Will I survive 'til the morning to see the sun?
Please Lord, forgive me for my sins, 'cause here I come

I suffered through the years
And shed so many tears
God, I lost so many peers

And Lord knows I tried, been a witness to homicide
Seen drive-by's takin' lives, little kids die
Wonder why as I walk by
Broken-hearted as I glance at the chalk line, gettin' high
This ain't the life for me, I wanna change
But ain't no future bright for me, I'm stuck in the game
I'm trapped inside a maze
See this Tanqueray influenced me to gettin' crazy
Disillusioned lately, I've been really wantin' babies
So I could see a part of me that wasn't always shady
Don't trust my lady 'cause she's a product of this poison
I'm hearin' noises, think she's fuckin' all my boys
Can't take no more, I'm fallin' to the floor
Beggin' for the Lord to let me in to Heaven's door
Shed so many tears

Lord, lost so many peers
And shed so many tears
I lost so many peers
And shed so many tears
Lord, I suffered many years
And shed so many tears
God, I lost so many peers
And shed so many tears



Shit, you mothafuckin' right!
I'm the bitch that's keepin' it live and keepin' it hot
When you punk-ass niggas don't
Nigga, westside! What?! Bring it on!

Look for me, lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Doing 85 when we ride
Trapped in this world of sin
Born as a ghetto child, raised in this whirlwind

Our childhood years recall the tears, heart laced with venom
Smokin' sherm, drinkin' malt liquor — father, forgive 'em
Me and my girlfriend, hustlin'
Fell in love with the struggle
Hands on the steering wheel, blush while she bail out bustin'
Fuck 'em all, watch 'em fall screamin'
Automatic gunfire exorcisin' all demons
My mafioso messiah, my congregation high, ready to die
We bail out to take the jail back, niggas united
Our first date, couldn't wait to see you naked
Touch you in every secret place
I could hardly wait to bust freely
Got you red-hot, you so happy to see me
Make the front page, prime time, live on TV
Nigga, my girlfriend, baby 45 but she still live
One shot make a nigga's heartbeat stop

What?! I'm bustin' on you punk-ass niggas
Run, nigga, run! I'm on yo' ass, nigga
Run, nigga! Duck and hide
When I'm bustin' on all you bitches!
Run, nigga! Yeah, west side!
Uh! Uh! Uh! Die, nigga, die!

When niggas act bitch-made she got the heart to fight
Nigga, my girlfriend, though we separated at times
I knew deep inside, baby girl would always be mine
Picked you up when you was 9
Started out my life of crime with you
Bought you some shells when you turned 22
It's true, nothin' compares to the satisfaction

All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend
All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend

I was too immature to understand your ways
Inexperienced back in the days
Caused so many arguments and strays
Now I realize how to treat you, the secret to keep you
Being faithful, ‘cause now cheating's lethal
We're closer than the hands of time
Deeper than the drive of mankind
I trust you dearly, I shoot blind
In time I clock figures, droppin' niggas as we rise
We all soldiers in God's eyes
Now it's time for war; never leave me, baby
I'm paranoid, sleepin' with you loaded by my bedside, crazy
Jealous when you hang with the fellas, I wait patiently alone
Anticipated for the moment you come home
I'm waitin' by the phone, this is true love, I can feel it
I've had a lot of women in my bed, but you the realest
So if you ever need me, call, I'll be there through it all

All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend
All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend

I love finger-fuckin' you, all of a sudden I'm hearin' thunder
When you bust a nut, niggas be duckin' or takin' numbers
Love to watch you at a block party, beggin' for drama
While unleashin' on the old-timers, that's on my mama
I would trade my life for yours, behind closed doors
The only girl that I adore, everything I'm askin' for
Talkin' to me, beggin' me to just take you around
Seventeen, like Brandy you just wanna be down
Talkin' loud when I tell you be quiet
You move the crowd, bustin' rounds, activatin' a riot
That's why I love you so, no control, down to roll, unleash
After a hit you, break apart, then back to one piece
Much love to my one and only girlfriend, the world is ours
Just hold me down, baby, witness the power
Never leave a nigga alone, I love you black or chrome

All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend
All I need in this life of sin
Is me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Just me and my girlfriend
All I need in this life of sin
Me and my girlfriend
Down to ride to the bloody end
Me and my girlfriend

Lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Doin' 85 when we ride
Trapped in this world of sin
Born as a ghetto child, raised in this whirlwind
Look for me, lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Doin' 85 when we ride
Trapped in this world of sin
Born as a ghetto child, raised in this whirlwind
Look for me, lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Doin' 85 when we ride
Trapped in this world of sin
Born as a ghetto child, raised in this whirlwind
Look for me, lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Look for me, lost in the whirlwind
'96 Bonnie and Clyde, me and my girlfriend
Me and my girlfriend



Turn it up loud
Hahaha, ahahaha, hey man
You a little sucker for love, right?
Word up, hahahahaha

I shoulda seen
You was trouble right from the start, taught me so many lessons
How not to mess with broken hearts, so many questions
When this began we was the perfect match, perhaps
We had some problems but we workin at it, and now
The arguments are gettin' loud, I wanna stay
But I can't help from walkin' out just throw it away
Just take my hand and understand, if you could see
I never planned to be your man it just wasn't me
But now I'm searchin' for commitment, in other arms
I wanna shelter you from harm, don't be alarmed
Your attitude was the cause, you got me stressin'
Soon as I open up the door with your jealous questions
Like where can I be you're killin' me with your jealousy
Now my ambition's to be free
I can't breathe, cause soon as I leave, it's like a trap
I hear you callin' me to come back, I'm a sucka for love

What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up
What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up

Just when I thought I broke away and I'm feelin' happy
You try to trap me say you pregnant and guess who the daddy
Don't wanna fall for it, but in this case what could I do? So now I'm back
To makin promises to you, tryin to keep it true
What if I'm wrong, a trick to keep me holdin on
Tryin' to be strong and in the process, keep you goin
I'm bout to lose my composure, I'm gettin' close
To packin' up and leavin' notes, and gettin' ghost
Tell me who knows, a peaceful place where I can go
To clear my head I'm feelin low, losin control
My heart is sayin' leave, oh what a tangle web we weave
When we conspire to conceive, and now
You gettin' calls at the house, guess you cheatin'
That's all I need to hear cause I'm leavin', I'm out the do'
Never no more will you see me, this is the end
Cause now I know you've been cheatin, I'm a sucka for love

What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up
What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up

Now he left you with scars, tears on your pillow and you still stay
As you sit and pray, hoping the beatings'll go away
It wasn't always a hit and run relationship
It use to be love, happiness and companionship
Remember when I treated you good
I moved you up to the hills, out the ills of the ghetto hood
Me and you a happy home, when it was on
I had a love to call my own
I shoulda seen you was trouble but I was lost, trapped in your eyes
Preoccupied with gettin' tossed, no need to lie
You had a man and I knew it, you told me
Don't worry bout it we can do it now I'm under pressure
Make a decision cause I'm waitin', when I'm alone
I'm on the phone havin' secret conversations, huh
I wanna take your misery, replace it with happiness
But I need your faith in me, I'm a sucka for love

What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up
What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up

What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up
What you won't do, do for love
You tried everything, but you don't give up
You tried everything, but you don't give up
You tried everything, but you don't give up
Do for love, yeah baby yeah
Do for love



To my niggas that went out in line on duty
21-gun salute! One love, one thug, one nation
All the time I be…

Hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio gettin' blowed
To the truest shit I ever spoke

21-gun salute, dressed in fatigues, black jeans and boots
Disappeared in the crowd, all you seen was troops
This little nigga named Nas think he live like me
Talking 'bout he left the hospital, took five like me
You live in fantasies, nigga, I reject your deposit
We shook Dre punk ass, now he out of the closet
Mobb Deep wonder why a nigga blowed 'em out
Next time grown folks talk, nigga, close your mouth!
Peep me, I take this war shit deeply
Done seen too many real players fall
To let these bitch niggas beat me
Puffy, let's be honest, you a punk or you will see me with gloves
Remember that shit you said to Vibe about me bein' a thug?
And you can tell the people you roll with whatever you want
But you and I know what's goin' on
Payback, I knew you bitch niggas from way back
Witness me strapped with MAC's, knew I wouldn't play that
All you old rappers tryin' to advance
It's all over now, take it like a man
Flabby and sick
Tryin' to player hate on my shit, you eat a fat dick
Let it be known, this is how you made me
Lovin' how I got you niggas crazy

Against all odds, hopin' my thug motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio, gettin' blowed
To the truest shit I ever spoke
Against all odds, hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote

I heard he was light-skinned, stocky, with a Haitian accent
Jewelry, fast cars and he's known for flashin'
Listen while I take you back and lace this rap
A real live tale about a snitch named Haitian Jack
Knew he was workin' for the feds
Same crime, different trials, nigga, picture what he said
And did I mention?
Promised to payback, Jimmy Henchman, in due time
I know you bitch niggas is listenin', the world is mine
Set me up, wet me up, niggas stuck me up
Heard the guns bust, but you tricks never shut me up
Touch one of mine, on everything I love
I'll destroy everything you touch
Play the game, nigga; all out warfare, eye for eye
Now you gotta watch your back, now watch your front
Here we come, gunshots to Tut, now you stuck
Fuck the rap game, nigga, this M.O.B.
So believe me, we enemies, I go against all odds

I'm hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio, gettin' blowed
To the truest shit I ever spoke
I'm hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote; against all odds

Puffy gettin' bribed like a bitch, to hide that fact
He did some shit he shouldn't have did, so we ridin' for that
And that nigga that was down for me, restin' dead
Switched sides, guess his new friends wanted him dead
Probably be murdered for the shit that I said
I bring the real, be a legend, breathin' or dead
Lord, listen to me, God don't like ugly, it was written
Ayo, Nas, your whole damn style is bitten
You heard my melody, read about my life in the papers
All my run-ins with authorities, felonious capers
Now you wanna live my life
So what's a "Hausa," Nas? Niggas that don't rhyme right
You've seen too many movies
Load 'em up against the wall, close his eyes
Since you lie you die — goodbye!
Let the real live niggas hear the truth from me
What would you do if you was me? Nigga

Hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio gettin' blowed
To the truest shit I ever spoke
Against all odds, hopin' my true motherfuckers know
This be the realest shit I ever wrote
Against all odds, up in the studio gettin' blowed
To the truest shit I ever spoke; against all odds

21-gun salute, one love to my true thug niggas
21-gun salute to my niggas that die in the line of duty
Representin' to the fullest, bein' soldiers with military minds
That play the rules of the game, 21-gun salute
I salute you, my niggas, stay strong
I ride for you, I rhyme for you, I roll for you, it's all for you
To all you bitch-made niggas, I'm comin' for you
Against all odds, I don't care who the fuck you is
You touch me I'm at you
I know you motherfuckers didn't think I forgot
Hell nah, I ain't forgot, nigga
I just remember what you told me
You said don't go to war unless I got my money right
I got my money right now, now I want war



“Street Science, you’re on the air. What do you feel when you hear a record like 2Pac’s new one?”
“I love 2Pac’s new record.”

To live and die in L.A., California
What you say about Los Angeles?
Still the only place for me
It never rains in Southern California

To live and die in L.A.
Where everyday we try to fatten our pockets
Us niggas hustle for the cash, so it's hard to knock it
Everybody got they own thing, currency chasin'
Worldwide through the hard times, worrying faces
Shed tears as we bury niggas close to heart
Who was a friend is now a ghost in the dark
Cold-hearted 'bout it, nigga got smoked by a fiend
Tryin' to floss on him, blind to a broken man's dream
A hard lesson, court cases keep me guessin'
Plea bargain ain't an option now, so I'm stressin'
Cost me more to be free than a life in the pen
Makin' money off of cuss words, writin' again
Learn how to think ahead, so I fight with my pen
Late night down sunset, likin' the scene
What's the worst they could do to a nigga?
Got me lost in Hell, to live and die in L.A. on bail

My angel sing
To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
And the angels go
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see
To live and die in L.A.
To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see

It's the city of angels and constant danger
South Central L.A. can't get no stranger
Full of drama, like a soap opera, on the curb
Watchin' the ghetto bird helicopters, I observe
So many niggas gettin' three strikes, tossed in jail
I swear, the pen right across from hell
I can't cry, ‘cause it's on now
I'm just a nigga on his own now
Livin' life thug style, so I can't smile
Writing to my peoples when they ask for pictures
Thinkin' Cali just fun and bitches
Better learn about the dress code, B's and C's
All them other niggas copycats, these is G's
I love Cali like I love women
‘Cause every nigga in L.A. got a little bit of thug in him
We might fight amongst each other
Get us pissed, to live and die in L.A

My angel sing
To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
And the angels go
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see
To live and die in L.A.
To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see

It wouldn't be L.A. without Mexicans
Black love, brown pride, and the sets again
Pete Wilson tryin' to see us all broke
I'm on some bullshit out for everything they owe
Remember K-day? Weekends, Crenshaw, MLK?
Automatics rang free, niggas lost they way
Gang signs being shown, nigga, love your hood
But recognize and it's all good
Where the weed at? Niggas gettin' shermed out
Snoop Dogg in this mothafucka permed out
M.O.B., Big Suge in the Lo-Lo, bounce and turn
Dogg Pound in the Lex with a ounce to burn
Got them Watts niggas with me, O.F.T.B.
They got some hash, took the stash, left the rest for me
Neckbone, Tray, Heron, Big Buntry too
Big Rock got knocked, but this one's for you
I hit the studio and drop a jewel, hopin' it pay
Gettin' high, watchin' time fly; to live and die in L.A

To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
Let my angel sing
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see
And my angels go
To live and die in L.A., it's the place to be
To live and die in L.A.
You've got to be there to know it
When everybody wanna see
Let my angel sing

All the radio stations that be bumpin' my shit
Makin' my shit sells katruple quitraple platinum
This go out to all the magazines that support a nigga
All the real motherfuckers
All the stores, the mom and pop spots
A&R people, all y'all mothafuckers
L.A., "California Love" part mothafuckin' two
Without gay ass Dre



Shit, tired of gettin' shot at
Tired of gettin' chased by the police and arrested
Niggas need a spot where we can kick it
A spot where we belong, that's just for us
Niggas ain't gotta get all dressed up and be Hollywood
Y'knahmean? Where do niggas go when we die?
Ain't no heaven for a thug nigga
That's why we go to thug mansion
That's the only place where thugs get in free
And you gotta be a G, at thug mansion

A place to spend my quiet nights, time to unwind
So much pressure in this life of mine, I cry at times
I once contemplated suicide, and woulda tried
But when I held that 9, all I could see was my mama's eyes
No one knows my struggle, they only see the trouble
Not knowin' it's hard to carry on when no one loves you
Picture me inside the misery of poverty
No man alive has ever witnessed struggles I survived
Prayin' hard for better days, promise to hold on
Me and my dawgs ain't have a choice but to roll on
We found a finally spot to kick it
Where we can drink liquor and no one bickers over trick shit
A spot where we can smoke in peace, and even though we G's
We still visualize places that we can roll in peace
And in my mind's eye, I see this place the players go and pass it
I got a spot for us all, so we can ball, at thug's mansion

Ain't no place I'd rather be
Chillin' with homies and family
Sky high, iced out, paradise in the sky
Ain't no place I'd rather be
Only place that's right for me
Chromed-out, mansion in paradise, in the sky

Will I survive all the fights and the darkness?
Dear departed, I shed tattooed tears
And couldn't sleep good for multiple years
Witness peers catch gunshots; nobody cares
Seen the politicians ban us, they'd rather see us locked in chains
Please explain why they can't stand us
Is there a way for me to change?
Or am I just a victim of things I did to maintain?
I need a place to rest my head
With the little bit of homeboys that remains
‘Cause all the rest dead; is there a spot for us to roll?
If you find it, I'll be right behind ya, show me and I'll go
How can I be peaceful? I'm comin' from the bottom
Watch my daddy scream "Peace!" while the other man shot him
I need a house that's full of love, when I need to escape
The deadly places slingin' drugs, in thug's mansion

Ain't no place I'd rather be
Chillin' with homies and family
Sky high, iced out, paradise in the sky
Ain't no place I'd rather be
Only place that's right for me
Chromed-out, mansion in paradise, in the sky

Dear Mama, don't cry, your baby boy's doin' good
Tell the homies I'm in Heaven and they ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night, it had me shook
Drinkin' peppermint Schnapps, with Jackie Wilson and Sam Cooke
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin' there kickin' it with Malcolm 'til the day came
Little Latasha sho' grown
Tell the lady in the liquor store that she's forgiven, so come home
Maybe in time you'll understand
Only God can save us, when Miles Davis cuttin' lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past
That passed on, they in Heaven, found peace at last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in Heaven
So right before I sleep, dear God, what I'm askin'
Remember this face, save me a place in thug's mansion

Ain't no place I'd rather be
Chillin' with homies and family
Ain't no place I'd rather be
Only place that's right for me
Ain't no place I'd rather be
Chillin' with homies and family
Ain't no place I'd rather be
Only place that's right for me
Chromed-out, mansion in paradise, in the sky



How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it yeah?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real

I love the way you activate your hips and push your ass out
Got a nigga wantin' it so bad, I'm about to pass out
Wanna dig you, and I can't even lie about it
Baby, just alleviate your clothes, time to fly up out it
Catch you at a club, oh shit, you got me fiendin'
Body talkin' shit to me, but I can't comprehend the meanin'
Now, if you wanna roll with me, then here's your chance
Doin' eighty on the freeway, police, catch me if you can
Forgive me, I'm a rider, still I'm just a simple man
All I want is money, fuck the fame, I'm a simple man
Mr. International, player with the passport
Just like Aladdin, bitch, get you anything you ask for
It's either him or me; Champagne, Hennessy
A favorite of my homies when we floss on our enemies
Witness as we creep to a low speed, peep what a ho need
Puff some mo' weed, funk, ya don't need
Approachin' hoochies with a passion, been a long day
But I've been driven by attraction in a strong way
Your body is bangin', baby, I love it when you flaunt it
Time to give it to daddy, nigga, now tell me how you want it

How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real

Tell me is it cool to fuck?
Did you think I come to talk? Am I a fool or what?
Positions on the floor, it's like erotic
Ironic, 'cause I'm somewhat psychotic
I'm hittin' switches on bitches
Like I been fixed with hydraulics
Up and down like a roller coaster
I'm up inside ya, I ain't quittin' 'til the show is over
'Cause I'm a rider, in and out just like a robbery
I'll probably be a freak and let you get on top of me
Get her rockin' these, nights full of Alize
A livin' legend you ain't heard about
These niggas play these Cali days
C. Delores Tucker, you's a motherfucker
Instead of tryin' to help a nigga, you destroy a brother
Worse than the others; Bill Clinton, Mister Bob Dole
You're too old to understand the way the game's told
You're lame so I gotta hit you with the hot facts
Once I'm released, I'm makin' millions, nigga, top that
They wanna censor me; they'd rather see me in a cell
Livin' in hell, only a few of us'll live to tell
Now everybody talkin' about us, I could give a fuck
I'd be the first one to bomb and cuss
Nigga, tell me how you want it

How do you want it?
How do you  feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you  feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real

Raised as a youth, tell the truth
I got the scoop on how to get a bulletproof
Because I jumped from the roof before I was a teenager
Mobile phone, Skypager, game rules, I'm livin' major
My adversaries is lookin' worried
They paranoid of gettin' buried
One of us gon' see the cemetery
My only hope to survive if I wish to stay alive
Gettin' high, see the demons in my eyes, before I die
I wanna live my life and ball, make a couple million
And then I'm chillin', fade 'em all
These taxes got me crossed up and people tryin' to sue me
Media is in my business and they actin' like they know me
But I'ma mash out and peel out
I’m with a clique that’s quick to whip that fuckin' steel out
Yeah nigga, it's some new shit so better get up on it
When you see me, tell a nigga how you want it
How do you want it?

How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real

Me and my Nigga Johnny J...yeah we out

How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real
How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real

How do you want it?
How do you feel?
Comin' up as a nigga in the cash game
Livin' in the fast lane, I'm for real



'Pac
What's happening
Not motherfucking double R, Richie baby
What's happening baby, you know how we do it
Yeah nigga, you know I'm up out this bitch
It's time for me to uhhh regulate
Fo' sho', hey
Observe
And you ain't going back?
Nah nah nah, we got to show these motherfuckers whassup though
This is for the honeys, the superstar
I don't want to be her man, I want to be her nigga
You feel me?
Well let 'em know

You fucking with niggas that's insecure
Watered down, my shit is pure
Write down my number but don't call me 'til you sure
I ain't begging just trying to relocate between your legs
Dripping wet, as we experiment in sweaty sex
When you met me you wouldn't let me, and now
You straight begging to sex me got you undressing to test me and uhh..

Shut me down if you want, and miss the chance to do it live
When I stroll by, I see that look in yo' eye
You want a nigga, but think that you can't have a nigga
Don't cheat yourself, instead treat yourself
If you scared, go to church, I know it hurts
To find out me and your man be sharing skirts

I'm hoping you don't take this the wrong way
But your body is banging, got me attracted in a strong way
After a long day of trying to make my songs pay
Making love all day against the wall in the hallway
Your fantasies come alive, your heart rate
Shall increase when we meet up in this dark place
You might think you're happy with him
But that's a lie, so give this thug a try
I'd rather be ya nigga

I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
These busters ain't loving you right
I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life

Look, now you was sprung from the introduction
My conversation's full of game yet laced with seductions
I see you blushing like you want something, come get a taste
Of Amerikaz Most Wanted and let's get into some touching, erotic fuckin'
My up and down with no interruptions
Have no intentions of busting until you learn your lesson
Now many questions are often asked, a drop top, 500 Benz
And plenty cash, to help a nigga get the ass

You can ride out with spoke coke, to get your lobster and crab
Cause all I got is conversation and a gang of stab
And I'ma listen when it hurts, I'ma hang out but never stay
Smoke blunts but leave them stunts up to Super Dave
I'll be your nigga, as long as we can understand
That I's the nigga and spoke coke can be the man
He wine and dine, but me and you we whine and grind
And when I'm on the field keep you on the sidelines

I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
Them busters ain't loving you right
I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
Them busters ain't loving you right

Now it's time for the moment of truth, I got you naked
Totally sweating, let's see how hot I can make it
Tongue kissing 'til yo' head swang
I'm so into you, witness a nigga make the bed bang
If it's all mine, then let me know
Now scream my name out; do you want it fast or shall I hit it slow?
Not to mention, the multiple positions I inflict
A boss player, freaky motherfucker, can I dig?

It's on and popping, now you see what I was seeing
Why your eyes rolling? Loosen up, girl, I ain't going
Nowhere, let's let that sucker stay out there
While he's stressed out and knock I stretch out the cock
Hold the boots, and let a nigga execute
And though you got it right, I'm going home tonight
You say you don't need a man, but I don't care
You're in the presence of a player, I'd rather be ya nigga

I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
These busters ain't loving you right
So I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
These busters ain't loving you right
I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A
So we can get drunk and smoke weed all day
It don't matter if you lonely baby, you need a thug in your life
These busters ain't loving you right
I'd rather be ya N-I-G-G-A



The blind stares of a million pairs of eyes
Lookin' hard but won't realize
That they will never see the P!
You must be goin' blind

Give me my money in stacks and lace my bitches with dime figures
Real niggas fingers on nickel-plated 9 triggers
Must see my enemies defeated
I catch 'em while they coked up and weeded
Open fire, now them niggas bleedin'
See me in flesh and test and get your chest blown
Straight out the West, don't get blown
My adversaries cry like hoes, open and shut like doors
Is you a friend or foe? Nigga, you ain't know?
They got me stressed out on Death Row
I've seen money, but baby, I've gots to get mo'
You screamin', "Go 2Pac!" and I ain't stoppin' till I'm well-paid
Bail's paid now, nigga, look what hell made
Visions of cops and sirens, niggas open fire
Bunch of Thug Life niggas on the rise, until I die
Ask me why I'm a boss player gettin' high
And when I'm rollin' by niggas can't see me!

The stares of a million pairs of eyes
And you'll never realize
You can't see me

Been gettin' word that these square motherfuckers with nerves
Sayin' they can get with us, but picture me gettin' served
My own mama say I'm thugged out
My shit be bumpin' out the record store as if it was a drug house
My lyrics bang like a Crip or Blood
Nigga what! It ain't nothin' but a party when we thug
And there I was, a young nigga with heart, ain't had shit to lose
Pullin' my pistol on them fools, you know the rules
D-R-E, you got me heated; my words like a penitentiary dick
Hittin' bitches where it's most needed
Money and weed, Alizé and Hennessy
Bail on these hoes in floss-mode
The life of a boss player, fuck what you thought though
My enemies deceased
Die like a bitch when my album hit the streets; niggas can't see me!

Niggas can't see me
They can't see me
Which way did he go, George?
Which way did he go?
Oh!! Which way did he go?
Which way did he go?

You niggas made a mistake
You shoulda never put my rhymes with Dre
Them thug niggas have arrived and it's judgement day
Hey homie, if you feel me
Tell them tricks that shot me that they missed, they ain't kill me
I can make a motherfucker shake, rattle and roll
I'm full of liquor, thug nigga, quick to jab at them hoes
And I can make you jealous niggas famous
Fuck around with 2Pac and see how good a nigga's aim is
I'm just a rich motherfucker from the way
If this rappin' bring me money, then I'm rappin' till I'm paid
I'm gettin' green like I'm supposed to
Nigga, I holla at these hoes and see how many I can go through
Look to the star and visualize my debut
Niggas know me, player, I gotta stay true
Don't be a dumb motherfucker 'cause it's crazy after dark
Where the true thug-niggas see your heart; niggas can't see me!


Niggas can't see me
Right before your eyes, I'll disappear from here
You niggas can't see me
You can't see me
I know it's hard nigga, I'm all up in your face
But you still can't see me
You can't see me
All up in your range, but niggas can't see me
20/20 vision won't visualize
I'm in the flesh, baby, but you can't see me
All those glasses won't help you realize
You blinded, you blinded, you can't see me
You can't see me

Thug Life, baby
Don't believe everything you read!
Alizé and weed
You can't see me, right before your very eyes
You won't even visualize, you can't see me
Dr. Dre all day, 2Pac
Niggas can't see me
I dedicate this to you punk motherfuckers!
This one's for you, BIG baby
'Cause you bitch-ass niggas can't see me
Niggas can't see me
You can't see me

See no evil, hear no evil, speak no evil
You won't see me
Yeah, first see me, now you don't
Wanna see me, but you won't
Come to see me, but you can't
Oh, you can't see me, you can't see me
Right between your eyes and you'll never realize
Right before your eyes, you won't even realize
Visualize what you can't see



It's all about you, one time!
Haha, for the bitches that think it's all about you
With my boy 'Pizznac, you know what I'm sayin'?)
It's all about you
But you know I'm lyin' though, hah! Yeah)

You probably crooked as the last trick
Want to laugh about how I got my ass caught up
With this bad bitch?
Thinkin' I had her, but she had me in the long run
It's just my luck, I'm stuck with fuckin' with the wrong one
Wise decisions, based on lies we livin'
Scandalous times, this game's like my religion
You could be rollin' with a thug
Instead you with this weak scrub, lookin' for some love
In every club, I see you starin' like you want it
Well, baby, if you got it, better flaunt it
Let the liquor help you get up on it
I'm still tipsy from last night
Bumpin' these walls as I pause, addicted to the fast life
I try to holla, but you tell me you taken
Sayin' you ain't impressed with the money I'm makin'
Guess it's true what they tellin' me
Fresh out of jail, life's hell for a black celebrity
So that's the reason why I call, and maybe you with it
Fantasies of us kissin', can I hit it?
Addicted to the things you do
But still true what I'm sayin', boo, ‘cause this is all about you

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Yeah, nigga
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho

I make a promise if you go with me, just let me know
I'll have you hollerin' my name out before I leave
Nobody loves me, I'm a thug nigga
I only hung out with the criminals and drug dealers
I love niggas, ‘cause we comin' from the same place
Witness me holla at a hoochie
See how quick the game takes
How can I tell her I'm a playa? And I don't even care
Creep low, weed smoke's in the air
Everywhere I go, it's all about the groupie hoes
Waitin' for niggas at the end of every show
I just seen you in my friend's video
Could never put a bitch before my friends, so here we go
Follow the leader and peep the drama that I'm goin' through
It's all about you, yeah, nigga, it's all about you

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho

Is you sick from the dick, or is it the flu?
It ain't about you or your bitch-ass crew
Every other city we go and every video
Explain to a nigga why I see the same shitty ho
You think it's all about you? Well, boo
I gets down like Dru, and my nasty new niggas, too

You couldn't hold me back, it'd take a fatter track
A lyrical attack, perhaps, it was a visual bluff
When I started to snaps all your rode 'em swoll
Straight in control, flows'll fold, while hoes cold stroll
Hold the set, I told Dramacy' go in next
Gold diggin', cold diggin' a gold Rolex

I slide in easily, try a grizzly
Sluts know the cuts, I came to fuck, try skeezin' me
Runnin' up in ya just like Bruce Jenner when I bend ya
At the most, I fucked a bitch
From the West Coast to West Virginia

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Every other city we go, every other video
No matter where I go, I see the same ho

I'm tellin' ya, it's the same old shit
I mean, goddamn, you know what I'm sayin'?
I'm sittin' back, watchin' Montell Jordan video
I see the same bitch who was in my homeboy Nate Dogg video, then I flip the channel
I'm checkin' out my homeboy 2Pac video
I see the same bitch that was in my video, you knahmsayin'?
And then, you nahmsayin', what make that even mo' fucked up, I'm watchin' a Million Man March
And I see the same bitch, on the Million Man March
That was in the homeboy Warren G video
I mean, damn, everywhere I look
Everywhere I go, I see the same ho'
Don't get mad, I'm only bein' real, yeah



Brenda's got a baby

I hear Brenda's got a baby, but Brenda's barely got a brain
A damn shame, the girl can hardly spell her name
"That's not our problem, that's up to Brenda's family"
Well, let me show you how it affects our whole community
Now Brenda really never knew her moms
And her dad was a junkie, puttin' death into his arms
It's sad, 'cause I bet Brenda doesn't even know
Just 'cause you're in the ghetto doesn't mean you can't grow
But oh, that's a thought, my own revelation
Do whatever it takes to resist the temptation
Brenda got herself a boyfriend
Her boyfriend was her cousin, now let's watch the joy end
She tried to hide her pregnancy, from her family
Who really didn't care to see, or give a damn if she
Went out and had a church of kids
As long as when the check came they got first dibs
Now Brenda's belly's gettin' bigger
But no one seems to notice any change in her figure
She's twelve years old and she's havin' a baby
In love with a molester, who's sexin' her crazy
And yet and she thinks that he'll be with her forever
And dreams of a world where the two of them are together
Whatever, he left her and she had the baby solo
She had it on the bathroom floor and didn't know, so
She didn't know what to throw away and what to keep
She wrapped the baby up and threw him in a trash heap
I guess she thought she'd get away, wouldn't hear the cries
She didn't realize how much the little baby had her eyes
Now the baby's in the trash heap, bawlin'
Momma can't help her, but it hurt to hear her callin'
Brenda wants to run away
Momma say you makin' me lose pay
There's social workers here every day
Now Brenda's gotta make her own way
Can't go to her family, they won't let her stay
No money, no babysitter, she couldn't keep a job
She tried to sell crack but end up gettin' robbed
So now, what's next? There ain't nothin' left to sell
So she sees sex as a way of leavin' hell
It's payin' the rent, so she really can't complain
Prostitute, found slain, and Brenda's her name
She's got a baby



Did you hear about the rose that grew from a crack
in the concrete
Proving nature's laws wrong it learned 2 walk
without having feet
Funny it seems, but by keeping its dreams
it learned 2 breathe fresh air
Long live the rose that grew from concrete
when no one else even cared!



Starin' at the world through my rearview
Just lookin' back at the world
From another level, you know what I mean? Starin'

Multiple gunshots clear the block, the fun stops
Snitches is callin' cops, people shot, nobody stops
I wonder when the world stopped carin'
Last night two kids shot while the whole block starin'
I will never understand this society
First they try to murder me, then they lie to me
Product of a dyin' breed; all my homies tryin' weed
Now the little babies crazed, raised off Hennessy
Tell me, will my enemies flee when they see me?
Believe me, even thugs gotta learn to take it easy
Listen, through the intermissions, search your heart for a plan
And we turnin' bad boys to grown men, it's on again
I give a holla to my niggas in the darkest corners
Roll a perfect blunt, and let me spark it for ya
One love from a thug nigga
Rollin' with a posse full of paranoid drug dealers
To the end, my friend, I'm seein' nothin' but my dreams comin' true
While I'm starin' at the world through my rearview
See, I'm seein' nothin' but my dreams comin' true
While I'm starin' at the world through my rearview

They got me starin' at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast 'cause it's time to die
Gettin' high, watchin' time fly
And all my motherfuckers
Starin' at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast 'cause it's time to die
Gettin' high, watchin' time fly
And all my motherfuckers

Now you see him, now you don't
Some niggas be here for the moment, and then they gone
What happened to 'em?
Well, let's see, it seems to be a mystery
But all I know I never let the money get to me
Stay down like the truest
Thug Life until I check out this bitch, I thought you knew this
Who is gonna catch me when I fall or even care to?
While you thinkin' I see you lost up in my rearview
Hear you is down with them Outlawz
Outcast, left far, I'm through like southpaws
But still we keep mashin' until our dreams come through
Starin' at the world through my rearview

Now, I was raised as a young black male
In order to get paid, forced to make crack sales
Caught a nigga so they send me to these overpacked jails
In the cell, countin' days in this livin' black hell
Do you feel me? Keys to ignition, use at your discretion
Roll with a 12 gauge pump for protection
Niggas hate me in the section, from years of chin-checkin'
Turn to Smith & Wesson war weapons
Heavenly Father, I'm a soldier
I'm gettin' hotter 'cause the world's gettin' colder
All you bustas best to run, look at my bitches!

Now I know the answers to the question
“Do dreams come true?”
Still starin' at the world through my rearview
I said, now I know the answer
“Do dreams come true?”
Starin' at the world through my rearview
Nigga Kadafi say

Back in the days we hustled for sneakers and beepers
Nine-six for Glocks
'Cause fiends hittin' up blocks with street sweepers
Bless myself when knowin' rules to these streets
Somethin' I learned in school
On some Million Man March shit for the piece
True that, only one life to lead, a fast life of greed
Criminally addicted, infested since a seed
We all die, breed, bleed like humans
Towns run by young guns, Outlawz and truants
Shit's deep, turn eighteen, burn my will when I go
Burnt my body with my shotty, or chosin' my dough
So while you reminiscin' all nights out with the crew
Smoke a blunt for me too, I'm starin' through your rearview





My niggas look mad
Y'all supposed to be happy I'm free!
Y'all niggas look like y'all wanted me to stay in jail
Ho bustas!

Picture me rollin' in my 500 Benz
I got no love for these niggas, there's no need to be friends
They got me under surveillance
That's what somebody be tellin'
"Know there's dope bein' sold," but I ain't the one sellin'
Don't want to be another number
I gotta puff a gang of weed to keep from goin' under
The federales wanna see me dead
Niggas put prices on my head
Now I got two Rottweilers by my bed, I feed 'em lead
Now I'm released, how will I live?
Will God forgive me for all the dirt a nigga did, to feed kids?
One life to live, it's so hard to be positive
When niggas shootin' at your crib
Mama, I'm still thuggin', the world is a war zone
My homies is inmates, and most of them dead wrong
Full grown, finally a man, just schemin' on ways
To put some green inside the palms of my empty hands
Just picture me rollin'
Flossin' a Benz on rims that isn't stolen
My dreams is censored, my hopes are gone
I'm like a fiend that finally sees when all the dope is gone
My nerves is wrecked, heart beatin'
And my hands are swollen
Thinkin' of the G's I'll be holdin'; picture me rollin'

Picture me rollin'
Picture me rollin'
Picture me, picture me rollin'
Picture me rollin'
Ooh wee

Can you see me now?
Move to the side a little bit so you can get a clear picture
Can you see it?
Picture me rollin'
Yeah, nigga!
Aye, but peep how my nigga Syke do it to you
Guess who's back?

I got ki's comin' from overseas
Cost a nigga 200 G's
I'm a street commando, Nino for example
This lavish lifestyle is hard to handle
So I got to floss 'cause I'm more like a boss player
Thug, branded to be a women-layer
So many player haters, imitators steady swangin'
Make me wanna start back bangin'
So I'm caught up in the game, dress code changed
Packin' 40 Glocks, contain 'em or rearrange
All that jealousy and envy comin' from my enemies
While I'm sippin' on Rémy
In front of black Lexus, Chevy's on the roam
'96 big body, sittin' on chrome
As we head up out the zone, stone-facin' is on
You can admire, but don't look too long
I'm livin' a dream with triple beams and my pockets bulgin'
It's hard to imagine, picture me rollin'

Picture me rollin'
Picture, picture me rollin'
Picture me rollin'
Picture me rollin'
Picture me

I gots to get the fuck up in it, formulate a caper
'Cause a nigga straight sufferin' from lack of havin' paper
My bitch fin' to have a bastard, see?
So I needs to hit a lick, drastically
I see some ballin'-ass niggas, and they slippin' in my spot
Checkin' in the park, 'Pac

We caught him sleepin'
He didn't peep you niggas creepin'?
This how we do it every weekend
I dump for madness, it's time to count the profit
CPO, you got the bomb spot
Nigga, time to clock it
I get the liquor, and you can get the females
This crooked shit that we inflictin', gettin' street sales

Move smooth as a motherfucker, me and my 9
I'm cool as a motherfucker, I'ma get mine
Now we satisfied, got the pockets on swoll
Boss Hogg and this 'Pac nigga, picture us rollin'

Picture me rollin'
Picture me
Picture me rollin'
Picture me rollin'

Is y'all ready for me?
Picture me rollin' roll call
You know there's some muh'fuckers out there
I just could not forget about
I wanna make sure they can see me
All you bitch-ass CO's
Can you niggas see me from there?
Ballin' on y'all punk-ass!
Picture me rollin', baby!
Yeah, all them niggas up in them cell blocks
I told y'all niggas when I come home it's on
That's right, nigga, picture me rollin'
Oh, I forgot! The DA
Yeah, that bitch had a lot to talk about in court
Can the ho see me from here?
Can you see me, ho? Picture me rollin'
And all you punk police, can you see me?
Am I clear to you?
Picture me rollin', nigga, legit
Free like O.J. all day, you can't stop me
You know I got my niggas up in this motherfucker
Manute, Pain, Syke, Bogart, Mopreme
It's sad, dog, can you picture us rollin'?
Can you see me, ho?
Is y'all ready for me? We up out this bitch
Any time y'all wanna see me again
Rewind this track right here
Close your eyes and picture me rollin'



{Crowd noise}


It's not about East or West
It's about niggas and bitches, power and money, ridaz and punks
Which side are you on?
*gunshots followed by several encroaching footsteps*
These niggas is still fuckin' talkin'?
You niggas still breathin'? Fuckin' roaches, aight
Aight, it's the Raid for you cockroaches

Hysterical, spiritual lyrics like The Holy Qur'an
Niggas get shook like 5-0
My .45 is next to me when we ride, for survival
Money-makin' plans, pistol close at hand, swollen pockets
Let me introduce the topic, then we drop it
Expose snakes ‘cause they breed freely
See me rise, located worldwide like the art of graffiti
I think I'm tougher than Nitti, my attitude is shitty
Born on a dope fiend's titty, in every city
You'll find me, look for trouble right behind me
My Outlaw niggas down to die for me, know what I mean?
I hit the scene, niggas duckin' from my guillotine stare
I'm right there, my every word a fuckin' nightmare
Get me high, let me see the sun rise and fall
This for my dogs down to die for y'all
Extreme venom, no mercy when we all up in ’em
Cut ’em down, to Hell is where we send ’em
My whole team trained to explode, ride or die
Murder motherfuckers lyrically and I'm not gonna cry
Me, a born leader, never leave the block without my heater
Two big pits, I call them my "bitch-nigga eaters"
And not a whimper until I'm gone
Thug Life runnin' through my veins so I'm strong
Bye bye bye, let's get high and ride
Oh, how do we do these niggas, but I'm not gonna cry
I'm a Bad Boy killer, Jay-Z die too
Lookin' out for Mobb Deep, nigga, when I find you
Weak motherfuckers don't deserve to breathe
How many niggas down to die for me? Yay-yay
West Coast rider, comin' right behind ya
Should have never fucked with me
I want money, hoes, sex and weed
I won't rest until my road dog's free – bomb first

We bomb first when we ride
Please reconsider 'fore you die
We ain't even come to hurt nobody tonight
But it's my life or your life, and I'ma bomb first
We bomb first when we ride
Please reconsider 'fore you die
We ain't even come to fight tonight
But it's my life or your life, and I'ma bomb first

For so many days, in so many ways
We've been duckin' strays they delivers
But still we some Bad Boy killers
Got nothin' to lose, I gots nowhere to go
I only got one home, see me stranded on Death Row
With Outlawz, it's Makaveli be the general
And I be a soldier on a mission
Sent to do what you'll never do
And that's ride for the cause, yes I'll die for the cause
You best believe, if I'ma leave this bitch, yo I'm dyin' with yours
Kamikaze, sicker than a motherfuckin' Nazi
Got a little question for that nigga that made "Paparazzi"
If you ain't in this rap game
For the motherfuckin' cash, mane
Then what is your motherfuckin' purpose? None can serve us
E.D.I. Mean, born worthless
That's until the day I decided to bomb first, bitch!

Biatch! Come on, bring it, down with it!
Then we ride
Come on, bring it
Bomb first when we ride
Hey, get that nigga!

Your style wack as ever, like you was rockin' patent leather
Causin' massive terror, y'all niggas lack, you ain't thorough
Half rapper, half drug kingpin
You're tellin' fairy tales, dunn
"King of New York" like you the motherfuckin' one?
But I'm from Jers' and we don't play that shit
From the Clare down to North Bricks
All my niggas flippin’ chips, gettin’ rich, even though it's hard
Tryin' to creep through these halls and brawls
Without scarred by a revolve
With no warning signs, ‘cause yo, my man took five
Now I'm the young one with the 9 ready to put in my time

Shoot first, look at their head, burst bleeding
Don't want to hear no shit this evening, believe me
We bomb first when we ride
Please reconsider 'fore you die
G's and thug niggas on the rise
Plan, plot, strategize, and bomb first
We bomb first when we ride
Please reconsider 'fore you die
G's and thug niggas on the rise
Plan, plot, strategize, and bomb first

{Start of "Hail Mary"}
Let us pray, my niggas
For we have definitely sinned




Perhaps I was addicted to the dark side
Somewhere inside my childhood witnessed my heart die
And even though we both came from the same places
The money and the fame made us all change places
How could it be? Through the misery that came to pass
The hard times make a true friend afraid to ask
For currency, but you could run to me when you need
And I'll never leave, honestly
Someone to believe in, as you can see
It's a small thing to a true, what could I do?
Real homies help you get through
And come to knew he'd do the same thing if he could
‘Cause in the hood, true homies make you feel good
And half the times we be actin' up, call the cops
Bringin' a cease to the peace that was on my block
It never stops, when my mama ask me will I change
I tell her "Yeah," but it's clear
I'll always be the same; until the end of time

So take these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly away, until the end of time
Until the end of time, until the end of time

Please, Lord, forgive me for my life of sin
My hard stare seem to scare all my sister's kids
So you know, I don't hang around the house much
This all night money making got me outta touch
Shit, ain't flashed a smile in a long while
An unexpected birth worst of the ghetto childs
My attitude got me walking solo
Ride out alone in my lo-lo
Watching the whole world move in slow-mo
For quiet times, disappear, listen to the ocean
Smoking 'Ports, think my thoughts, then it's back to coastin'
Who can I trust in this cold world?
My phony homie had a baby by my old girl
But I ain't trippin', I'm a player, I ain't sweatin' him
I sexed his sister, had her mumble like a Mexican
His next of kin, no remorse, it was meant to happen
Besides rappin' the only thing I did good was scrappin'
Until the end of time…

So take these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly away, until the end of time
Until the end of time, until the end of time

Now who's to say if I was right or wrong
To live my life as an outlaw all along?
Remain strong in this planet full of player haters
They conversate, but Death Row full of demonstrators
And in the end, drinking Hennessy
Made all my enemies envy me
So cold when I flow, eliminatin' easily
Falls to they knees, they plead for they right to breathe
When I conceive closer to achieve
In times of danger, don't freeze, time to be a G
Follow my lead, I'll supply everything you need
An ounce of game and the training to make a G
Remember me as an outcast Outlaw
Another album out, that's what I'm about, more
Getting raw 'til the day I see my casket, buried as a G
While the whole world remembers me, until the end of time

So take these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly away, until the end of time
Until the end of time, until the end of time




You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch

Look here, Miss Thang, hate to salt your game
But you's a money-hungry woman and you need to change
In the locker room, all the homies do is laugh
High fives ‘cause another nigga played your ass
It was said you were sleezy, even easy
Sleepin' around for what you need, see
It's your thing, and you can shake it how you wanna
Give it up free or make your money on the corner
But don't be bad, play the game, get mad and change
Then you wonder why these motherfuckers call you names
Still lookin' for a way out, and that's okay
I can see you wanna stray, there's a way out
Keep your mind on your money, enroll in school
And as the years pass by, you can show them fools
But you ain't tryin' to hear me ‘cause you're stuck
You're headin' for the bathroom, 'bout to get tossed up
Still lookin' for a rich man, you dug a ditch
Got your legs up tryin' to get rich
I love you like a sister, but you need to switch
And that's why they called you bitch—I betcha!

You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha, bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch

You leave your kids with your mama
‘Cause your headin' for the club
In a skin-tight miniskirt, lookin' for some love
Got them legs wide open while you're sittin' at the bar
Talkin' to some nigga 'bout his car
I guess he said he had a Lexus, what's next?
You headin' to his car for some sex?
I pass by, can't hold back tears inside
‘Cause Lord knows, for years I tried
And all the other people on my block hate your guts
Then you wonder why they stare and call you slut
It's like your mind don't understand
You don't have to kill your dreams plottin' schemes on a man
Keep your head up, legs closed, eyes open
Either a nigga wear a rubber or he die smokin'
I'm hearin' rumors, so you need to switch
And niggas wouldn't call you bitch—I betcha!

You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha, bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch
I betcha
You wonda why they call you bitch
You wonda why they call you bitch

I guess times gettin' hard, even harder for you
‘Cause hey now, got a baby on the way now
More money from the county, and thanks to the welfare
You're about to get your hair done
Got a dinner date, can't be late
Trick or treat, sweet thang got another trick to meet
The way he did it it was smooth
Plottin' while he gamin' you so, baby, peep the rules
I should've seen it in the first case, the worst case
I should've never called you back in the first place
I remember back in high school, baby, you was fast
Straight sex when you moved your ass
But now things change, ‘cause you don't look the same
Let the ghetto get the best of you, baby, that's a shame
Caught HIV and now you 'bout to be deceased
And finally be at peace
So where your niggas at now? ‘Cause everybody left
They stepped, and left you on your own
See, I loved you like a sister, but you died too quick
And that's why we called you bitch—I betcha!

You wonda why we call you bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
I betcha, bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
I betcha, bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
I betcha, bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch
You wonda why we call you bitch

Dear Ms. Delores Tucker, keep stressin' me
Fuckin' with a motherfuckin' mind
I figured you wanted to know
You know, why we call them hoes bitches
And maybe this might help you understand
It ain't personal, strictly business, baby, strictly business
So If you wonder why we call you bitch
You wonder why we call you bitch
If you wonder why we call you bitch
You wonder why we call you bitch



To my unborn child…
To my unborn child
In case I don’t make it
Just remember, Daddy loves you

Now ever since my birth, I've been cursed, since I'm born to wile
In case I never get to holla at my unborn child
Many things learned in prison, blessed and still livin'
Tryna earn every penny that I'm gettin'
I'm reminiscin' to the beginnin' of my mission
When I was conceived and came to be in this position
My mama was a Panther, loud single parent, but she proud
When she witnessed baby boy rip a crowd
Went to school, but I dropped out and left the house
‘Cause my mama say I'm good for nothin', so I'm out
Since I only got one life to live, God forgive me for my sins
Let me make it and I'll never steal again or deal again
My only friend is my misery
Wantin' revenge for the agony they did to me
See, my life ain't promised, but it's sure gettin' better
Hope you understand my love letter, to my unborn child

I'm writing you a letter
This is to my unborn child
Wanna let you know I love you
If you didn't know I feel this way
‘Cause I think about you every day
I have so much to say

Seems so complicated to escape fate
And you can never understand 'til we trade places
Tell the world I feel guilty for bein' anxious
Ain't no way in hell that I could ever be a rapist
It's hard to face this cold world on a good day
When will they let the little kids in the hood play?
I got shot five times, but I'm still breathin'
Living proof there's a God if you need a reason
Can I believe in my own fate?
Will I raise my kids in the right or the wrong way?
Dear Mama, I'm a man now
I wanna make it on my own, not a handout
Make way for a whirlwind prophesized
I wanna go in peace when I gotta die
On these cold streets, ain't no love, no mercy and no friends
In case you never see my face again, to my unborn child

I'm writing you a letter
This is to my unborn child
Wanna let you know I love you
If you didn't know I feel this way
‘Cause I think about you every day
I have so much to say

Dear Lord, can you hear me? Tell me what to say
To my unborn seed in case I pass away
Will my child get to feel love?
Or are we all just cursed to be street thugs?
‘Cause bein' black hurts, and even worse if you speak first
Livin' my life as an Outlaw – what could be worse?
‘Cause maybe if I tried to change
Who'm I kiddin'? I'm a thug 'til I die; I'm a rider, mane
Touch bases, eat lunch in plush places
Regular criminal oasis awaits us
If there's a ghetto for true thugs, I'll see you there
And I'm sorry for not bein' there
Bless the boys and all my little girls
Please take care of all my seeds, to my unborn child

Please take care of all my kids and my unborn child
To my unborn child…
This letter goes out to my seeds
That I might not get to see ‘cause of this lifestyle
Just know your daddy loved you
Got nothin' but love for you
And all I wanted was for you to have a better life than I had
‘Cause I was out there on a 24 hour 365 grind
When you get to be my age, you’ll understand
Just know I got love for you
And I’ll see you if there’s a ghetto in Heaven
If there’s a Ghetto Heaven, I’ll be there waitin' for you
Heh heh, take care, run wild, but be smart
Follow the rules of the game
I know sometimes there’s confusion
Rules of the game is gonna get you through it all day every day
Watch out for these snakes and fakes
Friends come a dime-a-dozen
Be an individual, work hard
Study, get your mind sharp, trust nobody



Talkin' about the stuff that don't wear off, it don't fade
It'll last for all these crazy days, these crazy nights
Whether you wrong or you right
A motherfucker still love you, still feel you
You will always be in my heart with unconditional love

Come listen to my truest thoughts, my truest feelings
All my peers doin' years beyond drug dealing
How many caskets can we witness
Before we see it's hard to live this life without God?
So we must ask forgiveness
Ask Mama why I got this urge to die
Witness the tears fallin' free from my eyes before she could reply
Though we were born without a silver spoon
One day I hope to make it, a player in this game
Mama, don't cry, long as we try maybe things change
Perhaps it's just a fantasy
A life where we don’t need no welfare and share with our whole family
Maybe it's me that caused it, the fightin' and the hurtin'
In my room cryin' because I didn't wanna be a burden
Watch Mama open up her arms to hug me
And I ain't worried 'bout a damn thing, with unconditional love

In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love
In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love

Just got the message, you've been callin' all week
Been out here hustlin' on these streets
Ain't had a chance to speak
But you know, with you and me it's all G
We could never be enemies
'Cause you've been such a good friend to me
Where would I be without my dogs?
No wonder why when times get hard
'Cause it ain't easy bein' who we are
Driven by my ambitions, desire higher positions
So I proceed to make G's eternally
And my mission is to be more than just a rap musician
The elevation of today's generation, if I could make 'em listen
Prison ain't what we need, no longer stuck in greed
Time to plan, strategize, my family's gotta eat
We work somethin' out of nothin'
No pleasure in the sufferin'
Neighborhood would be good if they could cut out all the bustin'
The liquor and the weed, the cussin'
Sendin' love out to my block

In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love
In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love

I'll probably never understand your ways
With everyday I swear I hear you tryin' to change your ways
While gettin' paid at the same time
Just had a baby with the same eyes
Somethin' inside, please let me die, these are strange times
How come I never made it?
Maybe it's the way I played it in my heart
I knew one day I gotta be a star
My hopes and all my wishes, so many vivid pictures
And all the currency I'll never even get to see
This fast life soon shatters, 'cause after all the lights and screams nothin' but my dreams matter
Hopin' for better days, maybe a peaceful night
Baby, don't cry, 'cause everything gon' be alright
Just lay your head on my shoulder
Never treated me bad, no matter who I was
You still came with that unconditional love

In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love
In this game, the lesson's in your eyes to see
Though things change, the future's still inside of me
We must remember that tomorrow comes after the dark
So you will always be in my heart, with unconditional love



{​​​​​​​*"To Live & Die in L.A." fades out*}​​​​​​​

God has a plan, and the bible unfolds that wonderful plan
Through the message of prophecy
God sent Jesus into this world to be our savior
And that Christ is returning, someday soon
To unfold the wonderful plan of eternity
For my life and your life
As long as we're cooperating with God
By accepting Jesus Christ as our personal Lord and savior
Unless the Lord does return in the coming seven days
We'll see you next time here on This Week in Bible Prophecy

2Pac, don't start that blasphemy in here!
Makaveli, the new breed
And I remember what my pops told me
The new word, follow me
Remember what my pops told me

My family tree consists of drug dealers, thugs and killers
Strugglin', known to hustle, screamin', "fuck they feelings!"
"Nigga, get off your ass if you plan to be rich!
There's ten rules to the game, but I'll share with you two
Know niggas gon' hate you for whatever you do
That's Money Over Bitches, 'cause they breed envy
Keep your enemies close, nigga, watch your homies"
It seemed a little unimportant, when he told me, I smiled
Picture jewels bein' handed to an innocent child
I never knew, in my lifetime, I'd live by these rules
Initiated as an outlaw, studyin' rules
Now, papa ain't around, so I gotta recall
Or come to grips with bein' written on my enemy's walls
Promised if I have a seed, I'ma guide him right
Dear Lord, don't let me die tonight
I got words for my comrades, listen and learn
Ain't nothin' free, get back what you earned
No doubt, gettin' higher than a motherfucka, bless me, please
This Thug Life'll be the death of me
C'mon, yeah

And I remember what my pops told me
Remember what my pops told me
Blasphemy!

Nuf for dem dat steal in the name of da Lord
Dem a tell nuff lie, but holdin' my bird in a cloud
Using the name of the lord in vain
While de people in de ghetto feel nuff pain

We pro'ly in Hell, already, our dumb asses not knowin'
Everybody kissin' ass to go to Heaven ain't goin'
Put my soul on it, I'm fightin' devil niggas daily
Plus the media be crucifyin' brothers severely
Tell me I ain't God's son; nigga, momma a virgin
We got evicted, had to leave the 'burbs
Back in the ghetto, doin' wild shit
Lookin' at the sun don't pay
Criminal mind all the time, wait for Judgment Day
They say Moses split the Red Sea
I split the blunt and rolled a fat one up, deadly
Babylon beware, comin' for the Pharoah's kids
Retaliation, makin' legends off the shit we did
Still bullshittin', niggas in Jerusalem waitin' for signs
Livin' by the Nile, while the water flow
I’m contemplatin' plots, wonderin' where the thought’ll go
Brothas gettin' shot, comin' back resurrected

And I remember what my pops told me
Remember what my pops told me
Blasphemy!

Nuff a dem a steal in the name of the lord
Dem a tell nuff lie, but holding a bird in a cloud
Using the name of the lord in vain
While de people in de ghetto feel nuff pain

The preacher want me buried, why? 'Cause I know he a liar
Have you ever seen a crackhead? That's eternal fire
Why you got these kids' minds thinkin' that they evil?
While the preacher bein' freaky, you say, "honor God's people"
We should cry if they cried when we buried Malcolm X
Waitin' to beat my ass if I don't go pop?
Memories of a past time, givin' up cash to the leaders
Knowin' damn well they ain't gonna feed us
In my brain, how can you explain time in B.C.?
It's hard enough to live, now, in these times of greed
They say Jesus is a kind man
Well, he should understand times in this crime land
My thug nation, do what you gotta do
But know you gotta change
Try to find a way to make it out the game
I leave this and hope God can see my heart is pure
Is Heaven just another door? I leave this here
I leave this and hope God see my heart is pure
Is Heaven just another door? And my people say

Nuff a dem a steal in the name of the lord
Dem a tell nuff lie, but holding a bird in a cloud
Using the name of the lord in vain
While de people in de ghetto feel nuff pain

Our father, who art in Heaven
Hallow be Thy name
Thy kingdom come, Thy will be done
In Earth as it is in Heaven
Give us this day, our daily bread
As we give up our debts
As we forgive our debt-ors
Lead us not into temptation
But deliver us unevil
For God is the kingdom and the power
And the glory forever and ever and ever




A coward dies a thousand deaths
A soldier dies but once

They say pussy and paper is poetry, power and pistols
Plotting on murdering motherfuckers 'fore they get you
Picturing pitiful punk niggas copping pleas
Puffing weed as I position myself to clock G's
My enemies scatter in suicidal situations
Never to witness the wicked shit that they was facin'
Pockets is packed with presidents, pursue your riches
Evading the playa hating tricks while hitting switches
Bitches is bad-mouth, ‘cause brawling motherfuckers is bold
But charge them hoes; the game should be sold
I'm sick of psychotic society, somebody save me
Addicted to drama, so even Mama couldn't raise me
Even the preacher and all my teachers couldn't reach me
I run in the streets and puffing weed with my peeps
I'm duckin' the cops, I hit the weed as I'm clutchin' my Glock
Niggas is hot when I hit the block; what if I die tonight?

If I die tonight
If I die tonight
Fuck it, If I die tonight
Tonight's the night I get in some shit

Polish your pistols, prepare for battle, pass the pump
When I get to poppin', niggas is droppin' then they done
Calling the coroner, come collect the fucking corpse
He got hit by a killer, preoccupied with being boss
Revenge is the method
Whenever steppin', keep a weapon close
Adversaries are overdosed over deadly notes
Jealous niggas and broke bitches equal packed jails
Hit the block and fill your pockets, making crack sales
Picture perfection, pursuing paper with a passion
Visions of prisons for all the pussies that I blasted
Running with criminals individuals with no remorse
Try to stop me, my pistol posse's using deadly force
In my brain all I can think about is fame
The police know my name, a different game, ain't a thing changed
I'm seeing cemetery photos of my peers
Conversating like they still here; if I die tonight

If I die tonight
Scare to die nigga, is ya, ha?
If I die tonight
Never fear, never worry
If I die tonight
Tonight's the night I get in some shit

Pussy and paper is poetry, power and pistols
Plotting on murdering motherfuckers 'fore they get you
Pray to the Heaven's, .357's to the sky
And I hope I'm forgiven for thug livin' when I die
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto for thug niggas
A stress free life and a spot for drug dealers
Pissing while practicing how to pimp and be a playa
Overdose of a dick while drinking liquor when I lay her
Pistol whippin' these simps, for being petrified and lame
Disrespecting the game, praying for punishment and pain
Going insane, never die, I live eternal, who shall I fear?
Don't shed a tear for me, nigga, I ain't happy here
I hope they bury me and send me to my rest
Headlines reading 'Murdered to death', my last breath
Take a look, picture a crook on his last stand
Motherfuckers don't understand; if I die tonight

Nigga!, If I die tonight
No fear nigga, never worry
If I die tonight
Bury me a motherfucking G, closed casket fuck it
If I die tonight
You know
Tonight's the night I get in some shit

Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
"Tonight's the night I get in some shit"
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder



I couldn't help but notice your pain
My pain?
It runs deep – share it with me!

They'll never take me alive, I'm gettin' high with my four-five
Cocked on these suckas, time to die
Even as a youngster causin' ruckus on the back of the bus
I was a fool all through high school, kickin' up dust
But now I'm labeled as a troublemaker – who can you blame?
Smokin' weed helped me take away the pain
So I'm hopeless rollin' down the freeway swervin', don't worry
I'm 'bout to crash up on the curb ‘cause my vision's blurry
Maybe if they tried to understand me – what should I do?
I had to feed my fuckin' family – what else could I do
But be a thug? Out slangin' with the homies
Fuck hangin' with them phonies in the club!
Got my mind on danger, never been a stranger to homicide
My city's full of gang-bangers and drive-by's
Why do we die at an early age?
He was so young but still a victim of the 12 gauge
My memories of a corpse, mind full of sick thoughts
And I ain't goin back to court, so fuck what you thought!
I'm drinkin' Hennessey, runnin' from my enemies
Will I live to be 23? There's so much pain

Ohhhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain

Years and years of that rough life
Runnin' crazed and wild as a kid and growin' tough with a knife
And livin' trifed on the regular, buckin' out competitors
See 'em fake a move and chase 'em down like the fuckin' Predator
Get in trouble everyday in school, act a fool
And you know I had to break every rule
Showin' off for the bitches ‘cause I had the mad rep
So I had to watch my back when it was time to step
But my grimies is the grimiest with love for me
Pop, pop, pop, and send a chuckle up above for me
Ayo, currency kept passin' me by, but I didn't cry, broke
Got hit off with the pack and started sellin' coke
And now the money's lookin' lovely
Pop the drop top and now the bitches wanna rub me
Kick 'em the game, it's all the same
I kick it back yo, give 'em slack yo
And now they label me the mack yo, people check it
Get disrespected if you front on the Birdman, you heard, man
Catch a couple shots from the Glock in my hand
Damn! At least I'm realistic with my biscuit
You know you get yo' ass twisted, so run for cover
Me and my man got a plan, kickin' major dust
So if you're on, nigga, look for the gauge to bust
A lot of pressure with the street fame, it's a deep game
And my mama always cryin' yo, there's so much pain

Ohhhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain

They got me mobbin' like I'm loc'ed, ready to get my slug on
And I load my clip and slip my motherfuckin' gloves on
I ain't scared to blast on these suckas if they test me
Trust – I got my Glock cocked, playa, if they press me
Bust – on motherfuckers with a passion
Better duck, ‘cause I ain't lookin' when I'm blastin'
I'm a nut and drinkin' Hennessey and gettin' high
On the lookout for my enemies, don't wanna die
Tell me why, ‘cause this stress is gettin' major
A buck 50 across the face with my razor
What can I do but be a thug until I'm dead and gone?
Keep my brain on the game and stay head strong
These sorry bastards wanna kill me in my sleep
I'm real, they cannot see
And everyday is just a struggle, steady thuggin' on the streets
And I'll be ballin', loc, don't let 'em make you worry
Keep swingin' at these suckas till you buried
I was born to raise hell, a nigga from the gutta
Word to mother I'm trapped, I'm kickin' dust up, ready to bust
I'm on the scene, steady muggin' mean until they kill me
I'll be livin' this life, I know you feel me; there's so much pain

Ohhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhh…
Tired of the strain and the pain
Ohhhhhh…



You find an MC like me, who's strong
Leavin' motherfuckers aborted, with no verbal support
When I command the microphone
I get deadly as Khan, though
With a bear and a snake and a panda, I'm all those
Who can withstand the more power I gain?
And make it possible, for me
To drop a few to wreck yo' brain
Imagine and keep on wishin' upon a star
Finally realizin' who the fuck we are
When I penetrate, it's been withstandin', faded
Would it be the greatest MC of all-time?
When I created rhyme
For the simple fact, when I attack I crush your pride
Our intention to ride, every time, all night
I'm faced with the scars beyond this one bar
For me to put down my guard, I'm faced what I'ma ride
Breakin' in gas with the '68 all day
In-and-out with my pay, I'm soon to count the bodies

So mandatory my elevation, my lyrics like orientation
So you can be more familiar with the nigga you facin'
We must be patient, nothin' better than communication
Known to damage and highly flammable, like gas stations
Sorry, I left that ass waitin', no more procrastination
Give up to fate and get that ass shakin'
I'm bustin' and makin' motherfuckers panic
Don't take your life for granted
Put that ass in the dirt, you swear the bitch was planted
My lyrics motivate the planet
It's similar to "Rhythm Nation", but thugged out
Forgive me, Janet
Who's in control? I'm activatin' your souls
You know the way the games get controlled
Yo, two years ago, a friend of mine
Told me Alize and Cristal blows your mind
Bear witness to the dopest fuckin' rhyme I wrote
Takin' off my coat, clearin' my throat

I got my mind made up, come on
Get in, get into
Let it ride, tonight's the night
I got my mind made up, come on
Get in, get into
Let it ride, tonight's the night

Well, I comes through with two packs
Of the bomb prophylactics
For protection, so my fuckin' sack won't collapse
'Cause nowadays, shit's evadin' the X-rays
Sendin' young motherfuckers to an early grave
I wonder if my terrifyin' tactics of torturin' MCs
Shows my heart's as cold as the tundra
Electrifyin' like thunder, I'm just too much
Rough and raw with that motherfuckin' poisonous touch
I'm an MC with lyrics that's the fuckin' Bombay
You got ten steps before instant death, like Bai Mei
My rhymes'll leave a mark on your mind
As the deadly virus spread through your head, like Sand Palm
There's no escape, nah, I ain't blastin'
I use my mental to assassinate assassins for those askin'
Opposed to laughin', raw maniacal villain
Laughter enhances the chances of the killin'
Why is that? 'Cause smilin' faces deceive
My thoughts rip your throat and make it hard to breathe
Your whole camp's under siege, and I'm Jason Voorhees
In the heat of the night is when I defeat and ignite mics
My verbal snipe your vocabs on site
I'm out the cut, uncut and raw with no clause for all
So all my rhymes hit and split the bricks on the wall
You already have an idea about the superior sphere
The greater rhyme creator on both sides of the Equator
I rock from here to there, to Philly and back
To L.A., on the spot where I rock and bust, like straps
As your views get overshadowed when you come in contact
Beware, set and prepare to enter verbal combat

Fuck you losers!
While you fake jacks, I makes manoeuvres
Like Hitler stickin' up {Jews} with German {Lugers}
The mister Meth-Tical from Staten Isle
Will be back after this message, don't touch the dial
Rarely do you see an MC out for justice
Got my gun powder and my musket—blaow!
Melons get swellings
I paint mental pictures, like Magellan
Half of my clan's repeat felons
Niggas best protect they joints for nine-nickel
Man, I stay on point, like icicles
Now, who wanna test Tical, then touch Tical?
All up in your motherfuckin' mouth
Headbanger boogie, catch me on tour with Al Doogie
Method Man rolled too tight, you can't pull me
Better take one and pass or that's that ass
Your vital statistics are low and fallin' fast
Johnny Blaze out to get loot, like Johnny Cash
Play a game of Russian Roulette and have a blast

Ayo, lyrical gat spittin' the criminal tactics
Non-believers get my dick and genitals backwards
Let's face it, there's no replacement
Taste this mad underground basement shit I'm laced with
Avalanche on your whole camp when I'm spliffted
Funk Doctor, who?
Spock, bitch, don't get it twisted
I got connects, like Federal Express
To get the fresh package of bless the dogs can't fetch
Got the clear spot from the rear block
To bust 'til every nigga here drop, men I fear not
Hold your nose and blow out 'til your ears pop
Since your crew suit you to shift
Now, you claim that your gears locked
Whiff this underground cannabis
I'm dangerous, like John the Bomb Analyst
Flip MCs like kis
My degrees freeze consecutively, like EPMD LPs
Lick off a shot and hit your fam by mistake
So I erase the whole front row at the wake
I planned my escape in case Jake wanna snake
Bust it, I'm the one pushin' the hearse, in the first place
Confidence for you shaky-ass folks
Pump for Rockafella for the day he got smoked
Choke off this antidote, got you ope
Get roast by my lyrical Billy Dee .45 Colt

I-N-S the Rebel



Lookin' for these better days
Better days, hey, better days
Got me thinkin' about better days
Better days, better days, better days
Hey, better days
Got me thinkin' about better days

Time to question our lifestyle, look how we live
Smokin' weed like it ain't no thing, so even kids
Wanna try now, then lie down and get ran through
Nobody watches 'em, clockin' the evil man do
Faced with the demons
Addicted to hearin' victims screamin'
Guess we was evil since birth, product of cursed semens
‘Cause even our birthdays is cursed days
A born thug in the first place, the worst ways
I'd love to see the block in peace
With no more dealers and crooked cops
The only way to stop the beast
And only we can change
It's up to us to clean up the streets, it ain't the same
Too many murders, too many funerals, and too many tears
Just seen another brother buried, plus I knew him for years
Passed by his family, but what could I say?
Keep yo' head up and try to keep the faith
And pray for better days

Better days, better days
Hey, better days
Got me thinkin' about better days
Better days, better days, better days
Hey, better days
Got me thinkin' about better days

Thinkin' back as an adolescent, who woulda guessed
That in my future years I'd be stressin'?
Some say the ghetto's sick and corrupted
Plus my P.O. won't let me hang with the brothers I grew up with
Tryin' to keep my head up and stay strong
All my homies slangin' yayo all day long
But they wrong, so I'm solo and so broke
Savin' up for some Jordan's, ‘cause they dope
I got a girl and I love her, but she broke too
And so am I — I can't take her to the places she wanna go to
So, we argue and play fight, all day and night
Makin' passionate love 'til the daylight
Plus we about to get evicted, can't pay the rent
Guess it's time to see who really is your friend
Tell me you pregnant and I'm amazed
So many blessings while we stressin', lookin' for them better days


Now, me and you was real cool, hell on them square fools
Since back in high school, we was true, me and you
Hardly parted or separated, we stayed faded
Affiliated with gang-bangers and still made it
Up in the gym, mess with me, gotta mess with him
Still dressin' like grown men when rollin'
Out in the dark, smokin' Newports, gamin' marks
Got a place in my heart, homie, stay smart
Locked you up in the pen, and gave you three to ten
I send you letters with naked flicks of old friends
Hopin' you well, I know it's hell
Doin' time in the cells, you need mail when you in jail
And me, I'm doin' cool
I settled down, had a family, workin' a night school
Every once in a while, I reminisce
And I wonder how we ever came to this; I miss the better days


I send this one out to all the homeboys down in, uh
Clinton lockdown, Rikers Island
All them dudes I was, uh, locked up with, hehe
E Block, F Block, lower H
N-I-C in Rikers Island, downstate
All the peoples I met along the way
Better days is comin', homeboy, keep your head up!



Troublesome, nigga
Hahaha, troublesome 19-motherfuckin'-96
Boss of all bosses, Makaveli

Menacin' methods, label me a lethal weapon
Makin' niggas die witnessin' breathless imperfections
Can you picture my specific plan?
To be the man in this wicked land, underhanded hits are planned
These scams are plotted over grams and rocks
Outlaw motherfuckers die by the random shots
We all die in the end, so revenge we swore
I was all about my ends; fuck friends and foes!
Me, a born leader, never leave the block without my heater
Got me a dog and named her "my bitch nigga eater"
What could they do to me, you lil' brat?
Shit, them niggas that shot me is still terrified I'll get they ass
How can I show you how I feel inside?
We Outlawz, motherfuckers can't kill my pride
Niggas talk a lot of shit, but that's after I'm gone
‘Cause they fear me in my physical form
Let it be known I'm troublesome

La la la la, la, la
La, la-la la, lahhh
Bye bye, bye bye
All you niggas die

Troublesome nigga, Outlawz
Put it down to the fullest
Spittin' rhymes and bullets, ha ha
We troublesome
Y'all know what time it is
Call the punk police, they can't stop us
Niggas run the streets, we troubleshit

Gutter ways, my mentality is ghetto
We guerrilla in this criminal war, we all rebels
Death before dishonor, bet I bomb on 'em first
Niggas knew we came for murder, pullin' up in a hearse
Westside was the war cry, bustin' off freely
Screamin', "Fuck all y'all niggas!" in Swahili
Pistol packin', fresh out of jail, I ain't goin' back
Release me to the care of my heartless strap
Say my name three times like Candyman
Bet I roll on yo' ass like an avalanche
A sole survivor, learned to get high and pull drive-bys
Murder my foes, can't control my 9
Hearin' thoughts of my enemies pleadin', "please"
Busta-ass motherfuckers tried to flee
Picture me lettin' this chump survive
Ran up on his ass, when I dumped he died
‘Cause I'm troublesome

La la la la, la, la
La, la-la la, lahhh
Bye bye, bye bye
All you niggas die

Young, strapped, and I don't give a fuck
I'm hopeless
I live the Thug Life, losin' my focus, ba-baby
I'm troublesome, ha ha
Bad Boy killa, there is no one realer
What you saw

"Murder murder" my mind state, shit ain't changed
Niggas bustin' shots like they lost they mind
Like 25 to life never crossed they mind
Tell me young nigga never learned a thang
Dead at thirteen ‘cause he yearned to bang
Sent a lot of flowers, but how could I cry?
Tried to warn the little nigga, "Either stop or die."
Mercy is for the weak, when I speak I scream
Afraid to sleep; I'm havin' crazy dreams
Vivid pictures of my enemies, family times
God to forgive me ‘cause it's wrong, but I plan to die
Either take me in Heaven and understand I was a sheep
Did the best I could, raised in insanity
Or send me to Hell, ‘cause I ain't beggin' for my life
Ain't nothin' worse than this cursed-ass hopeless life
I'm troublesome

La la la la, la, la
La, la-la la, lahhh
Bye bye, bye bye
All you niggas die

In your wildest dreams you couldn't picture a nigga like me
Hahahaha – I'm troublesome, I don't give a fuck
I'm troublesome… like my nigga Napoleon said, nigga
Somebody gotta explain why I ain't got shit
Ha ha, I'm troublesome
You know what time it is, the Outlaw clique
Young, rugged and sick
Makaveli the Don, the Boss of all bosses
Mussolini, E.D.I. Amin, Hussein Fatal
Kadafi, Kastro, Napoleon, Po-Nitty
Haha, we ain't fuckin' around
Haha, we troublesome
Ayo, ha ha, we troublesome, I ain't goin', HA HAH
Young Kastro, the first to blast, the last one to dash
Goin' for the hoes and the cash
Fuck you niggas! Outlawz! Ha hah!
Khadafi – trump tight, never sloppy
Them motherfuckers try to copy
But they can't mock you, nigga, you're too strong
Outlawz keep it goin' on, you know whassup
Outlawz, Outlawz, all you niggas die
Outlawz, Outlawz
This is dedicated to the real niggas
All the real troublesome soldiers on the streets
{…bye bye, bye bye, all you niggas die…}



Heyyyy! Heyy-ayyaahhyy

Yo, Mo Bee, mayn, drop that shit!
You know what time
Boo-yaow! I know it's time for you
So grab one by the hand, you know what I'm sayin'?
And uh, throw up that finger!
Hey yo, throw y'all fingers up!
Thug style, baby, thug style, y'know?

Tell me, baby, are you lonely? Don't wanna rush ya
I can help ya if you're only, let me touch ya
If I'm wrong, Love, tell me
'Cause I get caught up in the life I live, it's hell, see
I never thought I'd see the day when I would calm down
You ain't heard? I've been known to clown and get around
That's my word, see you walkin' and you lookin' good
Yes indeed, got a body like a sex fiend, you're killin' me
With your attitude to match, right?
Don't be phony, 'cause I hate it when you act like
You don't know me, I've be stressin' in the spotlight
I want the fame, but the industry's a lot like
A crap game, ain't no time for commitment, I gotta go
Can't be with you every minute miss, another show
And even though I'm known for my one night stand
Look here, I wanna be an honest man, but temptations go—

Throw up the finger!
And all my homies go
Throw them the finger!
You know what, baby, it's like—

I know you've been searchin' for someone
To make you happy and get the job done
You say you needed a man with money
But I can't be there, and will you still care?

Will I cheat or will I be committed? Heaven knows
Gettin' weak and I wanna hit it, so here I go
In my ride and I'm all in
Gettin' high, I can hear the people callin'
I'm passin' by, everybody knows I'm ballin'
And to God, gotta keep myself from fallin'
But it's hard, all the cuties know I'm under pressure
What do I do? Gettin' shaky when she pull the dress up
And say it's cool, should I stroke
Or should I wait a while? You decide
If you tell me that you don't want it, that's a lie
Move close and let me whisper
Some dirty words in your ears as I kiss ya
On every curve, slow down baby, don't rush, I like it slow
Can't hold it any longer so let it go
Open the gates to your waterfall up in heaven
And don't worry, I let myself in, all I heard was—

Give 'em the finger!
All my homies go, throw your fingers up!
That's just the thug in me, girl, you know
Peep out all my homies, y'know, it's like—

I know you've been searchin' for someone
To make you happy and get the job done
You say you needed a man with money
But I can't be there, and will you still care?

A lot of people think it's easy to settle down
Got a woman that'll please me in every town
I don't wanna but I gotta do it
The temptation got me ready to release the fluid
Sensation, sit down and conversate
Like you know me, take my hand
'Cause even thugs get lonely, understand
Even the hardest of my homies need attention
Catch you blowin' up the telephone, reminiscin'
I wanna take you to the movies and the park
Let's find a spot for you to do me in the dark
Now that it's passion, hold me tight
Don't need lights, I can see you by the moonlight
I know your man ain't lovin' you right
You're lonely and depressed, you need a thug in your life
Enough talkin', you want me to leave I'll get to walkin'
See you later, 'cause baby, I'm a player, and all I heard was—

Give 'em the finger, and all my homies go
Yo, this how we gonna do this in the nine-trey, y'know?
Throw your fingers up!
You know? They gonna peep this
This how we run game on you
All my niggas go, uptown in the, give 'em the finger!
Throw your hands up, give 'em the finger!



Rest in peace to my motherfucker Biggy Smallz
That's right, bwoy, it's goin' on, right here
Thug Life, God bless the dead

God bless the dead and buried, nigga, don't worry
If you see God first, tell him shit got worse
I ain't mad, I know you representin' the crew
And I can picture you in heaven with a blunt and a brew
Fuck the world, pain was a part of the game
If you a baller, money went as quick as it came
My role models gone or they locked in the pen
Straight hustlers caught up in the whirlwind
The other day I thought I seen my homeboy Biggy
Sayin' shit don't stop, nigga, no pity
We all hoods and all we ever had was dreams
Money makin' motherfuckers plot scandalous schemes
In the gutter you learn to have a criminal mind
I was addicted to tryin', never meant to do time
My epitaph will read "was the last of G's"
Kicked the shit to make the white man bleed
God bless the dead


Man, ain't nobody promised me a thang
I been caught up in this game
Ever since I was a little motherfucker wantin' to hang
I can see 'em in my head – pow!
Memories of my nigga but he dead now
Lookin' back in my yearbook
All the years took half my peers, they're stretched for years
And if I die, will they all shed tears?
Two to the dome, leave me alone, let me get my head clear
Paranoia got me lookin' in the mirror
Behind me, life without my 9, I'd rather do the time
See, I'm old enough to know that ain't no justice
{Fuck the police} and all the courts same way they fucked us
And why the hell am I locked in jail?
They let them white boys free, we be shocked as hell
In my mind I can see it comin'
And all the time it's a plot to keep a nigga runnin'
I keep a gun and never run unless I'm comin' at ya
Cry later but for now let's enjoy the laughter
God bless the dead


Rest in peace to all the motherfuckers that passed too early
All the young motherfuckers that was took in they prime
Real motherfuckin' G's, this one is for you
Yo Stretch, Biggy
Yo Big, this is to you, my nigga
Springfield Hollis Crew, Thug Life, YG'z
Sendin' they respect, ya know what I mean?
You my nigga for life, forever
You're always gonna be with a nigga
No matter what, don't forget that!

I pray before I go to sleep, "Dear God!"
Say my grace before I start to eat, 'cause times is hard
So I'm droppin' to my knees, "Oh why!"
Why you had to take my nigga with the rock-a-bye?
You had to take a good one, a ghetto hood son, Uzi weighin' a ton
Niggas terrified of drama from the young gun
Hearin' that they did it outta fear don't amaze me
But it's mind-blowin' so I'm flowin' goin' crazy
Slipped, forgot the gun, but he didn't run like a punk
He shoulda had the gauge in the trunk
But spunk is what he had, kid, I'd rather attack Big
Now you 'bout to smell the aftermath of what the mag did
Wannabe suckas wanna test, I'm tellin' you, yes
The teflon's 'bout to rip through your fuckin' vest
Guess who? I'll make a mess of your crew quick
The spirit Biggy Smallz and the thuggin' clique, yeah




A body map of 2Pac's tattoos, starting from the neck, working around and down to his back


• Makaveli

• 2Pac

• 2 Die 4

• 50 Niggas

• Thug Life

• Black Panther Head

• Burning Jesus on Cross

• Only God Can Judge Me

• Outlaw

• West Side Skull

• M.O.B

• Heartless Skull

• My only fear of death is coming back reincarnated

• Notorious

• Boss Playaz Crown

• Fuck the World


• Smile Now Mask

• Cry Later Mask

• Ballin




Nothin' but love for you, my sister
Might even know how hard it is, no doubt
Bein' a woman, a black woman at that, no doubt
Shit, in this white man's world
Sometimes we overlook the fact
That we be ridin' hard on our sisters
We don't be knowin' the pain we be causin'
In this white man's world
In this white man's world
I ain't sayin I'm innocent in all this
I'm just sayin', in this white man's world
This song is for y'all
For all those times that I messed up, or we messed up

Dear sister, got me twisted up in prison, I miss ya
Cryin', lookin' at my niece's and my nephew picture
They say don't let this cruel world get ya
Kinda suspicious, swearin' one day you might leave me
For somebody that's richer
Twist the cap off the bottle, I take a sip and see tomorrow
Gotta make it if I have to beg or borrow
Readin' love letters; late night, locked down and quiet
If brothers don't receive they mail, best believe we riot
Eatin' Jack-Mack, starin' at the walls of silence
Inside this cage where they capture all my rage and violence
In time I learned a few lessons, never fall for riches
Apologizes to my true sisters, far from bitches
Help me raise my Black nation, reparations are due
It's true, caught up in this world I took advantage of you
So tell the babies how I love them, precious boys and girls
Born black in this white man's world—and all I heard was

Who knows what tomorrow brings
In this world where everyone's blind?
And where to go, no matter how far, I'll find
To let you know that you're not alone


Bein' born with less, I must confess
Only adds on to the stress
Two gunshots to my homie's head, died in his vest
Shot him to death and left him bleedin' for his family to see
I pass his casket, gently askin', is there a heaven for G's?
My homeboy's doin' life, his baby mama be stressin'
Sheddin' tears when her son finally ask that questions
Where my daddy at? Mama, why we live so poor?
Why you cryin'? Heard you late night
Through my bedroom door
Now, do you love me, mama?
Why they keep on callin' me nigga?
Get my weight up with my hate
And pay 'em back when I'm bigger
And still thuggin' in this jail cell, missin' my block
Hearin' brothers screamin' all night, wishin' they'd stop
Proud to be black, but why we act
Like we don't love ourselves?
Know what it means to be black, whether a man or girl
We still strugglin' in this white man's world

Who knows what tomorrow brings
In this world where everyone's blind?
And where to go, no matter how far, I'll find
To let you know that you're not alone

We must fight for brother Mumia
We must fight for brother Mutulu
And we must fight for brother Ruchell Magee
We must fight for brother Geronimo Pratt
We must fight for the countless political prisoners
Who are locked up falsely by this white man

So, tell me why you changed to choose a new direction
In the blink of an eye?
My time away just made perfection
Did you think I'd die?
Not gon' cry, why should I care?
Like we holdin' onto lost love that's no longer there
Can you please help me?
God bless me, please keep my seeds healthy
Makin' all my enemies bleed while my G's wealthy
Hopin' they bury me with ammunitions, weed and shells
Just in case they trip in Heaven—ain't no G's in Hell
Sister, sorry for the pain that I caused your heart
I know I'll change if you help me, but don't fall apart
Rest in peace to Latasha, Lil' Yummy, and Kato
Too much for this cold world to take, ended up bein' fatal
Every woman in America, especially black
Bear with me, can't you see that we under attack?
I never meant to cause drama to my sister and mama
Hope we make it to better times, in this white man's world

Who knows what tomorrow brings
In this world where everyone's blind?
And where to go, no matter how far, I'll find
To let you know that you're not alone


Never that, in this white man's world, they can't stop us
We've been here all this time
They ain't took us out, they can never take us out
No matter what they say, about us bein' extinct
About us bein' endangered species
We ain't never gon' leave this
We ain't never gon' walk off this planet
Unless y'all choose to
Use your brain, use your brain
It ain't them that's killin' us, it's us that's killin' us
It ain't them that's knockin' us off
It's us that's knockin' us off
I'm tellin' you better watch it, or be a victim
Be a victim, in this white man's world
Born black, in this white man's world, no doubt
And it's dedicated to my motherfuckin' teachers
Mutulu Shakur, Geronimo Pratt, Mumia Abu Jamal
Sekou Odinga, all the real OG's, we out




Hey DeVante
Nigga, don'tcha know we're gonna sow up every bitch in the country
Me and you, up in the same motherfuckin' room
On the same level
This shit here, hahahaha
Please, no more pain
That's right nigga
Hey drop that shit boy

My adversaries cry like hoes fully eradicate my foes
My lyrics explode on contact, gamin' you hoes
Who else but Mama's only son, fuck the phony niggas I'm the one
Say my name, watch bitches come
Now fire when ready, stay watchin' our figure
Increase speed, make you motherfuckers bleed from your mouth quicker
Plus all these niggas that you run with, be on some dumb shit
Trickin' on hoes, I ain't the one bitch
Holla my name and witness game official, it's so sick
Have every single bitch that came witchu, on my dick
Plus this alcohol increases the chance to be deceased
I'm movin' you stupid bitches, vicious telekinesis
Am I reachin' your brain? Nigga how can I explain?
How vicious this Thug motherfucker came
When I die, I want to be a living legend, say my name
Affiliated with this motherfuckin' game, with no more pain

I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain

Line up my adversaries, blast on sight
And fuck your boyfriend bitch, I want some ass tonight You know my steelo, Alize and Cristal, weed
Sure you heard of all the freaky shit they say about me, huh
Plus all you busters is jealous, pull your gun out and blast
I dare you niggas to open fire, I'll murder that ass
And disappear before the, cops come runnin'
My Glock's spittin' rounds, niggas fallin' down clutchin' they stomach
It's Westside, Death Row, Thug niggas on the rise
Busters shot me five times, real niggas don't die
Can ya hear me?, laced with this game, I know you feel me
Spit the secret to war, so cowards fear me
My only fear of death is reincarnation
Heart of a solider with a brain to teach your whole nation
And feelin' no more pain

I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain

Bury me that's what they all say
It's time to make a killin', sure to make a million with DeVante
Bitch I know you want me, what your mouth say?, now, watch your eyes
You don't wanna get with me, that's a lie
I got my hands on your hips, no time to bullshit
Freaky bitch, come give me kiss
Tell them niggas from other areas, brothers from here
So obsessed with this money makin' it ain't nothin' we fear
Now they label me a troublemaker, cause I'm a ridah
Death to you playa haters, don't let me find ya
Mama made me rugged, Baptize the public
Now you all thugs, nigga don't you love it
It's similar to multiple gunshots, retaliation is a must
Wasn't too sure what you facin' so watch the guns bust
You niggas'll bleed, fuckin' with me you'll be deceased
Never restin' in peace, nigga
With no more pain

I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
Let's go inside my astral plane
I came to bring the pain, hardcore to the brain
Let's go inside my astral plane

Hahahahaha, yeah nigga, yeah! Hahahaha
No more pain
It's just like that nigga, like that yeah
No more pain
Motherfuckers can't handle that shit
Much too much for these bitches
No more pain
Feel me nigga? Feel me?
How you figure you can fuck with me?
Fully automatic type shit
No more pain
Coward ass niggas, cowards
Come put your mouth on this pistol nigga
Come put your mouth on the pistol, no more pain
Close your eyes nigga, do it
Die in the dark, no more pain
Death Row, so what you motherfuckers do?
Hey that's DeVante droppin' that beat like that BEYATCH
In case you wonderin'
And jealous niggas, hahaha, see y'all niggas
Motherfuckin' niggas are shit
Westsiiiiiide! Death to everybody that ain't down with me
That's on, feel me? Hahaha
Oh yeah, to the cowards, you know who you are, it's still Bad Boy Killa
Just feel that, Thug Life, shit don't stop
Fat motherfuckers got Downs Syndrome, motherfuckers
Weak ass niggas, dancers turned fuckin' CEOs
Put your mouth on this pistol nigga
Put your mouth on the pistol!
Hahahaha, yeah nigga no more pain
Prison ain't changed me nigga, it made me worse
Feel me nigga, haha
No more pain
Hey DeVante I'm givin' these motherfuckers choices
Niggas can roll with us, or they can be rolled up under us
That's on you nigga, what you wanna do?
Last year we was lettin' these niggas kick up dust
This year you motherfuckers gonna be dust
Thug Life nigga Westsiiide!



Hey, Suge, what I tell you, nigga?
When I come out of jail, what I was gonna do?
I was gonna start diggin' into these niggas' chest, right?
Heh, watch this!
Hey, Quik, let me see them binoculars, nigga, the binoculars!
Hahahahaha! Yeah, nigga, time to ride!
Grab your bulletproof vest, nigga
'Cause it's gonna be a long one
Now, me and Quik finna show you niggas what it's like on this side—the real side
Now, on this ride there's gonna be some real motherfuckers
And there's gonna be some pussies
Now, the real niggas gonna be the ones with money and bitches
The pussies gonna be the niggas on the floor bleedin'
Now, everybody keep your eyes on the prize
'Cause the ride get tricky
See, you got some niggas on your side that say they're your friends, but, in real life they your enemies
And then you got some motherfuckers that say they your enemies
But in real life they eyes is on your money
See, the enemies will say they true
But in real life those niggas will be snitches
It's a dirty game, y'all
Y'all gotta be careful about who you fuck with and who you don't fuck with, 'cause the shit get wild, y'all
Keep your mind on your riches, baby!
Keep your mind on your riches!

9-1-1, it's an emergency, cowards tried to murder me
From hood to the 'burbs, everyone of you niggas heard of me
Shit, I'm legendary, niggas scaried and paralyzed
Nothin' more I despise than a liar, cowards die
My mama told me when I was a seed
Just a vicious motherfucker, why these devils left me free?
I proceed to make 'em shiver when I deliver
Criminal lyrics from a worldwide mob figure
Thug niggas from everywhere, Mr. Makaveli
Niggas is waitin' for some thug shit, that's what they tell me
So many rumors, but I'm infinite, Immortal Outlaw
And every breath I breathe until the moment I'm deceased
Will be another moment ballin' as a G
I rip the crowd, then I start again, eternally, I live in sin
Until the moment that they let me breathe again; the hearts of men

The hearts of men

My lyrical verge with so much pain, to some niggas it hurts
My guns bust, if you ain't one of us it gets worse
Bitch niggas get their eyes swoll in fly mode
I'm a homicidal outlaw, and five-o
Get your lights on, the fight's on
Tonight's gonna be a fuckin' fight so we might roll
My own homies say I'm heartless
But I'm a G to this until the day I'm gone, that's regardless
Ride by, niggas bow down, thought I'd rot in jail
Paid bail, well, a nigga's out now
Throw up your hands if you thugged out
First nigga act up, first nigga gettin' drugged out
I can be a villain if you let me
A motherfucker if you do upset me
Tell the cops to come and get me
Rip the crowd like a phone number, then start again
Don't have no motherfuckin' friends
Nigga, look inside the hearts of men

In the hearts of men

To all my niggas engaged in makin' money in the fifty states
Keep your mind on your chips and fuck a punk bitch
No longer livin' in fear, my pistol close in hand
Convinced that this is my year like I'm the chosen man
Give me my money and label me as a don
If niggas is havin' problems, smoke 'em, fire and bomb
I died and came back, I hustle with these lyrics
As if it's a game of crack, thuggin' is in my spirit
I'm lost and not knowin'
Scarred up but still flowin', energized and still goin'
Uhh, can it be fate, that makes a sick motherfucker break
On these jealous-ass cowards 'cause they evil and fake?
What will it take? Give me that bass line, I'm feelin' bomb
Death Row, baby, don't be alarmed
The homie Quik gave a nigga a beat and let me start again
Represent, 'cause I've been sent, the hearts of men




Never!
You ain't never had a friend like me!
Believe that!
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me!

See, at night I watch the sky
I take another breath
I smoke my Newport to the butt
Like it's the last motherfucker left
Just me and you evading enemies
Let you get my last shot of Hennessy
Ain't never had a friend like me
Remember memories so vividly
Was once a little dust kicker now becomes a G
Who can I call when they all fail
Collect calls to my dogs from the county jail
Sending me mail
Heard the block's in the same shape
Ain't nothing changed
Niggas slanging at the same place
The same faces
Suppose to always hate our foes
This lifestyle lives forever
Watch the game unfold
Shedding crocodile tears, just got life plus
And you wonder if these white judges like us
Just stay strong, we'll appeal, nigga, you'll be free
Down with ya to the very end
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me

I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me

How can I be blamed? Forgive me, Lord, I'm insane
In search of fame, won't hurt to change
Following the foot steps of past dealers
Equipped with Ski masks, no witnesses as we blast squealers
And now they feel us in this act of war
More casualties, no survivors
Any man that defies, quickly dies 'cause we riders
In my quest for chips
We wear vests, equipped with automatic fire
We reply when my enemies trip
Me and you against the nation
Whispering while we conversatin'
'Cause niggas died over information
How much more can we take
Expect us all to wait
The world ain't ready for us yet so let's make Clinton pay
They never wanted us to make it
Everything that we possess
We had to fight and take it
I think the president is smokin' weed, bumpin' this beat
Makin' a livin' out of my misery
'Til he got a friend like me

I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me

Promise to visit
I know it's rough in your cell
Receiving mail to the county jail
This is hell
When I was younger
I could picture livin'
In luxury
So how the fuck did I end up in prison
Fuckin' snitches
They got me crossed by my own side
I found him by his self
No drama, he alone die, nobody cry
Should have never testified
You got my nigga 25
So now I sacrifice your life
Help to separate me and my dog
Broken ties, why the fuck should I let you live
When I'm dead inside?
Rapid fire my delivery
I'm bustin' at they whole crew
Nigga, remember me
Hit up my Outlawz set
Then throw my pistol in the ocean
Ditch my ski mask
And get to straight coastin'
It's visitin' day at San Quinton
Always there to see your closest roaddog
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me

I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
I'm down for you so ride with me
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me

Come after us, best be complete
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My Enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me
Come after us, best be complete
My enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
Nobody knows where we'll be
My Enemy's your enemy
'Cause you ain't never had a friend like me

Right! You ain't ever had a friend like me
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me
You ain't ever had a friend like me
'Cause you ain't ever had a friend like me



The money behind the dreams
My right hand, my other Capo in this big motherfuckin' war we got
My other Capo in this big-ass
Conglomerate called Death Row
Snoop motherfuckin Dogg, Tha Doggfather
And who's he coming through right now?
Makaveli the Don
Feel this, Killuminati

Lord have mercy, father help us all
Since you supplied your phone number, I can't help but call
Time for action, conversating, we relaxing, kicking back
Got you curious for thug passion, now picture that
Tongue-kissing, hand full of hair, look in my eyes
Time to make the bed rock, baby look how it rise
Me and you moving in the nude, do it in the living room
Sweating up the sheets, it's the Thug in me
I mean no disrespecting when I tongue-kiss your neck
I go a long way to get you wet, what you expect?
Late night, hit the highway, drop the top
I pull over, getting busy in the parking lot
And don't you love it how I lick your hips and glide?
Kiss you soft on your stomach, push my love inside
Got you lost in a love zone, stuck in the lust
I got the bedroom shaking, back-breaking
When we're tossing it up

Feel this baby, I like the way it's going down
When nobody's around, slip-slide ride
Giving me that nice smile
Female I like, what I want to give all night
You and me alone, everybody's gone, toss it up
Baby let's get it on!

I like the way you please me, baby
The sexy way you tease me, shorty
The way you move your body
It really drives me crazy
Your body hypnotizing, your smell is so exciting
So baby come on home with me
I like the way you give it to me, baby

I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up

Play on, play on, play on, play on
Play on, play on, play on, play on
Play on, play on, play on, play on
Play on, play on, play on, play on

Oh, it's K-Ci baby, mmm, that want you lady
Oh, don't act so shady
Baby, your taste as fine as gravy
The way you move that thang, you make me wanna sang
Girl you make my bells rang, make them go ting-a-ling!

Nasty man, I'm here again
Don't want it to ever end
It's feeling too good
Gimme some more, oh lady, lady
Your body the kind I like-ah
Big booty titillating delight-ah
Back it up yo, let me in there
Toss it up for me

I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
I like the way you give it to me
Let me see you toss it up
So won't you play on

How do you want it? What's your phone number? I get around
Cali Love to my true Thugs, picture me now
Still down for that Death Row sound, searching for paydays
Blown and forgotten, rotten for plotting Child's Play
Check your sexuality, as fruity as this Alize
Quick to jump ship, punk trick, what a dumb move
Cross Death Row, now who you gonna run to?
Laugh at you suckers cause you similar
Pretending to be hard, oh my God, check your temperature
Screaming "Compton", but you can't return, you ain't heard?
Brothers pissed cause you switched and escaped to the burbs
Mob on to this new era, cause we untouchable
Still can't believe that you got 'Pac rushing you
Up in you, bless the real, all the rest get killed
Who can you trust? Only time reveals
Toss it up

Let me see you toss it up
Let me see you toss it up
Let me see you toss it up
Let me see you toss it up

Yeah no doubt
Toss it up now
Play on playa, play on
How can some non-players do a song about tossing it up
And then want to do a player song?
We are not little kids, you fat ass, you feelin' threatened)
Teddy Riley, who? Puffy? who?
Puffy, I read your little interview buddy, c'mon
You still ain't touching us, all that peace talk
I don't care if you kiss my ass from here to across the street, boy
It's on! Toss it up, we took you on
You know who beat we took, and we took y'all beat
Tired of suckers rocking beats that don't belong to them, toss it up, it's on, it's out there now, it's our beat now
Yeah, toss it up now!



I would share the definition of ballin’
With you white folks, but no
The game is to be sold not told, so fuck you

I'm just living and a lovin'
Waiting for the moment
When you've got time to kill

I'm up before the sunrise, first to hit the block
Little bad muthafucka’ with a pocket full of rocks
Learn to throw them thangs, get my skinny little ass kicked
And niggas laugh til the first muthafucka’ got blasted
I put that nigga in his casket
Now they covering the bastard in plastic
I smoke blunts on the regular, buck when it counts
I'm trying to make a million dollars out a quarter-ounce
And getting ghost on the 5-0
Fuck them hoes
Got a .45, screaming out survival
Hey nigga, can I lay low? Cook some yay-yo
Holla "one-time" when I say so
Don't wanna to go to the pen, I'm hitting fences
NARCs on a nigga's back, missing me by inches
In a city where the skinny niggas die?"
Tell Mama "don't cry"
Cause even when they kill me
They can never take the game from a young G
I'm Str8 ballin'!

I'm just living and a lovin'
Waiting for the moment
When you've got time to kill

I'm still on parole, but I'm the first nigga serving
Pour some liquor on the curb for my niggas that deserve it
But if I want to make a million, gotta stay dealing
It's kinda booming round the way and today I'll make a killing
Dressing down like I’m dirty, but only on the block
It's a clever disguise to keep me running from the cops
I'm getting high, I think I'll die if I don't get no ends
I'm in a bucket, but I’m riding it like it's a Benz
I hit the strip, let my music bump
Drinking liquor and I'm looking for some hoes to fuck
Rather die making money than live poor and legal
As I slang another ounce, I wish it was a kilo
I need money in a major way
Time to fuck my beyach! Ha! And getting paid
You other muthafuckers crawlin'
But me and my muthafuckin' thug niggas
We str8 ballin'!!!

I'm just living and a lovin'
Waiting for the moment
When you've got time to kill

Look here, y'all know what time it is
This the part where y'all loc up
Know what I'm sayin'?
Doing 55, nigga, do time
The police right behind
They can't see me, they wanna be me
Str8 muthafuckin' ballin'
Start letting it off, nigga this 94, and niggas want mo'
That's how it's goin down my muthafuckin' nigga
Bulletproof vests and all, you know?

Damned if I don't, and damned if a nigga do
So watch a young motherfucker pull a trigger just to raise up!
But don't let them see you cry, dry your eyes
Young nigga, time to do or die
I keep a pistol in my pocket, ready
On my block ain't no time for a nigga to even cock shit
And I done seen a muthafucka’ peep pain
At point-blank range cause he slept on the game
And ain't a damned thing changed
You shaking the dice, now roll em
If you can't stand pain, better hold em
Cause ain't no telling what you might roll
You might fold, catch AIDS from a slight cold Nigga
Best to live your life to the fullest
Be quick to kill the bull
Got a pistol, motherfucker, better pull it
Cause even when they kill me, they can never
Take the game from a young G. We st8 ballin'!

I'm just living and a lovin'
Waiting for the moment
When you've got time to kill

They have you niggas believe you bout to die
When we really coming up like a muthafucka
Just str8 ballin', know what I'm sayin'?
Fuck that small-time nickel-and-dime shit
If you gonna do it, do it nigga
If you want it, pursue it!
We can handle the shit
It's time for niggas to stay ballin'!
We made this muthafucka! For who?

To my niggas in the penitentiary
Loc up like a motherfucka when they mention me
Cause you fuckin' with the realest motherfucka ever born
And, once again, it's on
I'm busting on these bitches till they gone
Now who the hell can you get to stop me?
I'm in the projects, parlaying with my posse
I keep my Glock cocked
Nigga, cause they all shady
I finally made it, now these jealous bitches trying to fade me!
I ain't going out, I'd rather blast back
I'm on the corner with my niggas watching cash stack
And I came up a long way from food stamps
And taking shit from these low-life ghetto tramps
How could you blame me?
If they sweat me I'mma open fire!
What could I do? Pull my trigger or watch my nigga die
I'm representing to the fullest, giving devil slugs
I'm on the block slanging drugs with the young thugs
And motherfucka, we be ballin'!
All motherfuckin day long! Stay strong! We str8 ballin



Whassup? It's 2Pac. Can you get away?
Let me come swoop you up
I know you got a man, but he ain't gon' mind if I take you out
Let me take you to lunch, I'll have you back before he even get home, before anybody see
Aww c'mon! Pleeeeeease...
Oh aight – what's wrong with your eye?
Why you got on glasses?

Ever since I met ya I could peep the pressure
It's like your man don't understand, all he does is stress ya
I can see your state of misery from the introduction
Ain't 'bout no suckin' and touchin', just harmless discussion
Maybe we can see a better way, find a brighter day
Late night phone conversations – would that be OK?
I don't wanna take up all your time, be the next in line
Tell me your size, let me find you things with you in mind
I can see you're cautious and I'm careful not to scare you
The anticipation of love makin'
Got you shakin' when I'm standin' near you
News of precision will prepare ya
In case you get scared, just ask the man in the mirror
Now the picture's gettin' clearer
All he does is hit you hard
I tell you to leave him, and you tell me keep my faith in God
I don't understand, I just wanna bring ya home
I wonder should I leave you alone
And find a woman of my own
All the homies tell me that you don't deserve it
I contemplate – but in my heart I know you worth it
Tell me, can you get away?

Ebony, can you get away?
C'mon… Let's go… Can you get away?
Can you get away?

So much pressure in the air

Could it be my destiny to be lonely?
Ain't checkin' for these hoochies that be on me
‘Cause they phony
But you was different, I got no need to be suspicious
‘Cause I can tell, my life with you would be delicious
The way you lick your lips and shake your hips got me addicted
I'm sittin' here hopin' that we can find some way to kick it
Even though I got your digits, gotta struggle to resist it
Slowly advance when it's my chance not to miss it
You blow me kisses when he ain't lookin'
Now your heart's tooken
My only wish is that you change your mind and he get shook
Wanna take you there but you scared to follow
Come see tomorrow
Hopin' I can take you through the pain and sorrow
Let you know I care – that someone's there for your struggle
Depend on me, when you have needs or there's trouble
I wanna give you happiness and maybe even more
I told you before, no time to waste
We can hook up at the store. Can you get away?


I sit here reminiscin' and I hope you listenin'
In the position to pressure and offer competition
Me and you was meant to be my destiny, no longer lonely
‘Cause now it's on for you and me, all I can see
A happy home – that's my fantasy
But my reality is problems with your man and me
What can I do? Don't wanna lose you to this sucker
‘Cause if he touch ya, I got some drama for that busta
Don't wanna rush ya, but make your mind up fast
Nobody knows, on who controls will it last?
Before I ask, I hope you see that I'm sincere
And even if you stay with him today I'm still here
I refuse to give up, ‘cause I believe in what we share
You're livin' in prison and what he's givin' can't compare
‘Cause everything I feel for you I wanna let you know
Passionately yours and I'll never let you go
Tell me, can you get away?

And I can't get away
I'm not happy here
I'm not happy here

You ain't got to go through all this drama and this stress
With this old half a man, ya know what I'm sayin'?
I ain't tryin' to put you in a position
Where you gotta give up your lifestyle for everything
You need, but now… he ain't even takin' care of you
He beatin' on you and shit; look how you look!
You too motherfuckin' raw to be with that nigga
Ya know what I'm sayin'?
Shake that sucker to the left
Let me show you what this life is really about
Ya know what I'm sayin'? You need to be on first class
Need to be goin' to Hawaii, seein' the world
Seein' what this world got to offer you
Not goin' to, ya know what I'm sayin'?
The emergency room, gettin' stitches
‘Cause this nigga done got jealous. Don't cry, it's all good

Can you take me from here?
Shake that man, get away
Can you take me from here?
I'ahhhhhm unhappy here
And I need you to show me love
Because it's so much pressure now
And I neeeeed to get awayyyheyyyeahhh



The only way, for me to come back, is by Makaveli
That's it! All these motherfuckers stole from me
I'm taking back what's mine

Even if I die, I'm gon' be a fuckin problem
Do you believe in ghosts, motherfucker?
Real live black... ghosts
Feel me?

Some say I'm crazy, these punk-ass cops can't fade me
Mama tried to raise me, but had too many babies
Papa was a motherfuckin, joke
Used to find dope in his coat
And nearly choked when he'd tell me not to smoke
Daaamn, don't get me started
My mama smoked so God damn much
When she was pregnant I'm surprised I ain't retarded
At night I can't sleep, count sheep
As they pass through the glass of my neighbors five deep
Starin at the wall, heard a scream
Wake up in the mornin'
See the blood in the hall from the murder scene
Don't cry, just ask why, and try not to die
As I take you through a ghetto nigga's lullaby
On the corner, where the niggas slang they crack
And the undercovers jack those that don't watch they back
Take a puff from the blunt and watch the smoke swirl
My mossberg goes BOOM, what's another plug
Snatchin drugs, pumpin' slugs in these other thugs
Every step could be death 'til you blast
And be the last nigga left, then I'll be ghost

Don't cry, just ask why, and try not to die
As I take you through a ghetto nigga's lullaby

A seven-deuce full of niggas goes by
Thought I was trippin' the second time they rolled, by
Recognized the plates, the faces looked familiar
Everybody swear they know the nigga that's gonna, kill ya
Don't murder me murder me, killa a nigga in his sleep
Let me die as I rest in peace, deep
Back to these niggas in the seven-deuce
A Mac-10 out the window bout to let it loose, what could I do
Run for cover and return fire
DIE MOTHERFUCKIN DIE, hope your ass fry, don't ask why
But I let off everything I have
An empty clip, hit the ground as a nigga dash
On my ass was the motherfuckin cops now
Barely breathin tryin to keep from gettin shot down
BOO-YAOW is the sound, bullet whizzed by
Still runnin like a nigga got nine lives
Don't know why but I'm running to my fucking block
Took a shot, tired of running from the niggas and the cops
Time to be a ghost
And then we'll be ghost


FUCK THE POLICE NIGGA!



U R the omega of my heart
The foundation 4 my conception of Love
When I think of what a black woman should be
Its u that I First think of

U will never fully understand
How Deeply my Heart Feels 4 u
I worry that we'll grow apart
And I'll end up losing u

U bring me 2 climax without sex
And u do it all with regal grace
U r my heart in Human Form
A Friend I could never replace



Niggas out there jealous cause we be bailin' with Death Row
They try to playa hate, but they can't fade us though
We be mobbin' through the neighborhood, yeah
We be throwin' down
This goes out to you playa
You know, you know who you are

Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me nigga, you better holla at me
Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me nigga, you better holla at me
Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me nigga, you better holla at me

Are you confused?
You wonder how it feels to walk a mile inside the shoes of a nigga who don't have a thing to lose
When me and you was homies
No one informed me it was all a scheme
You infiltrated my team and sold a nigga's dreams
How could you do me like that?
I took ya family in
I put some cash in ya pocket, made you a man again
And now you let the fear put your ass in a place
Complicated to escape, it's a fool's fate
Without your word you're a shell of a man
I lost respect for ya, nigga
We can never be friends
I know I'm runnin' through your head now
What could you do?
If it was up to you, I'd be dead now
I let the world know, nigga, you a coward
Ya could never be live
Until you die
See the motherfuckin' bitch in your eye
Type of nigga, that let the evil of the money trap me

Gotta be afraid, don’t let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay
So I gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay

Curious, spittin' lyrics on the verge of furious
I'm addicted to currency
Nigga that's why we're doin' this
I got shot up, I surprised the niggas the way I got up
And then I hit the studio, it's time to blow the block up
No hesitation
This information got you contemplatin'
Heartbreakin' and eliminatin' with this conversation
Break him and let him see the face of a mental patient
It's a celebration of my criminal elevation, more participation
I want members that call the fifty states
To keep the nation anticipatin' until we break
Will I be great, is it my fate?
To live the life of luxury, some niggas bought my tapes
So much jealousy it scares me
So be prepared, cause only the strong survive
Probably never knew the way it feels to die
So you see come fuck with me, I give that ass a try!!
Nigga, holla at me

Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay
And now I gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay

I should've saw the signs, I was blinded
Criminal minds of a young black brotha doin' time
So many brothas framed in this dirty game
It's a shame, so much pressure on my brain while she blame me
Secrets in the dark, only her and I know
Now I'm sittin' in the state pen', doin' time slow
Guess she made a bad decision
That got me livin' just like an animal
I'm caged up in state prison
My niggas dissin' cause hell hath no fury like a woman's scorn
A cemetery full of motherfuckers not knowin'
Picture my prophecy I got some attacking me, on top of me
I'm runnin' from the coppers, but never let 'em stop me
Cause I'm a soldier
Hell, ever since I was a little nigga havin' fantasies of one day getting older
Niggas is paranoid, trust; a no no
Love is a mystery, fuck the po po
Holla at me

So when you see me nigga
You better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay
Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay
A nigga gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me, nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay

Niggas out there jealous cause we be bailin' with Death Row
They try to playa hate, but they can't fade us tho'
We be mobbin' through the neighborhood, yeah
We be throwin' down

Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay
Gotta be careful, can't let the evil of the money trap me
So when ya see me nigga, you better holla at me
You better beware where you lay
We better not find where you stay



Throw me a cigarette, dawg! {inhales}
They got me feelin' crazier than a motherfucker
I got Bad Azz in this motherfucker
Makaveli the Don, representin' the Outlawz
Bad Azz representin' the LBC Crew
So what'cha wanna do? Y'know how we do it

Puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
Oh yeah, I feel crazy
Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
Oh yeah, I feel crazy

Last year was a hard one, but life goes on
Hold my head against the wall, learnin' right from wrong
They say my ghetto instrumental detrimental to kids
As if they can't see the misery in which they live
Blame me for the outcome, ban my records – check it
Don't have to bump this, but please respect it
I took a minus and now the hard times are behind us
Turned into a plus, now they stuck livin' blinded
Hennessy got me feelin' bad, time to stop drinkin'
Rollin' in my drop-top Jag, what's that cops thinkin'?
Sittin' in my car, watch the stars and smoke
I came a long way, but still I got so far to go
Dear Mama, don't worry; I'ma watch for snakes
Tell Setchu that I love her, but it's hard today
I got the letter that she sent me, and I cried for weeks
This what came out when I tried to speak – all I heard was…

Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
I feel crazy
Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
I feel crazy

I see Bloods and Crips runnin' up the hill
Lookin' for a better wayyy
My brothers and sisters, it's time to bail
‘Cause even thug niggas prayyy
Hopin' God hear me, I entered the game
Look how much I changed
I'm no longer innocent – casualties of fame
Made a lot of money, seen a lot of places
And I swear I seen a peaceful smile on my mama's face
When I gave her the keys to her own house, this yo' land
Your only son done became a man
Watchin' time fly, I love my people, do or die
But I wonder why we scared to let each other fly
June 1-6, '7-1, the day
Mama pushed me out her womb, told me, "Nigga, get paid!"
No one can understand me – the black sheep
Outcasted from my family, now packin' heat
I run the streets, a young runaway, live for today

Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
I feel crazy
Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
Crazy, crazy, crazy

God, help me out here, ‘cause I'm possessed
I need the root of all evil for my stress
‘Cause money's like a strong prescription
Drug, it's got me addicted
To the pleasure and the pain it inflicted
Somethin' about the paper
With the pictures of the president's head
Damn, it's like a motherfuckin' plague that spread
It's epidemic; forgotten, forgotten it got worse
I keep my head on straight, makin' money ‘cause it's cursed
Makin' money makes a difference day by day
So I gotta stay paid, no doubt, day in and day out
This life is like a vicious cycle called fightin' to live
No matter how hard you try, it's in death, you gotta die
A lot of my peers didn't make it to the years to come
Did life doin' right, or did life livin' dumb
Who has the answers? I wonder, I turn to my elders
They aged and experienced, but they can't even tell ya
Or tell me, that there'll be light at the end of the road
A million things run through my mind
You ain't gotta be in jail to be doin' time

Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy
I feel crazy
Time goes by, puffin' on lye
Hopin' that it gets me high
Got a nigga goin' crazy

I feel fucked up in this bitch
I smoked half a ounce to the head
Chocolate Thai, indo, Hawaiian, lambsbread, buddha
All that shit!
I'm fucked up in this motherfucker
And Hennessy don't help
Thug Passion in this muh'fucker
Makaveli the Don puttin' it down to the fullest
Maximum overload
3 Day Theory, Killuminati to your body
With the impact of a 12 gauge shotty
Double-I slugs, no love, straight thugs

One time for my niggas in the jail cell
One time for my niggas doin' life in Hell
One time for my niggas doin' life in Hell
One time for my niggas on the Death Row
For my niggas on Death Row
One time for my niggas livin' broke
One time for my niggas livin' broke
One time for my niggas in the jail cell
Wonder if it get me high, yeah



Here we go; we gonna send this one out to the old school
All these motherfuckers in the Bronx, and Brooklyn, and Staten Island
Queens, and all the motherfuckers that laid it down, the foundation
Ya know what I'm saying? Nothing but love for the old school
That's who were going do this one for, ya feel me?

"What more could I say? I wouldn't be here today
If the old school didn't pave the way"

I remember Mr. Magic, Flash, Grandmaster Caz
LL, Raising Hell, but, that didn't last
Eric B. & Rakim was, the shit to me
I flip to see a Doug E. Fresh show, with Ricky D
And Red Alert was puttin in work, with Chuck Chill
Had my homies on the hill getting ill, when shit was real
Went out to steal. Remember Raw, with Daddy Kane?!
When De La Soul was puttin Potholes in the game
I can't explain how it was, Whodini
Had me puffin on that buddha gettin buzzed, cause there I was
Them block parties in the projects, and on my block
You diggy don't stop, sippin on that Private Stock
Through my speaker Queen Latifah, and MC Lyte
Listen to Treach, KRS to get me through the night
With T La Rock and Mantronix, to Stetsasonic
Remember "Push It" was the bomb shit, nuttin like the old school


I had, Shell Toes, and BVD's
A killer crease inside my Lee's when I hit the streets
I'm playing skelly, Ringolevio, or catch a kiss
Before the homies in my hood learned to smack a bitch
I remember. way back, the weak weed they had
Too many seeds in the trey bag
I'm on the train headin uptown, freestyling
With some wild kids from Bucktown, profiling
Cus the hoochies was starin, thinking "what them niggas wearing?"
I'm wondering if that's her hair, I remember
Stickball, humpin hoochies on the wall
Or taking leaks on the steps, stinking up the hall
Through my childhood, wild as a juvenile
A young nigga tryin to stay away from Rikers Isle
Me and my homies breakin nights, tryin to keep it true
Out on the roof sipping 90 proof, ain't nuttin like the old school


Remember popping and locking to Kurtis Blow, the name belts
And Scott LaRock the Super Ho back in Latin Quarters
When Slick Rick was spittin La Di Da Di
Gaming the hoochies at the neighborhood block parties
I remember, breakdancing to Melle Mel
Jekyll and Hyde, LL when he Rocks the Bells
Forget the TV, I'd rather hit the streets and do graffiti
Be careful don't let the transit cops see me
It ain't nothing like the old school!


Haha, on the real though
Remember seeing Brooklyn go crazy up in the motherfucking party?
Remember motherfuckers used to go, "Is Brooklyn in the house?"
And motherfuckers would lose they God Damn Mind!
I remember goin places that motherfuckers was scared to say
They was from anywhere but Brooklyn; that shit was the bomb
Back in the motherfucking old school nigga
Remember skelly nigga? Knocking niggas out the box, popping boxes?
Remember stickball? Member niggas to run that shit like that?
Remember the block-- 'Member screaming up at your moms from the window?
The ice cream truck, remember all the mother--
'Member the Italian Ices, yo? Yo, remember the Italian Ices?!
The Spanish Niggas comin' down with the coconut ices and shit?
I came through the door, said it before
That was the shit!




He just stand by the goddamn window
You don't work, you don't fuck, you don't
You don't do a goddamn thing

I see death around the corner, gotta stay high while I survive
In the city where the skinny niggas die
If they bury me, bury me as a G nigga, no need to worry
I expect retaliation in a hurry
I see death around the - corner, any day
Tryin to keep it together, no one lives forever anyway
Strugglin' and strivin', my destiny's to die
Keep my finger on the trigger, no mercy in my eyes
In a ball of confusion, I'm thinkin' 'bout my daddy
Madder than a motherfucker, they never shoulda had me
I guess I seen too many murders, the doctors can't help me
Got me stressin' with my pistol in my sheets, it ain't healthy
Am I paranoid? - Tell me the truth
I'm out the window with my AK, ready to shoot
Ran out of indo and my mind can't take the stress, I'm out of breath
Make me wanna kill my damn self; but I see death around the corner

I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner

I see death around the corner, the pressure's gettin' to me
I no longer trust my homies - them phonies tried to do me
Smokin' too much weed, got me paranoid, stressed
Pack a gat and my vest, under my clothes when I dress
Here's hopin' I die the way I lived, straight thuggin'
Huggin' my trigger for all them niggas that was buggin'
My homie told me once, don't you trust them other suckers
They front like they your homies but they phony motherfuckers
And even if I did die young, who'd care
All I ever got was mean mugs and cold stares
Got homies in my head that done passed away screamin', please
Young nigga, make G's
I can't give up, although I'm hopeless, I think my mind's gone
All I can do is get my grind on, death around the corner

I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner

Ever since I was an itty bitty kitty
Drinkin' liquor out my momma's titty
And smokin' weed was an everyday thang in my household
And drinkin' liquor til' you out cold
And though I'm grown now, nigga it's still on - Pow!
Bustin on them niggas 'til they gone
How many more jealous ass bitches, comin' for my riches
Now I gotta be suspicious when I bone
Cause if I ain't sharp and heartless, them bitches'll start shit
Excuse me, but this is where we part bitch
No more game for free, please explain to me
Why niggas trip bitch, who you came to see?
Murder me now but see me later man, that's on my pops
I got homies that will hunt you 'til you drop
I hope the Lord can forgive me, I was a G
And gettin' high was a way of bein' free; I see death around the corner

I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner
I see death around the corner

This is for all the real motherfuckin' niggas out there
I know you ain't scared to die; we all gotta go, y'know?
A real motherfucker will pick the time he goes
And make sure he handles his motherfuckin' business
You fuckin hump?" - )
Y'all niggas stop actin' like pussies out there, all right

{*movie samples*}
"If any of you..
Are tired of gettin' ripped off by guys like that.." -

"I want his family dead! I want his house burnt to the ground!
I wanna go there in the middle of the night I wanna piss on his ashes!"
"I want his family dead! I want his house burnt to the ground!
I wanna go there in the middle of the night I wanna piss on his ashes!"

"I want that son of a bitch dead, I want him dead!
I want him dead, I don't care.."



A military mind, nigga
A military mind mean money
A criminal grind, nigga
A criminal grind mean hustle
You know

We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes

Now can your mind picture, a thug nigga drinkin' hard liquor
This ghetto life has got me catchin' up to God quicker
Who would figure that all I need was a hair trigger
Semi-automatic MAC-11 just to scare niggas
Pardon my thug poetry, but suckers is born everyday
And feared men grow on trees
Criminal ties for centuries, a legend in my own rhymes
So niggas whisper when they mention
Machiavelli was my tutor Donald Goines, my father figure
Mama sent me to go play with the drug dealers
Henceforth, we thug niggas and we came in packs
Every one of niggas strapped sippin' on ‘yak
In the back, my AR-15
Thuggin' 'til I die, these streets got me cravin' thorazine
My lyrics are blueprints to money makin'
Fat as that ass that honey shakin'

My nigga tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
My nigga tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas despise, look in my eyes

I bust a trey-trey, buggin an' shit
They call it overthuggin' and shit
But I was just a younger nigga;
Gettin' older and lovin' this shit
But what was I doin' in this place?
To the fakes without a pistol in the first
Facin' termination in the worst
But I figured to play the wall; to watch all
These playa hatin' niggas position for I could see 'em all
Made it up out of there, lucky to be here to tell you
But it'll never be a repeat people I'm tryna tell you

Now picture the scenery, I'm thugged out smokin' greenery
Considered a B.G., but I'm off in this game something D-P
My eyes only see deez, that's why I'm young and burnt out
Learned the know how, well how to do now, by 18 turned out
And wide open - the ridin' and smokin'
Collidin' with foes - in the worst place;
Y'all shouldn'ta fucked with us, in the first place
Y'all real O.G.'s, droppin' game to the youngsters
Y'all don't want no funk cause
Y'all be the next in the long line of war stories

We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes

I breaks them off with this gangsta war story tale
Stacking loot up in the coupe that I protect with a Mack 12
Slap my clip in the chamber; fool, your life's in danger
No one will remain when I come through dumping insane
Call me Bo Loc Major Pain, gun-slang and moving 'caine
I be the nigga that's pulling the trigger and dumping the hot ones up in your brain
More bigger balls than RuPaul, Thug Life ain't a ball
Never been no sign for men call
How we bucks them down on the way to the ground
Ain't nothing but the hog in me
Plus, stompin' steel toed, killin' up hoes and keep mobbin' G
It ain't no calling the funk off
Don't be funking with my sawed off
Bust they dirty-ass drawers off
And had them bitch niggas hauled off

We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, we Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes

My whole family been raised, on shit that ain't okay
Ain't nothing on this earth will make a nigga like me stay
I'm reminiscing, and catchin' flashbacks when niggas ran up
In my house and I was too young, to try to blast back
What happend then? No one would tell me since I was three
Heard that God took my peoples, now they living somewhere free
But fuck that, you got what's mines and I want that
Never drop my guard, been on the squad, since ways back
And now I'm sitting, holding in anger because my parents missing
Thugging Immortal when got some war stories for you

Now look at me - straight Outlaw Immortal
Never gave a fuck cause I was nobody's daughter
Outlawing from my tits to my clits, don't try to figure
Cause the murderous tendencies in my mind, can't be controlled, nigga
So who's the bigger, who's the quickest killer?
Would you try to trip with my finger on the 9 milla
When I got you on kay-nine-fourths
Prayin' to God as your life goes back and forth
We tradin' war stories

We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes
We tradin' war stories, Outlawz on the rise
Jealous niggas I despise, look in my eyes

War stories nigga; hahaha, what players do
Thug Life, Outlaw Immortalz
Motherfucking 2Pac a.k.a. Makaveli
Can you feel me?
Just so you know, it's on Death Row
My niggas love that shit
Dramacydal in this motherfucker, heheheh
Yea nigga! Shout out to my niggas Fatal N Felony
C-Bo, the bald head nut, what?
You know what time it is



— What's up?
— Yo, man, what's up? This riding motherfucker, jack me at rollin' 'round bumping, ’cause music's too loud, you know what I'm sayin'?
— Yo, this is P-O to the G-O
— Motherfuckin' cop just jacked me, 'cause I was drinking beer in Mill Valley
— What's up, man?
— A'ight, man, fuck 'em

I don't give a fuck
They done pushed me to my limit, I'm all in
I might blow up any minute, did it again
And now I'm in the back on the paddy wagon
While this cop's bragging about the nigga he's jackin'
I see no justice, all I see is niggas dyin' fast
The sound of a gun blast, then watch the hearse pass
Just another day in the life, G
Gotta step lightly, 'cause cops tried to snipe me
The cabs, they don't wanna stop for a brother, man
But damn near have an accident to pick up another man
I went to the bank to cash my check
I get more respect from the motherfuckin' dope man
The Grammys and American Music shows
They pimp us like hoes, take our dough, but they hate us, though
You better keep your mind on the real shit
And fuck tryin' to get with these crooked-ass hypocrites
The way they see it, we was meant to be kept down
Just can't understand why we gettin' respect, now
Mama told me there'd be days like this
But I'm pissed, 'cause it stays like this
And now they're trying to ship me off to Kuwait?
Give me a break! How much shit can a nigga take?
I ain't going nowhere, no how
Bush wanna throw down?
You better bring the gun, pal
'Cause this is the day we make 'em pay
Fuck bailing hay, I better spray with an AK
And even if they shoot me down
There'll be another nigga bigger
From the motherfuckin' underground
So, step but you better step quick
'Cause the clock's going tick and I'm sick of the bullshit
You're watching the makings of a psychopath
But you sit and laugh before the wrath and aftermath
Who's that behind the trigger?
Who do you think? A motherfuckin' 90's nigga
Ready to buck and rip shit up, I had enough!

Nigga, it ain't just the blacks
It's also a gang of motherfuckers dressed in blue slacks
They say niggas hang in packs and they attitude is shitty
So, tell me, who's the biggest gang of niggas in the city?
They say we niggas like to do niggas
So me and a cop are just two niggas
A street-walkin' nigga and a beat-walkin' nigga
With a badge, I end his future and his past
With a blast, take his cash before I dash, I bash his head in
Dump him at the dead end and that's just his luck
'Cause a nigga like P don't really give a fuck

Walked in the store, what's everybody staring at?
They act like they never seen a motherfucker wearing black
Following a nigga and shit—ain't this a bitch?
All I wanted was some chips
I wanna take my business elsewhere, but where?
’Cause who in the hell cares
About a black man with a black need?
They wanna jack me like some kind of crack fiend
I wonder if he knows that my income
Is more than his pension, salary and then some
Your daughter is my number one fan
And your trife-ass wife wants a life with a black man
So who's the mack? In fact, who's the blackjack?
Sit back and get fat off the fat cat
While he thinks that he's getting over
I bust a move as smooth as Casanova
And count another quick mill'
I'm getting paid for my trade, but I'm still real
And if you look between the lines you'll find a rhyme
As strong as a fuckin' nine
Mail stacked up, niggas wanna act up
Let's put the gats up and throw your blacks up
But the cops getting dropped by the gun shot
Used to come but he's done, now we run the block
They know we fed up
But they just don't give a fuck

I gotta give my fuck offs
Fuck you to the San Francisco Police Department
Fuck you to the Marin County Sheriff's Department
Fuck you to the FBI
Fuck you to the CIA
Fuck you to the B-U-S-H
Fuck you to the Ameri-K-K-Ka
Fuck you to all you redneck prejudice motherfuckers
That wanna fuck with me, fuck y'all!
Punk-gay insensitive little dick bastards
2Pacalypse motherfuckerin' now
Y'all can all kiss my ass and suck my dick
And my Uncle Tommy's balls
Fuck y'all



Y'all ain't never just tripped and pictured
And just looked at the whole situation
‘Cause once you look at it

They don't give a fuck about us
They don't give a fuck about us
They don't give a fuck about us
If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
Nobody give a fuck about us
And when I start to rise
A hero in their children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

Some say niggas is hard-headed ‘cause we love to trip
Equipped with game so we bang with this thuggish shit
I see you tryin' to hide, hopin' that nobody don't notice
See, you're black like me, so you snap like me
When these devils try to plot, trap our young black seeds
Look it, cops are just as crooked as the niggas they chasin'
Lookin' for role models, our father figures is basers
Some say they expect Illuminati take my body to sleep
Niggas at the party with they shotties just as rowdy as me
Before I fear computer chips, I gotta deal with brothers flippin'
I don't see no devils bleedin', only black blood drippin'
We can change — what your mouth say?
I'm watchin' niggas work their lives out without pay
Whatever it takes to switch places with the busters on top
I'm bustin' shots, make the world stop
They don't give a fuck about us

Now If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in their children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us
If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in their children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

It's the morning after and now all the laughter is gone
Time to reflect on what you did, ‘cause they sayin' you wrong
I'm sure you had your reasons, dawg, I don't doubt ya
See, the simple fact of the matter is they don't give a fuck about ya
Or them five mouths you forced to feed, not includin' yourself
All you want is wealth, they perceive it as greed
So as you loaded up that MAC and continue to buck 'em
I was on paper, thinkin' they don't give a fuck about us

I'm seein' it clearer, hatin' the picture in the mirror
They claim we inferior, so why the fuck these devils fear ya?
I'm watchin' my nation die, genocide the cause
Expect a blood bath, the aftermath is y'alls
I told you, last album, we need help cause we dyin'
Give us a chance, help us advance, ‘cause we tryin'
Ignore my whole plea, watchin' us in disgust
And then they beg when my guns bust
They don't give a fuck about us

Now If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in their children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us
If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in their children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

Now, all my homies got love for me
Down to catch a slug for me
Guaranteed to bleed deeply, now that's love
Shit, nobody else could give a fuck
If I'm tore down, from the floor down, six-feet deep in the cut
What the fuck done went wrong?
How long will I be mourned?
When I'm gone, same song, ain't gave a fuck all along
And who am I to blame 'em?
Just do or die through the rainin'
Since they don't give a fuck, I don't; feel what I'm sayin'?

Now, thug niggas die but multiply in doubles
Wrapped in plastic or closed casket for our troubles
Pressed in times, we busted, like bubbles
With the police, this nation's peace sent here to run you
Now look at what this crooked world has come to
I grew up on the other side of perfect, a life of hurtin'
Man, I still hustle, so I'm dyin' certain
So I spent your time in poor and workin', I see no reason
So I stay ballin' season to season
Why you stuck thinkin' that they give a fuck?

You tell me my world is in peace, but nigga, you're lyin'
‘Cause half of my niggas long gone
Buried in the dirt just for tryin'
Sometimes I think my block is dyin' and that is awful
To wake up to another day, shit ain't changed that's all fool
I wake up sweatin', dreamin', coughin'
Seein' me upside down backwards head twisted
While I'm layin' in the coffin
The shit comes around so often; so tell me somethin'
Before I take it out on the world, and get to dumpin'
Nigga, I been so through pain, go through the struggle
Doin' the same thing you did at my age, and that's hustlin'
On the edge of straight bustin'
Well, since you don't give a fuck, I be frontin'
And I'ma drink my Hennessy like it ain't nothin'

If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
They don't gives a fuck about us
But while I'm kickin' rhymes
Kick it to their children's minds
Now they give a fuck about us
They wanna see us die
They kick us every time we try
‘Cause they don't give a fuck about us
So while I'm gettin' high
I'm watchin' as the world goes by
‘Cause they don't give a fuck about us
If I choose to ride, thuggin' 'til the day I die
They don't gives a fuck about us
But while I'm kickin' rhymes
Kick it to their children's minds
Now they give a fuck about us
They wanna see us die
They kick us every time we try
‘Cause they don't give a fuck about us
So while I'm gettin' high
I'm watchin' as the world goes by
‘Cause they don't give a fuck about us
Riiise… riiise!




Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he's gonna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he's gonna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug!
Said he wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug

Was a nice middle-class nigga
But no one knew the evil he'd do when he got a little bigger
You'd often find him blazed, for puffing on a Newport
Plotting on a another way to catch a case
Was only 16, yet convicted as a felon
With a bunch of old niggas, but you the only one ain't tellin'
I tell you it's a cold world, stay in school
You tell me it's a man's world, play the rules
And fade fools, break rules until we major
Blaze up, getting with hoes through my pager
Was raised up, commence to money-makin' tactics
It's getting drastic, niggas got automatics
My finger's on the trigger
Tell the Lord to make way for another straight thug nigga
I'm sitting, getting buzzed, looking for some love
From the homies, ‘cause shorty wanna be a thug

Said he's gonna be, said he's gonna be
One day he's gonna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he's wanna be, said he's wanna be
One day he's gonna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he's gonna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug

Straight from the hall to the pen
An adolescent nigga standing way higher than six feet ten
He carried weight, like a Mack truck
Gonna bust on playa haters, if them mothafuckas act tuff
Then that's when, a lethal weapon with the razor
This little nigga smoking weed and getting blazed up
No one could figure, when the guns blast, pull the trigger
Could take the life of a young nigga, guns bigger
No mother and father, you see, the nigga's all alone
Old timers my role model, the war zone
Been laced with this game 'til it's a part of me
My heart don't beat no fear, and that ain't hard to see
The future is looking dim
I'm tryin' to make a profit out of living in this sin
I'm in the dark, getting buzzed, looking for some love
Out with the homies, ‘cause shorty wanna be a thug

Said he's gonna be, said he's gonna be
One day he's gonna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he's wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he's gonna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he's wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug
Said he wanna be, one day he's gonna be
Said he wanna be, shorty's gonna be a thug

Shorty's gonna be a thug
Little bad ass nigga, to the young niggas
Gotta stay sharp, nigga, play your part!
You only get three mistakes, and then it's life, big baby
Damn, nigga! Sixteen, nigga?
Sixteen?! Too bad, mothafuckers



Pawhoo hoo hoo hoo
Live from the graveyard
I don’t wanna be your fuckin' man
I wanna be
Yo let me fuck that nigga down
What’s that?
Ay yo what you doin' with that big ass
Set it off, set it off
Let’s be friends
Where my niggas at
Where my niggas, where my niggas
Where my niggas, where my niggas
Let's be friends…

Approach you and post a minute, arm on my double-R tinted
As you pass bye, winkin' my eye, freshly scented
What's the haps, baby? Come get with me and perhaps, lady
You can help me multiply my stacks, baby
Currency seems small, I need companionship
Through with that scandalous shit, I bet your man ain't shit
So why you hesitatin', actin' like yo' shit don't stink?
Check out my diamonds, bitch, everyone gonna blink
This be a thug thang, Outlaw nigga with riches
Cream dreamin', motherfucker, on a mash for bitches
Check my résumé, sippin' on Cristal and Alize
Smokin' on big weed, keyed the Cali way
Don't like trickin', but I'll buy you a fifth
I can't stand no sneaker-wearin' nappy head bitch
Let my pedigree, read briefly, they're so cheap
Puttin' bitch-made bustas to sleep with no grief
Mash on my so-called COMP, who the man?
While I'm tuggin' on your main bitch head
He broke and I smoke daily, baby, let's be friends

You ain't gotta be my man at all
Long as you just bring me your friends
Why you trickin' on them other hoes?
Where the niggas with money? Where you at, baby?)
You ain't gotta be my man at all
Why you trickin' on them other hoes? Let's be friends

I met you and I stuttered in passion
Though slightly blinded by that ass
It was hard to keep my dick in my pants
Every time you pass got me checkin' for you
Hardcore, starin' and watchin'
Me and you, one on one, picture countless options
Was it prophecy? Clear as day, visions on top of me
Erotic, psychotic, would possess bubonics
Far from a crush, I wanna bust your guts and touch
Everything inside you from my head to my nuts
You got me sweatin' like a fat girl goin' for mine
Just a skinny nigga fuckin' like she stole my mind
Back in time, I recall how she used to be
I guess money and fame made you used to me
What's up in 9-6? Fine tricks in drag
Fuck Dre! Tell that bitch he can kiss my ass!
Back to you, my pretty ass caramel queen
Got my hands on your thighs
Now let me in between as friends

You ain't gotta be my man at all
Long as you just bring me your friends
Why you trickin' on them other hoes?
You ain't gotta be my man at all
Long as you just bring me your friends
Why you trickin' on them other hoes? Let's be friends

Can you imagine me in player mode? Rush the tricks
I got her ready for a booty call, I fucked your bitch
Was it me or the fame? My dick or the game?
Scream my name ‘cause, baby, it's delicious
Ghetto weak spot for pretty bitches up and down
Similar to switches
You got me high, let me come inside!
I love it when you get on top, baby, let me ride!
Who wanna stop me? Am I top notch?
Fuck player hatin' niggas, ‘cause they cockblock
You probably hate to see a real thug with vision, what's the game?
Rather see a nigga up in prison, why you change?
Made a livin' out of cuss words, liquor and weed
A bad seed turned good, in this world of G's
Baby got me fantasizin' seein' you naked
It's the fuck song, so check my record, and let's be friends
Where my niggas at? Show me where my niggas at?
Where my bitches at? Thug style!

It goes on and on and on and on)

Where my people at? Show me where my people at!
Where my people at? Show me where my people at!
All my niggas now, just my niggas come!
Where my niggas at? Just my niggas now!
Be friends, tell me where my niggas at
Be friends, tell me where my bitches at
Be friends, tell me where my people at
Be friends, tell me where my bitches at
Make money, take money, be friends

You ain't gotta be my man at all
Long as you just bring me your friends
Why you trickin' on them other hoes?
You ain't gotta be my man at all
Long as you just bring me your friends
Why you trickin' on them other hoes? Let's be friends

Make money, take money!
Make money, take money!
Make money, take money!
Make money, take money!
Make money, take money!



You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting

Hey yo storm
Honestly I think I can fuck wit' a motherfucker like you
See I don't like a motherfucker that be all lonely and shit
All up under me, telling me we having gold, in case she gold ringing
When I'm coming home and all of that ol' crazy shit
What type of life I live

Now peep it, here go the secret on how to keep a playa
Some love makin' and homecookin', I'll see you later
It don't take a lot to keep a nigga heart
Must be a lady in the light but real freaky in the dark
Plus I got some enemies, baby, hold my pistol
And wrap your arms around a nigga every time I kiss you
Can you visualize the picture, me and you in ecstasy
Don't be upset, it's good sex, when you next to me
Do you wanna test me, put your tired head on my chest
A thug nigga's in the house, now you can rest
I bet'cha never screamed a nigga's whole name out
And felt the pleasure and the pain
About to fuck the very taste out your mouth
If you call me when you need me
1-800-skypage, when you wanna see me
Cause I can be your man
And, baby, you can be my lady
But you gotta give a nigga space or you'll drive me crazy
Run the streets

You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting

Yo 'Pac, you know I'm 16 strong behind you boo
But I gotta do what I gotta do
I gotta run the streets you know
I ain't no clean up one minute, type ho'
You know

Now me and you was cool, but I ain't the one to play the fool
Can't make no money in bed
So ain't no future fuckin' you, I ain't the bitch to love ya
Can't do a damn thang for you, if ya ain't about money
9 times outta 10, I'll ignore you, it's a man's world
But real women make the shit go around
Disrespect and I clown the type of bitch to throw down
Throw up the block cause nothin' stops my chips
I boss play ya with this, then twist you lame tricks
Holler if you understand my plan, ladies
Fuck havin' babies by them shady ass niggas, swearin' he can save me
My strategy's official
Checkin' ya pockets while I tongue kiss ya
Soft as tissue
So my next issue is 'how to diss you ?'
They call me Storm from the day I was born
I been known to break the coldest motherfucker, 'til his hearts warm
I ain't never been the type to wait at home alone
Just cause we bone
Don't mean you own me
Nigga, I'm grown

You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting

Hahhahaha yeah nigga
Let nigga hang out with the homies, you know baby
Aye a nigga that hang out more
Will come home, and love you better
You feel me sweetheart?
Let a nigga be free
Don't had a nigga all up on thee
Let him run with his niggas
Let the nigga run the street boo, let him run the streets

I'd rather run the streets to make some mail
And put the game down tight
For these gamin' bitches could get it right
It might be a plan that I'm chosen
Don't get in confusion
Because I'm known for showin' examples how I do it
Thinkin' I'm new to this, because I'm younger
Where I'll only leave you suspicious and to wonder
And at the end I make a come up
Nigga, was raised up off of M.O.B
Fetti over something
That's tellin' me don't run the streets

So tell me am I wrong?
For tryin' to communicate through a song
I'm up early in the morning, by sunrise I'll be gone
All my homies is waitin' for me
Plottin' on plans that we made and all the fun that it's gonna be
So meet me at 3'
And don't be late nigga
We hangin' out all night while drinkin' straight liquor
I heard it's poppin' at a club
But they say I can't get in, cause I'm dressed like a thug
Until I die
I'll be game related
Got me strivin' for a million, stayin' motivated
Now that we made it
It's a battle just for the big money
I'm livin' wild, no smiles, cause ain't a thing funny
I came up hungry, just a lil' nigga, tryin' to make it
I only got one chance, so I gotta take it
Ya never know when it's all gonna happen
The rappin' or the drugs
But until then give me love
And let me run the streets

You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting

Let the nigga run the streets boo - I hate you hahah
I'll call you back
Just let me hang with my niggas
Why you actin' like that Michel'le, Ha?
You know nigga wanna kick it with his homboys and shit
I told ya I was coming back later on - right?
So you don't believe a nigga
Just cook for a nigga - pleaaaaase!
Make some of that shit you made last meal
Some of them breads and shit
I'll be back through later tonight
I'm hashing weed
We finna drink some Hennessy and some Alize
We finna eat that foods
Smoking ol' blunt
Lay up in the bed, watch out Jay Leno and something
Then after that, shit do what after comes to mind baby
Just let a nigga run with the homies
Let me go kick it with my niggas
When I come back, I be all yours
For real

You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting
You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waiting for you
Until you get through
I'll be waiting



Makaveli the Don, break on 'em!
Ah put ya, ah put ya hands on ya, hands on ya heater
Hands on ya, hands on ya heater, hands on ya, hand…

Let it be prophesized; niggas'll die because your crew's goon
Around the way niggas get murdered by the full moon
Heard it in whispered tones
Niggas is bold and they choose to roll
I kill 'em all, watch now, nigga, truth be told
Westside was the war cry, look how they scatter
Niggas dyin' by my 30-yard, brains'll splatter
Wonder why these niggas cross me, I'm certified crazy
So sick the world made me
Now diggy-die, every time I ride is for reasons
Hard to kill a nigga cause I'm comin' back like Jesus
Bow down to my ill nation, runnin' from drug cases
Lookin' at my congregation so full of thug faces
Momma gave a nigga breath, a life of stress
I invest in a vest and makin' niggas watch they every step
Label me a threat and I ain't even got started with this shit yet
Thug style, baby, hands on my pistol, listen
I'm a ridah, every nigga breathin' pay attention
'Bout to show you motherfuckers how it feel to drop a body
A simple glimpse of my lifestyle, Killuminati…

Hold it down!
Hold it down!
Hold it down!
Hold it down!

After the fire comes the rain, after the pleasure there's pain
Even though we broke for the moment, we'll be ballin' again
'Til I make it, yo, my military be prepared for them bustaz
Similar to bitches too scary, get too near me, we rushin'
Visions of over-packed prisons, millions of niggas thug livin'
Pressures and three strikes, I hope they don't test us
They pull the heat out, ammunition in crates
Psssh! Move without a sound as we slide down pistols in place
They got me fiendin' for currency, the money be callin'
It’s like I’m - dreamin', seein' scenes of me ballin'
Participated in felonious behavior
Cock the cocked 45, snatchin' niggas pagers
Labeled a mark soon as we start, it was hard to quit
We started out drinkin' 40's, moved to harder shit
God damn, now I'm a grown man, I follow no man
Nigga got my own plan, and it's called Killuminati

Killuminati
Hold it down!
Hold it down!
Hold it down!

I spend most of my time bankin', niggas
Because they hate a nigga, comin' across fake niggas
But we made niggas, old school and I'm thinkin'
Y'all some bitch made niggas and you steadily sinkin'
O-U-T, L-A-W-Z, ain't nothing fuckin' with that
We bustin' back, comin' back for the stacks
Laugh last, cash cash, all I want is the paper
Givin' them fuckers tool whips, I rule haters
Y'all can't fade us, we kill, steal and peal quickly
The boss niggas, definitely, put it down strictly
E.D.I. Amin, until the law come for me
Kill 'em all for shorty, '99 Killuminati

They got me thinkin' strugglin' and hustling's my only fate
Toppin' graems on the kichen plate
Tryin' to keep that money straight
Times is rolling three up these streets sleep
But when I crack, hammer cocked back, rapped in my sheets
My life's been crossed, crooked since a seed
It hurts, got a package from the devil, payin' my deeds
Preoccupied by the greed in this crooked life I lead
More funds to spend or bigger guns to squeeze
Me and my thugs clock G's, sippin' naughty thangs
Real as these tats on my body, and it's Killuminati

Hold it down!
Hold it down!
Hold it down!
Hold it down!

The question we ask, do you know what time it is?
You know what type of shit we be
You want that hip-hop real, it's that hip-hop that's real
Hold it down, hold it down! Hip-hop that's worldwide, feel?
Fuck with me, nigga, you get killed!
It don't get no realer than this
What's my motherfuckin' name, nigga?
My niggas, we all bad
What's my muh'fuckin name, nigga?
What's my muh'fuckin name?
Outlawz in this bitch, Death Row at its finest
Repeat! Death Row at it's finest
Nigga, you know what time it is



Fugees! Fugees and Mobb Deep
Tryin' to diss now too, huh?!
Hahaha! Well, I ain't prejudiced
I don't give a fuck
This is what it sounds like
When we ride on our enemies
Biatch! When we ride on our enemies

Hey, got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin' thug niggas?
Used to love niggas, now I plug niggas, and slug niggas
Am I wrong? Niggas makin' songs, tryin' to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I bust, then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin' back to brighten up the sky; how many die?
Heard the Fugees was tryin' to do me
Look, bitch, I'll cut your face, this ain't no motherfuckin' movie
Then, we watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin' at my motherfuckin' sideshow
Bam! Set my plan in mo'
Time to exterminate my foes, I can't stand you hoes
Uh, now label this my fuckin' trick shot
My lyrics runnin' all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we ride on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
I bet you motherfuckers die
When we ride on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies
Bet all you motherfuckers die
When we ride on our enemies

Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain, nigga, time to die
Say goodbye, watch my eyes when I pull the trigger
So right before you die, you bow before a bigger nigga
Now dry your eyes, you was heartless on your hits
Niggas love to scream "peace" after they start some shit
Pay attention, here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you, then I run a train on Mobb Deep—don't fuck with me!
Nigga, you're barely livin', don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin' well
Hell, how many niggas wanna be involved?
See, I was only talkin' to Biggie, but I'll kill all of y'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up by the fuckin' Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody heard
Know I meant every motherfuckin' word
When we ride on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
Make sure everybody die
When we ride, on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies, hehe
I make sure everybody die
When we ride, on our enemies



Aight, new drink
One part Alizé, one part Cristal
Thug passion, baby
Y'all know what time it is
This drink is guaranteed to get the pussy wet and the dick hard
Now, if you with me
Pour a glass and drink with a nigga, knowhatimean?
I ain't tryin' to turn you all niggas into alcohols - alcoholics
I'm just tryin' to turn you into motherfuckin' thugs
So come and get some of this thug passion, baby

Mayne!, I could pull out the drink and be good until it's relevant
But I'm a straight soldier, I'll roll up a nigga like it's Heaven sent
Trippin' over dead presidents
They got these derelicts
I throw was down with this business, tryin' to clown and get a cent
And so rather, than stand forever
Been thinkin' drinkin' over a felony
And hell of me
And how it will be in hella shit, people tellin' me to cool out
But they ain't feelin' me, a motherfuckin' fool, about
My fuckin' cheddar cheese
And it pleases, passion of mine
Thuggin', huggin' plenty of G's and laughin' while I pass through times
And all these bastards be watchin' just keep it plain
I'ma keep it the same partner, just take it the simple game
I can, pinkle with the rain twinklin'
Diamonds and things go blinkin'
Enough to hold me, 'til I'm, old and wrinklin'
And these adversaries
They gonna have to be worryin'
Cause I'ma be illin', fulfillin' my passion
'Til I'm buryin' my thug passion

I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!

Now what if me
Turn this Hennessy into a robbery
The Prophecy probably suddenly switch and how it supposed to be
And dirty money
Can't be evil cause it's fillin' up my tummy
Born in a position, death collision was futuristic
Twistin' riches, but there is only one way to make more
So I'm standin' on the corner tryin' to hustle in the snow
And my bigger bro, couldn't know
But buy a .44, blastin' at playa haters wantin' more
With a thug passion

Puttin' down mashin', control by this thug's passion
Unlike them other bustas pistol blastin'
I'm askin', what happened
To the niggas who kept it real like they claim to
That's what money and fame do, see they ain't true
Travelin' this road my poor soul has been consolidated
With all this bullshit that I done tolerated
How I made it, can be easily stated
It's like my hardest bring the grip with the passion, left me to fuckin' greatest
Load up and take shit

Make it to some high dollar gangsta shit
Jack a stack 'til we got enough bank to split

Creep with me, through that immortal flow
Thug passion got you tremblin' like Death on the Row
Make your move, so I can throw your mind a curve
While I'll be blowin' up the scene, like my nigga Mr. Herb
Take a toke, as your heart goes full arrest
I got the bomb, so nigga, fuck the rest
You need a dub to get you flowin'
And let that loc see smoke
Feelin' the strokes of the 9 squeeze tight and slow

I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!

They say money don't make the man
But damn, I'm makin' money
Observin' you motherfuckers, 'cause some of you bitches funny
Say you want it but you bullshittin'
Lickin' them lips, you got me about to act a fool quick
Sippin' on some Alizé and Cristal, meanwhile
Buy me a drink and get to winkin' at me, she smiles; a niggas full of passion
Satisfaction is everlastin'
"How does it feel?" what I'm askin'
While I'm rubbin' on that ass "Why you laughin'?"
See, I'm diggin' as if I'm curious
Full blown and furious
Baby, get a grip, when I be doin' this
It's so physical my attraction
Driven by alcohol, beware of my reaction
Baby I'm born to ball
Thugged out on Death Row
You better recognize and picture what I said so
Now you can feel it, it's a portion for my niggas in motion
Forever blastin', bitches ain't ready for this thug passion

I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
Thug passion
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!
Thug passion
I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
Thug passion
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!
Thug passion
I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!
I heard it's the bomb
And you got it goin' on
Give me some of your thug passion, baby
You got me drippin' wet
From the way you make me sweat
Give me some of your thug passion, baby ohhhwow!



I don't have everything
As a matter of fact I don't have anything,
except a dream of a better day
And you, to help me find my way
Being a man I am sure to make mistakes
But to keep you, I would do all it takes
and if it meant my love was really true
I'd gladly die and watch over you
I wish you knew how much I cared
You'd see my love is true. By the life we'd share
Even if you changed your mind and said our love was thru
I'd want to die, continuously cry and still I'd love you



Damn, another funeral, another motherfucker
Lord knows
Lord knows
Lord knows

I smoke a blunt to take the pain out
And if I wasn't high, I'd probably try to blow my brains out
I'm hopeless, they should've killed me as a baby
And now they got me trapped in the storm, I'm goin' crazy
Forgive me; they wanna see me in my casket
And if I don't blast I'll be the victim of them bastards
I'm losin' hope, they got me stressin', can the Lord forgive me
Got the spirit of a thug in me
Another sip of that drink, this Hennessey got me queasy
Don't wanna hurl, young nigga take it easy
Picture your dreams on a triple beam, and it seems
Don't underestimate the power of a fiend
To my homies on the block
Slangin' rocks with your Glocks put this tape in your box
When you're runnin from the cops—and never look back
If they could be black, then they would switch
Open fire on them busta-ass bitches, and Lord knows

Lord knows
The Lord knows
The Lord knows

I wonder if the Lord will forgive me or bury me a G
I couldn't let my adversaries worry me
And every single day it's a test, wear a bulletproof vest
And still a nigga stressin' over death
If I could choose when a nigga die, figure I'd
Take a puff on the blunt, and let my trigga fly
When everyday it's another death, with every breath
It's a constant threat, so watch yo' step!
You could be next if you want to, who do you run to?
Murderin' niggas, look what it's come to
My memories bring me misery, and life is hard
In the ghetto, it's insanity, I can't breathe
Got me thinking, what do Hell got?
Cause I done suffered so much, I'm feelin' shell-shocked
And driveby's an everyday thang
I done lost too many homies to this motherfuckin' game
And Lord knows


One-time! One-time!
Fuck the 5-0 cause they after me
Kill me if they could, I'll never let 'em capture me
Done lost too many niggas to this gangbangin'
Homies died in my arms, with his brains hangin', fucked up!
I had to tell him it was alright, and that's a lie
And he knew it when he shook and died, my God
Even though I know I'm wrong man
I can't sleep, so I stay up, don't wanna fuck them bitches
Try to calm me down, I ain't givin' up
I'm gettin' lost in the weed, man, gettin' high
I smoke a blunt to take the pain out
And if I wasn't high, I'd probably try to blow my brains out
Lord knows

Lord knows!
Lord knows.. Jesus..




Who'll be the last motherfucker breathin'?
Tell me, nigga, tell me
Who'll be the last motherfucker breathin'?

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'
Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Woke up with 50 enemies plottin' my death
All 50 seein' visions of me shot in the chest
Couldn't rest, nah, nigga, I was stressed
Had me creepin' 'round corners, homie, sleepin' in my vest
Shit, I'm like a hostage on this troubled block; call the cops
A thug nigga screamin', "Westside!", bustin' double Glocks
Hittin' corners in my Chevy Suburban
Liquor got me drivin' up on the curb
Hand on the steerin' wheel, swervin'
Bless me, Father, I'm a sinner, I'm livin' in hell
Just let me live on the streets, ‘cause ain't no peace for me in jail
Gettin' world-wide exposure
With a bunch of niggas that don't give a fuck, ridin' as my soldiers
I just release 'em on a war path, not your average dealer
Westside, Outlaw, Bad Boy killer
Complete my mission, my competition no longer beefin'
I murdered all them bustas, now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Make sure I hold my position, stand firm in the dirt
For all my soldiers gone, we burnin' the Earth
Outlawz, worldwide, we packed the block
Shootin' rocks at the kid, I'll bust back for Pac
Ask Yak, he'll tell you that it's hell down here
Stale down here, too many jails down here
Why you act like you don't hear me? Young Noble
Outlaw 'til these motherfuckers kill me; I'm still breathin'

Now, we was raised, "Fuck this life," my wrongs, my rights
Holdin' on a tight grip, with death in my sight
And the dark is my light, I'm cynical, sleep walkin' as a true
Walk around town, with a pound full of bitter food
Came a long way from my born day
Dead away where there's war play
Fuck friends! I'll say, rather die for my A-K
With these fag ass niggas, see-through-glass ass niggas
Only-ride-my-dick-and-the-skin-of-my-mash ass niggas

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

I walk around with a knife in my back
Talkin' 'bout a bad day — I live a life like that
It's severe, and I'm losin' my hair, bless a hooligan
Catch me, I'm fallin' out flat, yo, I'm ruined and
Breathin' in sewer stench, no one give a fuck about me
I learned to like it like that when I was still in Mommy
The side of the city that the Devil run from
In the belly of the beast, that's where the fuck we come from
And still I'm breathin'!

And still I'm totally wasted, they want me to face this
Just lost two of my closest na'r, one of y'all can take this
But I'm Makaveli trained, simple and plain
We number one, motherfucker, 'bout to do it again
Shit, Pac still doin' it, you hoes can't ruin it
Two million every time he drop, I know you fuckers losin' it
We movin' in for the kill, for a meal, holdin' steel
Hold the wheel
I'm 'bout to give these niggas somethin' they can feel
Fakin' real, but we the raw and uncut
Style-bitin', thug-lyin' niggas, give it up! We hit 'em up!

And we still breathin' and we still breathin'…

Who'll be the last motherfuckers breathin'?

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'
Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason
To be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin' my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin'
Now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'



Who you callin' rapist?
Ain't that a bitch
You devils are so two faced
Wanna see me locked in chains, dropped in shame
And gettin' stalked by these crooked cops again
Fuckin' with the young Black male, tryin' to stack bail
And um, stay away from the packed jails
I told the judge I'm in danger
And that's why I had that four-five with one in the chamber
Fuck the world!

They tryna say that I don't care
I woke up screamin' "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
Just woke up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
Uhh, I woke up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They're tryna say that I don't care
Just got up and screamed "Fuck the world!"

When I was comin' up rough that wasn't even what you called it
That's why I smoke blunts now and run with alcoholics
I'm gettin' flex to me, comin' from my enemies
And in their dreams it's hell where they sendin' me
Have I lost control or just another soul?
A car full of motherfuckers when we roll
Sippin' on yak as I sit back
Life as a big mack
Brothers come up and say "you did that?"
Never take your eyes off the prize and even if you gettin' high
Don't ever hesitate to try
Cause you can fall off or stay ballin', niggas we all in
And them my motherfuckers callin'
Fuck the world!

They tryna say that I don't care
Woke up screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
Just woke up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
I got up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They're tryna say that I don't care
I woke up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They're tryna say that I don't care

Damn, they wanna label me a menace
Cause I'm sittin' here sippin' on Guinness
Weighin' 165 and these tricks should die
For being jealous of a brother when he rise
I can see it in your eyes, you wanna see a young playa fallin'
They hate to see a nigga ballin'
Some of you suckers is rotten, plottin' on what I got
Stop givin' game for free, you wanna hang with me
Like being a thug is the thang to be
But I got love for my homies, the G's and macks
And if you're black, you better stay strapped
Nigga, Fuck the world!

I woke up screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
I woke up and screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
I got up and screamed "Fuck the world!"

Haha, Fuck the world!
Fuck it
I hear my niggas screamin' "Fuck the world"

They wanna know if I claim the clique that I'm hangin' with
And if I'm down with this bangin' shit
Well homie I don't give a fuck if you Blood or Cuz
Long as you got love for thugs
But don't try to test me out, stall that
Homie this is Thug Life nigga and we all strapped
I been through hell and back and if I fail, black
Then it's back to the corner where we sell crack
Some of you niggas is bustas, you runnin' round
With these tramp-ass bitches, don't trust her
But don't cry, this world ain't prepared for us
A straight thug motherfucker who ain't scared to bust
Fuck the world!

I woke up screamed "Fuck the world!"
They tryna say that I don't care
I woke up screamin' "Fuck the world!"

Uhh, uhh, uhh.. Fuck the world!

I don’t care.. I don’t care, I don’t care!



Major! Hell motherfuckin' yeah
This one goes out to my nigga Mike Cooley, hell yeah
Mama raised a hellraiser

Born thuggin'
Heartless and mean, muggin' at sixteen
On the scene watchin' fiends buggin'
Kickin' up dust with the older G's
Soakin' up the game that was told to me
I ain't never touched a gat that I couldn't shoot
I learned not to trust the bitch from the prostitutes
Taught lessons, a young nigga askin' questions
While other suckers was guessin', I was gangsta sexin'
Elementary wasn't meant for me, can't regret it
I'm headed for the penitentiary and cuttin' classing
I'm buckin' blastin', straight mashin'
Mobbin through the overpass laughin'
While these other motherfuckers try to figure out, no doubt
They jealous of a nigga's clout, tell me Lord
Can ya feel me? I keep my finger on the trigger
'Cause some nigga tried to kill me
And mama raised a hellraiser, everyday gettin paid
Police on my pager, straight stressin'
A fugitive my occupation is under question
Wanted for investigation, and even though
I'm marked for death, I'ma spark 'til I lose my breath
Motherfuckers, every time I see the paper
I see my picture, when a nigga's gettin' richer
They come to get ya, it's like a motherfuckin' trap
And they wonder why it's hard bein' black
Dear Lord can ya feel me, gettin' major, unhh

Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser
Stress gettin' major, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major

Dear Lord can ya feel me

Tell me Lord can ya feel me, show a sign
Damn near running outta time, everybody's dyin'
Mama raised a hellraiser, can't figure
Why you let the police beat down niggas
I'm startin' to think all the rich in the world is safe
While the po' babies rushin' into early graves
God come save the youth
Ain't nothin' else to do but have faith in you
Dear Lord I live the life of a Thug, hope you understand
Forgive me for my mistakes, I gotta play my hand
And my hand's on the sixteen-shot, semi-automatic
Crooked cop killin' Glock, tell me Lord
Can ya feel me? Show a way
I'm prayin' but my enemies won't go away
And everywhere I turn I see niggas burn
Every nigga that I know's on death row
My younger homie's seventeen and he paid a price
Little young motherfucker doin' triple life
Though I tell him in his letters, it's gettin' better
If my nigga knew the truth he'd hit the roof
Just heard ya baby's mama was smoked out, fuck the drama
Wanna break my Loc out, smokin' blunts
Gettin' drunk off that Tanqueray gin
'Bout to break my nigga out the fuckin' pen'
Mama raised a hellraiser, uhh, yeah
C'mon, uhh, mama raised a hellraiser
Uhh, dear Lord can ya feel me, stress gettin' major

Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major
Lord be my savior, unnh
Mama raised a hellraiser, stress gettin' major

Dear Lord can ya hear me, it's just me
A young nigga tryin' to make it on these rough streets
I'm on my knees beggin' please come and SAVE ME
THE WHOLE WORLD done made a nigga crazy!
I got my three-five-seven can't control it
Screamin' die motherfucker and he's loaded
Everybody run for cover, aww shit
Thug Life motherfucker, duck quick
Now am I wrong if I am don't worry me
Cause do or die gettin' high 'til they bury me
Dear Lord if ya hear me, tell me why
Little girl like LaTasha, had to die
She never got to see the bullet, just heard the shot
Her little body couldn't take it, it shook and dropped
And when I saw it on the news how she bucked the girl, killed Latasha
Now I'm screamin' fuck the world, in the end
It's my friends, that flip-flop
Lip-locked on my dick when my shit drop
Thug Life motherfucker, I lick shots
Every nigga on my block dropped two cops
Dear Lord can ya hear me, when I die
Let a nigga be strapped, fucked up, and high
With my hands on the trigger, thug nigga
Stressin' like a motherfuckin' drug dealer
And even in the darkest nights, I'm a thug for Life
I got the heart to fight now
Mama raised a hellraiser why cry
That's just life in the ghetto, do or die



I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

I was raised, the little young nigga doin' bad shit
Talk much shit, ‘cause I never had shit
I could remember being whupped in class
And if I didn't pass, Mama whupped my ass
Was it my fault Papa didn't plan it out?
Broke out, left me to be the man of the house
I couldn't take it, had to make a profit
Found a block, got a Glock, and I clock grips
Makin' G's was my mission
Movin' enough of this shit to get my mama out the kitchen
And why must I sock a fella?
Just to live large like Rockefeller?
First you didn't give a fuck, but you're learnin' now
If you don't respect the town then we'll burn you down
Goddamn, it's a motherfuckin' riot
Black people on a rage, police, so don't try it
If you're not from the town then don't pass through
‘Cause some O.G. fools might blast you
It ain't right, but it's long overdue
We can't have peace 'til the niggas get a piece too
I want G's so you label me a criminal
And if I die, I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

Here on Earth, tell me what's a black life worth?
A bottle of juice is no excuse, the truth hurts
And even when you take the shit
Move counties, get a lawyer, you can shake the shit
Ask Rodney, Latasha, and many more
It's been going on for years, there's plenty more
When they ask me, "When will the violence cease?"
When your troops stop shootin' niggas down in the street
Niggas had enough time to make a difference
Bear witness, on our own business
Fuck the guard, ‘cause it's hard tryin' to make ends meet
First we couldn't afford shit, now everything's free
So we loot, please don't shoot when you see
I'm takin' from them ‘cause for years they would take from me
Now the tables have turned around
You didn't listen, until the niggas burned it down
And now Bush can't stop the hit
Predicted the shit in 2Pacalypse
And for once I was down with niggas
Felt good in the hood being around the niggas
Yeah, and for the first time everybody let go
And the streets is death row, I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

I see no changes, all I see is racist faces
Misplaced hate makes disgrace to races
We under, I wonder what it take to make this
One better place, let's erase the wasted
Take the evil out the people, they'll be actin' right
‘Cause both black and white are smokin' crack tonight
And only time we deal is when we kill each other
It takes skill to be real, time to heal each other
And though it seems heaven-sent
We ain't ready to have a black President
Huh, it ain't a secret, don't conceal the fact
The Penitentiary's packed, and it's filled with blacks
I wake up in the mornin' and I ask myself
Is life worth livin'? Should I blast myself?
I'm tired of being poor and, even worse, I'm black
My stomach hurts, so I'm lookin' for a purse to snatch
Cops give a damn about a negro
Pull the trigger, kill a nigga, he's a hero
Mo' nigga, mo' nigga, mo' niggas
Rather I'd be dead than a po' nigga
Let the Lord judge the criminals
If I die, I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto

I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
And I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto



Sometimes when I'm alone
I cry because I'm on my own
The tears I cry R bitter and warm
They flow with life but take no form
I cry because my heart is torn
and I find it difficult 2 carry on
If I had an ear 2 confide in
I would cry among my treasured friends
But who do u know that stops that long
To help another carry on
The world moves fast and it would rather pass u by
than 2 stop and c what makes u cry
It's painful and sad and sometimes I cry
and no one cares about why.



You know they got me trapped in this prison of seclusion
Happiness, living on the streets is a delusion
Even a smooth criminal one day must get caught
Shot up or shot down with the bullet that he bought
Nine millimeter kickin' thinkin' about what the streets do to me
Cause they never talk peace in the black community
All we know is violence, do the job in silence
Walk the city streets like a rat pack of tyrants
Too many brothers daily heading for the big pen
Niggas comin' out worse-off than when they went in
Over the years I done a lot of growin' up
Gettin drunk, throwin' up
Cuffed up
Then I said I had enough
There must be another route, way out
To money and fame, I changed my name
And played a different game
Tired of being trapped in this vicious cycle
If one more cop harrasses me I just might go psycho
And when I get 'em, I'll hit 'em with the bum rush
Only a lunatic would like to see his skull crushed
Yo, if you're smart you'll really let me go, G
But keep me cooped up in this ghetto and catch the Uzi
They got me trapped

Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
They got me trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down

They got me trapped
Can barely walk the city streets
Without a cop harrassing me, searching me
Then asking my identity
Hands up, throw me up against the wall
Didn't do a thing at all
I'm telling you one day these suckers gotta fall
Cuffed up throw me on the concrete
Coppers try to kill me
But they didn't know this was the wrong street
Bang bang, count another casualty
But it's a cop who's shot for his brutality
Who do you blame? It's a shame because the man's slain
He got caught in the chains of his own game
How can I feel guilty after all the things they did to me?
Sweated me, hunted me
Trapped in my own community
One day I'm gonna bust
Blow up on this society
Why did ya lie to me?
I couldn't find a trace of equality
Work me like a slave while they laid back
Homie don't play that
It's time I let 'em suffer the payback
I'm tryin to avoid physical contact
I can't hold back, it's time to attack jack
They got me trapped

Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
They got me trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down

Now I'm trapped and want to find my getaway
All I need is a 'G' and somewhere safe to stay
Can't use the phone
Cause I'm sure someone is tapping in
Did it before
Ain't scared to use my gat again
I look back in hindsight the fight was irrelevant
But now he's the devils friend
Too late to be tellin' him
He shot first and I'll be damned if I run away
Homie is done away I should've put my gun away
I wasn't thinkin' all I heard was the ridicule
Girlies was laughin', Tup sayin "Damn homies is dissin you"
I fired my weapon
Started steppin' in the hurricane
I got shot so I dropped
Feelin' a burst of pain
Got to my feet
Couldn't see nothin' but bloody blood
Now I'm a fugitive to be hunted like a murderer
Ran through an alley
Still lookin' for my getaway
Coppers said, "Freeze, or you'll be dead today."
Trapped in a corner
Dark and I couldn't see the light
Thoughts in my mind was the nine and a better life
What do I do? Live my life in a prison cell?
I'd rather die than be trapped in a living hell
They got me trapped

Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
They got me trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Uh uh, they can't keep the black man down
Trapped
Naw, they can't keep the black man down



Sometimes it's hard to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear 'em anymore
Got me heartbroken, fine, so many babies screaming
‘Cause they seeing destruction before they see a human being
So they start smokin' weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families in shape
‘Cause they all broken, why do ghetto birds die
Before we learn to fly? Somebody else should try
Cockin' guns, smokin', we can all make a change
So I'm told, but I haven't seen a change unfold
I'll keep hoping, please, if you prefer to breathe
Communities in need of people that will lead
Keep your eyes open, I can only say I'll try
Until the day I die, I promise to be wise
With my heart open, greed brings only misery
Away the tragedy, so I stay sucker free
Only a few chosen rise, my ghetto queens rise
Don't be afraid to try, too many of us die
For the door to open wide, my brothers speak wise
Stay focused on the prize, though everybody dies

We can only learn to take, our anger and our hate
Control our mental states, settle down and set it straight
Maybe we can learn to take a second to pump the brakes
Before we said it, regret it later and let it escalate
‘Cause by then it's just too late, there's so much we can take
And there's only so much someone can swallow and tolerate
To the point that he just breaks, snaps, and it's all it takes
You think that we was learnin' from other rappers' mistakes
But we ain't, its grain to go against
With every artist comes the image he portrays
And the picture that he paints
But in the midst of all this anger and this angst
Never once did you heard me say I'm a gangster
And I ain't hear no complaints
But I know that I will always continue to grow
As long as I lead, and never follow in no one else's shadow
There will never be another me, and that I can guarantee
That's why the fuck I remain sucker free
To this day, the game will never be the same
No matter how much fame and success they attain
There will never be another me
And no matter what they do, there will never be another you
You can search, but you'll never find
You can try to rewind time, but in your hearts and your minds
We will never die, we are forever alive

Don't get caught in the publicity and caught in the hype
Rappers are regular people minus money and lights
Searchin' for fortune and fame and superstardom
All the jewelry, all the cars, whose crew's the hardest
There's not a hip-hop police, the villains is watchin'
And the kids think beef is they only option
Outlawz born filthy, guilty as charged
My memories took a dive, my Machiavelli lives on
You think the industry is fun, ain't no pity with guns
And when your money is up, that's when your enemies come
So if he died and came back, would he try to save rap?
We needing a change, the drama remains the same

I spend my whole life fightin' myself
That I can't win, so I'm invitin' some help
And hey, now then, I take rights and no lefts
I'm still, just like a kid, lookin' for stripes on my belt
Yeah, that there is a fight in itself
So I just pray and hope God, take a light to myself
No matter how much I try, stay alive
I'ma die a man, still standin' and in love with my pride

Heard frivolous beats, we past that
I'm tryin' to keep some income coming in
And collect on my ASCAP
The rappers in the game ain't changed
And I finally realize that we're not in the same game
The hatin' will never end, so I guess I'll deal with it
Them .45's will pop killas, yes, I'm still with it
The streets is military, you gotta be a soldier
Gotta stay leery, and keep your eyes on the rollers
They do what they gotta do to shackle and hold us
So we gotta do what we gotta do to keep rollin'
One way at a time, keep the faith in your mind



Shit, tired of gettin' shot at
Tired of gettin' chased by the police and arrested
Niggas need a spot where we can kick it
A spot where we belong, that's just for us
Niggas ain't gotta get all dressed up and be Hollywood
Y'knahmean? Where do niggas go when we die?
Ain't no heaven for a thug nigga
That's why we go to thug mansion
That's the only place where thugs get in free
And you gotta be a G, at thug mansion

A place to spend my quiet nights, time to unwind
So much pressure in this life of mine
I cry at times, I once contemplated suicide
And would've tried, but when I held that 9
All I could see was my mama's eyes
No one knows my struggle, they only see the trouble
Not knowin' it's hard to carry on when no one loves you
Picture me inside the misery of poverty
No man alive has ever witnessed struggles I survived
Prayin' hard for better days, promise to hold on
Me and my dawgs ain't have a choice but to roll on
We found a family spot to kick it
Where we can drink liquor and no one bickers over trick shit
A spot where we can smoke in peace
And even though we G's
We still visualize places that we can roll in peace
And in my mind's eye I see this place, the players go in fast
I got a spot for us all so we can ball, at thug's mansion

Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Every hour, ‘cause it's all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Nothing but peace, love
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion

A place where death doesn't reside, just thugs who collide
Not to start beef but spark trees, no cops rollin' by
No policemen, no homicide, no chalk on the streets
No reason for nobody's mama to cry
See, I'm a good guy, I'm tryin' to stick around for my daughter
But if I should die, I know all of my albums support her
This whole year's been crazy, asked the Holy Spirit to save me
Only difference from me and Ossie Davis, gray hair maybe
‘Cause I feel like my eyes saw too much sufferin'
I'm just 20-some-odd years, I done lost my mother, and
I cried tears of joy, I know she smiles on her boy
I dream of you more, my love goes to Afeni Shakur
‘Cause, like Ann Jones, she raised a ghetto king in a war
And just for that alone she shouldn't feel no pain no more
‘Cause one day we'll all be together
Sippin' heavenly champagne
Where angels soar with golden wings, in thug's mansion

Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Every wrong done will be alright
Nothing but peace, love and street passion
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion

Dear mama, don't cry, your baby boy's doin' good
Tell the homies I'm in Heaven and they ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night, it had me shook
Drinkin' peppermint Schnapps
With Jackie Wilson and Sam Cooke
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin' there kickin' it with Malcolm, 'til the day came
Little Latasha sho' grown; tell the lady in the liquorstore
That she's forgiven, so come home
Maybe in time you'll understand only God can save us
When Miles Davis cuttin' lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past
That passed on, they in Heaven, found peace at last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in Heaven
So right before I sleep, dear God, what I'm askin'
Remember this face, save me a place in thug's mansion

Every corner, every city
There's a place where life's a little easy
Little Hennessy, laid back and cool
Every hour, ‘cause it's all good
Leave all the stress from the world outside
Every wrong done will be alright
Nothing but peace, love and street passion
Every ghetto needs a thug mansion



Hey Nate, you know you got the vocals on this motherfucker
We finna talk about these scandalous hoes
I can talk about scandalous bitches
I know you can!
I know you that's why we finna do it
Daz on the beat
Hey Daz, nigga stop fuckin' around with the piano nigga
Just drop that shit like uhh, this here

I met you through my homie now you act like you don't know me
So disappointed 'cause baby that shit was so phoney
It's not for me, you see no lovin' from my closest homies
Woulda paid you no mind, but baby you was all up on me
While you proceed with precision, you had the table hosed
No, I ain't mad at you baby, go 'head and play them fools
They chose not to listen, so now he stuck inside his house
And can't leave without his bitch permission
The mission's to be a playa, my alias is Boss
Drop a top on these jealous niggas, playa let me floss
Y'all don't wanna see me in pain
I'll leave that ass like Toni Braxton, never breathin' again
It's scandalous, I never liked your back stabbin' ass, triiick
Used to watch you money grabbin', who you baggin' beeyitch?
Ready to bust, in the city you don't know who to trust
But bitches lookin' scandalous

Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous

How's it hangin'? 'Cause baby from the back the shit is bangin'
I've been stressing in this ghetto game, trying to do my thang
Won't be no bullshit, no ass-kissin'
This bitch'll have ya wakin' up with all your cash missin'
I'm askin', as if I'm qualified to analyze
You're lookin' at a bitch who specialize in tellin' lies
She got a body make a motherfucker fantasize
Her face ain't never shed a tear through them scandalous eyes
My sister precious in poverty
Plus I knew she was a freak bitch so why should it bother me?
I'd probably be sprung, addicted to the heat of her tongue
And though I don't where we're goin', she's makin' me come
I've been trained as a boss playa, so what you saying?
Let me show you, got some hookers we can toss later
Before I let her get me, I got her
Went in her purse took a hundred dollars
Nigga I'm so scandalous

Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous

Dangerous and ambitious, while schemin' on gettin' riches
I'm spittin' at tricks 'cause I'm addicted to pretty bitches
Currency motivated, not easily terminated
Now that we made it, my niggas can never be faded
This is my prophecy, I gotta be paid
All you cowards that try to stop me is beggin' for early graves
I thought we was cool, I was a fool, thinkin' you could be true
When I don't fuck with your punk crew
These are the tales for my niggas doin' time in the cell
I went from hell, to livin' well
Busting at niggas who said my name in vain
I got no time for them tricks, I'm heavy in the game
I wanna be a baller, please
But the bitches and the liquor keep on calling me
I'm tokin' free on the highway, formulatin' plans
Can't wait til I see L.A., 'cause it's so scandalous

Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
Scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous
She's so scandalous!, she's so scandalous, she's so scandalous

Aiyyo.. how the prettiest bitch be the more scandalous the ho be
A bitch can be like 15, fucking with a nigga 35
Gettin' him for everything
Hoes these days is way too motherfucking intelligent
When these niggas get to tricking, hahaha, it's over then
That's aight though
Keep a nigga heavy in the game, 'bout so long
Watch them hoes
All you niggas out there
Beware these lying ass scandalous bitches



Keepin' it real

I take a shot of Hennessy
Now I'm strong enough to face the madness
Nickel bag full of cess weed laced with hash
Phone calls from my niggas on the other side
Two childhood friends just died, I couldn't cry
A damn shame, when will we ever change?
And what remains from a twelve gauge to the brain?
Arguments with my boo, it's true
I spend more time with my niggas than I do with you
But everywhere it's the same thang
That's the game, I'll be damned if a thang changed
Fuck the fame, I'll be hustlin' to make a million
Lord knows ain't no love for us ghetto children
So we cold, Rag-top slowin' down, time to stop for gas
Beep my horn for a hoochie with a proper ass
Uh, it ain't easy, that's my motto
Drinkin' Tanqueray straight out the bottle
Everybody wanna know if I'm insane
My baby mama got a mind full of silly games
And all the drama got me stressin' like I'm hopeless
I can't cope, me and the homies smokin' roaches
'Cause we broke, late night, hangin' out 'til the sunrise
Gettin' high, watchin' the cops roll by
It ain't easy; that's right, it ain't easy

—easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?

I can't sleep, niggas plottin' on me, kill me while I'm dreamin'
Wake up sweaty and screamin'
'Cause I can hear them suckers schemin'
Probably paranoid, problem is them punks be fantasizin'
A brother bite the bullet, open fire and I died
I wonder why, it's just the way it is, even now
Lookin' out for these killa kids 'cause they wild
Bill Clinton, can you recognize a nigga representin'
Doin' twenty to life in San Quentin?
Gettin' calls from my nigga Mike Tyson, ain't nothin' nice
Yo 'Pac, do somethin' righteous with your life
And even though you're innocent you still a nigga
So they figure, rather have you behind bars than triggers
But I'ma hold you down and holla Thug Life
Lickin' shots 'til I see my niggas free on the block
But no, it ain't easy, ha ha ha
'Til I see my niggas free on the block, uh, it ain't easy

It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary…

Lately been reminiscin' about Peppermint Schnapps
In Junior High hit the block
Keep an eye on the cops while d-boys slang rocks
Just a project kid without a conscience
I'm havin' dreams of hearin' screams at my concerts
Me and all my childhood peers
Through the years tryin' to stack a little green
I was only seventeen when I started servin' fiends
And I wish there was another way to stack a dolla
Sold my Impala 'cause these hard times make me wanna holla
Will I live to see tomorrow? Am I fallin' off?
Ain't nobody down with me, I'm thuggin'
I can't go home, 'cause muh'fuckers think I'm buggin'
So now I'm in this high-powered cell at the county jail
Punk judge got a grudge, can't post no bail
What do I do in these county blues?
Gettin' battered and bruised by the you-know-who
And these fakes get to shakin' when they face me
Snakes ain't got enough nuts to replace me
Sittin' in this livin' hell, listenin' to niggas yell
Tryin' to torture 'em to tell, I'm gettin' mail
But ain't nobody sayin' much, the same old nuts
Is makin' bucks while these sluts is gettin' fucked
They violated my probation
And it seems I'll be goin' on a long vacation
Meanwhile it ain't easy… no, it ain't easy

It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?
It ain't easy being me
Will I see the penitentiary or will I stay free?



Hahaha, right, thug for life, nigga
Can't you read the signs?

Mobbin' like a motherfucker, stuck
Can you picture a middle finger out the window
Gettin' fucked of liquor; get loaded, can't control it
Nigga, pass me the blunt and let me roll it
You get the bozack to the ho-stack, that's for sho', black
So be a mack and keep your dough fat
And tell me, what does it take to be a G?
I started with a quarter ounce, soon bounced to a ki'
You gotta watch your back, stay strapped, be alert
Started as a young motherfucker doin' dirt
And now I'm in the rap game
Like the crack game, I got enemies
Can't pretend to see my friends are not my enemies
And even thug motherfuckers wanna have fun
Stuck in, buckin' my motherfuckin' Magnum
What does it take to be a G?
Silence is a must, violence is a plus
Bust shots at my adversaries, them niggas scurry
Pick a spot to be buried
‘Cause I'll be buckin' in a fuckin' hurry

Thug for life, high 'til I die
When them stupid-ass bitches ask why, tell 'em
Shootin' crooked ass cops, let me fry
Do or die, to my brothers in the penitentiary
Raise hell, when them niggas mention me

Thug for life, high 'til I die
When them stupid-ass bitches ask why, tell 'em

Game thicker than most of these tricks
I got my mind on makin' money
But you stuck on these fake bitches
And jealous motherfuckers can't see
That's it's the fame that causes
These stupid bitches to pass the pussy free
So tell me, why you sweat a motherfucker like me?
A young nigga tryin' to hustle up some G's
You pussy-ass playa hating hoes
Freaking down on niggas, jumpin' around at the shows
And you the first motherfucker to jump
To the trunk when it's time for funk, little trick-ass punk
Thug motherfuckers don't die
We get high and we multiply, motherfucker
Give a holla to my niggas in the Bay
I'm livin' in L.A., still clutchin' on my AK


Thug for life, beyatch! Yeah, nigga
Thug Life, from now until for motherfuckin' forever
Have-nots in this, motherfucker



Killing us one by one
In one way or another
America will find a way to eliminate the problem
One by one
The problem is the troublesome black youth of the ghetto's
And one by one
We are being wiped off the face of this earth
At an extremly alarming rate
And even more alarming is the fact
That we are not fighting back
Brothers, sisters, niggas
When I say "nigga" it is not the nigga we have grown to fear
It is not the nigga we say as if it has no meaning
But to me it means Never Ignorant Getting Goals Accomplished, nigga
Niggas, what are we going to do?
Walk blind into a line or fight
Fight and die if we must die, like niggas

This is for the masses, the lower classes
The ones you left out, jobs were giving, better living
But we were kept out
Made to feel inferior, but we're superior
Break the chains in our brains that made us fear ya
Pledge allegiance to a flag that neglects us
Honour a man that that refuses to respect us
Emancipation Proclamation? Please!
Lincoln just said that to save the nation
These are lies that we all accepted
Say no to drugs but the governments' kept it
Running through our community, killing the unity
The war on drugs is a war on you and me
And yet, they say this is the Home of The Free
But if you ask me, it's all about hypocrisy
The constitution, yo, it don't apply to me
And Lady Liberty? Stupid bitch lied to me
This made me strong, and no one's gonna like what I'm pumpin'
But its wrong to keep someone from learning something
So get up, its time to start nation building
I'm fed up, we gotta start teach the children
That they can be all that they wanna to be
There's much more to life than just poverty

This is definitely uh... words of wisdom
AMERICA! AMERICA! AMERIK-K-KA
I charge you with the crime of rape, murder, and assault
For suppressing and punishing my people
I charge you with robbery for robbing me of my history
I charge you with false imprisonment for keeping me
Trapped in the projects
And the jury finds you guilty on all accounts
And you are to serve the consequences of your evil schemes
Prosecutor, do you have any more evidence?

Words of Wisdom
Based upon the strength of a nation
Conquer the enemy armed with education
Protect yourself, reach for what you want to do
Know thyself, teach by what we've been through
Armed with the knowledge of the place we've been
No one will ever oppress this race again
No Malcolm X in my history text, why's that?
’Cause he tried to educate and liberate all blacks
Why is Martin Luther King in my book each week?
He told blacks, if they get smacked, turn the other cheek
I don't get it, so many questions went through my mind
I get sweated, they act like asking questions is a crime
But forget it, cause one day I'm gonna prove them wrong
Not every brother had his mother on the welfare line
The American Dream, though it seems like it's attainable
They're pulling your sleeve, don't believe
’Cause it will strangle ya
Pulling the life of your brain, I can't explain
Beg as you can obtain from which you came
Swear that your mother is living in equality
Forgetting your brother that's living in poverty
Thought they had us beaten when they took out King
But the battle ain't over till the black man sings
Words of Wisdom
The battle ain't over 'till the black man sings
Words of Wisdom

NIGHTMARE! That's what I am
America's Nightmare
I am what you made me
The hate and the evil that you gave me
I shine as a reminder of what you've done to my people
For four hundred plus years
You should be scared
You should be running
You should be trying to silence me
Ha, but you can not escape fate
For it is my turn to come
Just as you rose you will fall
By my hands
America, you reap what you sow
2Pacalypse, America's Nightmare
Ice Cube and Da Lynch Mob, America's Nightmare
Above The Law, America's Nightmare
Paris, America's Nightmare
Public Enemy, America's Nightmare
KRS-One, America's Nightmare
New Afrikan Panthers, America's nightmare
Mutulu Shakur, America's Nightmare
Geronimo Pratt, America's Nightmare
Assata Shakur, America's Nightmare



What's your phone number?

Now, I could make miracles to tempos
Shook when you rush me, walked up and touched me
Why? Do you wanna fuck me?
Just ‘cause I'm paid in the worst way? True!
Lookin' kinda good in your birthday suit
I wonder if you're wild and you act shy
Do you like to be on top or the back side?
Watch me while you lick your lips
Shake your hips, goddamn, I love that shit
Yo, let's stop fakin', be real now
I got a room and a hard-on – still down?
Met you standin' at a bar full of black dudes
Said you wanna see my scars and my tattoos
When we head for my hideout, act right
Boss player when I ride out, that's right
What's ya phone number?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?
If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

Oh shit, baby is a dime piece, more than just fine
She's personally blessed from the gods
If I seen her right now, she could get me hard
Didn't wanna talk to me just to see my car
Never had sex with a rich rap star
'Til I got her in the back of my homeboy's car
Tell me, why do we live this way?
Money over bitches, let me hear you say
What's your phone number? Are you alone?
Got a pocket full of rubbers, let's bone!
Time for your girlfriend to take you home
I had fun, but baby, gotta leave me alone
Picture in my rhyme, take time to rewind these words I say
If you open your mind, bet in a minute you'll find
It's time let the Outlawz play; what's ya phone number?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?
If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

‘Cause a motherfucker hop that shit like I got hydraulics
Fixed in me, you feel me? I be hittin' switches, baby
Heh, get some pussy, hah, hah




Am I wrong, cause I wanna get it on till I die?
Am I wrong, cause I wanna get it on till I die?
Get it on, till I die, get it on, till I die
Y’all, y’all remember me
Y’all, y’all remember me

Sold me out, taking change
Told me your name, we had all the lanes
Held me down

Last chance, fancy pants
Oh very well *gunshot*

Gotta get ready, want a big payback
The payback!
Hey, hey


I like the way you die, boy

Only wish to breed, I explode into a million seeds
Ya’ll remember me, legendary live eternally
Bury me in pieces cause they fear reincarnation
Niggas screaming peace cause they fear when my squad face ‘em
Take them to places, stake they face
Then erase ‘em and brake ‘em
Murder motherfucker’s at a rate and then quicken the pace
Blast me but never ask me to live a lie
Am I wrong cause I wanna get it on till I die
Now even if you blind you still see my prophecy
My destiny to overthrow those on top of me
Bitch made niggas and that bullshit you go through
Outlawz busting busting, we untouchable


Expect me like you expect Jesus to come back
Expect me nigga, I’m comin, hahaha



Aww yeah, uhh, uhh
Holla if ya hear me, yeah

Here we go, turn it up, let's start
From block to block we snatchin hearts and jackin marks
And the punk police can't fade me, and maybe
We can have peace someday, G
But right now I got my mind set up
Lookin down the barrel of my nine, get up
Cause it's time to make the payback fat
To my brothers on the block better stay strapped, black
And accept no substitutes
I bring truth to the youth tear the roof off the whole school
Oh no, I won't turn the other cheek
In case ya can't see us while we burn the other week
Now we got a nigga smash, blast
How long will it last 'til the po' gettin mo' cash
Until then, raise up!
Tell my young black males, blaze up!
Life's a mess don't stress, test
I'm givin but be thankful that you're livin, blessed
Much love to my brothers in the pen
See ya when they free ya if not when they shove me in
Once again it's an all out scrap
Keep your hands on ya gat, and now ya boys watch ya back
Cause in the alleys out in Cali I'mma tell ya
Mess with the best and the vest couldn't help ya
Scream, if ya feel me; see it clearly?
You're too near me -

Holler if ya hear me!
"Hard"
"Tellin' you to hear it"
"The rebel"

Pump ya fists like this
Holla if ya hear me
PUMP PUMP if you're pissed
To the sell-outs, livin it up
One way or another you'll be givin it up, huh
I guess cause I'm black born
I'm supposed to say peace, sing songs, and get capped on
But it's time for a new plan, BAM!
I'll be swingin like a one man, clan
Here we go, turn it up, don't stop
To my homies on the block gettin dropped by cops
I'm still around for ya
Keepin my sound underground for ya
And I'mma throw a change up
Quayle ain't do nothing but blow my name up!
Now my homies in the backstreets, the blackstreets
They feel me when they rollin in they fat jeeps
This ain't just a rap song, a black song
Tellin all my brothers, get they strap on
And look for me in the struggle
Hustlin 'til other brothers bubble -


Will I quit, will I quit?
They claim that I'm violent, but still I kick
Representin, never give up on a good thing
Wouldn't stop it if we could it's a hood thing
And now I'm like a major threat
Cause I remind you of the things you were made to forget
Bring the noise, to all my boyz
Know the real from the bustas and the decoys
And if ya hustle like a real G
Pump ya fists if ya feel me, holla if ya hear me
Learn to survive in the nine-tre'
I make rhyme pay, others make crime pay
Whatever it takes to live and stand
Cause nobody else'll give a damn
So we live like caged beasts
Waitin for the day to let the rage free
Still me, till they kill me
I love it when they fear me -






Yo, Jackson! A 231549
Yeah, close four! Comin' down!
Crichlow! A 5991301
Close five! Comin' down!

My homeboys in Clinton and Rikers Island
All the Penitentiaries
Mumia, Mutulu, Geronimo, Sekon
All the political prisoners
All the jailhouses, I'm with you

Yeah, one thug, one thug
How do we keep the music playin'?
You're listenin' to the sounds of one thug
One thug, one thug, How do we get ahead?
You're listenin' to the sounds of…

I wake up early in the mornin', mind state so military
Suckers fantasizin' pictures of a young brother buried
Was it me, the weed, or this life I lead?
If daytime is for suckers, then tonight we breathe
Out for all that, knowin' that this world bring drawbacks
Look how they shiver once I deliver these raw raps
Meet me at the cemetery, dressed in black
Tonight we honor the dead, those who won't be back
So, if I die, do the same for me, shed no tears
An outlaw thug livin' in this game for years
Why worry? Hope to God, get me high when I'm buried
Knowin' deep inside only a few love me
Don't rush me to the gates of Heaven
Let me picture for a while, how I lived for my days as a child
I wonder now, how do we outlast?
Always get cash, stay strong if we all mash; hold ya head!

How do we keep the music playin'?
Yes, you got to hold ya head!
How do we get ahead? Hold ya head!
Too many young black brothers are dyin'
Yes, you got to hold ya head!
Livin' fast, too fast

These felonies be like prophecies
Beggin' me to stop, ‘cause these
Lawyers gettin' money every time they knock us
Snatchin' pockets lyrically, suckers flee when they notice
Switched my name to Makaveli, half the rap game ghost
Exposed foes with my hocus-pocus flows, they froze
Now suckers idolize my chosen blows
And mo' money mean litigatin', mo' playa hatin'
Got a cell at the pen' for me waitin'—is this my fate?
Miss me with that misdemeanor thinkin', me fall back?
Never that, too much Tequila drinkin', we all that
Make them understand me? Hell nah, this ain't my posse
Everyone with me is family, ‘cause everybody's got me
Watch me paint a perfect vision, this life we livin'
Got us all meetin' up in prison
Last week I got a letter from my road dog, written in blood

How do we keep the music playin'?
You got to hold ya head!
How do we get ahead? Come on, hold ya head!
Too many young black brothers are dyin'
Yes, hold ya head!
Livin' fast, too fast
The weed got me tweakin' in my mind, I'm thinkin'…

God bless the child that can hold his own
Indeed, enemies bleed when I hold my chrome
Let these words be the last to my unborn seeds
Hope to raise my young nation in this world of greed
Currency means nothin' if you still ain't free
Money breeds jealousy, take the game from me
I hope for better days, trouble comes naturally
Runnin' from authorities 'til they capture me
And my aim is to spread mo' smiles than tears
Utilize lessons learned from my childhood years
Maybe Mama had it all right, rest yo' head
Tradin' conversations all night, bless the dead
To the homies that I used to have that no longer roll
Catch a brother at the crossroads
Plus nobody knows my soul, watchin' time pass
Through the glass of my drop-top Rolls; hold ya head!

How do we keep the music playin'?
You got to hold ya head!
How do we get ahead? C'mon, hold ya head!
Too many young black brothers are dyin'
Yes, hold ya head!
Livin' fast, too fast
You got to hold ya head!
How do we keep the music playin'?
Yes, you got to hold ya head!
How do we get ahead?

No matter how hard it get, feel me?
Get the weed, drink a drink, read a book
Watch the stars, get some pussy—whatever!



When thugs cry
Now I lay me down to sleep
I pray the Lord my guns to keep
If I die before I wake
I pray the Lord my soul to take
Got us dyin'
When thugs cry, times is hard

Born thuggin', and lovin' the way I came up
Big money clutchin', bustin' while evadin' cocaine busts
My pulse rushin', semi clutchin' into insanity
They shot at my cousin, now we bustin' at they whole family
The coppers wanna see me buried, I ain't worried
I got a line on the D.A. ‘cause I'm fuckin' his secretary
I black out and start cussin', bust 'em and touch 'em all
They panic, and bitches duckin', I rush 'em and fuck 'em all
I'll probably be an old man before I understand
Why I have to live my life with pistols close at hand
Kidnapped my homie's sister, cut her face up bad
They even raped her, so we blazed they pad
Automatic shots rang out, on every block
They puttin' hits out on politicians, even cops
I ain't lyin', they got me sleepin' with my infrared beams
And in my dreams I hear motherfuckers screamin'
What is the meanin' when thugs cry?

Oh, why should you send your child off to die?
In the streets of chalk where they lie
Oh my, does it have to be this way?
Our children of today won't stay wise
Let the children hear when thugs cry, dear God, oh why?

Maybe my addiction to friction got me buggin'
Where is the love?, never quit my ambition to thug
Ain't shed a tear since the old school years of elementary
Niggas I used to love, enclosed in Penitentiaries
But still, homie, keep it real, how does it feel
To lose your life, over something that you did as a kid?
You all alone, no communication, block on the phone
Don't get along with your pop, and plus your moms is gone
Where did we go wrong? I put my soul in the song
To help us grow in time, but now our minds are gone
We went from brothers and sisters to niggas and bitches
We went from welfare livin' to worldwide riches
But somethin' changed in this dirty game, everything's strange
Lost all my homies over cocaine, mayne
See, they ask me if I shed a tear, I ain't lie
See, you gotta get high or die, ‘cause even thugs cry

Oh, why should you send your child off to die?
In the streets of chalk where they lie
Let no wrongs cry out when thugs cry, dear God
Oh my, does it have to be this way?
Our children of today won't stay wise
Let the children hear when thugs cry, dear God, oh why?

And all I see is these paranoid bitches, illegal adventures
Bustin' motherfuckers with uppercuts, I leave 'em with dentures
‘Cause in my criminal mind, nobody violates the Don
I write your name wit' a piece of paper, now your family's gone
Why perpetrate like you can handle my team?
So merciless in my attack I take command of your dreams
Leavin' motherfuckers drownin' in they own blood
Clownin', takin' pictures later
Laugh 'bout them punk bitches that turned snitches
Regulate my area, the terror I represent
Makin' your people disappear, you wonderin' where they went
Am I cold, or is it just I sold my soul?
Addicted to these streets, never find true peace I'm told
Come take my body, God, don't let me suffer any longer!
Smoke a pound of marijuana, so I know it ain't long
Where is the end to all my misery, is there a close?
I suppose that's why I murder my foes; when thugs cry

Oh, why should you send your child off to die?
In the streets of chalk where they lie
Let no wrongs cry out when thugs cry, dear God
Oh my, does it have to be this way?
Our children of today won't stay wise
Let the children hear when thugs cry, dear God, oh why?

Oh, why should you send your child off to die?
In the streets of chalk where they lie
Let no wrongs cry out when thugs cry, dear God
Oh my, does it have to be this way?
Our children of today won't stay wise
Let the children hear when thugs cry, dear God, oh why?

I shed tattooed tears for years
For my dead homeboys and my prison peers
Y'all ain't never heard my cries
Now you wonder why would you die?




I wanna dedicate this one to Robert "Yummy" Sandifer
And all other lil' Young Niggas that's in a rush to be gangstas

As a Young nigga, I'm almost runnin' in the wind
Give anything, to be that innocent again, when I was ten
I didn't bang but I was hangin' with the homies
'Til them niggas started slangin', now they don't know me
I got my hustle on, learned to ignore what couldn't pay me
Lately I've been tryin' to make a million, can you blame me?
With that jealousy they need to miss me, don't sweat me
If them cowards really want me, come get me, and even I
Someday will die but I'm cautious, I'm fin' to ride
Put down the top, now we flossin'
Hit the freeway, let the wind blow, drop the window
Workin' with a twenty sack of indo, feelin' good
Stop through the hood, grab the young thugs
And I can't help but reminisce back when we slung drugs, though it's bad
But all we had was our hopes and dreams
Couldn't see unless we learned to slang dope to fiends
As young niggas

He's the kind of G like everybody knows
He's always G'd up, from head to toe
Always got it blown like Al Capone
He's the downest G I've ever known

Back in Junior High, when we was barely gettin' by, when daddy died
That's when my momma started gettin' high
My neighborhood was full of drive-bys, couldn't survive
All our homies livin' short lives, I couldn't cry
Told my momma if I did die, just put a blunt in my casket
Let me get my dead homies high
Come follow me throughout my history, it's just
Me against the world stuck in misery; as a young nigga
My only thing was to be paid
Life full of riches avoid snitches cause they shady, back in the days
We always found the time to play
But that's before they taught them gangbangers how to spray
Not just L.A., but in the Bay and in Chicago and even St. Louis
Every stadium that I go, when will they change?
Stuck in the game like a dumb nigga
Remember how it was, to be a young nigga

He's the kind of G like everybody knows
He's always G'd up, from head to toe
Always got it blown like Al Capone
He's the downest G I've ever known

I'm tellin' you—to be young, have your brains and have every limb and all that—yo, y'all niggas don't know how good you really do got it
Muh'fuckers need to just calm down
And peep what the fuck they wanna do for the rest of the life
'Fore you end your life before you begin your life
You dumb nigga

Now that I'm grown, I got my mind on bein' somethin'
Don't wanna be another statistic, out here doin' nuttin
Tryin' to maintain in this dirty game, keep it real
And I will even if it kills me, my Young Niggas
Break away from these dumb niggas
Put down the guns and have some fun nigga, the rest'll come figure
Fame is a fast thang, that gangbangin'
Puttin' niggas in a casket, murdered for hangin'
At the wrong place at the wrong time, no longer livin'
Cause he threw up the wrong sign, and every day
I watch the murder rate increases, and even worse
The epidemic and diseases, what is the future?
The projects lookin' hopeless, where
More and more brothers givin' up and don't care
Sometimes I hate when brothers act up, I hit the weed
And I proceed to blow the track up, for young niggas

He's the kind of G like everybody knows
He's always G'd up, from head to toe
Always got it blown like Al Capone
He's the downest G I've ever known
He's the kind of G like everybody knows
He's always G'd up, from head to toe
He always got it blown like Al Capone
He's the downest G I've ever known

Them niggas that's thirteen and fourteen
Stay strong nigga
You could be a fuckin' accountant, not a dope dealer
Fuck around and, you pimpin' out here
Niggas gotta get they priorities straight
Really doe.. Young Niggas.. little RahRah



"I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends"

Ha ha ha… hey man fuck all y'all… fuck all y'all
I don't need nobody

Money gone fuck friends, I need a homie that know me
When all these motherfuckin' cops be on me
I got problems, ain't nobody callin' back
Now what the fuck is happenin' with my ballin' cats?
Remember me? I'm your homie that was down to brawl
Sippin' Hennessy, hangin' with the clowns, and all
We used to do is drink brew, screw and common knew
We had bitches by the dozens, we fuckin' cousins
You can throw your middle finger if you feel me, loc
A nigga just got paid and we still was broke
It took time, but finally the cash was mine
All the rewards of a hustler stuck in the grind
Look around, and all I see is snakes and fakes
It's like scavengers, waitin' to take a hustler's place
And when you stuck, where the fuck is all your friends?
They straight busted and can't be trusted; fuck y'all!

"I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends"

Fuck all y'all
Fuck all y'all

I'm sippin' Tanqueray and juice and what's the use
‘Cause I'm a hopeless thug
Ain't no love reminiscin' on how close we was
Way back in the day, before they put the crack in the way
And heeyyy, how much money can you stack in a day?
It's gettin' rough, collect calls from my niggas in cuffs
I recollect we used to ball, now just living's enough
I stand tall in the winter, summer, spring or fall
"Thug For Life" sprawled all across the wall
And all about my dollars make me wanna holla
Drop an album, sell a million, give a fuck about tomorrow
I know it's gettin' crazy after dark, these marks
Keep on huffin' and puffin', ain't no fear in my heart
What's goin' on in the ghetto? Still struggle and strive
I still roll with the heater, smokin' chocolate thai
In '94, I'll be goin' solo
Too many problems of my own so I'm rollin' dolo; fuck all y'all!

Huh, pardon me!

"I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got.."

Fuck all y'all
Fuck all y'all ...fuck all y'all

I went from rags to riches
Quick to socializin' with the baddest bitches
Went from a bucket to a rag with switches
I'm seein' death around the corner
I'm bumpin' "Gloriaaaa," doin' 90 ‘cause I wanna
I'm gettin' high, and like I said, it was some chocolate thai
Mixed with some Indonesia, watch me fly
And even though I know the cops behind me
Hit the weed and I continue doin' 90
Until I get caught, another ticket get to kick it in court
Fuck the law, give a shit, I'm even worse than before
I know they wanna see a nigga buried
But I ain't worried, still throwin' these thangs
Got me locked in these chains
And hey, nigga, what the fuck is you wailin' 'bout?
Soon as I hit the cell, I'll be bailin' out
And when I hit the streets, I'm in a rush to ball
I'm screamin' "Thug Life!", nigga, fuck y'all!

"I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends
I thought I had friends, but I ain't got no fuckin' friends"

That’s right fuck all y'all man
Fuck all y’all
That is right, I don’t need nobody
Fuck all y’all
Fuck all the hard copies daily news
Fuck the bitches, the tele news, New York Posts, all those motherfuckers
Fuck all y’all
Fuck 'em



If in my quest 2 achieve my goals
I stumble or crumble and lose my soul
Those that knew me would easily co-sign
There was never a life as hard as mine
No father - no money - no chance and no guide
I only follow my voice inside
If it guides me wrong and I do not win
I'll learn from mistakes and try 2 achieve again.



Death Row, that's where mothafuckas is endin' up

Dear Mama, I'm caught up in this sickness
I robbed my adversaries but slipped and left a witness
Wonder if they'll catch me, or will this nigga snitch?
Should I shoot his bitch or make the nigga rich
Don't wanna commit murder, but damn, they got me trapped
Hawkin' while I'm walkin' and talkin' behind my back
I'm kind of schizophrenic, I'm in this shit to win it
‘Cause life's a Wheel of Fortune, here's my chance to spin it
Got no time for cops, who trip and try to catch me
Too fuckin' trigger-happy to let them suckers snatch me
Niggas gettin' jealous, tryin' to find my stash
Peter picked a pepper, but I can pick a punk
Snatched him like a bitch and threw him in the trunk
The punk thought I was bluffin', but swear I'm nothin' nice
Before I take your life, first wrestle with these mites
I listened to his screams, until he went insane
I guess the little mites had finally found his brain
New Rovers pull me over, I'm sentenced to the pen
Remember that little bird? He snitched and told a friend
It's trouble on my mind, I'm with the old-timers
And fuck five-0! Blaow, blaow! Turn 'em into forty-niners

Bye bye, I was never meant to live
Can't be positive when the ghetto's where you live
Bye bye, I was never meant to be
Livin' like a thief, runnin' through the streets
Bye bye, and I got no place to go
Where they find me; 16 on Death Row

Dear Mama, these cops don't understand me
I turned to a life of crime, ‘cause I came from a broken family
My uncle used to touch me, I never told you that
Scared what you might do, I couldn't hold you back
I kept it deep inside, I done let it fuel my anger
I'm down for all my homies, no mercy for a stranger
The brother in my cell is 16 as well
It's hard to adapt when you're black
And you're trapped in a living hell
I shouldn't have let him catch me
Instead of livin' sad in jail I could've died free and happy
And my cellmate's raped on the norm
And passed around the dorm
You can hear his asshole gettin' torn
They made me an animal, can't sleep
Instead of countin' sheep, niggas countin' cannibals
And that's how it is in the pen
Turn old and cold, and your soul is your best friend
My mama, pray for me; tell the Lord to make way for me
‘Cause when they come for me they find a struggler
To the death I take the breath from your jugular
The trick is to never lose hope
I found my buddy hangin' dead from a rope; 16 on Death Row

Bye bye, I was never meant to live
Can't be positive when the ghetto's where you live
Bye bye, I was never meant to be
Livin' like a thief, runnin' through the streets
Bye bye, and I got no place to go
Where they find me; 16 on Death Row

Dear Mama, they sentenced me to death
Today's my final day, I'm countin' every breath
I'm bitter ‘cause I'm dying, so much I haven't seen
I know you never dreamed your baby would be dead at 16
I got beef with a sick society
That doesn't give a shit
And they too quick to say goodbye to me
They tell me the preacher's there for me
He's a crook with a book
That mothafucka never cared for me
He's only here to be sure I don't drop a dime to God
About the crimes he's committin' on the poor
And how can these people judge me?
They ain't my peers, and in all these years
They ain't never love me
I never got to be a man, must be part of some big plan
To keep a nigga in the state pen
And to my homies out buryin' mothafuckas
Steer clear of these Aryan mothafuckas
‘Cause once they got you locked up
They got you trapped, you're better off gettin' shot up
I'm convinced self-defense is the way
Please, stay strapped, pack a gat every day
I wish I would've known while I was out there
Now I'm straight headin' for the chair

Bye bye, I was never meant to live
Can't be positive when the ghetto's where you live
Bye bye, I was never meant to be
Livin' like a thief, runnin' through the streets
Bye bye, and I got no place to go
Where they find me; 16 on Death Row

16 on Death Row, Death Row
Death Row, Death Row
16 on Death Row, Death Row, Death Row
It's to all my partners
In the penitentiaries; 16 on Death Row



Straight motherfuckin' ballin', part 2
Still ballin', Westside!

Now, ever since a nigga was a seed
Only thing promised to me was the penitentiary
Still ballin', ridin' on these niggas ‘cause they lame
In a '61 Chevy, still heavy in this game
Can you feel me? Blame it on my mama, I'm a thug nigga
Up before the sun rise, quicker than the drug dealers
Tell me if it's on, nigga, then we first to bomb, bust
On these bitch-made niggas, hit 'em up
Westside! Ain't nobody loved me as a broke nigga
Finger on the trigger, Lord forgive me if I smoke niggas
I love my females strapped, then fuck her from the back
I get my currency in stacks, California is where I'm at
Ridin', passed by while these niggas wondered why
I got shot but didn't die, let 'em see who's next to try
Did I cry? Hell nah, nigga, tears shed
For all my homies in the pen, many peers dead; a nigga still ballin'

You can bring your crew, but we remain true
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin'

Now, as I kneel and pray I hope the Lord understand
When he's gone, devolve, I become a dangerous man
Ain't crazy or deranged, I'm sayin'
But when these kids go to spray 'em, boy, won't be playin'
With clientele, any rhyme sales
Question is, will you fuck-niggas ride for real, huh?
Bitch nigga, this is G-rated
Plus your homeboy won't make it, street game Fugazi
I'm elevated to the top of this shit
Done fucked around and put me and 2Pac on the bitch
And you can tell 'em "Thug Life" was the reason for this
And I ride for any nigga who believe in the shit; still ballin'

Until the day I die
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin'
Niggas wonder why
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin'

Now everybody wanna see us dead
Two murdered on the front page
Shot to death, bullets to the head
Niggas holla out my name and it's similar to rape
Motherfuckers know I'm comin', so they runnin' to they graves
Watch! Swoop down with my nigga from the Pound
‘Cause Trick don't give a fuck
Where you coward niggas now?
Blast, keep pumpin', ain't worried about nothin'
Busters thought we was frontin'
So reload and keep dumpin'; still ballin'

You can bring your crew, but we remain true
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin'
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin'
You can bring your crew, but we remain true
Motherfucker, still ballin', until the day I die
Motherfucker, still ballin'
Straight motherfuckin' ballin'



Pssst... psssssst... ayo
Are you afraid to die, or do you wanna live forever?
Tell me, which one?

They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- I'm losin' my mind
Look down the barrel of my 9, and my vision's blurry
Fallin' to pieces, am I guilty? I pray to the Lord
But he ignores me, unfortunately, ‘cause I'm guilty
Show me a miracle, I'm hopeless
I'm chokin' off marijuana smoke
With every toke it's like I'm losin' focus
Fallin' to sleep while I'm at service, when will I die?
Forever paranoid and nervous, because I'm high
Don't mention funerals, I'm stressin' and goin' nutty
And reminiscin' 'bout them niggas that murdered my buddy
Flashbacks of bustin' caps, anything for money
Where am I goin'? I discovered, can't nothin' save me
My next door neighbor's havin' convo with undercovers
Put a surprise in the mailbox, hope she get it
Happy birthday, bitch, you know you shouldn't have did it
Everybody's dyin', am I next? Who can I trust?
Will they be G's, and they look at me before they bust?
Or will they kill me while I'm sleepin'?
Two to the head while I'm in bed
Leakin' blood on my satin sheets
Is there a heaven for a baller?
I'm gettin' suspicious of this bitch
The line's busy everytime I call her
Now she's tellin' me to visit, who else is home?
I check the house before I bone, so we all alone
After I nut I hit the highway -- see ya later!
To all the players, watch the fly way a nigga played her
The bitch is tellin' all her homies
That I can fuck her like no other
Now them other bitches wanna bone me
I'm under pressure, gettin' drunk, somebody help me
I drink a fifth of Hennessy, I don't think it's healthy
I see my enemies, they creepin', don't make me blast
I watch the 5-0's roll, the motherfuckers pass
By me like they know me, smilin' as they laugh
I put up my middle finger, then I dash
Niggas don't like me, ‘cause I'm thuggin'
And every day I'm a hustler lookin' to get paid
They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- no need to lie
I pray to God I don't scream when it's time to fry
Nowhere to rest, I'm losin' homies -- ain't that a bitch?
When I was rich I had clout, now a nigga's lonely
I put the pistol to my head, and say a prayer
I see visions of me dead, Lord, are you there?
Then tell me, am I lost? ‘Cause I'm lonely
I thought I had friends, but in the end a nigga dies lonely
Nowhere to run, I'm in terror, and no one cares
A closed casket at my funeral and no one's there
Is there a future for a killer? I change my ways
But still that don't promise me the next day
So I stay thuggin' with a passion, forever blastin'
I'm bustin' on these motherfuckers in my madness
They wonder if I'm hellbound
Well, Hell can't be worse than this, ‘cause I'm in Hell now
Don't make me hurt you, I don't want to, but I will
Seen motherfuckers killed over phone bills
Never will I die, I'll be back
Reincarnated as a motherfuckin' MAC
-11, ‘cause in Heaven there's no shortage on G's

"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas"
"Only fear of death is comin' back reincarnated"
"Only fear of death..." "You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."
"You ghetto niggas..."

Hahaha, I ain't scared to die
I ain't scared to die
Do you wanna live forever? Are you scared to die?
Or will you scream when you fry?
I don't fear death
My only fear of death is coming back, reincarnated
This is dedicated to Mental, R.I.P
And Big Kato, R.I.P.
And all you other O.G.'s who go down; I don't fear death



No man separate what we create
Unstoppable, untouchable
Motherfuckin' worldwide mob figures
Death Row at it's finest!
M.O.B., thug for motherfuckin' life
Motherfuckin' made niggas
We comin' after these niggas, worldwide
Feel me! Makaveli the Don

My life in exchange for yours, born hated as a thug
House full of babies cryin' from a lack of gettin' love
Ain't nobody tell me shit, 'til I got a sack of drugs
Had the block sewn up, cause I learned to pack a gun
Do you feel me? World, do you hear me?
Catch a risin' star, fuck the love, niggas fear me
Got these niggas runnin' all wild from my double-R
When we ride, motherfuckers is sure to die
Boom once I enter the room, in the air
All you hear is the whispers of doom, niggas scared
They don't wanna see me head on
Think of all the busters that I had to leave dead and gone
Call a gravedigga, fuckin' with a made nigga
M.O.B, gunfire, gettin' sprayed quicker
Fuck 'em all, let 'em understand my plot to get richer
Much more than six figures, a motherfuckin' made nigga

A motherfuckin' made nigga
I got a plot to get richer
Take my picture, a made nigga

Nigga, I was raised on the streets, I had to hustle just to eat
My role model was killin' niggas, so I know I would never be weak
They got me sittin' wonderin', where my life begins
These niggas crossed my father, then my father crossed them
'Cause I roll with Immortal Thug niggas
And my number one plan to kill a man
To grab a needle and drug niggas
Niggas don't like us, because they bitches straight love us
The President told us to leave
'Cause the government don't want us
It's Napoleon, I get my pleasure out of sin
And seein' blood spill ain't shit 'cause I seen it at the beginnin'
A made nigga

How many niggas fall in your vision?
Gunnin' 'em down for every last minute that I spent in prison
We mash together, plus we get cash together
Blast whenever, knowin' it don't last forever
It's only one way out and one way in
Motherfuckers cross and get crossed out, never made men
We find excuses to loot, cock, and shoot
Blow the roof off them groups like Rauf al-Mabhouh
I can't be touched, 'cause of the weapons I clutch

Picture the scenery, 'cause for now you gon' have to imagine
Call me your prophet 'cause I predicted what's gon' happen
I began the paper, stackin' at those who be paper snatchin'
Will emerge like crack in the 80's
Fade me? Maybe, that's if I slip
But I became official since the start of this
Edi Amin, born July, 7th, a few shed eyes, precious
But others gave me they hate to cherish
But still I made it, a made nigga made by the game
Made for war, my aim is simple and plain
Yeah, whether it's 'caine, or these tracks made for your brain
You'll forever know my name, Edi, a made nigga

I ain't count the line, my strap, my head
There will be none of that
The young hog, K-Dog playin' Outlaw Immortal combat
With the criminal skill, they cannot beat me a nigga
'Til he still and chill, recognize the real deal
Feel — a nigga made when I was young and dumb
With a gun, but it pays, so I'm bustin' for fun
And the outcome will be the same every time
We all gon' die, get yours 'cause I'ma get mine

Tha Outlawz, we be the Don Juan's of this rough shit
Rhymes baptize your mind while paralyze the public
With my mentality of war
Dead bodies and silence, give it to you raw
Thug nigga to the core
The results of livin' poor, got me thinkin' on a made level
Shootin' my gauge to get paid, a fuckin' crazed devil
Mash shit from here to here, day by day, year to year

Call me a Bad Boy killer, murder motherfuckers daily
Know the feds trail me, so my alias Makaveli
Gettin' lessons from niggas in penitentiaries
Game, when applied, help me survive several centuries
Lock me in a cage, I'll display my rage
Surround the court buildin' with the gauge and spray
They wonder if I'll go when I'm finally sentenced
On my knees to God, beggin' for repentance
I'm so convinced that I'm a thug
They got me fiendin' for my cash
Like a fiend when he dreams of drugs
Diss Kidada and I'll kidnap your daughter
Kill your wife and hit the funeral
And tell you just who gave the order
Makaveli the Don 'til I'm gone
I maintain my army of lunatics that stay armed
'Til the day I die, I'll be remembered as a paid nigga
Outlaw to the grave, a motherfuckin' made nigga

Can you feel me? Come closer, ha ha ha
Get into the mind of a made nigga, I can't be touched
My adversaries get fucked, feel me?
Multimillionaire dreams
All I want is the C.R.E.A.M.
I sell my shit to the fiends, all the bitches scream
Come and see, to see a made nigga
Outlawz, Makaveli The Don
Hussein Fatal, Edi Amin, Kastro
Napoleon, Kadafi, Mussolini, M.O.B.
I send this out to my niggas on the streets
The motherfuckin' made niggas
All my niggas on Death Row, Tha Dogg Pound
Tha Doggfather, and all his niggas
You know what time it is
Daz Dillinger, Kurupt, Young Gotti

Uhh… Sarge… uhh…
We've got uhh 2Pac Shakur
Uhh Fatal, Fatal Hussein… uhh Kastro, Kadafi
We got a bunch of niggas here
They've got guns in their car
They've got weed, they've got money
They're with a lot of black women, what should we do, Sarge?
Uhh, I repeat, let 'em go
I repeat, let 'em go
They're made niggas… let 'em go
But, but Sarge, they've got guns, they've got weed
I said, let 'em go
Alright, you guys can go, I'm sorry
I'm sorry about the-the mix up, you guys can go




"Your life has been marked by considerable pain..
Do you think you'll ever get to the point where you can live
A normal, happy life?"

No, but.. I.. I'm goin' for it.. I'm tryin' for it
And until then..I have to make the life that I do live
As happy as I can and try to do the best with what I have
Do.. you know, live the best life I can live
Be as happy as I can be.. nothing is perfect for anybody
I don't think

I know it seems hard sometimes, but..
Remember one thing..
To every dark night, there's a bright day after that
All my homeboys and my homegirls, stay strong
When things get bad, especially come the first and the fifteenth
So no matter how hard it get, stick you chest out, keep your head up..
And handle it!
Hold on..
I'll catch y'all up in the next life
We're in traffic

Ay do this Thug style main, Thug style
When this whole beat drop we just gon' run it to 'em bet
It's all good, uhh

I never had much, ran with a bad bunch
Little skinny kid sneakin' weed in my bag lunch
And all through Junior High, we was just gettin' by
And driveby's robbed my homies of their young lives
I never did cry, and even though I had
Pain in my heart, I was hopeless from the start
They couldn't tell me nothin', they all tried to help me
The marijuana had my mind gone it wasn't healthy
I travelled places, caught cases, what a ill year
I felt the pain and the rain but I'm still here
Never did like the police, let the whole world know
Now I gets no peace, cause they chasin' me down
And facing me now, what do I do?
These thangs that a Thug goes through
And still I rise so keep ya head up, and make ya mind strong
It's a struggle every day but you gotta hold on


I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night, there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if you hold on
It's a struggle everyday, you gotta roll on

There's, never a good day, cause in my hood they
Let they AK's pump strays where the kids play
And every Halloween, check out the murder scene
Can't help but duplicate the violence seen on the screen
My homies dyin' 'fore they get to see they birthdays
These is the worst days, sometimes it hurts to pray
And even God turned his back on the ghetto youth
I know that ain't the truth, sometimes I look for proof
I wonder if heaven got a ghetto, and if it does
Does it matter if you blood or you cuz
Remember how it was, the picnics and the parties in the projects
Small time drinkin' getting high with them armies
Just another knucklehead kid from the gutter
I'm dealin' with the madness, raised by a single mother
I'm tryin' to tell you when it's on
You gotta keep your head to the sky and be strong, most of all hold on



I know them ain't tears coming down your face
When it's on it's on but wipe your eyes
In this world only the strong survive y'know
Hmm, I know it's hard out there
Welfare, AIDS, earthquakes, muggings, carjackings
Yeah we got problems but believe me when I tell you
Things always get better God don't like ugly
And God don't like no quitters
You know what Billie Holiday said bay-bee
God bless the child that can hold his own
Y'know? You got to stand strong
And when these busters try to knock you out your place
You stand there to they face tell em hold on, and be strong
The game don't stop, Hmmm
Hold on, and be strong, this here is Black Man

If you don't never leave nothin', learn one thing
It don't stop, til the casket drop
Hold on




No matter what I do, they got a nigga
Still runnin' from the police


I ain't got nuttin' on my mind, but gettin' in some trouble
Licking shots to they block, leavin' bloody blood puddles
For some ridah's delight, now we in a gunfight
I can shoot the gauge pebbles at the devils or die tonight
It's on me, but if I die, bury me a motherfucking G
A open casket on them bastards so they all remember me
With my vest on my chest, my tools and my piece
Thug Life motherfucker, got me runnin' from the police

Nigga, you know that's true
Catch a nigga like K-Dog, chillin' with a crew
Every damn day parlay with my glass of Re
The O.J. and it's all okay
To that fuckin' fake cop, got to play the man
Ran me down the block with my glass in my hand
Damn, I hope it don't spill
Nigga chill, shit is real, cock back my steel

Still runnin' from the police, I gets no sleep
I got you peepin' in my window, while I'm smokin' indo
But I ain't no motherfucking track star, pigs got a jeep
Like Big Malcolm, runnin' through motherfucker's backyards
So I grabs my piece before I flee
And instead of me runnin', these bitches is runnin' from me
Lick shots, hit spots off on my piece
Cause a nigga like Big Malcolm is through runnin' from the police

Now it's war, me trying to sell, runnin' from the punk po-lice
They try to cock me, but them can't gun store
What about they come to hold up me north
Pulled up the park, I left school and let's buck
Look around, look around, punk po-lice
Run as fast as you can, but you can't catch me
Look around, look around, punk police
Me have to blast back, cause they blast at me

Yo I was, schemin' and fiendin' for loots and took the crooked route to
Ghetto fame I felt the pains and now I run the game
The insane brain, cold gettin' fly like a plane
On them suckers with my nigga Biggie Smalls causin' ruckus

Check it, I grew up, a fuckin' screw-up
Got introduced to the game, got a ounce and fuckin' blew up
Choppin' rocks overnight
The nigga Biggie Smalls tryin' to turn into the black Frank White

And we got the workers choppin' rock, fiends by the flock
And we gettin' it, the dirty cop is jealous so they sweatin' it
I'm lettin' off smoke, hope they don't play me for no joke
And provoke the homicide, so just let the drama slide
We keepin' it real, fuck how you feel, Biggie pass the steel
Let's serve these motherfuckers, slugs as a fuckin' meal

We had to grow dreads to change our description
Two cops is on the milk box missin'
Show they toes you know they got stepped on
A fist full of bullets a chest full of Teflon
Run from the police picture that, nigga, I'm too fat
I fuck around and catch a asthma attack
That's why I bust back, it don't phase me
When he drop, take his Glock, and I'm Swayze
Celebrate my escape, sold the Glock, bought some weight
Laid back, I got some money to make, motherfucker


They got me runnin' from the five-o
Duckin' and dodgin' and my survival
Depends on when I let off with my nine, ho
I'm movin' swifter than the next nigga, no time for sex
Cause in my mind all I wonder is who's next
Nigga, my homie slipped and now he pays the price
He did a drive-by, sixteen, now he's doin' triple life
Tell me is it me or my upbringin'
I spit that thug shit
Nigga, motherfuck singin'
I hope you got your Timberlands on tight
Cause I ain't givin' up
I'd rather duck these motherfuckers all night
I'm runnin' through the projects, biatch
They'll never catch me
Cause I'm loc'ed and trigger happy on the, sniatch
Don't say you never heard of me, til they murder me
I'm a legend
Do thug niggas go to heaven?
I'm rollin' with the Thoro Headz
We gettin' ghost on them hoes and yo
I got no love for the five-o
I'm runnin' from the police




And my niggas say
We want the fame!
Come on! Come on!

One thing we all adore
Something worth dying for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame
The one thing we all adore
Something worth dying for
But nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame

Though we exist to breed, some believe currency comes to G's
Stress is half the battle, with success comes greed
They got me hot when they shot me, plotted
My revenge to increase my ends; enemies gettin' dropped
Win or lose, red or blue, we must all stay true
Play the game, nigga, never let the game play you
And for the fame, niggas change fast, that's a shame
What's to gain, lost souls? Who controls our brain?
Who can I blame? The world seems strange at times
Somewhat insane, I'm hopin' we can change with time
I'm livin' blinded, searchin' for refinement curse
I know, Death follows me, but I'll murder him first
And worse yet, with each breathe, steps I take, breathless
Is there a cure for a hustler with a death wish?
Cigar ashes, toast with crystal, glasses
We mash on them jealous bastards, with my ski mask
I'm the first one to want him blasted
Wrapped in plastic, bullshittin' got his ass hit
Ain't nothing left now, treated like a stepchild was not for me
Nothing but busters and bitches be rockin' beats, fakin' fame

Block run and shoot slugs
We throw them back like hardballs
Without the gloves, no love for these fake desperadoes
And thugs I bleed to envy
Smoke and blow out they blunts, sippin' Henny
Drunk nights, and hot days
Cockin' my heat, shootin' it sideways
A wife on the run, full of common blunts
Unconditionally married to my gun
Fulfillin' my destiny on knees and one's desires
Be pullin' all my cabbage like priors, stuck in the trance
Searchin' for something higher, the fortune and fame

One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame
One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame

Searchin' for fortune and fame, lost in the rain
A lost of the game, with life the cost of the game
We forcin' the change, motherfuck flossin' a chain
All the blame belongs to the part of the brain
That we never use, nigga, plus my heart is in pain
And if I ever lose, homie, bet I'm at it again
Outlaws don't die, so united we stand
And if family come before, all the fortune and fame

As I walk up in the crib, laid to rest my head
Say salaam to the angels, hope they bless my bed
Hope they bless me the righteous way
Got a homie locked down outta town, I sent him a kite today
Man, that hate in your heart you gotta cleanse it, dawg
Prayin' for my downfall, and I can sense it, dawg
I was passed down the street fame
Like Glocks clocked and keep aim
Was raised up with a clock box
And I ran with the local street gang
They say the light is faded but still shine in the dark
You can easy been a man, but you's a boy in your heart
And that's some game that I got from generation of game
In the road of life, dog
We need to switch up lanes – think about it!

One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame
One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Been nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame

I can't complain, I've seen my fair share of the fame
It won't change me, now I've got this piece of change
I feel strange, I got so used to the hood
That when I finally got out at first it ain't feel good
I was just a baby, still retarded from slavery
When we struggle to shovel shit ain't nobody saved me
Ghetto ain't made me, I made myself
Poverty raised me, thinking ain't no help
I pray for my health, my mind, and my family too
State of myself, my grind, and my family crew
Where one hand washes the other
No, we ain't blood, but we still real brothers
The struggle is real, nothin' can steal what we build
And that remains the same 'til the day that we killed
And that's real, life that I was aimed to be
Love by my family tree, that's fame to me – how about it?

One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame
One thing we all adore
Something worth dyin' for
Nothin' but pain
Stuck in this game
Searchin' for fortune and fame



Yeah, ballad of a dead soldier
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
Come play the ballad of a dead soldier

The plan, to take command of the whole family
Though underhanded, to be the man it was planned
All my road dogs, official mob figures
Love to act up, the first to bomb when we rob niggas
I can be lost in my own mind
Niggas get tossed up, war scars, battlefield memories
Swore I saw the devil in my empty glass of Hennessy
Talkin' to a nigga on a tight leash
Screamin' "Fuck the police!" as I ride through the night streets
Little child runnin' wild, towards danger
What's the cause? Don't be alarmed, death to all strangers
Maybe I'm a madman
A pistol grabbin' nigga, unleash the Sandman
Promise a merciless retaliation, nothin' is colder
Close your eyes, hear the ballad of a dead soldier

Thug for Life, I will be
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
A life of crime I will lead
Close your eyes, hear the ballad of a dead soldier
If you play the game, you play to win
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
It's a crazy world full of sin
Close your eyes…

Completely lost, revenge at all costs
Payback's a bitch, switched, now the trick's crossed
Tossed up and never to be heard of
A single witness screamin', "Bloody murder, murder!"
Blast, tell me, homie, what you see now?
A blind man and a dead body, I'm ready to leave town
And get my cash though, hook up with Kastro
Homie had to blast on the task force
Stupid coppers tried to play us out, never that
They took my money and my stash, time to get 'em back
Upon my secret arrival
Two Glock four-fives, time for survival
Death to my rivals – tell me, what you want, Lord?
Nobody left after the death of a drug lord
The situation's critical, nothin' is colder
Than hear the ballad of a dead soldier

Thug for Life, I will be
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
A life of crime I will lead
Close your eyes, hear the ballad of a dead soldier
If you play the game, you play to win
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
It's a crazy world full of sin
Close your eyes and hear the ballad of a dead soldier

Be a coward, put yo' hands to the moon
When my Glocks rang out, the niggas came out, BOOM!
Who wanna see me in a challenge?
So merciless, I'm terrifyin' niggas in my ballads
Do you feel me? Capo or Capi-tan
One day I'll be the Don; until then, remain strong
My only fear of death is reincarnation
Bustin' at my adversaries like a mental patient
To all my niggas facin' 60 years
Sheddin' tattooed tears, another suicidal on the tier
Takin' private planes, tryin' to survive the game
For all my homies that'll never be alive again
All they promise us is death, nigga
Take a breath, come be the last one left, nigga
It's real now, feel it or fantasize it, ain't nothin' colder
Listen, you can hear it – the ballad of a dead soldier

Thug for Life, I will be
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
A life of crime I will lead
Close your eyes, hear the ballad of a dead soldier
If you play the game, you play to win
This is the ballad of a dead soldier
It's a crazy world full of sin
Close your eyes and hear the ballad of a dead soldier

This go out to Kato, Mental, all the niggas that passed away
Mutulu, Geronimo, Seyku – all the down-ass riders
All the niggas that put it down, all the soldiers
All the niggas that go through that day-to-day struggle
All the niggas that passed on
All the niggas with ambition and money in they heart
All the niggas that want some and that don't take none
The police are so scared of us
All the feds they aware of us
They wanna see us dead
Tryin' to see me in chains, shit
Them niggas'll never breathe again
Before they put me in a cell, they'll see me in Hell
Got my pistols cocked
Run the whole motherfuckin' block; fuck the cops!
The police? We run these streets, nigga
These niggas can't see me, half the world wanna be me
Multi-millionaire, shit, it ain't fair
But nigga, you know – it's the ballad of a dead soldier!



Resist the temptation
This song go out to the Underground Railround..
Digital Underground..

Resist the temptation of the beast
You slip and loose your grip, and forever fall asleep
The venom is contagious, be wary of its spell
What you thought would be heaven, turns out to be hell
I wonder if she knows, the devil's taking off her clothes
Deep into her soul, slow, now he's in control
Poppa's doing worse, a victim of his deadly curse
Wouldn't be the first, to leave the ghetto in a hearse
Oh and how it hurts, the children pay the biggest price
Never get the chance to grow up with a happy life
Blame it on the rock, but we know that's a bunch of crap
Someone from the top, supplying us with plenty crack
Keep 'em in a daze, don't let them see the other way
Let 'em all get paid, won't live to see another day
See, they never got a breath of the sunshine
Now the kid's addicted and only hit it one time
We're destined to be dead as a nation
Don't let it come to this, resist the temptation

From pyramid top to bottom of bowl
From whips and locks to fist and afro
We dug too deep to give up this gold
Don't be bought, and you won't be sold
Running on empty, you ain't gon' go
Running on empty, lead you to nowhere
We fact, nobody can lie
So resist the temptation

Gamble for your soul with the devil
You wonder how low, can you go, before you finally reach the lowest level
As everybody sit and stares
There's no use looking in your eyes cause there isn't anybody there
And though it may make you wanna cry
Got you stealing from your family and you don't even know why
I guess you think they'll understand
You feel cold, cause you sold your soul to the dopeman
Oh now there's no turning back, in fact
I's decided, that would live and die for the crack
You got no friends cause you cheated 'em all
Feel lonely, low, defeated and small
No one was there when I took the wrong path
And nobody'd care if I died in a blood bath
But is this my destiny?
Tell the lord they got my mind, but he can have the rest of me
Cause I'm ready to end it all
One bullet to the brain, forgive my sins and all
I didn't mean to be a bother
A failure as a son, a husband and a father
I wish I could turn back the time
Go back and find, why I let it crack my mind
And my only explanation, it came to this
Resist the temptation

From pyramid top to bottom of bowl
From whips and locks to fist and afro
We dug too deep to give up this gold
Don't be bought, and you won't be sold
Running on empty, you ain't gon' go
Running on empty, lead you to nowhere
We fact, nobody can lie
So resist the temptation

Your death left family behind
Your wife and your son find a gun, and pieces of daddy's mind
On the door and on the floor
Now her husband is dead, what else is she living for?
So now she picks up the gun
Now son is the only one
Grows up in adoption homes
Gets older, bolder, and cold cause he's left alone
To him, nothing is funny
Mind set on one thing, making his money
Since I was left with no hope
I want money and gold ropes and so I slang dope
Now I'm the neighborhood dopeman
And as long cause they smoking I'll never be broke man
I live the life of a trifle
Following a cycle, so I'm just a psycho
But if I had a better life
I would have lived a good life and did more things right
Hard to resist temptation
With all the aggravation and the frustration
Of living in the ghetto
Your mind gets twisted, just like a pretzel
So it's time that I check out
But one nosy cop, just won't let me get out
They got me trapped once again
I can't stand the frustration
Resist the temptation

From pyramid top to bottom of bowl
From whips and locks to fist and afro
We dug too deep to give up this gold
Don't be bought, and you won't be sold
Running on empty, you ain't gon' go
Running on empty, lead you to nowhere
We fact, nobody can lie
So resist the temptation

Five Thousand
This song go out to the Underground Railround..
Digital Underground..



They got a nigga shedding tears, reminiscin on my past fears
Cause shit was hectic for me last year
It appears that I've been marked for death
My heartless breath, the underlying cause of my arrest
My life is stressed, and no rest forever weary
My eyes stay teary for all the brothers that are buried in the cemetery
Shit's scary, our black on black crime legendary
But at times unnecessary, I'm gettin worried
Teardrops and closed caskets, the three strikes law is drastic
And certain death for us ghetto bastards
What can we do when we're arrested, but open fire
Life in the pen ain't for me, cause I'd rather die
But don't cry through your despair
I wonder if the Lord still cares, for us niggas on welfare
And who cares if we survive
The only time they notice a nigga is when he clutchin on a four-five
My neighborhood ain't the same
Cause all the little babies goin crazy and they sufferin in the game
And I swear it's like a trap
But I ain't given up on the hood it's all good when I go back
Hoes show me love, niggas give me props
Forever hop cause it don't stop... on my block


Now shit's constantly hot, on my block, it never fails to be gunshots
Can't explain a mother's pain, when her son drops
Black male living in hell when will we prevail
Fearin jail but crack sales got me livin well
In a sense I'm suicidal with this Thug's Life
Stayin strapped, forever trapped in this drug life
God help me, cause I'm starvin, can't get a job
So I resort to violent robbings, my life is hard
Can't sleep cause all the dirt make my heart hurt
Put in work and shed tears for my dead peers
Mislead from childhood where I went astray
Till this day I still pray for a better way
Can't help but feel hopeless and heartbroke
From the start I felt the racism cause I'm dark
Couldn't quit, the bullshit make me represent
Hit the bar and played the star, everywhere I went
In my heart, I felt alone out here on my own
I close my eyes and picture home... on my block


And I can't help but wonder why
So many young kids had to die
Caught strays from AK's in a drive-by
Swollen pride and homicide, don't coincide
Brothers cry for broken lives, mama come inside
Cause our block is filled with danger
Used to be a close knit community but now we're all cold strangers
Time changes us to stone, them crack pipes
All up and down the block exterminatin black life
But I can't blame the dealers
My mama's welfare check has brought the next man chrome wheels
Shit's real, I know ya feel, my tragedy
A single mother with a problem child, daddy free
Hangin out pickin up game, sippin cheap liquor
Gamin the hoochies hopin I can get to sleep with her
It's a man's world, stayin strapped
Fantasies of a nigga livin phat, but held back
Pipe dreams can make the night seem hopeless
Wide eyed and losin focus... on my block


And block parties in the projects lastin way past daylight
A young nigga learned to break night
Used to play fight with my homies but they stuck in the pen
I send them ends, but it's tough on a friend, in my mind
I see the same motherfuckers ballin
Alcohol will make a lazy nigga slip and fall, misses call
I know the young niggas understand this
Growing up in this world where everything is scandalous
I reminisce on tha fast times, past crimes
Tryin to cop a slice of pizza with my last dime
Can't explain, just what attracts me to this dirty game
Gold chains, some extra change, and the street fame
And what's strange is that everybody knows my name, swear they all know me
And lots of cash make a nigga change
I hit the green just to maintain, feelin pain
For all the niggas that I lost to the game... from my block

Rest in peace to all the motherfuckers who passed away
From all the blocks that I’m from
One-twelve street, 7th Avenue, New York, Uptown, knahmsayin?
183rd and Walt, my block, that’s right
122nd and Morningside, my block, that’s right
Decatur Avenue, Baltimore, my block, that’s right
In the jungle of Marin City, that’s my block, that’s right
Los Angeles, haha, that’s my block too
Oakland, can’t forget Oaktown, that’s my block for sure
And all the other blocks around this motherfucker
Houston, Florida, St. Louis, Tennessee, Miami, Chicago
All y'all niggas stay kicking up dust



Fuckin' lil' homies
Everybody duckin', my fuckin' lil' homies
Lil' homies
Everybody duckin', my fuckin' lil' homies

Just pay attention, here's a story 'bout my lil' homies
Straight thuggin', lil' bad young motherfuckers, gotta love 'em
You could catch him in his G ride clutchin' his Glock
Screamin', "Outlaw!" bustin' on my enemy's block
Educated on these cold streets
Gettin' money, makin' dummies out the police
Ain't no peace for an adolescent nigga too wild to be a thinker
Bud smokin' 24/7, everyday drinker
Got my diploma, but I never learned shit in school
Mo' money, mo' bitches, mo' murder, fool!
Always the young niggas gettin' in shit
She wouldn't stop to conversate, so you called her a bitch
Bustin' on paper thin motherfuckers
Drinkin' gin before you get to sinnin' on them busters
Emptied his clip, passed by like he didn't know me
Everybody duckin', my fuckin' lil' homies

Lil' homies on the ride
Niggas gonna die tonight, let's get high tonight
Lil' homies on the mash
Runnin' from these punk police
‘Cause lil' niggas run the streets
Lil' homies on the ride
Niggas gonna die tonight, let's get high tonight
Lil' homies on the mash
Runnin' from these punk police
‘Cause lil' niggas run the streets

I remember when you was just a lil' G
Flirtin' with death, playin' Russian Roulette, screamin', "Kill me!"
Hey there, young nigga, what you smokin' on?
Mad at the world ‘cause you came from a broken home?
Love the squad plus your mob is sick
A bunch of adolescent niggas spittin' major shit
Tell me, young nigga, if you die, let me know
Would your heart feel pain, watchin' as your mother cries?
Will all your homies ride?
Or will they all get high, and talk about how you died?
Young niggas on a mission to compete
Gettin' G's, packin' heat, bringin' havoc to the fuckin' streets
Nobody knows why he took a fo'-fo'
And unloaded on the whole front row
Try to tell him, but he act like he don't know me
Pull out his pistol and he show me; my lil' homie

Lil' homies on the ride
Niggas gonna die tonight, let's get high tonight
Lil' homies on the mash
Runnin' from these punk police
‘Cause lil' niggas run the streets
Lil' homies on the ride
Niggas gonna die tonight, let's get high tonight
Lil' homies on the mash
Runnin' from these punk police
‘Cause lil' niggas run the streets

"First 2 Bomb," "16 On Death Row"
Bustin' on them phony motherfuckers ‘cause the big homie said so
Niggas knew I was a nutcase, quick to blast
Livin' underage, but he'll blaze on your bitch-ass
Is there a heaven for a G?
And if it is, will I finally get to be at peace?
On these streets ain't no peace, shell-shocked souls
Makin' money off of crack sales
Young black male unable to change ‘cause it's a cycle
Plus nobody knows the evil that they might do
Lil' Moo, Big Yak, K. Kastro
Big Malcom, Hussein, call 'em Outlawz
Tellin' the world to be equipped
When these young motherfuckers rip shit, they don't quit
Drew down on me, pulled a pound on me
Bust like he didn't know me; my lil' homies

Lil' homies on the ride
Niggas gonna die tonight, let's get high tonight
Lil' homies on the mash
Runnin' from these punk police
‘Cause lil' niggas run the streets

Whassup, nigga, let's do this shit! My lil' homies!
Lil' bad-ass motherfuckin' adolescent niggas! My lil' homies!
What the fuck you niggas wanna do?
WHAT, NIGGA? My fuckin' lil' homies
Sixteen, fifteen, thirteen, my fuckin' lil' homies
Juvenile delinquents ready to BUST on you motherfuckers
What the fuck you niggas wanna do, nigga?!
Nigga, take yo’ shit on, lil' homies!
We robbin' motherfuckers, nigga
Thug Life, Outlawwwwz! West Siiide!
You know what time it is, my lil' homies!
You know what the fuck you gotta do, nigga
Outlawz, nigga, my lil' homies



Got me thinkin' 'bout better days
Heyyy! Better days..
Got me thinkin' 'bout better days
Most of these niggas need bitches too
But you never hear that side of the story so
We wanna do shit like this...

Verse-1
Sometimes its hard to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear them anymore
Got me heartbroken,fine, so many babies screaming
Cause they seeing destruction before they a see human being
So they start smoking weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families in shape
Cause they all broke. and why do ghetto birds die
Before we learn to fly, some bodies else's child caught in guns
Smoking weed, can all make a change
So I'm told, but I haven't seen the change unfold
I keep hoping please, if you prefer to breathe
Communities in need of people that will lead
Keep your eyes open, I can only say I'll try
Until the day I die
Baby please don't cry
Got me thinkin' 'bout better day

Eternally thug nigga Hilfigure made by Tommy
So when I speak hope to reach my buddy mommy
Oh come to poppy
I love it when you sweat and sloppy more peeps
Until I come to wake no one can stop me
My bump and grind
Coming through ya every time
Come get a blast of this through passion
It'll blow your mind
Hey throw up your legs
Wrap your shit around my back
It's a west side bang fucking hoes around the map
? get down with 2Pac while I'm ? out ?
While they seduce my jimmy I'll
Be screaming give me body
Make then hoes scream my name out
Give me my prides and don't cha
Love out these thugs nigga ?
I'm at the freaking parade
I'm watching caramel bitches play
Get with real niggas bullshitting never get your pay
This is the dream of a young black teen
I think hoes cross-country like a greedy crack fiend
Now come on!

Verse-3
Though half our problems can be based on economical greed
And dying breed, addicted to weed
They're getting Gs
With my heart open, greed, brings only misery
A way to tragedy, so I stay sucker free
Too many of us died for the door to open wide
My brother be wise, stay focused on the prize
Though everybody dies
We continue growing...

Got me thinkin' 'bout better days
Heyyy! Better days..



That's right nigga you gotta get your papers in this motherfucker
Aiyyo, what the fuck you wanna be when you grow up RahRah?
Nigga, is you stupid, I wanna be a motherfuckin' Outlaw
That's right nigga, hahaha.. housin' these hoes, you feel me?
Aight, you know what I'm sayin'?
You got to do that shit, keepin' it real nigga or what?
Keepin' it real!
How old are you nigga?
I'm eleven

Cause all I see is, murder murder, my mind state
Preoccupied with homicide, tryin' to survive through this crime rate
Dead bodies at block parties, those unlucky bastards
Gunfire now they require many closed caskets
Who can you blame? It's insane what we been through
Witnessin' evil that these men do, bitches sin too
In fact they be the reasons niggas get to bleedin'
Pull 'n' fuckin' fire when I leave 'em, you shoulda seen 'em
And snitches get dealt with, with no love
Body bags of adversaries that I had to bury
I broke the law and they jaw, all in the same flurry
But never worry, they'll remember me through history
Causin' motherfuckers to bleed, they'll label me a


Before I close my eyes I fantasize I'm livin' well
When I awake and realize I'm just a prisoner in hell
Just as well, cause in my cell I'm keepin' pictures of these bastards
Exercisin', visualizin', everyone inside a casket
Picture me blasted, surrounded by niggas in masks
Sent with the task to harass and murder my ass
Will I last? Heaven or Hell? Freedom or jail?
Shit's hard, who can you tell? And if we fail?
High speeds, and Thai weed on the freeway
When will they learn to take it easy? Uh
Drive-by's and niggas die, murder without a motive
By makin' motherfuckers fry
Got me runnin' from these coward-ass crooked-ass cops
Helicopters tryna hover over niggas 'til we drop
Got no time for the courts, my only thought is open fire
Hit the district attorney, but fuck that bitch, cause she's a liar
Now it's time to expire, I see the judge, spray the bitch
"Motherfuckers is crooked," is what I scream, and hit the fence
I commence to get wicked, spittin' rounds as the plot thickens
Never missin', an early grave is my only mission
If I die, never worry, bury me beside my four-five
May God forgive me, I was high, label me a


Society lied to me, I ain't never gonna try to be
My mob'll be doin' robberies, and stickups on these wannabe's
I witnessed niggas lose they chest
For ordinary reasons niggas bodies put to rest

So I just ... swallow my Beck's and holla, "Fuck 'em!"
And if I'm next ... just let a nigga step with somethin'
I ain't fearin' nuttin'

Young and thuggin', prepared for bustin' if that's my destiny
Ready for whatever, see you niggas can't get the best of me

Cause when I bust 'em they gonna shiver, the killers cry
Soldiers got bodies floatin' in the river, what is they sayin'?
Talkin' 'bout prayin'

They need to stop, that ain't gon' help
These niggas sprayin' up my block

Tryin' to take my wealth


Fuck the judge, I gotta grudge
Punk police, niggas run the streets
Hahah, it ain't nuttin' but muuuusic
Shit's changed
1995 the game has changed, motherfuckers is actin REAL strange
The rules is all rearranged
You got babies lyin' dead in the streets
These punk police is crooked as me
But all I see is motherfuckers actin less than G's
Stop bein' a playa-hater, be a innovator nigga
Fuck that shit, don't be no entertainer and a stranger
Be a real motherfucker keep it real pack that steel
Cause you know these streets is real ill
Muh'fuckers wanna see me in my casket
Jealous, motherfuckin' bastards
I never die, thug niggas multiply
Cause after me is Thug Life baby
Then the young thugs
Then the youngest thug of all, my nigga RahRah!




But you can't, you can't give up

Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Baby don't cry! I hope you got your head up

Now here's a story 'bout a woman with dreams
So picture perfect at 13, an ebony queen
Beneath the surface it was more than just a crooked smile
Nobody knew about her secret so it took a while
I could see a tear fall slow down her black cheek
Sheddin' quiet tears in the back seat; so when she asked me
"What would you do if it was you?"
Couldn't answer such a horrible pain to live through
I tried to trade places in the tragedy
I couldn't picture three crazed niggas grabbin' me
For just a moment I was trapped in the pain
Lord, come and take me
Four niggas violated, they chased and they raped me
Even though it wasn't me, I could feel the grief
Thinkin' with your brains blown that would make the pain go
No! You got to find a way to survive
‘Cause they win when your soul dies

Baby please don't cry!, you got to keep your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Baby don't cry!, you got to keep your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Baby don't cry…

Forget him, girl, he ain't gon' never change
I ain't no hater but that nigga lost in the game
After the bright lights and big thangs
He probably could love you, but he in love with the struggle
Everyday, his mind on gettin' mo'
And never your feelings, he's chasin' millions for sho'
Uh oh, now you 'bout to have his baby?
Another wild-ass nigga that's gon' drive you crazy
You got too much mo' livin' to do – I'm spittin' this to you
‘Cause you deserve more than what he givin' to you
Beautiful, black, precious, and complicated
A new millennium dime piece, so fine she
Got 'em all stuck standin' still when she come through
Baby, take a little mo' time, love'll find you
And sho' as the sky's blue somebody other than me

Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Baby don't cry…

I'm tryin' to do all that I can
From jump, now you losin', you was choosin' the wrong man
Dealt the wrong hand, you was young and beautiful
Lost and turned out, what you let that nigga do to you?
I knew her since elementary, she blew a kiss to me
Wrote me a note in crayon, wantin' to get with me
We was kids, now she got three kids
They see their father e'ryday, and they don't know who he is
Seen him last night, homie roll a E-class
Mad cheese in the stash, still a deadbeat dad
I bring her Pampers and food, just to stop through
But those ain't my seeds, nothin' really I could do
I feel pity for you, you ain't even his wife
Seventeen with three kids, locked down for life
Should've chose me, she 'bout to OD from the pressure

Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Even when the road is hard, never give up!
Baby don't cry

Baby don't cry! Got to keep your head up



Outlaw Immortalz
Bow down to somethin' greater than yourself, trick
Individuals capable of enormous amounts of chin checks and eye swolls
They know you watchin'
But you ain't seein' what lies before you, biatch
Picture if you will seven deadly human beings
Blessed with the gift of speech
The power to reach
Each nigga on every street
May the heavenly father look down and be proud of what transpired
Since the day the seed was planted
The G grew but we knew he'd rise up quick
Smoked out, loc'ed out, all into shit
Just me and my dogs, livin' like hogs
Outlaw Immortalz
What follows is the story, what proceeded was the glue
What lies between is the fiction
Don't fuck around and make it true

*laughing*
My adversaries crumble when we rumble it's a catastrophe
Out for revenge on bitch niggas that blasted me
Plus my alias is Makaveli
A loaded three-fifty-seven with hollow points to a nigga belly
Bust him to see if he bleed
He shoulda never fucked around with a sick-ass nigga like me
They call my name out and niggas run
Best be prepared for the Outlawz, here we come

They call me Hussein Fatal, it's a two game table
I'm robbin' ya niggas' cradle with a knife in your navel
Rap-related, criminally activated and evil
I wouldn't wanna be you behind my fuckin' Desert Eagle
'Til the end, I'm tellin' all friends and enemies
You see what I got to make you freeze, to touch me you need ten of these
Complete most, wanted on the streets of the East coast
Young Gunz fire and niggas bleed, I see Mo

I be shinin' like white diamonds and crystal
Glistenin' holdin' pistols
The mission's simple, fold up and roll up dead presidentials
Sew up all the potential, million, billion dollar baller potential
Sort it, oughta call on a nigga I'll be sure to get you
Take cash bro, fast yo, for my Kastro
Blast and I'mma last yo past all these Glass Joes
And assholes who claim, like they be runnin' thangs
I be gunnin' those same niggas runnin' late, to their fate

My alias is motherfuckin' Na-poleon, and I'd rather be
Robbin' again before these motherfuckers leave me sufferin'
But it ain't nothin', and I got no time for no bluffin'
Befo' a nigga finish with puttin' in work I betta end up with somethin'
I think these niggas got the game fucked up
Perhaps it's a must, I'm facin' cases, fuck probation
Is what I'm screamin' when these money hungry cops be chasin'

Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride
Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride

It's the imperial serial killer, alias Mussolini
Mentally unstable G status, so you can't see me
Drug warlord, ridin' Concorde jets
Rag Vette's, shakin' bitches and snitches and trippin' on sets
Inglewoods banger, keepin' one in the chamber
For the anger that I build inside, when it's time to ride
Suicidal thoughts lurk fuckin' no end to revenge
Fuck any, my alias Mussolini

They call me Idi, from the side of seedy
Young nigga greedy, so I'm runnin' up on these niggas easy
It ain't nuttin, cause if they wantin' somethin', so I'mma commence
To dumpin' stomp down and struck up while my beat is bumpin', Thuggin'
To my fuckin' last note, with Lo-Pole and Kastro
Who you thought was on that asshole, don't ask though
Outlaw Immortalz doin' this dit-nirt on the sli-zow
Ain't no chance to hide when we ride

My alias Khadafi, Trump tight so feds can't copy
Six-three and cocky quick to hit your bitch if she jock me
Severely addicted to livin' like a fuckin' felon
While beefin' with rookie cops the cookie rocks a nigga sellin'
Since a shorty I been livin' life defiant, nickel plated chrome
Got this baby Capone lookin' like a giant, and I ain't lyin'
It's like it's me against myself with all these
Backstabbin' snakes grabbin' at my fuckin' wealth

Mo Khomeini goes terrorist, mad man killer
The bottom of the river where the body lays and shivers
I'm that nigga with the fifty cap pouch, with the murderous stacks
That increase, while these motherfuckers eat beef
It's been a long road, a lot of episodes
And as the Glock loads, I gotta teach hoes
Reach hoes, make 'em feel a nigga when I'm mashin'
Now I'm surpassin' any assassin'

Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride
Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride
Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride
Thug nigga 'til we die
No mercy on these playa hatin' bitches, ask me why - when we ride

Hahahaha, Outlaw Immortalz baby
Makaveli, Hussein, Kastro, Kadafi, Mussolini
Amin, Napoleon, Khomein
What y'all really wanna do?
Haha, like them niggas said
"What would you do? If you could fuck with me and my crew"
Hehahahahaha, Thug Life, yeah nigga
Flashin on niggas
Thug Life right? This year we Thug Life
But we Outlaw Immortalz
We die nigga, but we multiply, we like legends nigga, like forever
Like I'll make you famous motherfucker
I'm talkin about Newsweek and Time Magazine and all that ol good shit
My niggas make the papers baby
My niggas make the front page



I exist in the depths of solitude
pondering my true goal
Trying 2 find peace of mind
and still preserve my soul
Constantly yearning 2 be accepted
and from all receive respect
Never compromising but sometimes risky
and that is my only regret
A young heart with an old soul
how can there be peace
How can I be in the depths of solitude
when there R 2 inside of me
This duo within me causes
the perfect opportunity
2 learn and live twice as fast
as those who accept simplicity



When I get dusted, I like to spread the blood like mustard
Trust it, my hardcore rain leaves you rusted
Move over Lucifer, I'm more ruthless, huh
Leave your toothless, you'll kibbitz, I'll flip it
Tears don't affect me, I hit 'em with the tech G
Disrespect me - my potency is deadly
I'm shootin babies, no ifs ands or maybes
Hit mummy in the tummy if the hooker plays a dummy
Slit the wrist of little sis
After she sucked the dick, I stabbed her brother with the icepick
Because he wanted me to fuck him from the back
But Smalls don't get down like that

Sick, Thicker than most of these tricks
I got my mind on makin money but you stuck on these fake bitches
I stay blunted, And never fronted and I doubt if I do
Cause if I do, Then I get beat up by my fuckin crew
A real nigga, Since you figure that you ready to box
You catchin knots from my nigga Freddie Foxxx
And I, You really don't want none from Pac
Cause I'll be strapped wit a Glock
And throw thangs like I'm born to box
I'll hit this motherfuckin gin then I'll be all in
Hell yeah, Young niggas straight ballin
And everybody wants to see if I'm a g weighin 185
And I'm high 'til I fuckin die


OHH! I had you yellin out when I backed a 30/30 Rifle
OHH! Too late for niggas to get religious and start readin they Bible
OHH! See you can yell like other niggas, your pickin a dirty psycho
OHH! See you should make peace instead of makin me become a psycho

Walkin thru tha cemetary, talkin to my homies that was buried
Say my enemies wanna see me dead I ain't worried, forgive me
Please give me shelter calm my fears
Lifted my head from my hand that'll ball me tears
I see bodies gettin splashed with acid
2 shots ring from the plasted guy wrapped in plastic
Bury tha bastard, time to notify
His family...shiet..
Ain't nothin left to be identify
Evacuate the crime scene fast, why?
I heard the feds have a warrent fo my ass, fly
I won't touch down till I see tijauna
Setup a shop sellin them crooked cops marijuana
Label me a success,i made tha switch, retired from the life that neva gave me shit
But cash that I couldn't spend, countless cars and adict fo a wife, tmy life as a ghetto star


OHH! I had you yellin out when I backed a 30/30 Rifle
OHH! Too late for niggas to get religious and start readin they Bible
OHH! See you can yell like other niggas, your pickin a dirty psycho
OHH! See you should make peace instead of makin me become a psycho

Just holla my name
And witness game official
Niggas is so shame
They stare stiff like scared bitches
While I remain inside a paradox
Gone my block
Though gun shots is promised to me when will I stop
I hit the weed
And hope to god I can fly high
Witness my enemies
Die when I ride by
They shouldn'ta tried me
Send they bodies to they parents up north
With they faces they wrists and they nuts cut off
Fuck em all what I scream as I dream in tons
Fuck a trick, get me rich n the bitches'll come
Bust ma gun make em all scatta
Bullets to my nuts only made my balls fatta
Eat her dead bee-yatch..mercy neva that

When we smoke spliffs, we pack four-fifths
Just in case dread wanna riff
He get a free lift to the cemetary, rough very
Not your ordinary, we watch you get buried
That's a real nigga for ya
Get mad do a quarter flip the script, and rip your lawyer
Spit at the D.A. cause fuck what she say
She don't give a fuck about your ass anyway

OHH! I had you yellin out when I backed a 30/30 Rifle
OHH! Too late for niggas to get religious and start readin they Bible
OHH! See you can yell like other niggas, your pickin a dirty psycho
OHH! See you should make peace instead of makin me become a psycho



They claim that I'm violent
Just cause I refuse to be silent
These hypocrites are havin' fits
’Cause I'm not buyin' it, defyin' it
Envious because I will rebel against
Any oppressor - and this is known as self defense
I show no mercy, they claim that I'm the lunatic
But when the shit gets thick, I'm the one you go and get
Don't look confused, the truth is so plain to see
’Cause I'm the nigga that you sell-outs are ashamed to be
In every jeep and every car, brothers stomp this
I'm Never Ignorant, Getting Goals Accomplished
The Underground Railroad on an uprise
This time the truth's gettin' told, heard enough lies
I told 'em fight back, attack on society
If this is violence, then violent's what I gotta be
If you investigate you'll find out where it's comin' from
Look through our history, America's the violent one
Unlock my brain, break the chains of your misery
This time the payback for evil shit you did to me
They call me militant, racist, cause I will resist
You wanna censor somethin', motherfucker censor this!
My words are weapons and I'm steppin' to the silent
Wakin' up the masses, but you, claim that I'm violent

"They claimin' that I'm violent"
"Fuck the damn cop!"
"Just because we play what the people want"

The cops can't stand me, but they can't touch me
Call me a dope man, cause I rock dope beats
Jacked by the police, didn't have my ID
I said, "Excuse me, why you tryin' to rob me?"
He had the nerve to, say that I had a curfew
Get out the fucking car, or I'll hurt you!")
Get out the car - or I'lI hurt you
So here I go, I better make my mind up
Pick my nine up or hit the line-up
I chose B, stepped into the streets
The first cop grabbed me, the other ripped my seat
They grabbed my homie and they threw him to the concrete
They tried to frame me
They tried to say I had some dope in the back seat
But I'm a rap fiend, not a crack fiend
My homie dropped, so I hit the cop
I kept swingin', yo, I couldn't stop
Before I knew it, I was beatin' the cop senseless
The other cop dropped his gun, he was defenseless
Now I'm against this cop who was racist
Givin' him a taste, of trading places
And all this, cause the peckerwood was tryin' this
Frame up, but I came up
Now they claimin' that I'm violent


Then the gun shot, but I wasn't hit
I turned around it was my homie with the gun in hand
I said, come on, it's time for us to get away
They called for backup, and they'll be on their way
Jumped in the car and tried to get away quick
We drove a little ways thinkin' that we got far
But I looked up and all I saw was blue lights
If I die tonight, I'm dying in a gunfight
I grabbed the AK, my homie took the 12 gauge
Load 'em up quick, it's time for us to spray
We'll shoot 'em up with they own fuckin' weapons
And when we through sprayin' then we steppin'
This is a lesson, to the rednecks and crooked cops
You fuck with real niggas, get ya fuckin' ass dropped
So here we go, the police against us
Dark as dusk, waitin' for the guns to bust
One thing fo' sho', tommorrow I won't be here
But if I go, I'm takin' all these punks with me
You wanna sweat me, never get me to be silent
Givin' them a reason, to claim that I'm violent




The only way to change me is maybe blow my brains out
Stuck in the middle of the game to get the pain out
Pray to my God everyday, but he don't listen
The poverty bothers me, but mama's working wonders in the kitchen
Listen! I can hear her crying in the bedroom
Praying for money but never think would she be dead soon
Am I wrong for wishing I was somewhere else
I'm thirteen, can't feed myself
Can I blame daddy cause he left me?
Wish he would've hugged me
Too much like him, so my mama don't love me
On my own at a early age, I'm getting paid
And I'm strapped, so I'll never be afraid
Where did I go astray?
I'm hanging in the back streets
Running with G's and dope fiends, will they jack me?
Can't turn back, my eyes on the prize
I got nothing to lose, everybody gotta die
Say good-bye to the bad guy
That one, you fucked, when you passed by
Buck-buck from a Glock let the glass fly
Do or die walk a mile in my shoes
Then you'd be crazy too

With nothing to lose
Got nothing to lose

Got nothing to lose
Got nothing to lose

I thank the Lord for my many blessings
Though I'm stressing keep a vest for protection
From the barrel of a Smith & Wesson
And all my niggas in the pen, here we go again
Ain't nothing separating us from a MAC-10
Born in the ghetto as a hustler, older
Straight soldier, bucking at them bustas
No matter how you try, niggas never die
We just retaliate with hate, then we multiply
See me striking down the block hitting corners
Mobbing like a motherfucker, living like I wanna
Ain't no stopping at the red lights, I'm sideways
THUG LIFE, motherfucker, crime pays
Let the cops put they lights on, chase me, nigga
Zig-zagging through the freeway, race me, nigga
In a high speed chase with the law
The realest motherfucker that you ever saw
I'm living raw, til they bury me, don't worry me, I'm high
Living like I ain't afraid to die
And if you could walk a mile in my shoes
Then you'd be crazy too

With nothing to lose
Got nothing to lose

Got nothing to lose
Got nothing to lose

Ain't no escape from a deadly fate
And every day there's a million black bodies put away
I'm starting to lose hope, it seems everybody's on dope
Mama told me to leave, cause she was broke
Sometimes I choke on the indo, creeping out the window
Alone, on my own, I'm a criminal
Got no love from the household
I'm out cold, on the streets screaming 'Motherfuck peace!'
I got nothing to lose, and something to prove, what do I do?
Live the THUG LIFE, nigga, stay true
I wonder when they kill me, is there a heaven for a real G?
Lord forgive me, if you feel me
Cause all my life I was dirt broke with no hope
Little skinny motherfucker wanting dough
I hated cutting suckers with my razor blade
But everyday it's a struggle to get major paid
Anyway, it's so hard on a nigga in this city, no pity
And ain't no love for the scrubs that be buying dime
If you could walk a mile in my shoes
Then you'd be crazy too


They wonder what type nigga be a THUG LIFE nigga
We be the craziest, motherfucker!
You know!
They wonder what type nigga be a THUG LIFE nigga
We be the craziest!



Nigga, westside!
Westside in this motherfucker
Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker

Can't nobody stop us when we blunted up and swervin'
Packed in a Suburban
Screaming, "Outlaw!", runnin' on the curb
They never try me, ‘cause right behind me a killer team
I get the word, cut the head off a nigga, like a guillotine
This Hennessy will keep me calm though
Sittin' in the back of the club, tradin' convo
Livin' like a Don in my own mind
Signal Kadafi, nigga, watch me with the chrome 9
All the time drinkin' champagne
Walk through the crowd, let the tramps hang
Niggas player hate but do a damn thing
Picture me doin' 80, down a one-way
Stuck in the trunk, caught with gunplay
So I gotta keep my eyes open
Gettin' high, wonder why we gotta die smokin'
My alibi, addictively
Like them other vile men, I'm marked for death
Spendin' my nights like it's the last one left; I'm an outlaw

Am I wrong? I wanna get it goin' on
Last to leave, 'til I see everybody's gone
I'm at the bar, you can catch me, hands full of liquor
Or puffin' on a sweet Swisher
I'm the last one left
Tell me, am I wrong? I wanna get it goin' on
Last to leave, 'til I see everybody's gone
I'm at the bar, you can catch me, hands full of liquor
Or puffin' on a sweet Swisher
Guess I'm the last one left

I got my back against the wall, gat chillin' by my balls
Prior to war is a rider nigga that's only 5'6" tall
Napoleon only knows on we Outlaws, fuck fear
Better strap down to the fullest, ‘cause we outchea
Thug passion all up in me, feelin' like I took some Henny
It ain't easy, I'm tryin' to make a dollar out of two pennies
What we got is rep, nigga, wanna pull their gat, nigga
He’s only got my side ‘cause they think 'Pac died, nigga
Blast niggas with our TEC's, takin' showers in our vest
'Pac, come and catch weight, nigga, we the last ones left

If we would've known the zone inside my own dome
Fresh outta jail, it was hell, but I'm finally home
Lookin' for niggas that was woofin' that shit
When I was locked back
Hands on the pump, make 'em jump when it cocked back
Fuck 'em all, they're bitches inside a world of weak
Bitch niggas be afraid to speak; we the last ones left

Tell me, am I wrong? I wanna get it goin' on
Last to leave, 'til I see everybody's gone
At the bar, you can catch me, hands full of liquor
Or puffin' on a sweet Swisher
Like I'm the last one left
Am I wrong? I wanna get it goin' on
Last to leave, 'til I see everybody's gone
At the bar, you can catch me, hands full of liquor
Or puffin' on a sweet Swisher
Like I'm the last one left

I eat and sleep the worst shit, turfs and birth
Me and my team super supreme, puttin' in work
I'm passed out, drunk as a fuck, 'til it hurt
And I call Earl screaming, "Fuck the world!"
I got a bitch on the side wanna be my wife
And wifey beefin', wanna know if she gon' see me tonight
And I know it ain't right, but it's the life I got
And that's until I see Yak, and that's until I see 'Pac
Young know I lost a troll, somebody owed me down
And if the world was a girl
I'd stick my dick in the ground; fuck the world!

Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker…
Uh, Outlaw in this motherfucker right here
Outlawz in this motherfucker
Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker…
Uh, Outlaw in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker
In this motherfucker right here…



Heaven ain't hard to find
All you gotta do is look

Simply because you nervous, let me start off with my conversation
Hopin' my information, alleviates the hesitation
I can see it clearly now
Catch you smilin' through your frown
I'm askin' baby boo are you down
Although I know you've heard about my reputation
Across the nation, Mr. I-get-around
My temptation got me drippin' wet, perspiration
I'm activated by the moves you're makin'
Baby why you fakin'? Strip naked get tp love makin'
See it's all in your mind, so every time I sip a glass of wine
I fantasize 'til that ass is mine
Never gettin' but wantin', never touchin' but wishin'
A straight thug on a mission, until I get what I'm missin'
Stop with the beeper, baby, listen
I know you're grown but pay attention
Let me hypnotize with my tongue kissin'
This is a message to bomb bodies and all dimes
Turn around one more time, heaven ain't hard to find

Hea-ven!!
Heaven ain't hard to find
Heaven ain't hard to find

Heaven ain't hard to find
In fact you can have it just have faith
Just like a little kid, still believin' in magic
It takes a lot of sacrifice
With all the lonely nights on tour
I need somebody I can trust in my life
Let me apply the brakes
Baby, you're movin' to fast
My conversations are gettin' deeper, but first let me ask
Are you afraid of a thug?
And have you ever made love
With candles and bubbles sippin' in your tub ?
Touch me and let me activate your blood pressure
This thug passion help the average man love better
Picture me naked and glistenin' beneath the moonlight mist
Take a shot of that Alizé, come give me a kiss
And maybe we can be better friends, perhaps we'll be closer
I'll be the thug in your life, baby, and you'll be my soldier
And I know it takes some time and you got a lot of questions on your mind
But relax, in due time
Heaven ain't hard to find

Hea-ven!!
Heaven ain't hard to find
Hea-ven!!, it ain't hard to find

You think we all dogs, that's why you cautious when I approached you
Been talkin' since you arrived, but not a word is spoken
Through my eye contact I wink and you respond back
Lookin' mean, what's all that?
It's like the closer you get
Baby, the quicker I'm speakin'
I got a flight out to Cabo
Let's kick it this weekend
I'm sippin' Hennessy and Coke
Though addicted to weed smoke
I'm fiendin' for your body even mo'
Oh God, help me, identify me truest thoughts
Your hidden motives full of passion
Who would have thought?
Come holler at me baby, love me for my thug nature
Far from a playa hater, label me a money maker,
Straight heart breaker
Baby we can be friends, I can soup you in my Benz
We'll ride, I'll let you floss it for your friends
Once we begin
Until the end, it gets better with time
I'm makin' love to your mind, baby
Heaven ain't hard to find

Hea-ven!!, Hea-ven, it ain't hard to find
Heaven ain't hard to find
Heaven ain't hard to find nice glass of Alize
Hea-ven!!!, Hea-ven!!! Hea-ven, Heaven
Hea-ven!!! it ain't hard to find
..hea-ven!! heaven
It ain't hard to find
It ain't hard to find
It ain't hard to find



Outlaw nigga, Westside, throw it up
Hahaha.. had love for 'em, but why you turnin on me?
Why me? Westside, how you do it boy?

I went from, nothin' to somethin' now they all wanna see me fall
And the player haters hate to see a thug nigga ballin'
And they say we hate the East coast, but that's funny
Got a lot of love for, any niggas gettin' money
I made a song about my enemies and niggas tripped
It was hip-hop until 2Pac fucked Biggie bitch
Y'all niggas hypocrites and bitch made
Now either love me or hate me but real thug niggas get paid
Have me catchin' cases all across the nation
I went from jail to bail to barely on probation
They got a player facin' three strikes
And we might, just blast God bless the child, that can get cash
But all these niggas turnin' and never learn
Got a long line of niggas player hatin' me but gettin' burned
Talk a lot of shit but you's a trick in drag
Like the MAC make you fall back and stick yo' ass for back stab

Why you wanna turn on me?
Why you wanna turn on me?
Never thought you would backstab me
Cause I'm a T-H with the U-G

It, started so innocent, but ended in the fifth precinct
Although two juvenile delinquents, we still decent
Playin' catch and kiss, used to diss the herbs
Fuck school we was skippin' drink a fifth on the curb
Me and you, no closer two, while drinkin' brew
What you need nigga? Anything at all come to me nigga
You can wear my clothes and my gold for the hoes
Gave you the keys to the jeep, offered my home as an open door
But then you picked a new direction, in the blink of an eye
My time away just made perfection, did you think I'd die?
I never got a single visit yet I carry on
All my old friends too busy now my money gone
Said I got raped in jail, picture that? {​*laughter*}​
Revenge is a payback bitch, get your gat
Fuck {​Wendy Williams}​ and I pray you choke
On the next dick down your throat
For turnin' on me

Why you wanna turn on me?
Why you wanna turn on me?
Never thought you would backstab me
When you niggas see me you flee
Cause I'm a T-H with the U-G

I put Jenny Craig on your fat ass, you fat troll
Anybody ever seen {​Wendy Williams}​ fat ass?
Why you always wearin' Spandex you fat bitch?
I know your pussy stinks, you fat ho
I'm puttin' Jenny Craig on you bitch
I'm about to put a twenty-thousand dollar, hit
Through Jenny Craig to come find yo' ass
And put you in a fat farm, you fat bitch!
Thug Life, Outlaw, Westside bitch
It's 2Pac so you know who said it
And for everybody who didn't like what I said about that other trick
And Mobb Deep, fuck you too nigga!
If a nigga didn't want to get talked about
He shouldn'ta stepped in the fuckin' ring
If Tyson don't want to get knocked out
He don't step in the fuckin' ring, that's how the shit go
When Tyson get in the ring, he knock motherfuckers out!
Well that's what 2Pac gon' do
When niggas come against me, I'ma knock they punk ass out!
One way or the motherfuckin' other
This old motherfuckin' nigga in the South told me nigga
It's more than one way to skin a cat
It's more than one way to shoot a gat
It's more than one way to die nigga
When I'm through, everybody cry nigga
This is how we do it

Why you wanna turn on me?
Cause I'm a T-H with the U-G..
Why you wanna turn on me?
Never thought you would backstab me
When you niggas see me you flee
Cause I'm a T-H with the U-G



Troublesome nigga
Hahaha, troublesome 19-motherfuckin'-96
Let it be known nigga
Boss of all bosses, Makaveli

Menacin' methods label me a lethal weapon
Makin niggas die witnessin' breathless imperfections
Can you picture my specific plan
To be the man in this wicked land underhanded hits are planned
Scams are plotted over grams and rocks
Undercover agents die by the random shots
We all die in the end, so revenge we swore
I was all about my ends, fuck friends and foes
Me, a born leader, never leave the block without my heater
Got me a dog and named her my bitch nigga eater
What could they do to me that little brat
Shit them niggas that shot me is still terrified I'll get they ass
How can I show you how I feel inside
We Outlawz, motherfuckers can't kill my pride
Niggas talk a lot of shit, but that's after I'm gone
Cause they fear me in physical form
Let it be known I'm troublesome

La la la la, la, la
La, la-la la, lah
Bye bye, bye bye
All you niggas die
Troublesome nigga, Outlawz
Put it down to the fullest
Spittin rhymes and bullets, ha ha
We troublesome
Y'all know what time it is
Call the punk police, they can't stop us
Niggas run the streets, we troublesome

Gutter ways, my mentality is ghetto
A guerrilla in this criminal war, we all rebels
Death before dishonor bet I bomb on the first niggas
Knew we came for murder, pullin up in a hearse
Westside was the war cry bustin off freely
Screamin, "Fuck - ALL Y'ALL NIGGAZ" in Swahili
Pistol packin fresh out of jail, I ain't goin back
Release me to the care, of my heartless strap
Say my name three times like Candyman
Bet I roll on yo' ass like an avalance
A sole survivor, learned to get high and pull drivebys
Murder my foes, can't control my nine
Hearin thoughts of my enemies pleadin please
Busta-ass motherfuckers tried to flee
Picture me lettin this chump survive
Ran up on his ass, when I dumped he died;
Cause I'm troublesome

Young, strapped, and I don't give a fuck
I'm hopeless - I live the Thug Life, losin my focus BA-BAY
I'm troublesome, haha
Bad Boy killa, there is no one realer
What you saw was the rough rugged and raw - Outlaw!

Murder murder my mind state, shit ain't changed
Since my last rhyme - the crime rate ain't decline
Niggas bustin shots like they lost they mind
Like twenty-five to life never crossed they mind
Tell me young nigga never learned a thang
Dead at thirteen cause he yearned to bang
Sniffed a lot of flowers, but how could I cry
Tried to warn the little nigga either stop or die
Mercy is for the weak when I speak I scream
Afraid to sleep; I'm havin crazy dreams
Vivid pictures of my enemies, family times
God forgive me cause it's wrong but I plan to die
Either take me in heaven and understand I was a sheep
Did the best I could, raised in insanity
Or send me to hell cause I ain't beggin' for my life
Ain't nothin' worse than this cursed-ass hopeless life;
I'm troublesome

In your wildest dreams you couldn't picture a nigga like me
Ha ha, I'm troublesome, I don't give a fuck
I'm troublesome like my nigga Napoleon said nigga
Somebody gotta explain why I ain't got shit
Ha ha, I'm troublesome
You know what time it is, the Outlaw clique
Young rugged and sick
Makaveli the Don the boss of all bosses
Mussolini, E.D.I. Mean, Hussein Fatal, Kadafi
Kastro, Napoleon, Komani
Ha ha, we ain't fuckin' around, we troublesome
Ayeo, ha ha, we troublesome, I ain't goin', ha ha
Young Kastro, the first to blast the last one to dash
Goin' for the hoes and the cash
Fuck you niggas, Outlawz
Kadafi, trump tight never sloppy
Them motherfuckas try to copy
But they can't mock you nigga, you're too strong
Outlawz keep it goin' on, you know whassup
Outlawz, Outlawz, ha ha
Outlawz, Outlawz
This is dedicated to the real niggas
All the real troublesome soldiers on the streets



In the event of my Demise
when my heart can beat no more
I hope I die for a principle
or a belief that I had lived 4
I will die before my time
Because I feel the shadow's depth
so much I wanted 2 accomplish
Before I reached my death
I have come 2 grips with the possibility
and wiped the last tear from my eyes
I loved all who were positive
In the event of my Demise!




Let us pray, Heavenly Father
Hear a nigga down here
Before I go to sleep
Tell me, who do you believe in?..
Who do you believe in?..

I see mothers in black, cryin', brothers in packs dyin'
Plus everybody's high, too doped up to ask why
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end
It's like we don't believe in God ‘cause we livin' in sin
I asked my homie on the block why he strapped
He laughed, pointed his pistol as the cop car passed, and blast
It's just another murder, nobody mourns no more
My tear drops gettin' bigger
But can't figure what I'm cryin' for
Is it the miniature caskets, little babies?
Victims of a stray, from drug dealers gone crazy?
Maybe it's just the drugs, visions of how the block was
Crack came and it was strange how it rocked us
Perhaps the underlyin' fact, stay high, explain genocide
It's when we ride on our own kind
What is it we all fear?, reflections in the mirror
We can't escape fate, the end is gettin' nearer

Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?

Can't close my eyes, ‘cause all I see is terror
I hate the man in the mirror
‘Cause his reflection makes the pain turn realer
Times of Armageddon, murder in mass amounts
In this society where only gettin' the cash counts
I started out as a beginner
Entered the criminal lifestyle, became a sinner
I make my money, and vacate, evade prison
Went from the chosen one to an outcast, unforgivin'
And all the Hennessy and weed can't hide the pain I feel inside
You know, it's like I'm livin' just to die
I fall on my knees and beg for mercy
Not knowin' if I'm worthy
Livin' life thinkin' no man can hurt me
So I'm askin', before I lay me down to sleep
Before you judge me
Look at all the shit you did to me; my misery
I rose up from the slums, made it out the flames
In my search for fame, will I change?
I'm askin'…

Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?

Faith in Allah, believe in me and this plastic
‘Cause so far I done witnessed too many dead niggas in caskets
With they chest plates stretched, like elastic
And what's worse I'm on front line
Holdin' down camp, still mashin'
Heard my cousin, one of the old heads from the block
Just came home October of '95, back in Yardsville stuck
With a three to five, if he don't act up
Now he realize, if you don't stay wise
Then in this game you fucked
Talk to my baby girl, give me the word on what she heard
One of the grimies is snitchin', dimin', a stool pigeon
I talked to him; he said he didn't, my man said he did
In fact he's sure, ‘cause he just came home off of bid

Now tell me, who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?

Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
And even though it's hard
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?

Who do you believe in?
Is it Buddah, Jehovah, or Jah? Or Allah?
Is it Jesus? Is it God? Or is it just yourself?
Definitely not to be imposed, being a demon
Because this is the joy of believin'
Man, to believe in yourselves
But for sure, the higher power
Resides only to ride in the heart of the true
From the soul, of the man; for truth never has an alibi
In the poetry, or in it's realm
That's what pulls all words together
Just to understand that every man is his own man
And only man can satisfy the man
Only the soul of the man, the feelings of the man
The for realness of the man
You can't shake the man when you give the man
You know the man
And you gotta call yourself, because you are that man

I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Even though it's hard
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
Blessed and still breathin'
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
I put my faith in God
Blessed and still breathin'
Even though it's hard, that's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
Put my faith in God
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?
Blessed and still breathin'
That's who I believe in
Before I'm leavin', I'm askin' the grievin'
Who do you believe in?
Who do you believe in?



They say
Influenced by crime, addicted to grindin'
Where I can pile up my chips
And niggas call me a timer
I been ballin' since my adolescent years steady climbin'
Man, you motherfuckers don't know nuttin' about no timin'

That's right, that's right boy, start that shit off

I heard a rumor I died, murdered in cold blood dramatized
Pictures of me in my final stage, you know mama cried
But that was fiction, some coward got the story twisted
Like I no longer existed, mysteriously missin'
Although I'm worldwide, baby I ain't hard to find
Where I spend most of my time, my California grind
Watchin' for thievin', I'm cautious, it's like I'm barely breathin'
Puttin' a bullet in motherfuckers, give me a reason
See me and hope I'm intoxicated or slightly faded
You tried to play me, now homicide is my only payment
I'm addicted to currency in this life I lead
Why the fuck you cowards be runnin', too scared to fight a G?
For the life of me, I cannot see
How motherfuckers picture livin' life after a night of fuckin' around with me
And if you don't like this rhyme
Then bring your big bad ass to California, 'cause we ain't hard to find

Influenced by crime, addicted to grindin'
Where I can pile up my chips
And niggas call me a timer
I been ballin' since my adolescent years steady climbin'
Motherfuckers don't know nuttin' about no timin'

I got my locs on, hard hat, goin' to war
Breakin' them off on sight, stoppin' lives like red lights
Watch 'em pause as I pull my strap out my drawers
And get to dumpin' on they ass like the last outlaw
Rich, 2Pac and The Click, smokin' blunts, loadin' clips
With enough shit to raise your block in one dip
We bring on horror like Tales From the Crypt
And we ain't hard to find is the tales that we kick

I'm fully automatic, full of static and shit
Movin' Dodge van, fifty rounds in the clip
I'm ridin' shotgun with the tint in the back
I'm plan to have a motherfuckin' mint in this rap
I'm from the V-A-L-L-E-J-O
Where sellin' narcotics is all I know
I got blow, speed, and weed, whatever yo' kind
And if you need a motherfucker, I ain't hard to find

Some may call me bootsy, but I call it timin'
To the point where a nigga can't stop
Too much feelin' this shit, that's why I'm quick to peel a bitch
Whether it's a nigga or a ho, a ho
Get in my way, then that ass gots to go
'Cause a nigga steady plottin'
I serves hit for hit, and motherfuckers keep droppin'

Influenced by crime, addicted to grindin'
Where I can pile up my chips
And niggas call me a timer
I been ballin' since my adolescent years steady climbin'
Man, you motherfuckers don't know nuttin' about no timin'

C-Bo, D-Shot, E-40, Richie Rich
Da Bay, beitch!

Down the steps
Abandoned broken down apartment complex
Heavy metal weapons they carry, can't be scary
Playboy, what the fuck is a proof without the trauma plate?
Nigga, what the fuck you got a gun for if you gon' hesitate?
Best shake and bake all those I-was-finst-to-ask niggas
Motherfuckers-didn't-think-I was-gon'-do-somethin'-ass niggas
Threaten your life, ain't like you love him
Bury your thoughts, take his head fuck him, have at him

I grew up with that nigga
Threw up with that nigga
I hear he tryin' to ride
Double agent for the other side
But now, my Glock be so judgmental
Back seat of a rental
Keep my name out your dental, nigga
If your gum bleedin' and you needin'
More than twenty stitches, you behaved like them bitches
Sideways to the next
Heavy in the game
Check the resident, it's all the same
Nigga, and we ain't hard to find

Can we just go there and sock this shit up, please?



Whassup, boo?
Swear I'll never call you bitch again
You ain't fuck with me
I swear I'll never call you bitch again
I swear I'll never call you bitch again
I'll never call you bitch again

Damn – gave my homie 90 days for domestic violence
I try to picture myself in this position but remain silent
I get to thinkin' 'bout this shit we been through
We close like kin, but you remain my friend too
This life of sin done got the both of us in trouble
But you always stay down for a nigga, so that's why I love you
Reminiscin' needin' tissues, fightin' over childish issues
Swear I can't live with you; but without you, every day I miss you
When we roll you hold my pistol, my gangsta bitch-itch, you
Always in the mood for love, that's why I'm sleepin' with you
Though not the man of your dreams
My plan and scheme's to be rich like a king
And live my life trouble free, I see
Yesterday I called you names and played games on your mind
I promise that I'll change in time
It's a complicated world, so girl, just be a friend

We came too far to throw it all away
We came way too far, pretty baby
To throw it all away, throw it all away

I wake up early in the mornin', at the crack of dawn
Nigga still tired so I'm yawnin', and now I'm gone
Tryin' to get my money on strong, so an early riser
Out before them other guys, that's the way to profit every time
Can't get too close my enemies, they see ghosts, they envy me
Plus we been beefin' with the East Coast, with casualties
Got stopped in traffic, had a warrant, so they gaffled me
But while I'm gone, watch my business and my back for me
My enemies think they got me crossed, they ain't knowin'
Ain't no love for player haters where you cowards goin'
You paid bail, got me out of jail, home again
I promise not to leave you on your own again
Cristal corks are popped, romantic thoughts are dropped
It's so frantic but don't panic, ‘cause we crossed the top
I found a partner and a rider, a woman and friend
I swear I'll never call you bitch again, believe me

We came too far to throw it all away
We came way too far, pretty baby
To throw it all away, throw it all away

I know, I know, all that is dead though
I'm changed, I'm tellin' you
I know what time it is, gotta give a nigga time
To grow up, ya know what I'm sayin'?
That was way back then

You're my nigga, my best friend
Never gonna call you a bitch again
Yea yea yea, ohhhhhhhhhh

Witness the evil men do, all this shit I been through
Never meant to hurt you — can we make this work, boo?
I know you been feelin' pain, things are not the same
Waitin' to exhale while I'm sittin' in the county jail
Keep your head up, ‘cause things are gettin' better
My cellmate shed tears off your last love letter
Told him you would find a friend, so keep your eyes peeled
Sorry if I cuss, but it's the sufferin' that I feel
Who can I trust? And if I bust, will she snitch?
Even though you ain't the type to trip, sorry if I called you bitch
You showed me the definition of feminine
The difference between a pack of bitches and black women
Huh, I see the boss for the third time, hope to see you soon
Pictures of us kissin' in the livin' room, in the nude
Thanks for bein' there much more than a friend
I swear I'll never call you bitch again — believe me!

We came too far, to throw it all away
We came way too far, pretty baby
We came too far to throw it all away
We came way too far, pretty baby
To throw it all away, throw it all away baby

Through all my ups and downs
You always stayed around stayed around



Who you are
One nation under a thug and bullet scar
Young nation, no revolution and no cause
One nation, young black and dangerous by far
Young nation just tryin' to get this

Murderous mind state, can't keep my 9 straight
Sippin' on this Hennessy, waitin' for the time to break
Show up and motherfuckers bow down, recognize
Westside, Death Row, Outlaw ridaz
Untouchable mob of pistol packers
Well-known felons, labelled for drug-sellin' merciless jackers
Forever buzzed, roll with thugs and dogs
Commence to lettin' off rounds, then escape in a fog
Who wanna see me solo? Catch Makaveli while he's sleepin'
My Mini-14 murderin' niggas while they creepin'
Uh, duck or you ass out, drink 'til you pass out
Ain't scared to die, drunk drivin' in my glasshouse
Niggas is under me, they bitches come to me
They heard the stories, nigga, now they wanna really see
"Bomb first" my motto, it's fully guaranteed
Niggas is playa haters, label them my enemies; I'm dumpin'

Who you are
One nation under a thug and bullet scar
Young nation, no revolution and no cause
One nation, young black and dangerous by far
Young nation just tryin' to get this

When it's on, I'm poppin' off every chance I get
Out the window on some "Uptown Anthem" shit
I'm stressin', but ain't no pressure here, I been there before
Fugitive, task force at my girlfriend door
Now they checkin' out my bedroom, I ain't there
.40 cal's, extended clips, still I ain't scared
Outlaw, and best believe they won't take me alive
I'm different, and I'ma prove it if it take me to die
Knew that God had a plan for me
But he won't be layin' up in my casket or doin' life in the can for me
Maybe I'm breezy or paranoid than a bitch
Me dyin' – you think I'd let them see the joy from that shit?
Walkin' dead, angel spend they last days by me
New Jersey giant like Dave Tyree
Young George and Jonathan Jatt
Your guns clap, mine'll go brraaatt, soldier like Geronimo Pratt
And come through cockin' the black pound
When they put the Twin Towers up
Pac, I'm knockin' them back down
Poster child cheque, Air Force Ones
With the crooked dial checks, I'm supposed to wild sex
Money and murder is all I breathe in my life
It's full of judges and chasin' enemies in the night
Through the Henny I see the eyes of the Devil
G ridin' with extra boxes of bullets to the 9 and the shovel

Who you are
One nation under a thug and bullet scar
Young nation, no revolution and no cause
One nation, young black and dangerous by far
Young nation just tryin' to get this

I always thought I'd have to die to do a record with Pac
So I wrote from the perspective of a graveyard box
You end up in a box, ‘cause them graverobbin' bastards
Dig your grave back up, snatched you out the casket
Worms in my eyes, eatin' through my cabbage
The flesh to the bones, the bones to the ashes
But I'm not dead, I'm actually in a session
With the Pac keepin' the shot money, progressive
They don't really want no drama, I know you're goons
That's why I keep pressure on them, like a open wound
This God-given, he keep givin' me better music
So every time you hear me, my songs present improvement
Y'all can't kill me, y'all forever losin', songs are evolution
If I load your gun for you and we bang it out at some other niggas, you better shoot it
Don't try to lie and say you was bustin' – I'm clever, stupid!
Claimin' you reppin' Ruthless
You got the same bullets that you had when I loaded it for you
You never used it; the Nacirema dream get ready for execution
Papoose, Fatal and Pac – the revolution

Who you are
One nation under a thug and bullet scar
Young nation, no revolution and no cause
One nation, young black and dangerous by far
Young nation just tryin' to get this



In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand

Why explain the game
Niggas ain't listenin', stuck in positions
If victims can't stand the heat then stay the fuck out the kitchen
Half these busters switchin', lookin' at me mean
Itchin', givin' suckers plenty space
Have these bitch niggas snitchin'
Where are we now, guns found daily
The feds surely hope that they could finally nail me
For sellin' dope they backwards
Make the track burst, whenever I rap
Attack
Words been known to explode on contact
Extreme at times
Blinded by my passion and fury
Look at me laugh at my competition's flashin' my jewelry
You'd stay silent if you niggas knew me
Truely effective
The shit you heard ain't do me justice
Got a death wish, bitch
Run, but face being traced, by the infrared beam
It seems niggas ain't recognize my team
Ain't nobody holdin' you back, explode the track to confetti
Unload it
'Cause niggas ain't ready
The life of an outlaw

In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand

Code 3
Attack formation
Pull out your pistols
Keep an eye out for the devils 'cause they itchin' to get you
Merciless madman screamin' kamikaze in tongue
Automatic gunfire makin' all my enemies run
Who should I call when I'm shot and bleedin'?
Indeed a possibility that's part a chasin' cream
Dope got me hatin' fiends
Scheme with my team, just a chosen few
My foes victim of explosives
Come closer
Exhale the fumes
We got memories fadin' fast
A slave for cash
Accelerate, mash, blast, then dash
Don't look now. How you like it, raw
Niggas ain't ready for the wrath of the outlaws
Never surrender
Death before dishonor, stay free
I'm thugged out
Fuck the world 'cause this is how they made me
Scarred but still breathin'
Believe in me and you could see the victory
A warrior in jewels
Will you picture me?
Life of and outlaw

Ridin' with my guns in hand

City under siege
It's like I can't even breathe
I'm from the state of car thieves
G.E.D. from the streets
Plenty beef
I play for keeps, arrange the whole crime scene
Mobb peep
They sneak up from behind tryin' to creep
No halfs with no straps, jack
It's on to bounce back
An ounce of wrath so bad, it snatched my style on death
Tell the gripper I was sent to get ya
Snip with clippers
Get the picture
I wrote my life down as a scripture

And still I'm lost in the land of the lonely
Where ain't nobody holy
A matter of a fact, we unholy
Everybody livin' soley for themselves
Too high strung to lend help
To somebody who be needin' it
You know we lost hope and he needin' it
But the evil it's forever
But I'm rappin' low down, scandalous
Like a tramp is
All for the street fame on how to be managed
To plan shit
6 months in advanced to what we plotted
Approached the goal on swole and now I got it

Uh, crack my window
Knowin' they'd love to catch Kastro sleepin'
Attach a strap under my pillow hand to hand like we freakin'
Creepin' deep into the mornin'
Peepin' out the weak while they yawnin'
And let my clout speak for itself
No doubt
Outlaw
Outta my mind, outta time
You're all blind
Some kind of life of mine if K-Dog don't mind
Findin' it funny, matter of fact, 'cause it is
Perhaps finally I'll adapt to it over the years as an outlaw

What's up, nigga?
Hell yeah
On my grandmother, nigga
What's up
Watch out)

Well, now they all say that vultures and parasites
Snakes are all alike
Thug life break night
Drink 'til we fist fight
Life or death, but you can't win with a vest
But there won't be no breathin' for the reason
Punk bitch on your breath
I see day is dark and I admit it's dark
So chase on the ave. hide your stash
Beware from them marks
And yo, Makaveli, give me them bullets that was left up in your belly
And let me bust back to them niggas 'til they all cold and sweaty

In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand
In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand
In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand
In the life we live as thugs
Everybody fuckin' with us so can't you see
It's hard to be a man
Ridin' with my guns in hand



Tell me about these fake ass bitches

Look here little nigga
Most of these niggas be bitches too
But you'll never hear that side of the story
So uhh, we finna do this shit like this

It's like I tell my niggas, keep your eyes on these bitches
They love to G a nigga young dumb and gettin' riches
What the fuck you think a trick is nigga
Nigga done stick and wet his dick
And then get tricked out all his riches by a -- BITCH!
I'm here to school you to the rules of the game, it'll cost ya
Think you all that just 'cause she let a nigga toss her
Motherfuckin' privilege
So don't give up your conversation, give that bitch your 7 digits
When she call ya, ask that tramp whassup
And if she hesitate  nigga hang up, worrrd up
And let that bitch meditate to the dial tone
And call me when you're ready to bone, and it's on
A motherfuckin' mack tonight
Stay that stay strapped cause my raps is tight
You fuckin' punks, I hate you snitches
Went against the grain and the game to be fake ass bitches

And expect them to accept it; girl your heard me it gets scandalous
But we gonna kick this shit like this here)

I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches

Time to show these bustas who's boss
Run up on a real motherfucker and get tossed
The game is deep, and thicker than a motherfuckin' jimmy
Broke hoes runnin' round yellin' "Gimme!"
I can't stand it, hoes talkin' bout they got a man
Shit all I wanted her to do is suck my DICK
So how about hittin' a motherfucker on my pager
Busy now bitch but you can give me the pussy later
Fly how I fade her, played her like a game of Sega
Fuckin' with the player that done made her, huh
And I ain't sleepin' caught you creepin' for my money
So get the bozack, knockin' hoes back, keep my dough stacked
So where the motherfuckin' hoes at?
Punk niggas can't fade the mack, livin' fat
Gettin' paid to rap, it's like that, you motherfuckin' bitches

Yeah, yeah that's my motto
She educated a whole bunch of you old raggedy-ass niggas
So y'all take that shit back to y'all camp and uhh
You sleep on that there, it's like

I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches

Oh you too nigga, don't think we ain't talkin' bout your punk ass
You old fake ass nigga
Standin' there wearin' all them Pendletons and khakis and all that
You soft as a motherfuckin' grape
Ain't this a motherfuckin' bitch
I can see right through your flower ass
Some of these niggas is bitches too, man I tell ya
But we gonna do this shit
Y'all take this shit and you play this shit for every single
And there's plenty of 'em
Fake ass motherfuckin' bitch, die in ninety-four



Hahahaha, man, you crazy

See, it ain't easy bein' me
Life as a celebrity is less than heavenly
I got these fakes and these backstabbers chasing me around
And it's always drama, whenever I wanna get around
Momma told me, long before I ever came up
Gotta be true to what you do and keep the game up
‘Cause things change, and jealousy becomes a factor
Best friends at your wife's house, tryin' to mack her
I'm on tour, but still they keep on knockin' at my door
And I got no time to worry, I'm steady wanting more
Every day is a test, yes, I try hard
But I'm strugglin' with every breath, I pray to God
That the woman that I left at home, all alone
There ain't nothing like tryin' to bone, over the phone
In my mind I can see her naked, I can't take it
Got me shaking at the thought that we can make it
I thought you knew

I'm rollin' out on tour today
You getting sad, ‘cause I'm going away
The chickenheads wanna play with me
You getting mad, ‘cause you think I'ma sway
Some of 'em cute, some of 'em fine as fuck
I hear 'em scream soon as I hit the stage, nah...
Still I be getting lonely for you
I'm coming home soon as I make this pay, make this pay

I call you up long distance, on the telephone
Wanna tuck you in even though I can't make it home
I whisper things in your ear like you're near me
Wonder if you feel me from far away, and can you hear me?
It seems to me, that you're jealous
‘Cause I'm hustling and making money with the fellas
In the backstreets, tryin' to track me, baby, hold up!
Thugs get lonely too, but I'm a soldier
And there's no way I'ma stop making money
‘Cause your attitude's changed and you're acting a little funny
Always complaining, saying we don't spend time
Can't you see I got enough stress on my mind?
And hanging up like you all that
Then get mad when I tell you that I'm busy, baby, call back
Please, ain't nothing left to say to you
Thugs get lonely too, you know


I sit alone in my room, drinking without a care
Talking out loud to you, like you're there
Take your picture out my back pocket, man, it's on
You're the first face I wanna see when I get home
Wanna love you 'til the sun rise, buckwild
Touching every wall in the house, thug style
Put your hands on the headboard, think of me
Drippin' sweat on top of you, sink and see
This in your head that I'm making love, so turn the lights down
Reminisce and relax ‘cause, baby, right now
I feel it in the middle of my stomach
You whisper in my ear and baby, tell me how you really want it
Hold on tightly, watch the ceiling
Scratch my back's how you react, let me know you feel me
‘Cause everything I'm giving to you, is so true
And thugs get lonely too, you know


Yeah, thug life, baby! Steady thuggin'
Aye, so you remember that
Next time you sweating me when I'm on the road, baby
Thugs get lonely too
We ain't gotta go through all this bullshitting ass problems
If you wanna be real with me, be real with me
If you wanna be fake, move on to the next one, that ain't me



Hard like an erection
Young black male
Hard like an erection
Ain't shit to fool with
Hard like an erection
Young black male
Hard like an erection
Ain't shit to fool with
Yes, niggas! Yes, niggas! Yes, niggas!
Go, nigga, go!
Hard like an erection
Young black male
Hard like an erection
Ain't shit to fool with
Hard like an erection
Young black male
Hard like an erection
Ain't shit to fool with

Young black male
I try to effect by kicking the facts
And stacking much mail
I'm packing a gat 'cause guys wanna jack
And fuck going to jail
'Cause I ain't a crook, despite how I look
I don't sell yayo
They judging a brother like covers on books
Follow me into a flow
I'm sure you know, which way to go
I'm hitting 'em out of the doors
So slip on the slope, let's skip on the flow
I'm fucking the sluts and hoes
The bigger the butts the tighter the clothes
The gimminy jimminy grows
Then whaddaya know, it's off with some clothes
Rowd when the crowd says ho
That let's me know, they know I can flow
Love when they come to my shows
I get up and go with skins before
When I'm collecting my dough
I never respect, the one that I back
The quicker the nigga can rap
The bigger the check
Now watch how they sweat
What kind of style is that?
The style of a mack, and ready to jack
I rendered up piles of black
The wacker the pack, the fatter the smack
I hate it when real niggas bust
They hate when I cuss, they threaten to bust
I had enough of the fuss
I bust what I bust and cuss when I must
They gave me a charge for sales
For selling the tales... of young black males

Yes, nigga, N-I-G-G-A, niggas
Ay, nigga, you can't handle that shit!
Pass that man!
Hit that shit, that's the shit!
It smells like skunk, skunk smells like that nigga, momma
We ain't nuttin' but some low down dirty niggas
Keep it real, nigga! Fuck you, nigga!
You ain't giving me near a dime on this real motherfucker
Fuck St. Ides, it's an Old E thing, baby
Strictly some of that Hennessy
Can I drink with you, fellas? Can I get it on it?
Fuck you, capo. You ain't in, baby
I tell you what! You guys are not gonna be talking
All that shit, when I come back, OK?
We gonna say who the big mouth, when I come back
Young black male!



Am I wrong 'cause I wanna get it on 'til I die?
Am I wrong 'cause I wanna get it on 'til I die?
Get it on 'til I die, get it on 'til I die
Y'all, y'all remember me
Y'all, y'all remember me

It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac

After the fire comes the rain, after the pleasure there's pain
Even though we broke for the moment we'll be ballin' again
Time to make y'all my military, be prepared for the busters
Similar to bitches, too scary, get to near me, we rush 'em
Visions of over-packed prisons, millions of niggas thug livin'
Pressure's three strikes, I hope they don't test us
So, pull the heat out, ammunition in crates
Shh! Move without a sound as we slide down pistols in place
I'm sensin' niggas is defenseless
I'm hittin' fence's, then gettin' ghost
Who can prevent me shootin' senseless?
At these niggas throats
Bitch-made niggas and that bullshit you goin' through
Outlaws bustin' while we rushin', we untouchable
Fuck you niggas and that bullshit you goin' through!
We Outlaws, rushin' you, bustin' you, we untouchable

It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac

You niggas better not try to run up
And don't try to say we ain't told ya
You're dealin' with killers and soldiers
Nigga, these explosives, tryin' to blow shit
Runnin' you over, nigga, controller
Whenever y'all niggas try to roll up
Thinkin' I'm a ho, well, come and let me show ya
I'ma light up the rhythm like dosia
Dumpin' so potent, nigga, don't choke up
Flow up, Makaveli the Don
Got niggas strapped and ready to bomb
As soon as I send the alarm
And when we're done, we've committed a red rum
Leavin' the enemies dead and gone
Leavin' them niggas head's blown
'Cause they know they dead wrong
When the shots ring out, you know we're comin' through
Talk a lot with your mouth, well, what you gon' do?
Shut 'em down, busters be knowin'
To keep they distance, thugs don't fuck around
We get back at 'em so swiftly
Niggas is with me underground
Slug in a nigga mug, reppin' Midwest Side
Niggas, if you a thug, get your weapon, let's ride
Ride for Pac, Pac, get live for Pac, Pac
Pop off the Glock, Glock, the thuggin', it don't stop

It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac

Only wish to breed, I explode into a million seeds
Y'all remember me, legendary, live eternally
Bury me in pieces, 'cause they fear reincarnation
Niggas screamin' peace
'Cause they fear when my squad face 'em
Take them to places, stake they face
Then erase 'em and brake 'em
Murder motherfuckers at a rate, and then quicken the pace
Blast me, but never ask me to live a lie
Am I wrong 'cause I wanna get it on 'til I die?
Now I'm worldwide; niggas gossip like girls, then hide
No offense to Nas, but this whole fuckin' world is mine
Even if you blind, you can still see my prophecy
My destiny to overthrow those on top of me
Fiendin' for currency, the money be callin'
Can you feel me, dreamin'? Seein' scenes of me ballin'?
Fuck you bitch-made niggas
And that bullshit you goin' through
Outlaws bustin' while we rushin', we untouchable
Fuck you niggas and that bullshit you goin' through
We Outlaws, rushin' you, bustin' you, we untouchable

It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac
It's that 2Pac Pac, it's that 2Pac 2Pac



Just Pour a nigga a glass
That's right
Ay pour me some of that too baby

They wanna knows my role model, it's in a brown bottle
Hennessy
They wanna knows my role model, it's in a brown bottle
Hennessy
Hahaha, y'all niggas can't fuck with this ol' thug shit
Hennessy

Big ballin' ass nigga named 'Pac

Now I was born in the gutter facin life or death
I was a thug ever since my mama gave me breath
These motherfuckers wanna see me die, so who am I
To try to warn 'em, I buck and bomb 'em, them niggas fry
Hey, remember me? Down that Hennessy
The nigga you don't wanna see, let me proceed
My definition of some thug shit, y'all don't hear me
Now that it's poppin ain't no love bitch
I maintain in the game in the gutter's where I still kick it
I'm trying to hustle up a meal ticket
I'm still wicked in my ways, a hustler 'til my dying days
Ain't nuttin wrong with gettin paid, so nigga blaze
Cause we some motherfuckin fools
Walkin through the streets wearing jewels, breakin niggas makin moves
Even the cops can't stop us, my enemies flip
When they see me drink a fifth of that Hennessy

They wanna knows my role model, it's in a brown bottle
Hennessy
They wanna knows my role model, it's in a brown bottle
Hennessy
Hahaha, y'all niggas can't fuck with this ol' thug shit
Hennessy

Big ballin' ass nigga named Trice

Now I was born in Detroit on the side that's West
Troubled child comin up I had to ride I guess
Tried to apply myself, them niggas was ballin
My mama couldn't tell me shit, the streets was callin
I was often involved with niggas breakin the law
I look back, 'Pac nigga, we was bankin off raw
P-Funk got it pumpin, he had the connects
Threw the sack to his lil' niggas workin the set
And if you got it you gettin wet, nigga bet on that
Don't come around hurr on that floss shit
Detroit niggas off shit
And this your road days, All Eyez on Me
O. Trice always rep his block
Pass the Henn and that ice
I'm on a track with 'Pac nigga


Yeah, ay 'Pac, 'Pac, nigga Detroit love you boy
You put it down out here, I mean, y'know
Me and my family, my friends, nigga we ride for you always
2Pacalypse Now 'til infinity boy, forever
Shady Records, Afeni Shakur, whattup? Yeah
Obie Trice, pour out a lil' liquor nigga



Ay what time is it nigga?
Oh shit, 12 o'clock
Oh shit, we got to get the fuck up outta here
Nigga, it's check out time nigga
Hey call up Kurupt, call Daz room
Call Suge, call all the niggas tell 'em to meet me downstairs
Tell the valet, bring the Benz around
Hey Kurupt, y'all niggas drivin' or y'all flyin' back, whassup?
Hey Syke nigga, come on man, get up out the bathroom fool
Aw nigga, damn

Now I'm up early in the mornin', breath stinkin' as I'm yawnin'
Just another sunny day in California
I got my mind focused on some papers while I'm into sexy capers
Give a holla to them hoochies last night, that tried to rape us
Will these rap lyrics take us, plus room all up in Vegas
I'm a boss playa, death before I let these bitches break us
Last night was like a fantasy, Alizé and Hennessy
A hoochie and her homie dirty dancin' with my man and me
Told her I was interested, picture all the shit we did
I got her hot and horny, all up on me, what a freaky bitch
First you argued, then I fight it, 'til you lick me where I like it
Got a nigga all excited, it don't matter, just don't bite it
I never got to check out the scene
Too busy tryin' to dig a hole in your jeans
Now it seems, it's check out time

We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!

Gotta go, gotta go
Yeah baby, hahaha, it's check it out time!!
Gotta go nigga, gotta go
Ay, c'mon man get y'all bags man, call that valet motherfucker
Tell him to get a nigga shit, cause we out this, motherfucker

They label me an outlaw, so it's time for the panty raid
My fantasies came true with Janet on, I'm in a escapade
But did it all, end too soon
All the homies runnin' through the halls room to room
So I assume, since I'm a playa like my nigga Syke
Then it's only right for me to disappear into the night
My game's trump tight
So I find time to recline
Sneak in your room, instant Messiah, shit wines of all kinds
I ain't got that much time
So hurry up and pop the Dom and let me hit it from behind
Since I'm only here for one night
I got to get you hot and heated
Play like Micheal Jackson, and Beat It
One more thing I like to mention, I'm done and I'm out
Cause there's someone else who deserves my attention
So all the homies round up in the lobby
Cause bustin' bitches is a hobby, nigga
It's check out time

We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!

Aiyyo man 'Pac, ay, where the where the fuck is Daz at man?
This nigga locked up or somethin'?
The only one not to leave
Yo man, it's check out time, it's time to get out this mother
We out man, fuck that shit
Yo Rece! Yo nigga, whassup?

Hey, I'm livin' the life of a boss playa
The front desk callin' but I'm checkin' out later
My behavior is crazy from what you did to me baby
If walls could talk, they'd say, you tried to fade me
I'm puttin' in work, but didn't hurt from the jacuzzi to the bed
Carressin' your thoughts, cause I'm livin' fed, heard what I said?
Passion is crashin' the room
From the liquor we consumed I heard a boom
I'm blackin' out, you're yellin' out 'Big Syke Daddy'
We did it in the caddy on the highway, my way
I'm lost in a dream and so it seemed, to be the night
Five bottles of Cristal and I'm still tight
Out of sight from 'Pac and Kurupt
As I get it up, once the doors close, you stuck
In a heaty, sticky situation
Get up baby, you ain't on vacation
It's check out time

We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!

Ay, it's check out time
Ay Pac, nigga where my motherfuckin', where my shoes go, nigga?
Where my motherfuckin' drawers and shit at man?
Man, y'all niggas was in here partyin' too fuckin' much
What the fuck y'all doin', nigga?
Kurupt, go tell Daz, man, and Bogart and the rest of them niggas
C'mon man, niggas is trippin' man
Front desk all callin' me, tellin' me to get the hell outta here, man
I ain't got no more money, somebody loan me a hundred

We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!
We gotta go, we gotta go!

We gotta go!!! oooo!!
We gotta, go!!!
We, heyyy!
We!!, we gotta go!.. haaa!!
We gotta, go!! haa!!



Dear Lord, as we down here, struggle for as long as we know
Dreams are dreams, and reality seems to be the only place to go, the only place for us
I know, try to make the best of bad situations
Seems to be my life's story
Ain't no glory in pain, a soldier's story in vain
And can't nobody live this life for me
It's a ride y'all, a long hard ride

Somebody wake me, I'm dreamin'
I started as a seed, the semen
Swimmin' upstream, planted in the womb while screamin'
On the top was my pops, my mama screamin' stop
From a single drop, this is what they got
Not to disrespect my peoples, but my papa was a loser
Only plan he had for mama was to fuck her and abuse her
Even as a little seed, I could see his plan for me
Stranded on welfare, another broken family
Now what was I to be? A product of this heated passion
Mama got pregnant and papa got a piece of ass
Look how it began, nobody gave a fuck about me
Pistol in my hand, this cruel world can do without me
How can I survive? Got me askin' white Jesus
"Will a nigga live or die?" cause the Lord can't see us
In the deep dark clouds of the projects, ain't no sunshine
No sunny days and we only play sometimes
When everybody's sleepin'
I open my window, jump to the streets and get to creepin'
I can live or die, hope I get some money 'fore I'm gone
I'm only 19, I'm tryna hustle on my own
On the spot where everybody and they pops tryna slang rocks
I'd rather go to college, but this is where the game stops
Don't get it wrong cause it's always on, from dusk to dawn
You can buy rocks, Glocks or a herringbone
You can ask my man, he's a mind reader
Keep my 9 heater all the time, this is how we grind
Meet up at the cemetery then get smoked out
Pass the weed, nigga! That Hennessey'll keep me keyed, nigga
Everywhere I go niggas holla at me, "Keep it real, G"
I was born not to make it, but I did
The tribulations of a ghetto kid, still I rise


I stay sharp as always
Runnin' your bricks with blitz, through your project hallways
Dumpin' crews like two's, nigga, all day
Secrets of war prepare me for the worst
A life that's lavish, full of cabbage or a life that's in a hearse
But now my dreams, it seems though
Be placin' triple beams and things, bro
Diamond pinkie ring got the loot poppin' out my jeans

Now I plan to keep my Glock cocked
If trouble was searchin' for me, then why not?
Show 'em what I'm made of, plus raised on, on my block
Chancellor Ave, where many turn to the street
Thugs snatchin' bags, we out for power, makin' cash
It wasn't fast, it'll make me mad, I'm just like him
My homie on the corner with his gat tucked in
Youngins, they buckin' somethin'
The life he lead's the life he don't need, don't we all know?
He tryin' to rise up and we just go doe, still he rise

Dreams of lost hope
I hit the strip broke where the fiends get coke
And still I rise, now I float, cowards ghost
Whenever we come around, I'm runnin' down
Clutchin' a pound, live as sirens, duckin' the sound
I used to hustle with my moms 'til the sun came
My homie Harm doin' time from this drug game
Stolen cars, war scars, born a outlaw
Behind bars, go to sleep just to see the stars
Freedom is ours, though we trapped on a firm block
Crackheads only 10 learn to duck cops

In '96 my Glock's my plastic, passion for blastin' bastards
No faces for open caskets, peelin' your cap backwards
You cowards ain't prepared for pistol practice
I send my missiles through your mattress
Leavin' holes in your body like a cactus
While me and my crew be boppin' more greens than topic
And loot to keep the seams in my motherfuckin' jeans poppin'
Leavin' your spleen to pick up
Half of you niggas is softer than a Snicker
Let's go to war and see who draw quicker
And still I rise, and still I rise…


Y'all niggas fake, all day everyday
So now I got roller blades, bitch
Thought you knew
Your mouth is rich
C'mon pops, let's go!



Oh, you Thug Life is yours?
Life ain't no something you can rap with
Ooh come no ordinary game
The game no something you can rap with
Me's a player you know?
I do not, play in no game
Me just, make money, dollars..
Every time, seen?

Now how can I explain how this game laced me, plus with this fame
I got enemies do anything to break me, my attitude changed
Got to the point where I was driven, twenty-four/seven
Money's my mission, just a nigga tryin' to make a livin'
These busta tricks don't want no mail
They spendin' they riches on skanless bitches, who'll stay petrified in jail
It's hell, plus all the dealers want a meal ticket
Jealous-ass bitches, player-hatin' but we still kick it
Always keep my eyes on the prize, watch the police
Seen so much murder, neighborhoods gettin' no sleep
But still, I get my money on major, continuously
Communicatin' through my pager, niggas know me
Don't have no homies since they jealous, I hustle solo
Cause when I'm broke I got no time for the fellas listen
Ain't nothin' poppin' 'bout no broke nigga, I ain't no joke
Fuck what they say and get your dough nigga
Heavy in the game

Who the bumba clat him a come try take mine?
I throw I'm blood claat P.M. to A.M
All, all the bumba come ya take dis ting
For ya take dis ting for joke?
The game's been good to me)

Certain niggas wanna stick to the game, you's a trick to the game
Waitin' upon your turn, son when will you learn?
Ain't no turns given, niggas be twistin' and takin' shit
Puttin' they sack down, then puttin' they mack down
Me myself I hustle with finesse yes I'm an Oakland baller
Be your own nigga meanin' buy your own dope
Cause that front shit is punk shit, something I never funked with
Be true to this game and this game will be true to you
That's real shit; disrespect, see what this here do to you
That jackin' and robbin', despisin' your homie
Ain't healthy, niggas be endin' up dead 'fore they get wealthy
But not me though, I'm sewin' somethin' major
So what I reap is boss -- that's why my public status is floss
Went from a, young nigga livin' residential
To a, young nigga workin' presidential

Me nigga Tu-pac always look good
You know that's true I'm look good every time
Can yi know I'm serving up blood claat
Playing yi fucking games
Ooh, we take game, we won!
Any by now
All, yi haffa forget fi we won!
Every time

I'm just a young black male, cursed since my birth
Had to turn to crack sales, if worse come to worse
Headed for them packed jails, or maybe it's a hearse
My only way to stack mail is out here doin' dirt
My decisions do or die, been hustlin' since junior high
No time for askin' why, gettin' high, gettin' mine
Put away my nine, 'cause these times call for four-five shells
'Cause life is hell, and everybody dies
What about these niggas I despise
Them loud talkin', cowards shootin' guns into crowds, jeopardizin' lives
Shoot 'em right between them niggas' eyes, it's time to realize
Follow the rules or follow them fools that die
Everybody's tryin' to make the news
Niggas confused, quit tryin' to be an O.G. and pay your dues
If you choose to apply yourself
Go with the grain then, come into riches and the bitches and the fame
Heavy in the game

Boy, ya nah bitch!
Major that's true we look good every time
When we at Beers Diamond
And fi them frame them look good, oh no?
This whole world ya call on
Gonna mass on a face
For any, section of bumba ras claat, oh!
Flush it!.. Oh!
Nobody wan come test me ya know
True them we a drive pretty car
Wanna no part of any ting
And now you wan come drown a gun
But ya see we know, you haffa show I'm maximum respect
For when a blood clat run or when a pussy walk up
We look good every time
'Nough dollars, dollars!
Ya know about dollars , them right?
But we nah talk no shit
We haffa walk de walk for we a talk, see it?
'Cause action, action speak louder dan words
You n who the record partner
Don't blood claat ting at, ALL



I wanted to bring back that reality
But nobody can ever be confused and think I'm fuckin Mike Tyson
And I'm the heavyweight champion, I'm a little nigga
That's why its so raw to just watch me battle lions
Cause I'm a little skinny nigga battlin' niggas three times my size

Watch this uppercut, here it comes..
Watch the jab nigga...ugh...here it come
Look out, watch my arms..

Now see so many motherfuckers wanna take a piece
Commin' equipped with some shit that niggas just can't believe
I pull a trick from my sleeve now kamikaze
I'm all over that nigga, come identify the body
My middle finger to you ho niggas
Run up on me and I'll be forced to let it go nigga
I ain't the one you wanna try, why? Stayin' high
I hit this blunt and watch these motherfuckers die
Whose runnin these streets I said that cocaine
Cause in the dope game, niggas'll die 'fore they go broke mayne
Another hustler makin' major cash
'til the punk police come an raid ya ass
Now you stressed doin' fed time
And its a bitch cause the judge gave you 8 years
You doin 6 and we know that you can't hang
You a trick rolled over turned snitch like a bitch

Now you know you should have ducked nigga
Gotchu fallin from the uppercut, fucked, so what's up? nigga!
Now you know you should have ducked nigga
Gotchu fallin' from this uppercut, stuck, so what's up? nigga!

They got a nigga in the dice game
I'm feelin' lucky but the nigga just a little bigger
He tryin fuck me out my cash, I'ma blast nigga
He don't know I gotta tell ya like the last nigga
Gotta go don't need to roll for the truck, I get 'em up
Left to right, my uppercut'll hit 'em up
I'm known to walk the streets on any block
I love my niggas, but I ain't puttin down my Glock
The gun shots rang when I lose nigga, and ooh nigga
Lay it down just to prove it
And fuck the rappin motherfucker we can do this


They claim that we violent, we named after tyrants
This revolution won't be televised, we keep it silent
Roll on our enemies, beat 'em at they own game
Molotov cocktails, releasing up in flames
Tired of bein' stepped on, sick of bein' held back
Lookin' through my rear view, thinkin' bout the pay back
Wanna see my kids grow don't know if I'ma make it though
One more nigga came up short in the ghetto
Society lied to me so I'm strapped with the metal
Push ya middle finger up nigga if you a rebel
Have ya face down goin' in ya pockets if ya let em'
I done lost too many homies for me to ever forget em'
I done made so many mistakes but still I don't regret em'
I'm a product of the pimp, the pusher, and the reverend
I'm a product of the block, the fiends and the felons
We all lost souls tryna find our way to heaven


To all the comrads no longer with us, see you when we get there
'Pac, Yak, we gon' keep on ridin', give these cowards the uppercut
'Til we get up there with y'all, YOU KNOW!
Thug Life we still livin it
Outlaw for life, in the name of the Don, let's go!



Black Cotton, Black Cotton
Black Cotton – a symbol for unrewarded struggle
Time for a little gospel tale
Ghetto gospel, that is, listen!
Rotten Black Cotton in God's eyes
Speak!

Black cotton, steady stressin', Smith & Wessons, count my blessings
Why do we work like slaves sweatin' blades to an early grave?
Answer that, then answer this too
Love's gonna get ya, you know it's true – life's a bitch, true?
You best to backtrack and try to act black and live
Not to be phony and positive but why be negative?
What's the matter, G? Black cat got your tongue?
Fat track got you sprung, now you're hung?
Do ya feel me? Dum dum diddy, is it me?
Attempt to reach each and every brother on the streets
If not peace, then at least let's get a piece
I'm tired of seein' bodies on the streets deceased
Lookin' through my highschool yearbook
Reminiscin' of the tears as the years took
One homie, two homie, three homies – POOF!
We used to have troops, but now there's no more youth to shoot
God, come save the misbegotten

Look to the sky, and I ask God why)
Drowned in by screams, no answer to my questions)
Why do I stress? It's like I'm bein' tested)
Vanished in thin air, please answer my questions)
Nobody don't care

In the belly of the beast I'm bubblin' up
Runnin' out of luck, about to self-destruct
Old heads say live your life like such
You're sure to catch her with your one-day boy
I wouldn't listen to 'em
Your power movement was cool, but it ain't fix nothin'
So I just go with what I know, I don't trust none
Look what the 80's did to us baby kids
And now we grown up, nobody ain't own us yet

Black cotton, I'm plottin' on what they owe me
I'm workin' without a profit, they shacklin' all my homies
I'm hurtin', but keep in mind, it ain't irkin'
And we ain't stop, it's curtains
You try to rise and certainly we survive with Outlaw Ridaz
What's the reward for a struggler?
If the Lord lovin' us, then why they hate to see us comin' up?
Runnin' up, gun cocked, black mask and gloves
If you ain't got a penny, mind the glove, no love
Waitin' for my 40 acres and a blunt to blaze
Biblical times, good hearts with milita minds
Black Cotton – I'm hoppin' over enemy lines
Black Cotton – I ain't stoppin' till they givin me mine
Black Cotton

Look to the sky, and I ask God why)
Drowned in by screams, no answer to my questions)
Why do I stress? It's like I'm bein' tested)
Vanished in thin air, please answer my questions)
Nobody don't care



Ever since you was a pee-wee, down by my knee with a wee-wee
We been coochie-coo all through school, you and me, G
Back in the days we played practical jokes on
Everybody smoked with they locs and they yokes on
All through high school, girls by the dozens
Saying we cousins, knowing that we wasn't
But like the old saying goes
Times goes on, and everybody grows
Grew apart, had to part, went our own ways
You chose the dope game, my microphone pays
In many ways we were paid in the old days
So far away from the crazies with AK's
And though I been around clowning with the Underground
I'm still down with my homies from the hometown
And if you need, need anything at all
I drop it all for y'all, if my homies call

"If you ever need a place to stay"
“Well, alright, y'all”
“Brothers and sisters”

It's a shame, you chose the dope game
Now you slang 'caine on the streets with no name
It was plain that your aim was mo' 'caine
You got fame now you run with no shame
I chose rapping tracks to make stacks
In fact I travel the map with raps that spray cats
But now I don't wanna down my homie
No matter how low you go, you're not lowly
And I, hear that you made a few enemies
But when you need a friend you can depend on me, call
If you need my assistance, there'll be no resistance
I'll be there in an instant
Who am I to judge another brother, only on his cover
I'd be no different than the other
H-to-the-O-to-the-M-to-the-I-to-the-E
I'm down to the E-N-D
Cause it's a fall in no time at all
I'm down for y'all, when my homies call
Word, if my homies call


Well, it's ninety-one and I'm living kinda swell now
But I hear that you're going through some hell, pal
But life making records ain't easy
It ain't what I expected, it's hectic, it's sleazy
But I guess that the streets is harder
Trying to survive in the life of a young godfather
My homies is making it elsewhere
Striving, working nine to five with no health care
We both had dreams of being great
But his deferred and blurred and changed in shape
It's fate, it wasn't my choice to make
To be great, I'm giving it all it takes
Trying to shake, the crates and fakes and snakes
I gotta take my place or fall from grace
The foolish way, the pace is quick and great
Smiling face to hide the trace of hate
But my homie would never do me wrong
That's why I wrote this song, if you ever need me, it's on
No matter who the foe they must fall
Us against them all I'm down to brawl if my homies call




You a what? Bad Boy Killaz
Hahaha, yeah, nigga, fuck 'em all!
Fuck all you muthafuckers!
Ayo, Biggie, put your hands up!

Now, I can make it happen
My rappin' is similar to mothafuckers when they scrappin'
Blast and watch 'em back up
Notorious Biggie killer, affiliation with Death Row
Niggas get their caps pealed back, fool, this the West Coast
Bitch, you misdemeanor, I'm raisin' hell like felonies
Mr. Makaveli straight outta jail to sellin' these
Intoxicated, we duplicated but never faded
Now that we made it my adversaries is player hatin'
Got a Mercedes for these tricks, that thought I quit
Then got a drop top Jag for these bitches that's on my dick
Go to a club in a pack, I'm smokin' bud in the back
I wait for niggas to trip ‘cause, bitch, I love to scrap
Mama raised me as a thug nigga, with love niggas
I'm a millionaire started as a drug dealer
I went from rocks to zines, writin' raps and movies
I went from trustin' these tricks
Now they all want to sue me, so fuck 'em all!

Come put your hands up in the air!
It's a middle finger affair, yeah

Now, could you picture my criminal status at its fuckin' peak?
Even the baddest be gettin' murdered in they seats
I'm addicted to these streets, like crack is to these creeps
Seein' visions of a prison, wake up screamin' in my sleep
Is there a heaven in this hell? A possibility of livin' well?
But if they killin' me, I get my stripes and whose to tell
Choosin' to sell, I'd rather die and be deceased
World mob figure addicted to these fuckin' streets

Fuck 'em all, touch 'em all; that's the way that we do it
Ride up, hop the fuck out, watch that bitch nigga lose it
Man, I'm as strong as this game, ya'll be knowin' my name
A young high strung thug nigga created by pain
Livin' my life in the fast lane, gettin' fucked by the past
Got my mind on my cash
And my next piece of ass, so fuck 'em all!

Come put your hands up in the air!
It's a middle finger affair, yeah
I do my dirt all by my lonely
Don't need no phony homie to call me
Back off, I hit at everyone of you homies
So don't get comfortable, I'm runnin' you
Nigga, we Outlaw riders
Don't give a fuck if you love us, we thuggin'

I got glad bags with enemies, cut up so they remember me
Soaked up in Hennessy, so they relatives know it's me
You can bet your last dollar, I'll dick 'em and holla
Ridin' these hoochies like they some heavy ass Chevy impalas
Jump up and get your ass shot up
For my profit pick my Glock up
I'm bustin' with self-defense, you see
Poppin' nobody got 'em, holla
Outlaw riders, mash up on the gas pedal
Vacate the scene, count the cash and stash the precious metal
Here come the coppers, the S.W.A.T. team and the helicopters
Them crackers is crazy, why? ‘Cause they'll never stop us
I watched Arnold Schwarzenegger bust somebody in a movie
Now I want to do it too, ooh, ooh
Niggas is too through, true to the game
I claim Outlaw riders, we give a fuck what they try, I'm…

‘Cause Young Noble behind it
Can you picture me stickin' niggas for they watch and chain?
Kick back, lil' nigga, and watch the game
Get your mob rocked and what-not
We keep it poppin', like a drug spot
The streets know what's hot, trust me

Even my hood call me "baby Malcolm X"
With the TEC's, shower some slugs on 'em
I've got a brother, don't rest and he keeps some drugs on him
Always in grind mood, hustle to find food
Ever seen Faces of Death? That's what my 9 do

I keep my mind on my money, and my money on my mind
With my back against the wall, like I'm runnin' outta time
Even rap with a gat, I must be goin' out my mind
Like I'm up against the world, this guerilla team of mine
Screamin', "Thug Life, bitch, fuck 'em all!" and die for 'em
Even if the last nigga left I'ma ride for 'em
Feel me? Until they kill me, that's how I'm rollin'
"Fuck 'em all, let them die!" – that's my slogan; fuck 'em all!

Come put your hands up in the air!
It's a middle finger affair, yeah
I do my dirt all by my lonely
Don't need no phony homie to call me
Back off, I hit at everyone of you homies
So don't get comfortable, I'm runnin' you
Nigga, we Outlaw riders
Don't give a fuck if you love us, we thuggin'




Was it the liquor, that makes me act blind, times that I'm with her
Anonymous pictures of other niggas tryin' to kiss her
Will I love her or shall I diss her?
I'm sick of this scandalous shit I deal wit', tryin' to paint a perfect picture
My memories of jealousy no longer carefree
Cause so much bullshit your girlfriends keep tellin' me
I'm on tour, but now my bedroom's an open door
So it got me thinkin', what am I tryin' for?
When I was young I was so very dumb, eager to please
A lil', trick on a mission tryin' to get in my P
Me and my niggas is thug niggas, former known drug dealers
We don't love bitches and believe, they don't love niggas
I gotta blame my attraction
But you became a distraction, a threat to my paper stackin'
I thought you changed but now I know
Can't turn a ho into a housewife, baby, and there you go

There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
Actin' like a ho', actin' like a ho'
HOE! See the word on the streets you're a
HOE! Just a groupie on a world tour
HOE! Now I found out for myself you're a
HOE! Girl you need to check yourself

These silly bitches got this game twisted
So I don't claim 'em, just bang 'em
Papa raised a player, so player, I play 'em
I got hoes that got more, hoes than me
So how I look, gettin' hooked, like I ain't got G?
Truly cutie booty big, but that ain't enough
And the head make me beg, still that just ain't enough
When I don't trust her, the bitch be lyin' too much
When she be dyin' to fuck me you be buyin' her stuff, ho

See girlfriend I know, your whole M.O.'s preoccupied with mostly
Gettin' clown after clown, town coast to coast - see
I been tryin' to stay away from sluts like you
Got me turned off completely by that sheisty shit that you do
Knew from jump yo' aim
Straight through them spandex, don't front just name
Spots on yo' body for me to touch while you clutch this game
I keep flowin' like H20 it ain't nothin' for me to say
Why you keep actin' like a ho? But there you go

There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
Actin' like a ho', actin' like a ho'
HOE!, see the word on the streets you're a
HOE!, just a groupie on a world tour
HOE!, now I found out for myself you're a
HOE!, girl you need to check yourself

Uhh, when I first met her I told her I was busy all the time
Now she, callin' me flippin' like she miss me all the time
How she, don't even trip she got a man at home
You need to stop chasin' dick bitch and raise your son
I'm like - damn, we can creep sometime
And you know I'm on the road for like weeks at a time
Girl you're thirsty; and stop callin' while I'm workin' you hurtin' me
All this bullshit is irkin' me girl, but there you go

I blame it on yo' momma, she need to holla at you
But should I blame it on yo' daddy for all the things that you do
Cause there you go, just like a ho, caught in the streets
Like givin' yo' number out to every nigga you meet
You hear what I'm sayin, you only good for parlayin'
I'm layin' down the rules, this a game that you lose
So the streets can have you baby cause I stay on the move

There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
Actin' like a ho', actin' like a ho'
HOE!, see the word on the streets you're a
HOE!, just a groupie on a world tour
HOE!, now I found out for myself you're a
HOE!, girl you need to check yourself

There you go baby girl, That's the story
There you Motherfuckin' go
I coulda Swore you told me you was gon' change
And you don't wanna go to clubs no more and
You wasn't fin' to dress all crazy no more and
You was gon' stay home and try to chill
What happened baby?
Ohh, so yo' friend wanted to go out
That wasn't you that went out
You was just goin' out cause yo' friend was
Okay, so you was pissy drunk up in that nigga car
Cause yo' friend wanted to get drunk huh?
It's all good, cause there you go baby
Oh I ain't trippin' on them niggas callin' the house
It's all good, cause there you go
Me I'ma still be a player, all day baby
So uhh, there you go

There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
There you - there you go, actin' like a ho'
Actin' like a ho', actin' like a ho'
HOE!, see the word on the streets you're a
HOE!, just a groupie on a world tour
HOE!, now I found out for myself you're a
HOE!..



Uh oh, uh oh, oh! Oh! Oh!
They ain't ready for this
L.T. Hutton, T.I., Ashanti
It's that new 'Pac, y'all

Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life
What do you know about Pac's life?
What do you know? What do you know?

Started with five shots, niggas plottin' to kill him
Never figured that that same nigga sell five million
Hit the charts like a madman, nothin' but hits
Court cases got a nigga facin' multiple digits
Dodgin' cop cars, look at how we come so far
Picture a high school drop-out roll in a double R
House full of happiness, weed and drank
Way out, so when trouble tried to find me – can't
Never visioned livin' longer than my twenty first
Thought I'd be locked down, cracked out, or in the dirt
And though it hurts to see the change, it comes with the fame
Watch them gossip in this silly game
To all the motherfuckers speakin' down on me, this is the night
Why's everybody caught up in Pac's life?
To all y'all niggas conversatin' on my life
Mind your motherfuckin' business!

Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life
What do you know about Pac's life?
What do you know? What do you know?
I remember that, ayy

What's happenin', Pac? Yeah, I know we never got to meet
But we know all the same people so we got to speak
And all the shit you went through meant a lot to me
But when they locked you up for nothin', it was a shame to see
You know the crack came, they did the same thang to me
I get along with real niggas, it's the lane to be
Talkin' loud out of pocket tryna bang with me
And so I pull it out my pocket, let it rain, you see
Now they all in the courtroom, blamin' me
See, we ain't live the same life but represent the same struggle
Power to the real niggas, death to the suckers
Money over bitches, get to know 'em for you love 'em
Death before dishonour, never talk to undercovers
Live by the same rules, so minus the tattoos
We the same sort of dude with the same short fuse

Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life
What do you know about Pac's life?
What do you know? What do you know?
Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life

I want money in large amounts
My garage full of cars that bounce
Movin' my tapes in major weight 'cause every dollar counts
Busters is jealous and half these niggas is punks
They runnin' off at the mouth 'til I fill it up with my pump
They jump, my automatic keep 'em weary
While you frontin' like you Billy Badass, nigga, you scary
I been knowin' you for years, we was high school peers
In Junior High I was itchin' to kill, and you was ready to die
While you bullshittin' niggas was dyin' and catchin' cases
Bustin' my automatics at motherfuckers in foreign places
Leavin' no trace, they see my face and they buried
Bitches die in a hurry, still I ride, I'm never worried
Mr. Makaveli tell me to ride, and I'ma ride
Pick my enemies out the crowd, and motherfuckers die
It's not the way I wanna live, my nigga, it's how it is
Only real niggas stay on top, word up!

Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life
What do you know about Pac's life?
What do you know? What do you know?
Everybody talkin' 'bout Pac's life



Life through my bloodshot eyes
would scare a square 2 death
poverty, murder, violence
and never a moment 2 rest
Fun and games R few
but treasured like gold 2 me
cuz I realize that I must return
2 my spot in poverty
But mock my words when I say
my heart will not exist
unless my destiny comes through
and puts an end 2 all of this



All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
They cuttin' off welfare...
They think crime is rising now
You got whites killing blacks
Cops killing blacks, and blacks killing blacks
Shit just gon' get worse
They just gon' become souljas
Straight souljas

All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me

Crack done took a part of my family tree
My momma's on the shit, my daddy split and moms is steady blaming me
Is it my fault, just cause I'm a young black male?
Cops sweat me as if my destiny is makin' crack sales
Only fifteen and got problems
Cops on my tail, so I bail 'til I dodge 'em
They finally pull me over and I laugh
"Remember Rodney King?" and I blast on his punk ass
Now I got a murder case...
You speak of heaven punk? I never heard of the place
Wanted to come up fast, got a Uz' and a black mask
Ducking fuckin' Task, now who's the jackass?
Keep my shit cocked, cause the cops got a Glock too
What the fuck would you do? Drop them or let 'em drop you?
I chose droppin' the cop
I got me a Glock, and a Glock for the niggas on my block
Momma tried to stab me, I moved out
Sold a pound a weed, made G's, bought a new house
I'm only seventeen, I'm the new king
Got me a crew, bought 'em jewels, and a Uz'-thick
But all good things don't last
Task came fast, and busted my black ass
Coolin' in the pen, where the good's kept
Now my little brother wants to follow in my footsteps
A soulja

All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me

Buck, buck - niggas get fucked, don't step to this
Quiet as kept I'm blessed on a quest with a death wish
Tell 'em to come and test, and arrest, nigga it's hectic
Here's the anorexic, I'm makin' it to an exit
Walking through the streets on the black tip
Packed with several gats, cause I'm on some pay 'em back shit
Niggas don't wanna try me, brother you'll get shot down
Now I'm king of the block, since my bigger brother's locked down
I'm hot now, so many punk police have got shot down
Other coppers see me on the block, and they jock now
That's what I call a kingpin
Send my brother what he needs and some weed up to Sing-Sing
Tellin' him just be ready set
Pack ya shit up quick; and when I hit, be prepared to jet
Niggas from the block on the boat now
Every single one got a gun, that'll smoke - pow!
These punks about to get hit by the best
I'm wearin' double vest... so aim at my fuckin' chest
I'll be makin' straight dome calls
Touch the button on the wall, you'll be pickin' up your own balls
I can still hear my mother shout
"Hit the pen nigga -- break your bigger brother out"
I got a message for the warden
I'm comin' for ya ass, as fast as Flash Gordon
We get surrounded in the mess hall, yes y'all
A crazy motherfucker making death calls
Just bring me my brother and we leavin'
For every minute you stall, one of y'all bleedin'
They brought my brother in a jiffy
I took a cop, just in case things got tricky
I caught a bullet in the head, the screams never left my mouth
My brother caught a bullet too
I think he gon' pull through, he deserve to
The fast life ain't everything they told ya
Never get much older, following the tracks of a soulja

All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
All you wanted to be, a soulja, a soulja
All you wanted to be, a soulja, like me
Straight soulja, 1993, and forward



You motherfuckers kill me
Why yall niggas don't ever talk that shit when we be in the physical form?
Why yall niggas get all shy when we right there next to you at the premiere's and shit?
Hahaha
Yall niggas get alot of heart when you get in the studio, huh?
Get that can the man motherfucker wanna talk shit on the mic
Well do this for me, would you?
Next time you get the notion to talk some shit about an Outlaw nigga
Or a nigga from the west side the best side, call me
Call me nigga, reach out and touch a nigga, cause uh
If you don't do that and I hear one of you niggas sayin somethin on a record, ha
Expect me nigga like you expect Jesus to come back
Expect me nigga, I'm comin'

*Beat starts*

Ah, from the pressure, yeah
You know how we do this Quik, Outlaws, untouchable
After the fire comes the rain, after the pleasure there's pain
Even though we broke for the moment we'll be balling again
Time to make y'all, my military be prepared for the busters similar to
Bitches to scary, get to near me we rush 'em
Visions of over packed prisons, millions of niggas thug living
Pressure's, three strikes I hope they don't test us
Move without a sound as we slide down pistols in place
I'm sensing niggas is defenseless I'm hitting fences then getting ghost
Who can prevent me shooting senseless at these nigga's throats?
Only wish to breed, I explode into a million seeds
Y'all remember me legendary live eternally
Bury me in pieces cause they fear reincarnation
Niggas screamin' peace cause they fear when my squad face 'em
Take 'em to places face to face then erase 'em, and break 'em
Murder motherfuckers that are waitin' to quicken the pace

Bitch made niggas and that bullshit you going through
Outlaws busting while we rushing
We untouchable
Fuck you niggas and that bullshit you going through
We Outlawz rushing you busting you
We untouchable

Aiyyo we won't stop, I let the '44 pop
Tanqueray and Alize' make niggas get shot
I'm smokin on some kush baby, you know it's all Gravy
Calicos, AK's, nigga's yellin' mayday
Payday, soon as the red dots connect
Off that haze and that 'dro, that Cali sticky icky
Strictly 2-1-3, 8-1-8, 3-2-3
3-1-0, we Outlawz, baby

I'm surrounded by thugs, slugs with crystals and pistols, callin'
Copy murderers that be softer than tissues
Got my persona soldier dedicated to the fuckin drama
My foes retreat like pros when they post my pros
Mashin' like piranahs or a pack of pitts
Bodies get wasted, paper chasin', tryna stack a brick
Dear mama, I'm touched for lots of lethal clutch, clingin' for a life which ain't much
And a lust for these guns to bust
Ain't no trust for these herbs tryna wet ya, keep my burner on the dresser
Wake up bustin' in the mornin' from the pressure


I never had a chance to be a buster, I was raised hard
With the only shed of tattooed tears out near the graveyard
I rep my Outlaws deeply
Done seen too many real players fall to let the industry cheat me
Only behind the scenes do they see me as 2Pac the don
And this bitch with 2 Glocks, I'm wrong
The homie still gon' roll and standin' with your biggest G
You still gon' fold, I can guarantee you a lost
The homie 'Pac told me "I can guarantee you a boss"
And it was in for a brief minute, far as my life
Since he disappeared, I still ain't found peace in it
But still strugglin like Mumia Abu, it was 'bout to end truly I knew
Named my daughter Assadah, for that alone, make 'em more than a rider
Got every homie trigger finger under the set
Dope but guaranteed now my 1 on 1 will connect


Fuck you niggas and that bullshit you going through
Outlawz! We untouchable!



Around the way type shit
All them little hidden words in your raps
All them mixtapes y'all droppin'
Make sure you bring it
Trying to get with me
Bring it live nigga worldwide feel it!

You heard it wrong nigga
Ain’t nothing sweet about my techniques
You checking for my breathless quotes I wrote deadly
My history so thoroughly involves destruction
Open up, first to bust, let me see your heart
Turn the lights down 'cause I might clown in the dark
When I check for the Heartz of Men what do we find?
Niggas watching for my pockets, planning plots on mine
Am I blind
Let my rhymes speak for me in history
A legend you define me
Don Makaveli bitch bow down to Death Row
Fuck what you say we untouchable
Now that we done shook Doc Dre
He ain’t made a beat in six years, swear he the shit
Won’t get no record sales sucking Nas' dick
Let me get my preach on, nigga drop the beat, I get my freak on
The wrong one for you to speak on
Motherfucker watch your mouth

Come on, come on
Live like this nigga
Come on, come on
Silly nigga
Watch ya mouth
Stick and move
Stick and move
Bring the muthafuckin hands
Bring the heat
Bring the funk
Eh yo 'Pac swing on that trick nigga
Let's do it

Look I heard Nas got beef 'cause I’m dissing his clique
I'm worldwide steady war rapping
What’s that
De-La got a problem with this hard shit
Ever since "Me myself and I" y'all been garbage
I’ma keep it real, show you how it feels to ride
Wendy Williams is a fat bitch, that’s the truth
Let the Westside-Eastside drama cease
I’ll come alone to your own streets, Outlaw
Prepare for panic when I unleash
Niggas is lucky if they leave here in one piece
Cream Puff never had no heart to start
So how the hell Biggie Smalls get the part
Watch your mouth

Don Makaveli
Stick and move
Stick and move
Killuminati style, nigga
Keep your muthafuckin hands up
Killuminati style
Yea, we gonna do this for awhile
I got a lot of shit
You know how we do it
Killuminati
Let's do this nigga

What I bring to you is hardcore
The very essence of my poetry
Dyslexic so you backward ass niggas will know it's me
The only G to bleed for the shit I bring
And swing hard on motherfuckers that’s my thing
Vocally I’m pure so you O.D. trying to throw me
Don’t get your life took trying to run with your homies
Y’all know me, same nigga so quick to blast
On this worldwide mash trying to get some cash
Holla, my name and the game will follow
Wait and I’ll murder these snakes tomorrow
Bunch of washed up jealous-ass punks though
Quit bullshitting 'Pac, flip the funk mode
Makaveli rise, all you niggas die when I come
I’ll do some fly shit and be done
They say 'Pac ain’t got love for the Eastside
You's a lying motherfucker, nigga we ride
Watch your mouth

Love that shit! I love that thug shit!
I wrote this for my niggas on the East side
I wrote this for my niggas on the West side
I wrote this for my niggas on the East side
I wrote this for my niggas on the West side
All my niggas in the north run, run with me
All my niggas in the north run, run with me
For my niggas down south now get with me
For my niggas down south now get with me
For my niggas on the east side, east side
For my niggas on the west side, west side
For my niggas up north of course
For my niggas up north of course
For my niggas down south no doubt
For my niggas down south no doubt
For my niggas on the east side, east side
For my niggas on the west side, west side
For my niggas up north of course
For my niggas up north of course
For my niggas down south no doubt
For my niggas down south no doubt
Come on
My dream is to see real niggas and real bitches
Get to together and have real kids and have a real
Life and get real money
Come on, uh
Tryin' to interrupt the conversation
Come on, uh
Come on, yea
And game type mobsters
What you’ll find, always rough rugged and raw
Come on, yea
Outlaw. West side. Death Row. Thug life
Dre can’t fuck with this, uh
Yea, you know my trial
To live and die In L.A
To live in and die in L.A
They say Dre can’t fuck with this, heyyeyeyeyeye
Uh, Dre can’t fuck with this, heyeheye
Hahahahahahaa
Yea nigga, the prodigal son
Ya this might have been your muthafuckin record label
When you was here, nigga
When you see where you at, and you see where the fuck I’m at, nigga
Westside. Deathrow the Untouchable style, nigga
I took your shit, you bitch made nigga
You up out of this shit, nigga
You got it erased nigga
You know the muthafuckin history
M.O.B. nigga, mob style
We don’t like your trick ass
You up out of here, nigga
By murder, or by hardcore styles
It took hardcore styles for your ass to walk
You walkin nigga
You don’t even come out in the morning
Cuz you know what time it is
Don’t even front muthafucka
You think by getting with my enemy
That will get you some love with my heart, nigga?
FUCK YOU



{Gunshot}
{Gun cocking} Let me know, holla {Gunshot}

There's gon' be some stuff you gon' see
That's gon' make it hard to smile in the future

Yeah nigga! Haha
Let's go nigga, this is what it is
2Pac cut his head bald
2Pac wear a bandanna
You wan' wear a bandanna
2Pac put a cross on his back
You wanna put crosses on yo' back
Nigga you ain't 2Pac - This 2Pac!

Is it, money or women to funny beginnings, tragic endings
I can make a million and STILL not get enough of spending
And since my life is based on sinning, I'm hell-bound
Rather be buried than be worried, living held down
My game plan to be trained
Military mind of a thug lord, sittin' in the cemetery cryin'
I've been lost since my adolescence, calling to Jesus
Balling as a youngster, Wondering if he sees us
Young black male, crack sales got me three strikes
Living in jail, this is hell, enemies die
Wonder when we all pass is anybody listening?
Got my, hands on my semi-shotty, everybody's listenin'
Please God can you understand me, bless my family
Guide us all, before we fall into insanity
I make it a point, to make my peep bumpin' warlike
Drop some shit, to have these stupid bitches jaws tight

'Till Makaveli returns, it's "All Eyez On Me"
And you can hate it or love it, but that's what it's gon' be
You should've listened, I told you not to fuck with me
Now can you take the pressure, that's what we gon' see

Now since you're crying for mercy I promise
My success'll be the death of you
Lo and behold you sold your soul
Nigga there's nothin' left of you
Look in the mirror, ask yourself who are you?
If you don't know who you are, how could your dreams come true?
Motherfucker, I sat back and watched
You pretended to be 'Pac, you pretended to be hot
You can't take the pressure, you pussy
I warned you not to push me
You see me and chills run up your spine
God made men the same boy, but your heart ain't like mine
Press, they look at me like I'm a menace
I was playing with guns
While your momma had your punk-ass playing tennis
I'm a nightmare, you see me when you dream
Wake up, turn on your TV and see my ass again
You cowardly-hearted, you couldn't make it on your own
Fuck The Source, I'm on cover of Rolling Stone
Hahahaha




Damn, take a ride to my block
My block, that's right! Hehe
'Round my motherfuckin' way

They got a nigga sheddin' tears, reminiscin' on my past fears
‘Cause shit was hectic for me last year
It appears that I've been marked for death, my heartless breast
The underlying cause of my arrest, my life is stressed
And no rest, forever weary; my eyes stay teary
For all the brothers that are buried in the cemetery
Shit is scary, how black-on-black crime legendary
But at times unnessecary, I'm gettin' worried
Teardrops and closed caskets, the three strikes law is drastic
And certain death for us ghetto bastards
What can we do when we're arrested but open fire?
Life in the pen ain't for me ‘cause I'd rather die
But don't cry through your despair
I wonder if the Lord still cares for us niggas on welfare
And who cares if we survive?
The only time they notice a nigga is when he's clutchin' on a 4-5
My neighborhood ain't the same, ‘cause all these little babies goin' crazy and they sufferin' in the game
And I swear it's like a trap
But I ain't given up on the hood, it's all good when I go back
Hoes show me love, niggas give me props
Forever hop, ‘cause it don't stop – on my block

Livin' life is but a dream
Every block is kind to me
But on the block we still pray
But on the block we still pray

Now shit's constantly hot on my block
It never fails to be gunshots
Can't explain a mother's pain when her son drops
Black males livin' in hell, when will we prevail?
Fearin' jail, but crack sales got me livin' well
And in a sense I'm suicidal with this Thug's Life
Stayin' strapped, forever trapped in this drug life
God, help me, ‘cause I'm starvin', can't get a job
So I resort to violent robberies, my life is hard
Can't sleep ‘cause all the dirt make my heart hurt
Put in work and shed tears for my dead peers
Mislead from childhood where I went astray
'Til this day I still pray for a better way
Can't help but feel hopeless and heartbroke
From the start I felt the racism ‘cause I'm dark
Couldn't quit, the bullshit make me represent
Hit the bar and played the star everywhere I went
In my heart I felt alone, out here on my own
I close my eyes and picture home – on my block

Livin' life is but a dream
Every block is kind to me
But on the block we still pray
But on the block we still pray

And I can't help but wonder why so many young kids had to die
Caught strays from AK's in a drive-by
Swollen pride and homicide don't coincide
Brothers cry for broken lives – Mama, come inside!
‘Cause our block is filled with danger
Used to be a close knit community
But now we're all cold strangers
Time changes us to stone, them crack pipes
All up and down the block exterminatin' black life
But I can't blame the dealers; my mama's welfare check has brought the next man chrome wheels
Shit's real, I know you feel my tragedy
A single mother with a problem child, daddy free
Hangin' out, pickin' up game, sippin' cheap liquor
Gamin' the hoochies, hopin' I can get to sleep with her
It's a man's world, stayin' strapped
Fantasies of a nigga livin' phat but held back
Pipe dreams can make the night seem hopeless
Wide eyed and losin' focus – on my block

Livin' life is but a dream
Every block is kind to me
But on the block we still pray
But on the block we still pray

And block parties in the projects lastin' way past daylight
A young nigga learned to break, right?
Used to play fight with my homies, but they stuck in the pen
I send them ends, but it's tough on a friend
In my mind I see the same motherfuckers ballin'
Alcohol will make a lazy nigga slip and fall, miss his call
I know the young niggas understand this
Growin' up in this world where everything is scandalous
I reminisce on the fast times, past crimes
Tryin' to cop a slice of pizza with my last dime
Can't explain, just what attracts me to this dirty game
Gold chains, some extra change, and the street fame
And what's strange is everybody know my name
Swear they all know me, and lots of cash make a nigga change
I hit the green just to maintain, feelin' pain
For all the niggas that I lost to the game – from my block

Livin' life is but a dream
Every block is kind to me
But on the block we still pray
But on the block we still pray

Rest in peace to all the motherfuckers that passed away
From all the blocks that I'm from
112 street, 7th Avenue, New York, Uptown, knahmsayin'?
183rd and Walt, my block – that's right
122nd and Morningside, my block – that's right
Decatur Avenue, Baltimore, my block – that's right
And the Jungle, Marin City, that's my block – that's right
Los Angeles, haha – that's my block too
Oakland, can't forget Oaktown – that's my block for sure
And all the other blocks around this motherfucker
Houston, Florida, St. Louis, Tennessee, Miami, Chicago
All y'all niggas stay kickin' up dust
Represent the motherfuckin' block



So what I'm gonna do, hopefully, is
I wanna be… I, I, not "I wanna be"

Everywhere I see, a soldier, a soldier
Everywhere I see, a soldier like me
Everywhere I see, a soldier, a soldier
Everywhere I see, a soldier like me
Everywhere I see, a soldier, a soldier
Everywhere I see, a soldier like me

Posse deep as I roll through the streets
Motherfuck the police as we creep in our Jeep's
Layin' so low you'd think I'm asleep
But at the slightest beef I'm robbin' niggas of they teeth
And OPD can get the dick if they play toughy
Last time them niggas rushed me
I ain't bust, but now I'm touched, trust me
Ain't nothin' jumpin' but these buckshots
A nigga's got enough knocks, I'm poppin' at corrupt cops
Them motherfuckers catch a hot one
You wanted to start a problem
Now you coward cops have got one
And there's no prison that can hold a
Motherfuckin' soldier, ready to roll and take control
So now I jack 'em while they sleepin'
Roll to the door, throw a grenade in the precinct
Some people panic, brothers bugged out
I had to keep poppin' ‘cause there's no stoppin' till they rubbed out
And they vest don't protect from the head wounds
Reload ammunitions and them bitches will be dead soon
Smoke risin' from the barrel of my shotty
I finally got revenge, now count the bodies
Twenty cops, one for every year in jail
Tryna keep a nigga down, but you failed
Before I let you take me, I told ya
Fuck bein' trapped — I'm a soldier!

I bet you that I got something you ain't got
That's called courage
It don't come from no liquor bottle
It ain't Scotch, it's not bourbon
I don't walk around like no G
‘Cause that ain't me, I'm not that person
I don't try to act like you do
‘Cause that ain't you, you just frontin', you ain't?

2Pac and the mad bitch
In the six-fo' rag on them thangs, that's a bad bitch
Gettin' ghost on them bitches in the town
Bustin' out the back seat, nigga, when we clown
Homie, is you down? Dee got the strap and she anxious
Hurry up 'fore she spank shit
Comin' round the corner spittin' rounds
They can't hold me down
Caught them sucker-ass bitches outta bounds
Now tell me how that sound?
A double date laced with hate
Make 'em pray for the judgement day
Now tell me how that sound?
A double date laced with hate
Make 'em pray for the judgment day—stinkin' beyotch!

I bet you that I got somethin' you ain't got
That's called courage
It don't come from no liquor bottle
It ain't Scotch, it's not bourbon
I don't walk around like no G
‘Cause that ain't me, I'm not that person
I don't try to act like you do
‘Cause that ain't you, you just frontin', you ain't?

Everywhere I see, a soldier, a soldier
Everywhere I see, a soldier like me



Yo, law!
Is it cool if a nigga just get fucked up for this one?
Yeah! Mr. Fuck-a-Cop is back
And I still don't give a fuck, yaknahmsayin'?
Puffin' on this indo
In the studio with my partners out here
Pacific Heights in the house, know what I mean

I was framed, so don't make the same mistake, nigga
You gotta learn how to shake the snakes, nigga
Cause the police love to break a nigga
Send 'em upstate cause they straight-up hate the niggas
So what I do is get a crew of zoo niggas
Straight fools into rules and do niggas
And one-time had enough of me
I'm still raw so the law can't fuck with me
They wanna send me to the pen, punk, picture that
I stay strapped, motherfuckers better get your gat
It ain't easy bein' me, I can't take it
Life as a celebrity ain't everything they make it
And ever since the movies these hoes try to do me
If they can't screw me, they find a way to sue me
Now can you picture me coolin' at a night club?
Nothin' but love, but motherfuckers wanna mean mug
Since I wear a lot of gold, they plot
Don't know what I got and get shot with the hot ones
And, aw yeah, I wanna feel guilty
But you punk motherfuckers tried to milk me
You'll get smacked behind the hill with my phone on my pager
It's beepin' while I cut you with my razor
I'm not violent, I'm petrified and nervous
I got no mercy for these niggas tryin' to serve us
But if you catch me outta pocket, then I'm got
You love to shoot a nigga but you scared to pop a cop
Now drop it


Strictly for my niggas, makin' G's

Reflected and disrespected, plus I'm rejected
You're just another rapper, who swears he's makin' records
That's what they said - whenever I would walk by
I never tripped though - always kept my head up high
Eventually I knew, that I would find my way
After the darkest night always comes a brighter day
And some would say, that turned away is all you'll get
I just said "Bet!," and never let 'em see me sweat
Cause in the end, I knew that I would have it all
While non-believers were prayin' for my downfall
And some would call and tell me that they wish me well
But in my heart, I'm knowin' that they wish me hell
Yo, get a real job, rappin' doesn't pay the rent
I hit the studio, cause that's where all my money went
Never surrender, it's all about the faith you've got
Don't ever stop, just push it til you hit the top
And if you drop, at least you know you gave your all
Be true to you, and that way you can never fall
But beware, these backstabbers ain't no joke
Just like a rope, they hang on you until you're broke
And when you're broke, they move onto the next dope
And there you are, can't even pay your car, nope
And when you reminisce, thinkin' how you got dissed
Remember how it felt and then remember this
Be true to you, believe that there's no one bigger
Cause they can all suck dick - it's strictly for my niggas


This is for the critics if you live up
Pick up my shit or I'll be back doin' stick-ups
I better see five stars next to my picture
If not, 2Pac will cop the Glock and come knockin' to get 'cha
I told you once, motherfucker, I'm a nut
Play me like a butt and you'll be bleedin' when you're fucked
Niggas know what's up but they be tryin' to hold me down
I'm comin' outta Oaktown, bitch fuck around
And it ain't where you from that makes you hardcore
Nigga it's the way you throw them thangs in the war
And to the marks that be talkin' all that shit
Screamin' out the next nigga's name like a bitch
And the niggas that I ran into recently
The motherfuckers at the club that pulled the piece on me
You little bitches shoulda pulled the fuckin' trigga
Now you live in fear of a heartless-ass nigga
Mr. Troublesome; niggas tried to play me with the gat
But like Terminator, nigga, I'll be back
Yeah! And I'll be back with a fuckin' army
You tried to harm me - ring the alarm, G
Cause most motherfuckers love to act up
Without they backup
When they get jacked up they crack up
It's strictly for my niggas at the show
So they know, not to play me like a ho
Strictly for my ...




When I was young me and my mama had beef
Seventeen years old kicked out on the streets
Though back at the time, I never thought I'd see her face
Ain't a woman alive that could take my mama's place
Suspended from school and scared to go home, I was a fool
With the big boys, breakin all the rules
I shed tears with my baby sister
Over the years we was poorer than the other little kids
And even though we had different daddy's, the same drama
When things went wrong we'd blame mama
I reminisce on the stress I caused, it was hell
Huggin on my mama from a jail cell
And who'd think in elementary?
Hey! I see the penitentiary, one day
And runnin from the police, that's right
Mama catch me, put a whoopin to my backside
And even as a crack fiend, mama
You always was a black queen, mama
I finally understand
For a woman it ain't easy tryin to raise a man
You always was committed
A poor single mother on welfare, tell me how you did it
There's no way I can pay you back
But the plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated

Dear mama
Don't you know I love you?
Dear mama
Place no one above you
Oh mama, I appreciate you
Although my shadow's gone
I will never leave you

Now ain't nobody tell us it was fair
No love from my daddy cause the coward wasn't there
He passed away and I didn't cry, cause my anger
Wouldn't let me feel for a stranger
They say I'm wrong and I'm heartless, but all along
I was lookin for a father he was gone
I hung around with the Thugs, and even though they sold drugs
They showed a young brother love
I moved out and started really hangin
I needed money of my own so I started slangin
I ain't guilty cause, even though I sell rocks
It feels good puttin money in your mailbox
I love payin rent when the rent's due
I hope ya got the diamond necklace that I sent to you
Cause when I was low you was there for me
And never left me alone because you cared for me
And I could see you comin home after work late
You're in the kitchen tryin to fix us a hot plate
Ya just workin with the scraps you was given
And mama made miracles every Thanksgiving
But now the road got rough, you're alone
You're tryin to raise two bad kids on your own
And there's no way I can pay you back
But my plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated


Pour out some liquor and I reminisce, cause through the drama
I can always depend on my mama
And when it seems that I'm hopeless
You say the words that can get me back in focus
When I was sick as a little kid
To keep me happy there's no limit to the things you did
And all my childhood memories
Are full of all the sweet things you did for me
And even though I act crazy
I gotta thank the Lord that you made me
There are no words that can express how I feel
You never kept a secret, always stayed real
And I appreciate, how you raised me
And all the extra love that you gave me
I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if you hold on
It's a struggle everyday, gotta roll on
And there's no way I can pay you back
But my plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated


I appreciate you
I love you
I need you
Oh mama
I love you
Appreciate you
I need you
Oh mama
*fading away*



Outlawz, go ahead, in this
No doubt
Death Row, Makaveli Records
You can call me daddy, uh
I'll be ya daddy, that's right, uh
Just like daddy
Fo' the ladies
Hahaha

Come with me and in time we'll grow
Dedicate slow jams on the radio-oh why
Know ya happy, I can feel ya passion
Lookin' out for ya just like daddy, come on
Sunshine turns to rain
Baby, I can take away ya pain
If ya trust me
Close ya eyes, feel the magic
Neva leave when ya need me
I'll do ya just like daddy

I met her when she was younger
Real daddy died when she was younger
Her moms let her do what she please, an' seen no one loved her
Her eyes shined of love, a diamond in the rough
The kind that you could love; not yet touch, but so much, potential
Youngster let me guide ya mental
And to a place, with a sourness of pain you'll never taste
By God's grace, you was born with that face
Nothin' but pure beauty; so for an eternity, I feel it's my duty
In the coldest nights is when I hold ya
Like I'm supposed to, as we roll closer
I'll take yo' hand gladly, anything you need, ask me
Supportin' my baby girl just like daddy

To alleviate the stress, spendin' time wit' you, I feel blessed
When you gone, feel the pain so strong deep in my chest
When I got arrested, came so close to goin' to jail
Throwin' blows at the po-pos breakin' ya nails
Screamin' loud goin' all out, damn I did
You stayed locked down at moms house, watchin' the kids
Through the whole bid in the V-I, I see ya daily
While my fake homies try to fuck you, you run and tell me
That's why I stay committed, I thank God every time I hit it
Hopin' you'll forgive me for all the times I bullshitted
Me and you against the world, we untouchable
Screamin' like you dyin' every time I'm fuckin' you
Ya never had a father or a family, but I'll be there
No need to fear so much insanity, and through the years
I know ya gave me your heart, plus
When I'm dirt broke and fucked up, ya still love me

Come with me and in time we'll grow
Dedicate slow jams on the radio-oh why
Know ya happy, I can feel ya passion
Lookin' out for ya just like daddy, come on
Sunshine turns to rain
Baby, I can take away ya pain
If ya trust me
Close ya eyes, feel the magic
Neva leave when ya need me
I'll do ya just like daddy

Boo, would ya die for me?
Down holdin' my pistol, gettin' high
With mean sounds tougher than bristles
But when you cry I'll be ya tissue
Back in the county written letters, how I miss you
Givin' you credit, apologetic how I diss you
Kiss you for thinkin' like a mona and on a level
And sometime daddy ready to wine ya and dilation
For a total twine ya, we right behind ya true
Life just me and you, no tellin' what we could do
Gettin' high between the sheets, make the shit right here discrete
Puttin' hickeys on ya belly while we fuckin' on the beach
I love it when ya nut up and grab me
I feel for ya badly, baby girl just like daddy

Shorty I lend my hand out ta help ya, lost soul lookin' for shelter
On late night accept it, treat ya good, won't disrespect ya
My age is young, out of place bitch days is done
From a trixy to a missy, you know I raised ya hun
Placed her under my wing, showed her how we swing
Now she rolling blunts for her king
One day labelled thug misses, the essence of my ghetto sisters
Hugs and kisses, that's just for me to be a father figure

Lookin' out for ya just like daddy, come on
Baby, I can take away ya pain Jjust like daddy)
If ya trust me
Neva leave when ya need me
I'll do ya just like daddy

C'mon
Throw ya hands up
Put ya hands up
Throw ya hands up
Put ya hands up
Throw ya hands up
Put ya hands up
Put ya hands up
Throw ya hands up
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Throw ya hands in the air
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Where my sistas?
Where my sistas at?
Throw ya hands in the air
Come on
Yes, just like daddy
Yes, throw ya hands in the air, come on
No doubt!
Kadafi, Hussein, Makaveli, Napoleon, Marvaless, EDI, Kastro, Khameleon, Storm, Yeah the bitch check
No doubt get yo money
Throw yo hands in the air
Yeah, just like daddy baby
Know you got somewhere to go tonight
Cause you a thug nigga, thug nigga that loves niggas!
Hahahahahaha
Come on
Just like daddy
Outlawz baby, outlaws, outlaws outlaw, outlaw
Throw ya hands in the muthafuckin' air



I ain't got time for this, man I'm out

You should stop, for a while
You spend all your hours just rushing, around
Do you have a little time
To have a little time for me?

As soon as I leave the house you wanna page me
See you got me trapped I'm goin crazy this is slavery
You act like it's outrageous, just give me space and we'll get better
And maybe we won't argue and be through with all these sorry letters
Soon as I come home it's like I get the third degree
Where you been and who you wit, I get no room to breathe
It makes me wanna leave, I'm sick of these tricks up your sleeve
Your suspicious I deceive, gimme grief when poppa leave
But to me, if you really trust me then it's pitiful
Question me about my whereabouts, that's so trivial
Let me live my life and you can live yours
Just be there to help me and support me that's what you're here for
Not to give me stress and add to pressure
Home is where I go to rest, I go to pass the test
I'm sorry if I left you all alone
But I couldn't make it home, so we argue on the phone
Don't you trust me?


Callin at my house then hangin up, you think that makes sense?
Tell me what it takes for us to shake so we can be friends
It's time for us to take our seperate paths
We had a lot of laughs but the good's become the past
Let's make it an even break, don't make it scandalous
Try and be mature, I'm pretty sure that we can handle this
You're sayin I'm too busy, I ignore you
I guess you didn't hear me when I said that I, cared for you
But now it seems the arguments are nightly
I wanna hold you tightly but instead you wanna fight me
So why let it stress and aggravate me
Instead I'd rather break, hope you don't hate me
You tell me that you love me but you're lyin
Fightin back the urge to just start cryin
I'll wipe away your tears, come and hug me
I love you like you love ME, girl, but don't you trust me?


I hang up the phone, I can't bear to hear you yellin at me
Maybe we should end it, neither one of us are happy
You know that I'm emotional, you know me
Comin over cryin just to get me feelin guilty
You and me were meant to be and yet
You always wanna sweat, how much closer can we get
Don't fret, just let me pack my things and I'll be outtie
This time I'm breakin out, you let your mouth overcrowd me
I can't take the beefin and the griefin
I get no room to sleep, I hope to see some cause I'm leavin
Maybe next time you'll be a little more sure
And I can give you more when you mature
But baby until then I gotta leave ya
It's not that I don't need ya but SEE YA
And I hope you understand why I'm bustin
Not because we bust our love, hah, don't you trust me?


Don't you trust me?
It's not that I don't trust you
Don't you trust me?
It's not that I don't trust you



Uhh, dear Mr. President. What's happenin'?
I'm writin' you because
Shit is still real fucked up in my neighborhood
Pretty much the same way
Right around the time when you got elected…
Ain't nothin' changed. All the promises you made, before you got elected… they ain't came true
Tell me what to do, these niggas actin' up in the hood
Send mo' troops, dear Mr. President
Tell me what to do, these niggas actin' up in the hood
Send mo' troops…

Why should I lie when I can dramatize?
Niggas fell victim to my lyrics, now traumatized
Simply by spittin' I've been blessed given riches
Enemies suspicious cuz I'm seldom in the company of bitches
Plus the concepts I depict so visual that you can kiss
Each and every trick or bitch, inside the shit I kick
My heaviest verse'll move a mountain
Casualties in mass amounts, brothers keep countin'
Fuck the friendships, I ride alone
Plus all my homies wanna die; call it euthanasia
Dear Lord, look how sick this ghetto made us
Sincerely yours, I'm a thug, the product of a broken home
Everybody's doped up, nigga, what you smokin' on?
Figure if we high they can train us
But then America fucked up and blamed us
I guess it's cause we black that we targets
My only fear is God, I spit that hard shit
In case you don't know I let my pump go
Get it ride for Mutulu like I ride for Geronimo
Down to die for everything I represent
Meant every word in my letter to the President

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops

Oh you's a baller in the White House, I hope you comfortable
Cause yo', I spend my nights out, with the lights out
Under the safety of darkness, amongst the crazed and the heartless
And young soul bros, ready to rode a starship
The Godless, I gotta get chips, but you can't understand that
Wanna ban rap? - Stand back, before you get hurt
It's the only thing nigga pay the paper besides smoke and work
First made my decision, I realized this ain't livin'
Trippin' to drastic measures, tryin' to get stacks of cheddar
Motherfuckers hate cops, wait, it ain't gettin' better
But you keep tellin' us that it is
While your motherfuckin' troops keep killin' our kids
Dig, don't be surprised if you see us
Dumpin' with nothing but artillery to free us, motherfucker

Dear Mr. President, tell us what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops

Strapped and angry, with no hope, and heart-broke
Fightin' first my trained brain until it's not so
It's hostile, niggas lick shots to watch the Glocks glow
Cadres of coppers patrol us like we some animals
And it ain't no peace, my peace a piece on my streets
To people beefin' and things squeakin' on they fiefs for weeks
Mr. President, it's evident, nobody really care
For a struggler out the gutter, 22 with gray hair
I was raised to raise hell, frail and my heart stale
So I'ma bring hell to Earth until my heart fail
But y'all play fair, give me and mine, I'll share
'Til y'all show us you care, it's gon' be mayhem out here
Me and these 223's will freeze the biggest with ease
I'm still a nigga you fear, bring the beast to his knees
And I've been born to represent, for that I've been heaven-sent
And I meant every word in my letter to the President

Shit is still fucked up, y'all. And y'all wonder when it's gon' get better, and it ain't gon' get better

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up…

Heavenly Father, may I holla at you briefly?
I wanna meet the President, but will he meet me?
Is he scared to look inside the eyes of a thug nigga?
We tired of being scapegoats for this capitalistic drug dealin'
How hypocritical is Liberty?
That blind bitch ain't never did shit for me
My history full of casket and scars
My own black nation at war, whole family behind bars
And they wonder why we scarred, 13 lookin' hard
Sister had a baby as an adolescent, where was God?
Somewhere in the middle of my mind
Is a nigga on the tightrope, screamin', "Let him die!"
Can't lie, I'm a thug, drownin' in my own blood
Lookin' for the reason that my momma's strung out on drugs
Down to die for everything I represent
Meant every word in my letter to the President

Blacks is broke, think it's a joke that we livin' low?
Y'all sniffin' blow and postin' what they hittin' fo'?
Tell the secretary it's necessary we get paid
Look what you made, little kids gettin' sprayed
Day after day, and night after night
Battles and wars to the daylight
We might change and rearrange if you do somethin'
'Til then we gonna keep it comin', Mr. President
And I meant every word in my letter to the President

Word motherfuckin' life, what the fuck this nigga think?
Cuttin' taxes, takin' off welfare
We 'sposed to just sit here, go broke and die, starvin'?!
Motherfuckers crazier than a motherfuckin' scout
Nigga, this Thug Life, Westside, Outlaw Immortalz
Nigga, we finna hustle 'til we come up

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops

But we can't find peace
I know you fear me cause you too near me not to hear me
Sayin' you cuttin' welfare
Shit, y'all want us to put down our Glocks and our rocks
We ain't stupid, think you got us lookin' to lose
Shit, I ain't got no love here
Police beatin' me in the streets… fuck peace!
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops..troops..troops..troops!




Hold on... *lighter flicks up*
Yeah, it's gonna be alright
Don't trip, baby *inhales*
It'll get better... *coughing*
Aye, do this thug style, man, thug style
When this whole beat drop
We just gon' run it to 'em
Bet, it's all good, uhh

I never had much, ran with a bad bunch
Little skinny kid sneakin' weed in my bag lunch
And all through Junior High, we was just gettin' by
And drive-by's robbed my homies of their young lives
I never did cry, and even though I had pain in my heart
I was hopeless from the start
They couldn't tell me nothin', they all tried to help me
The marijuana had my mind gone, it wasn't healthy
I traveled places, caught cases, what a ill year
I felt the pain and the rain, but I'm still here
Never did like the police
Let the whole world know, now I gets no peace
‘Cause they chasin' me down
And facin' me now, what do I do?
These things that a thug goes through
And still I rise, so keep your head up
And make your mind strong
It's a struggle every day, but you gotta hold on

Hold on, be strong!
Hold on, be strong!
Hold on, be strong!
When it's on, it's on

There's never a good day, ‘cause in my hood they
Let they AK's pump strays where the kids play
And every Halloween, check out the murder scene
Can't help but duplicate the violence seen on the screen
My homies dyin' before they get to see they birthdays
These is the worst days, sometimes it hurts to pray
And even God turned his back on the ghetto youth
I know that ain't the truth, sometimes I look for proof
I wonder if Heaven got a ghetto, and if it does
Does it matter if you Blood or you Cuz?
Remember how it was?
The picnics and the parties in the projects
Small time drinkin', gettin' high with them armies
Just another knucklehead kid from the gutter
I'm dealin' with the madness, raised by a single mother
I'm tryin' to tell you when it's on
You gotta keep your head to the sky
And be strong, most of all, hold on

Hold on, be strong!
Hold on, be strong!
Hold on, be strong!
When it's on, it's on

I know them ain't tears comin' down your face
Wipe your eyes
In this world, only the strong survive, you know?
Hehe, I know it's hard out there
Welfare, AIDS, earthquakes, muggings, car-jackings
Yeah, we got problems
But believe me when I tell you things always get better
God don't like ugly, and God don't like no quitters
You know what Billie Holiday said?
Bay-bee, God bless the child that can hold his own
You know? You got to stand strong
And when these bustas try to knock you out your place
You stand there to they face
Tell 'em "Hold on!", and be strong
The game don't stop, huh
This here is black, man
If you don't never learn nothin', learn one thing
It don't stop, 'til the casket drop
Thug for life... feel me?
All my homeboys and my homegirls, stay strong
When things get bad
Especially come the first and the fifteenth
Stay strong, and stay ballin', hold on
I'll catch y'all at the next life, we in traffic



when I was alone and had nothing
I asked 4 a friend 2 help me bear the
pain no one came except . . . God

when I needed a breath 2 rise
from my sleep no one could
help me except . . . God

when all I saw was sadness
and I needed answers no one
heard me except . . . . God

so when I'm asked who I
give my unconditional love 2
Look For No other Name
except . . . GOD!



Damn, what I'ma do now til when I free.. oh shit!

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

Them bitches is foul, take a look at the evening news
And see a nigga gettin' cuffed by the boys in blue
Is it a, frame up, tryin' to keep me out the game, stuck
These motherfuckers tryin' to dirty up my name, but
I'm slippin' quick as the wind, it's me or them
Fuck friends my foes be on a mission tryin' to do me in
Fuck 'em I'm bout to get out, they all soft
I blow up my new range, and in a rage blow they balls off
Why are you niggas tryin' to test me trick?
And be the first ones to snitch to arrest me bitch
Main thang with nigga meal ticket only if you with the real
The nigga will kick it I'll enforce it with the steel
Use the lessons that I learned in jail
Networkin' with connects that I got in the Pen'
In no time, I'll be clockin' again

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

Still sittin' in my cell as I dwell on my past
Tryin' to figure how a nigga turned dreams into cash quick
Call her collect, ain't no respect on the other side
My cellmate's suicidal cause his mother died
And my C.O. is a lady, and I'm thinkin' maybe
Me and her can hook up a scheme, to be Swayze
Cause she keep on callin' me baby
To a young motherfucker facin' eighty that's enough to make you crazy
Now how long will it take, to get her hooked
Got her watchin' me liftin' weights, sneakin' looks
I devised a plan, I'm in the trunk while she drives the van
Ain't no disguise I'ma die as a man
If we make it then I'm takin' it to Hell
All them niggas that was frontin' while I sat up in the cell
Locked in jail, I couldn't touch her so I planned your misery
The nigga you don't wanna see

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

Stuck in my cell
The Pen' ain't nuttin like the county jail
When will they let me bail?
Walkin' through the yard, I play the Guard
First nigga disrespect me, first nigga gettin' scarred
I'm, back on the scene
I'm hittin' knees in the back of a limousine, puffin' on weed
As we game on the drunk hoes
Hit the skunk I reminisce just on the way, we used to play, you punk hoes
What I possess is to be rich, in currency
Paranoid niggas like bitches when they come and see me
Laid out, played out, the nigga barely breathin'
As for that bullshit punk, nigga n-now we're even
But I wait, until it's time
And try to find a crooked way to profit off this crime
This life of mine... until I get free
My prophecy is niggas screamin', as if they bleed in agony
As soon as they popped my gate
I knew these motherfuckers made a mistake

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

When I get free
Hahaha.. yeah nigga, when I get motherfuckin' free
Pop the gate, I'm back baby!
When I get free.. we up out this bitch



Searchin' for Black Jesus
Oh yeah, sportin' jewels and shit, yaknahmean?
Straight tatted up
Me, I'm a thug; thugs, we praise Black Jesus, all day
Young Kadafi in this bitch, set it off nigga..
What?

I do my shootings on a knob, prayin' to God for my squad
Stuck in a nightmare, hopin' he might care
Though times is hard, up against all odds, I play my cards
Like I'm jailin', shots hittin' up my spot like midnight rains hailin'
Got me bailin' to stash more greenGods; they ain't tryin' to be trapped
On no block slangin' no rocks like bean pies
Brainstorm on the beginnin'
Wonder how shit like the Qu'ran and the Bible was written
What is religion?
God's words or a curse like crack?
Shai-tan's way of gettin' us back
Or just another one of my Black Jesus' traps

Who's got the heart to stand beside me?
I feel my enemies creepin' up in silence
Dark prayer, scream violence - demons all around me
Can't even bend my knees just a lost cloud; Black Jesus
Give me a reason to survive, in this earthly hell
Cause I swear, they tryin' to break my well
I'm on the edge lookin' down at this volatile pit
Will it matter if I cease to exist? Black Jesus

All hail, the pressure no endeavor can fail
Submissive souls turn to hoes when exposed to jail
In times of war we need somebody raw, rally the troops
Like a saint that we can trust to help to carry us through
Black Jesus
He's like a saint that we can trust to help to carry us through
Black Jesus

Outlawz we got our own race, culture, religion
Rebellin' against the system, commence to lynchin'
The President ain't even listenin' to the pain of the youth
We make music for eternity, forever the truth
Political prisoner, the two choices that they givin' us
Ride or die, for life they sentence us
Oh Black Jesus, please watch over my brother Shawn
Soon as the sky get bright, it's just another storm
Brothers gone, now labeled a statistic
Ain't no love for us ghetto kids, they call us nigglets
History repeats itself, nuttin new
In school I knew, e'rything I read wasn't true
Black Jesus

To this clique I'm dedicated, criminal orientated
An Outlaw initiated, blazed and faded
Made for terror, major league niggas pray together
Bitches in they grave while my real niggas play together
We die clutchin' glasses, filled with liquor bomblastic
Cremated, last wishes niggas smoke my ashes
High sigh why die wishin', hopin' for possibilities
I'll mob on, while they copy me sloppily
Cops patrol projects, hatin' the people livin' in them
I was born an inmate, waitin' to escape the prison
Went to church but don't understand it, they underhanded
God gave me these commandments, the world is scandalous
Blast 'til they holy high; baptize they evil minds
Wise, no longer blinded, watch me shine trick
Which one of y'all wanna feel the degrees?
Bitches freeze facin' Black Jesus

All hail, the pressure no endeavor can fail
Submissive souls turn to hoes when exposed to jail
In times of war we need somebody raw, rally the troops
Like a saint that we can trust to help to carry us through
Black Jesus

Some say, some day, some how, some way, we gon' fail
And it ain't hard to tell, we dwell in hell
Trapped, black, scarred and barred
Searchin' for truth, where it's hard to find God
I play the Pied Piper, and to this Thug Life, I'm a lifer
Proceed, to turn up the speed, just for stripes
My Black Jesus, walk through this valley with me
Where we, so used to hard times and casualties
Indeed, it hurt me deep to have to sleep on the streets
And haven't eaten in weeks, so save a prayer for me
And all the young thugs, raised on drugs and guns
Blazed out and numb, slaves to this slums
This ain't livin'... Jesus

We believed in you
Everything you do
Just wanna let you know, how we feel
Black Jesus!
We believed in you
Everything you do
Just wanna let you know, how we feel
Black Jesus!
We believed in you
Everything you do
Just wanna let you know, how we feel
Black Jesus!

Searchin' for Black Jesus
It's hard, it's hard
We need help out here
So we searchin' for Black Jesus
It's like a Saint, that we pray to in the ghetto, to get us through
Somebody that understand our pain
You know maybe not too perfect, you know
Somebody that hurt like we hurt
Somebody that smoke like we smoke
Drink like we drink
That understand where we comin' from
That's who we pray to
We need help y'all



Get on yo knees nigga, get on yo knees and pray

Increase the doses, bust on whoever closest
Thug livin', hell of prison, never losin' my focus
I'm makin' money moves mandatory, end of discussion
My past records tell a story, picture niggas with rushin'
And still bustin', 'til the cops come runnin', duck in abandoned buildings
Ditchin' my gun, homeboy the motherfuckin' villain
I live the lifestyles of drug dealers, but now legitly
So I laugh til I'm cryin', when the Lord come get me
No baby momma drama, nigga missed me
Why plant seeds in a dirty bitch waitin' to trick me
Not the life for me, livin' carefree 'til I'm buried
And if they dare me, I'll bust on them niggas, and until they scurry
I'm clearly a man of military means, to my artillery
Watchin' over me through every murder scene
From adolescence, to my early teens, thought we was gonna die
Sellin' dope to all the fiends, at times I wanna cry
And still, we try to change the past in vain
Never knowin' if this game will last, feelin' the shame
Of cocaine, the product of the devil, am I sellin' my soul
Got tired of small time livin' nigga tellin' me no
I got mine, fuck them other suckas
That's the mentality, jealous ass bustas make it hell for a hustler

It ain't me, I was raised this way
Lord, help me change my ways
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta, make it Hell 4 a hustler

Now in these last days and times I takes mines so serious
Gotta get that paper quickly and escape the sickness
If I fail, then I suffer, bein' broke is hell 4 a hustler
So I stay strugglin' and jugglin' with all the might I can muster
Since a youngster, been money hungry, moved in
One's five's and ten's was funny money
So I sets my sights bigger, four figures or mo'
Real nigga fo' sho', out in the cold for dough
What you thought? "all" is for lost homies in plenty battles
Last two years shed plenty tears and I'll send plenty at you
Let me catch you slippin' you soft niggas is outta here
In case you forgot we on the same shit that got us here

Yo, to e'ry step I take, e'ry sell I make
E'ry jail I break, e'ry mill' I ate
Head to head, whoever hustle hardest
On the block duckin' charges, nigga fuck the sergeant
He got a job, all my bottles got a pinch of coke
Listen tho' I'm missin' dough I gotta gather mo'
Hell naw, dead blocks with red tops but now a nigga sell words
For all my young thugs in jail in Jerz
They made it hell 4 a hustler, I bails high as fuck son
Dyin' luck none supply us with much guns
I buck one, just to let you know that I can touch ya
Slangin' cracks or raps, still hell 4 a hustler

It ain't me, I was raised this way
Lord, help me change my ways
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta, make it Hell 4 a hustler

No insanity plea from me, I ride the beef 'til I burn
Censor me and bar your kids from the lessons I learned
And in turn I'm hostile, guess you can recall me antisocial
Niggas shakin' like they caught the Holy Ghost when I approach
Try to politic before I smoke 'em, like Sun Tzu
Niggas do unto these snitches, before it's done to you
And if the cops come arrest me in the evening
Best believe they comin' for my dogs in the morning
And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?, gettin' blowed out
High watch me murder the bird before he testify
Strikes walkin' close to my third, I live a troubled life
And if you dream, be a part of my team from Long Beach to Queens
Drug dealers to ex-fiends
Keep yo eyes on the prize, nigga watch for bustas
Either heaven or jail, it's still hell for a hustler

It ain't me, I was raised this way
Lord, help me change my ways
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta, make it Hell 4 a hustler

This is how we ride not knowin' if we'll live or die
Catch me rollin' with my motherfuckin' guns on the side
In case of drama, I'm the first to break wild 'til they all die
This is how we ride not knowin' if we'll live or die
Catch me rollin' with my motherfuckin' guns on the side
In case of drama, I’m the first to break wild until they all die, outlaw
Yes, change my ways yes, the Black Jesuz guide us through this
Weary weary weary weary, aight, only God can save us



Haha
Livin' the life of a ghetto star
Makaveli

Just holla my name and witness game official
Niggas is so ashamed they stand stiff like scared bitches
While I remain inside a paradox called my block
Though gunshots is promised to me, when will I stop?
I hit the weed and hope to God I can fly high
Witness my enemies die when I ride by, they shouldn't have tried
I send they bodies to they parents up North
With they faces, they wrists, and they nuts cut off
Fuck 'em all what I scream as I dream in tongues
Fuck a trick, get me rich and the bitches'll come
Bust my gun, make 'em all scatter
Bullets to my nuts only made my balls fatter
Eat a dick, biyotch mercy, never that, you say you comin' back?
Bring it on, forever strapped
Introduce you to the pleasure and the pain, you can go so far

I live the life of a thug nigga, drug dealer livin' game tight
Mug niggas, slug niggas for the fame life
Laced with game, practice on takin' pain
Quick to slang, and let it rain through yo' brain
Street smart, proficient, intelligent
And keep suckers hittin' 'til snitches start smellin' it
Movin' niggas with telekinesis
Keepin' Channel 7 at work, filmin' different features
Leadin' niggas to an early death with they head blown
And to those who didn't make it to the morgue was just dead and gone
And hope niggas got punished
Kidnapped, jacked in the back with MAC's to they neck, rappers waitin to get done in
M.O.B. related, one mo' nigga found shot up with his dick in his mouth
Printed my name in these streets as a motherfuckin' G

Walkin' through the cemetery, talkin' to my homies that was buried
See my enemies wanna see me dead, I ain't worried, forgive me
Please give me shelter, calm my fears
Lifted my head, from my hands, had a palm of tears
I see bodies gettin' splashed, with acid
2 shots rang from the plastic Glock, wrapped in plastic
Buried the bastard, time to notify
His family, sheeit, ain't nothing left to be identified
Evacuate the crime scene fast
Why, I heard the Feds had a warrant for my ass
Why, I won't touch down 'til I see Tijuana
Set up shop selling them crooked cops marijuana
Label me a success, I made the switch
Retired from the life that never gave me shit
But cash that I couldn't spend, countless cars
An addict for a wife, my life, as a ghetto star

Got the word that some nerds wanna plot on this
Hit the curve, let it swerve, had to stop they grip
No remorse, no repentance as I buck one down
Straight to the morgue cause I plan on, shuttin' shit down
Born soldier, fucked 'em up with a MAC-fo'
Torn ligaments, all up in that nigga shoulder
And a vest couldn't protect that flesh
Cause I got, slugs, to knock the air out your chest
Death, apparently they wasn't sucka free
Cause I had all them wannabe thug niggas in protective custody
I guess they heard that I got them birds
Thought I was a nerd 'til I bucked one of them to the curb
Luxury livin' lavish, with dreams of dyin' rich
With a team and clientele on my mothafuckin' dick
And gettin' down on these snitch bitches, protectin' riches
By givin' stitches, the life as a ghetto star

When I grow up I wanna be like them
My life as a ghetto star
When I grow up I wanna be like them
My life as a ghetto star
When I grow up I wanna be like them
Live my life as a ghetto star
When I grow up I wanna be like them
And live my life as a ghetto star
When I grow up I wanna be like them
Live my life as a ghetto star
When I grow up I wanna be like them
And live my life as a ghetto star

All you niggas on the block, sellin' rocks
I see you
Live your life as a ghetto star
Claimin' gettin' riches
Live my life as a ghetto star
It's the Don Makaveli - live my life as a ghetto star



Got any last words
Yeah I've got some last words
Ice Cube's in the muthafuckin' house
The nigga you love to hate

Here comes the nigga with the ruff, the terror
The paranoid, gots to get the boy
Get your steel cause I feel like a headbanger
Yeah I got a gang of shits, styles guns
My Uzi weighs a motherfucking ton
Bucking down one, bucking down two
Bucking down your crew, muthafuck you
Pigs wear blue, I wear black, nothing but black
Cause Goddamn it's a brand new payback
Fuck Pat Sajak, never did nothing for a nigga
On the trigger the zigga the zag the nickel the bag
The nigga the sag the forty four mag got you running like a fag
So, keep your muthafucking jokes
Cuz, I'm that nigga with a fresh pair of locs
No yokes but smokes
Crakers and them dirty mackers friends aren't jackers
Get yah for your drawers, young niggas out to kill for the cause

Ice-T in the motherfucking house
L.A. Playa

O- to the muthafuckin G, I break crazy
A lot of niggas hate me but they can't fade me
Stop me, clock me, cops wanna Glock me
But the punk motherfucking pigs can't stop me
UHH am I a G, I got proof
Banged in my youth, keep niggas on the roof
With a scope, dough, Cube keep the rope
2Pac'll string a nigga up if the mob don't
So whats up, punk?
You want what I got, step to me wrong fuck around and get shot
Your moms crying fuck her bust her
Bitch start screaming to me and I'll dust her
Pops got the LP phat, track on hit
Laid by the mutha fuckin' Bobcat
Ninety three suckas want me to go out
Throw the ho out, bitch muthafucker I'm rich

2Pac's in the muthafucking house
Nigga I'm loc'd, 2pac's gonna get'cha motherfuckers
Got any last words

Now they're after me, why?, cause a nigga's Black
Spittin' facts and ain't afraid to pull a trigger back
Let em come step to a real muthafucker
Dan Quayle, don't you know you need to get your ass kicked?
Where was you when there was niggas in the caskets?
Muthafucker Rednecks all the same
Fear a real nigga if he ain't balled and chained
That's why we burn shit and wreck
Cause the punk police ain't learned shit yet
You mutha-fuckas gonna pay the price
Can't make a Black life, don't take a Black life
It's on, the next real nigga fall dead
Dread, jheri curl, process, or bald head
Be prepared for the smoke to bust
What niggas need to do is start loc'in up
United we stand divided we fall
They can shoot one nigga, but they can't take us all
Let's get along with the Mexicans
And we can all have peace on the sets again
Keeping the smile off they White face
I ain't racist but lets trade places
Trace the hate 'n face it
One nigga teach two niggas
Three teach four niggas
And them niggas teach more niggas
And when we blast
That'll be the biggest blast you've heard
And them is my last wordz



Turn it up in my head phones, please
Comin' to a ghetto near you, street fame
More, ha ha, comin' to a ghetto near you

I wasn't mad until these tricks shot me
It's time I sanitize my posse
Look how paranoid these niggas got me
Cellular calls are being traced since surveillance silently
Mama, chill, thug livin' pay the bills, I'm dyin' violently
Closed caskets, expose bastards, I leave 'em bloody
Delores Tucker, don't let your kids
Hear a nigga speak on gettin' money
Ain't nothin' funny, green got a nigga seein' things
Why? Hit the lye, hope to God I can fly
Lethal weapon, I'm a savage; still a method to my madness
Blast, niggas laugh, calling my cash cabbage
Read 'em and weep, put 'em to sleep, they hell bound
Lyrics will leave 'em spell bound
Clown, now tired of being held down
Cross my heart, hope to die, blind with some pussy
Millionaire, livin' care free, sucka free, playa haters miss me
Hope in hard times never catch me slippin'
Fuck authorities! They wonder why minorities be trippin'
We ain't havin' it, time to tear this shit back
Ghetto children kick back
Once I hit the MAC, niggas'll never get they shit back
Spit it so eloquently, my pistols represent me
Bust until my rounds empty; back for the street fame

One love to my true thugs
Comin' to a ghetto near you, street fame
Bust! Comin' to a ghetto near you, street fame
All out warfare, eye for a eye
Bustin' on my enemies, bad boy killin'
Straight dissin' you
Fuck Lil' Kim, you nasty bitch!

Temperatures rises, niggas blinded by my lyrical disguise
No time to plot retreats, niggas shiver and die
Multiple rounds found laced in his body and face
Wrapped in plastic, the acid erased all traces
Criminal tactics, the rap game became so drastic
Military mind,  mash all the hoes, get blasted
If we bleed then they suffocate, chokin' in terror
So we strive seein' our lives be reflected in mirrors
The prophecy is clear, niggas lock and load, disappear
Strategize with no fear, wagin' war for years
The crack game wasn't big enough, ready to rush
Bitch made motherfuckers get murdered and touched
I go to jail niggas screamin' free me, speakin' freely
Conversatin' with my comrades kickin' Swahili
Indeed they should fear my first seed
It gets worse, planned a curse to be a G, on the first to breathe
Currency in stacks, artillery in the back
Strapped, armies, we camouflaged in all black
When we attack, holla out my set, nigga
Tighten your jaw, givin' birth to Outlawz, street fame

Bust, nigga bust!
Comin' to a ghetto near you, street fame
Only Makaveli the Don
Can put it down like this; ain't none like me
Comin' to a ghetto near you, with street fame

Positive identification, got me rushed to the station
Stuck in this line up, tryin' hard to hide my face
They placed the name but can't recall description
I ain't did shit, officer, that bitch trippin'
Promise retaliation, their plan busted, no man to be trusted
Everything corrupted once man touch it
Kamikaze, hopin' that none of the spies find me
That's why we bye bye daily, knowin' cops trail me
But why cry? Floatin' while we tokin' on this potent branch
Flossin' in the thug stance, pistol tucked inside my pants
Never underestimate me, playa hate me, see me and hide
Sure as hollow-points shatter, enemies die
Spread love, dead thugs gettin' buried in riches
Take a chance to advance; fuck them worryin' bitches!
Penitentiary's a possibility, bust and pray
Wear a rubber so I live to fuck another day, hey!
Ain't nothin' strange, I'm 25, dyin' to change
But still I bang wantin' street fame

That's the end of that
Thugged out, Makaveli the Don
Representin' the Outlawz, street fame
One love to my true niggas
Comin' to a ghetto near you street fame
Makaveli the Don, Killuminati
Comin' to a ghetto near you, street fame

Yo, check this out, I'ma tell you like this
If the lifestyle that you livin'
Got you taking more fuckin' shorts than gettin' props
Then that lifestyle need to stop
Best to recognize some Outlaw shit
‘Cause only in this Outlaw lifestyle can you truly come to
To see what this life's supposed to be like
Nigga, you'll start to see riches
Fine bitches and hittin' switches
Shit, to me that shit sound delicious; street fame




Now up and at 'em it's on, I was raised to be strong
And mama told me be a thug, since the day I was born
I came up, out the gutter never changed my style
Got for real about my papers, cause the game was wild
And the fame was a plot to try to change me
And what's strange is, nobody knew my name 'fore it came
Now the whole world is calling me a killer
All I ever did, was try to reach the kids with the real
All the time I was ballin', never heard my friends callin'
Couldn't stop myself from fallin', I'm all in
Shit's gettin' sleazy, believe me
Best to take what ya need, but don't be greedy
Cause in my mind, I see sunshine, I thought
I didn't have to run, now I'm duckin' from the gun yellin' "One time!"
Take your time to feel my record
And if you did, chill a second
My blind method, will still wreck it
My young homies stay strong
I wonder if they'll listen to a nigga when he gone
Are you still down?

Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?

I'm gettin' high, so a nigga think, he touch the sky
Turn tough inside, in the rush to die
Livin' life as a thug, time to face the truth
What's goin' on with the wasted youth, please God
Come and save me, had to work with what ya gave me
And got a nigga goin' crazy
I can't read the signs
I'm blind, but a nigga know he need his nine
Cause times, they ain't what they used to be
Ain't a penitentiary built big enough for me
And my niggas on the streets, man, listen
Cause these ain't the old days
Ain't no way, I'mma bustin' my ass and gettin' no pay
It seems I can't find my focus and homie, I ain't paranoid
I seen the future and it's hopeless
Lord knows, it's hard on a young scrub
It seems I had less problems when I slung drugs
But since I'm tryin' lace, niggas with the game
Wanna see me locked in chains, tryin' to dirty up my name
And them same motherfuckers that was callin' me
Will be the first to turn their backs, when I'm fallin', see
I should have seen it from the jump, but now it's clear
This one nigga got the town in fear, but are you still down

Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?
Raise 'em up ... are you still down?

I wrote this for my critics and my enemies
Last year ya used to love me, huh, remember me
Now ya hate me with a passion, tryin' to get me stuck in the mix
I'm stayin' sharp, got no time for them tricks
And now they wonder if I'm goin' to jail
Just as well, cause my life on the streets - a livin' hell
And I can't sleep, they got my phone tapped
And mercy Lord, come get me 'fore they hurt me
Ran outta tears, and through the years couldn't change me
My daddy left me alone and so I'm angry
I never did nothin' wrong, my mama told me, "Baby, it's on!"
And now I'm hustlin' and bustlin' bones
Never said it came easy, I'm makin' cheese
Buyin' all the things on TV, and gettin' skeezed
Wish my homeboys could see me now
Little bad motherfucker runnin' wild through the town
Please tell me, are you still down?

Are you still down, to raise 'em up?
Are you still down, to raise 'em up?
Are you still down, to raise 'em up?

That's right y'all, give them bitches the motherfuckin' middle finger
Raise 'em up
These hoes can't fade me, don't these bitches know we crazy?
Thug life niggas be the sickest
You feel me?
Now get that shit written down
God damn!
Took four years and a motherfuckin' case for these motherfuckers to feel me
Ain't that a bitch?
Are you still motherfuckin' down?
Old ho ass fake ass niggas
We out this motherfucker though



Oh shit, caught that nigga alone. Ain't that a bitch?
Hey, uh, this one here is, uhh for them niggas that be Johnny Dangerous when they be fuckin' 50 deep
But they be fuckin' cowards when they by theyselves
You know who I'm talkin' about
You know who I'm talkin' about, that's right
You ain't shit without your homeboys
You ain't shit without your homeboys
You ain't shit without your homeboys

Now, everytime I see you cats is rollin' in packs
For the life of me I cannot see why you don't know how to act
Love to clown when you deep, but when you on that solo creep out on the streets you don't hear a peep
Nigga, it's a God damn shame, somebody explain
Why they sent a Bad Boy to play a grown man's game?
Tear that ass out the frame, completely get that ass kicked
Woke up on the street, but you'll be sleepin' in the casket
How long will it last? Nigga, don't ask, just be first to blast
Outlaw on the mash, tryin' to be the first to see some cash
My shit's classic, like my nigga Nate
Go get the tape, we keep the nation anticipatin' until we break
Money made me evil, court cases got me stressed
Niggas aimin' at my head, but I still wear my vest
I don't give a fuck, motherfuckers, I'm loc
They all duckin' when my gun smoke
You ain't shit without your homeboys

You probably run at the sound of funk
I give a fuck, you niggas is punks
Without your homeboys you be the first to reach in your trunk
You scary niggas is punks
You ain't shit without your homeboys, nigga
You ain't shit without your homeboys

Like Yak said, how the fuck you gonna shoot me rocks?
When you got the Outlaw Pac shittin' your box
You was lookin' real weak walkin' down the street
Now a nigga 30 deep, oh, you wanna beef?
Talk cheap, shoot a nigga the fair one
Your homies like fuck it – what's this? You the only scared one
Damn, son, close call I bet
Now down around the way you gets no respect
They like that Outlaw nigga played you out
We could have took it to the fists, I would have laid you out
Niggas be actin' all different when they dogs come around
Watch 'em act like bitches when Outlawz draw down
They all clown, better yet they all stunned
You the type to have a gun and never blazed it once
Get y'all banana split, you ain't Emmanuel
Outlawz you'll never forget, Makaveli the Don get a call y'all
Turnin these streets into Vietnam
Where your homeboys?

You ain't shit without your homeboys
My thug niggas, I love niggas
The only thing a nigga got left
I love my niggas to death, we ain't shit without our homeboys
I ain't shit without my homeboys

Now, I was born alone, took my first joint and I got high alone
Now I'm an Outlaw nigga, I never die alone
Me and my niggas is so close, it's complicated
One nigga smokin' and drinkin', and yet we all faded
My nigga Edi had a son, we all happy
Cause now that little ridah got to deal with eight daddies
My niggas cry, we all cry, and all ride
To rectify the problem, motherfuckers, they all die
Been tryin' to make a million by hustlin since my adolescence
From crack dealin' to rap villian, my new profession
Who wanna see me at eight deep, fuck 3D
You coward ass motherfuckers'll never see me
Bustin' with automatic straps, my raw raps like good crack
Niggas fiendin', I got 'em comin' back. Until I die, they label me as a ridah forever, my niggas be together

Ain't shit without your homeboys
Thug niggas, I love niggas
From small time crooks to big-time drug dealers
Without your homeboys
The only thing a nigga got left
I love my niggas to death
We ain't shit without our homeboys
Love my niggas to death
I ain't shit without our homeboys
Love you niggas to death
We ain't shit without our homeboys



Ghetto!
I' changed?...
You motherfuckers kill me....
I've changed?

It ain't that i've changed
But it's strange how you motherfuckers rearrange
When I found fame
Point ya finger at tha bad guy!

You know what my momma used to tell me
If ya can't find something to live for..
.. then you BEST, find something ta die for


Deep deep

La'tasha Harlins, remember that name...
Cause a bottle of juice... ain't something to die for

Young Quaid, remember that name...
Cause all you motherfuckers
That go to your grave with that name on your brain
Cause jealousy and recklessness is NOT, something to die for

Look how the cracker crumbles

Unite
One nigga, teach two niggas
Four niggas teach more niggas
All the poor niggas
The pen niggas
The rich niggas
The strong niggas
UNITE

There's more of us than there is of them
Look around...
Check your strip

Deep deep
That's something to die for

Black
That's something to live for

What do I know?



I know how it is
Don't nobody understand
I feel ya

She was born a heavy set girl with pigtails and curls
A heart full of gold, still it won't change the world
Though she could never understand why
Some underhanded plans witnessed a man die
Was only fifteen, should have been a beauty queen, still
See her cryin' by the caskets when her parents got killed
Little girl don't cry, cuz even though they died
You can best believe they're watchin' over thee from the sky
Never asked for this misery, but look at what you're gettin'
It's a blessin' in disguise when you find out you're pregnant
No money, no home, and even though you're all alone
You gots to do this on your own, so baby gone
I wish you luck and if you need me, call
Just come to me and let me feed you all
I can understand the way it feels when you're fightin' the world
Facin' all this drama when Mama's just a little girl

Mama don't know why
Mama's just a little girl
Livin' if she is or not
Time ain't on her side
She gotta hold her head up high

At sixteen
What a beautiful thing, the very essence of a jet-black ebony queen
Got violated by someone she dated
If this is fate, I'd hate to see the seeds she created, and so we waited
Though it takes time to build a body and a mind
She reclines nine months then finally it's time
What do we find?, little growin' boy of mine
With a tortured soul, addicted to a life of crime
Had no time for the growin' stage
He learned his values on the streets at an early age
Cuz Mama's actin' crazy at the hospit-al
'bout to have another baby
Like a rose from the concrete, growin' within
Blessed with twins how the hell can Mama raise three men?
So we began, closest family, such insanity
A happy home, from one act of inhumanity
Plus Mama said the seed was corrupted
Used to rub Her belly, beggin' us to breathe and she'd loved us
Now, Mama, sits quiet, sippin' peppermint Schnapps
How could Mama bring a thug like me in this world?
She ain't the cause of all the drama
Cause Mama's just a little girl

Mama's just a little girl
Livin' if she is or not
Time ain't on her side
She gotta hold her head up high

Now, will she remain in the same spot?
The gunshots rang, they came from the 'caine spot
Now, look here, I see her clutchin' her son in her arms, she's hurt
Her heart bleeds, now she watched her seed die in the dirt
Fulfilled prophecy
But who could stop the grief I walk around, tryin' to hold the world, up on top of me
I'd probably be an innocent man, still I'm the victim of a curse
What could be worse?, nothing but pain, since my birth
Only functions at the Pen', cuz everybody's in
Payin' back society, I'm guilty of a life of sin
I watch the drama occur, my eyes blur before I jetted
I wonder why we all have to die 'fore we get it
Though we shed tears, so many peers I've done buried
Worried and scared, knowin' I'ma see the cemetery
Must be prepared, in this cold world, no one cares
No! It ain't fair, but we all bear and do our share
In this land of the underhanded schemes and plans
Vivid dreams of a nigga havin' G's in hand
Mama told me not to be a punk
There ain't a thing I wouldn't do for my Mama in this world

Mama don't know why
Livin' if she is or not
Time ain't on her side
She gotta hold her head up high

They ask us why we mutilate each other like we do
You see, you wouldn't ask why the rose that grew from the concrete had
Damaged petals
On the contrary, we would all celebrate its tenacity
We would all love its will to reach the sun
You see, Mama's just a little girl
Mama...



Daddy's home...

Heh, so??
You say that like that means somethin to me
You've been gone a mighty long motherfuckin time
We been gettin along fine just without you
Me, my brother, and my mother
So if you don't mind, you can step the FUCK off, POPS.. FUCK YOU!

Had to play catch by myself, what a sorry sight
A pitiful plight, so I pray for a starry night
Please send me a pops before puberty
The things I wouldn't do to see a piece of family unity
Moms always work, I barely see her
I'm startin to get worried without a pops I'll grow to be her
It's a wonder they don't understand kids today
So when I pray, I pray I'll never grow to be that way
And I hope that he answers me
I heard God don't like ugly well take a look at my family
A different father every weekend
Before we get to meet him they break up before the week ends
I'm gettin sick of all the friendships
As soon as we kick it he done split and the whole shit ends quick
How can I be a man if there's no role model?
Strivin to save my soul I stay cold drinkin a forty bottle
I'm so sorry...

I'm so sorry
For all this time
I'm so sorry
For all this time
For all this time, so sorry baby!

Moms had to entertain many men;
Didn't wanna do it but it's time to pay the rent again
I'm gettin a bit older and I'm startin to be a bother;
Moms can't stand me cause I'm lookin like my father
Should I stay or run away? Tell me the answer
Moms ignores me and avoids me like cancer
Grow up rough and it's hard to understand stuff
Moms was tough cause his papa wasn't man enough;
Couldn't stand up to his own responsibilities
Instead of takin care of me, he'd rather live lavishly
That's why I'll never be a father;
Unless you got the time it's a crime; don't even bother
Said I was an only child)
Look at mama's lonely smile!
It's hard for a son to see his mother cry
She only loves you, but has to fuck with these other guys
I'm so sorry...


Man child in the promised land couldn't afford many heroes
Moms was the only one there my pops was a no-show
And ohh -I guess ya didn't know
That I would grow to be so strong
Lookin kinda pale, was it the ale or pops was wrong?
Where was the money that you said, you would send me
Talked on the phone and you sounded so friendly
Ask about school and my welfare
But it's clear, you ain't sincere hey who the hell cares
You think I'm blind but this time I see you comin, Jack!
You grabbed your coat, left us broke, now ain't no runnin back
Ask about my moms like you loved her from the start
Left her in the dark, she fell apart from a broken heart
So don't even start with that "Born to be a father" shit
Don't even bother with your dollars I don't need it
Now that I finally found you, stay the fuck away from me
You're so sorry


I never meant to leave but I was wanted
Crossed too many people every house I'd touch was haunted
Had to watch the strangers every brother was a danger;
If I wanted to to keep you breathin, had to be out of range-a
Had to move on, done lost my name and picked a number
Made me watch my back I had no happy home to run to
Maybe it's my fault for being a father livin fast
But livin slow, mean half the dough, and you won't get no ass
Hindsight shows me it was wrong all along
I wanted to make some dough so you would grow to be so strong
It took a little longer than I thought
I slipped, got caught, and sent to jail by the courts
Now I'm doin time and I wish you'd understand
All I ever wanted was for you to be a man
And grow to be the titan you was meant to be
Keep the war fightin by the writings that you sent to me
I'm so sorry...




Oh I posted bail? I'm out this motherfucker? I can go?!
Aw, fuck y'all! Ay fuck the judge!
Fuck the motherfuckin' district attorney, the prosecutor
And fuck you motherfuckers in the jury box, fuck all y'all!
Cause I'm out on motherfuckin' bail
Y'all ain't never gon' see me in this motherfucker again!
Drop that shit L G
Let these ol' punk-ass bitches know how we runnin' this shit for the '94
Niggas ain't goin' back to court, you stank ass bitches

I'm stuck in jail, the D.A.'s tryin' to burn me
I'd be out on bail, if I had a good attorney
Want to label me a criminal and cuff me up
Got a pocket full of money so they rough me up - I ain't trippin'
In the county and I'm mad as fuck
Got a record so they put me with the baddest bunch
Everybody wanna talk cause I'm rappin', they askin' me what happened
Is it true you did a flick with Janet Jackson?
I can't sleep! they takin' Polaroids
And I'm tryin' to use the phone, but they makin' noise
Man I wish I had my Glock, cause it's major
I'm makin' shanks out the plastic in razors
These motherfuckers won't leave me alone, that's my word
'Bout to turn a violation to a motherfuckin' murder
I'm makin' co-llect calls to my ol' bitches
Send mo' pictures, and make me some mo' riches
To all the suckers on the block, talkin' shit while I was locked up
Be prepared to get socked up
Cause the game is deep, and the fame is brief
And you bullshit bitches ain't changin' me
I came straight up out the gutter, I was saved from hell
And I'm a thug, I was raised in jail, now I'm out on bail

Ay pass me my motherfuckin' Rolex
Yes bitch, that's a Presidential

I'm stuck in jail, and mad as a bitch
I'd be out on bail, if it wasn't for the snitch
Runnin' wild through the streets like I'm loco
And fuck the punk police and they chokeholds
I got no love in my heart cause I'm heartless
Mobbin' in the park after dark when I start shit
Rippin' up the scene as a teen I was at it, hey
And sellin' product to the addicts cause they gotta have it
I was a well-known thug and I got a lot of love
Hangin' out with the O.G.'s, shootin' up the clubs
And momma told me, don't hang with the homies
But they got me if they need me, then it's on g
Got me sittin' in a cell, a five by seven
Will I finally get to go to ghetto heaven?
Got my bitches on the outside, writin' me letters
And they tell me they love me, and the shit'll get better
I don't believe 'em cause I just got the news on the wire
Take it how you want it but your picture's on fire
I gotta be a player so I stay strong
Cause I know that I won't be away long
And when I finally do hit the fuckin' streets, I'ma handle this
A thug nigga gettin' scandalous, I'm on bail

Ay pass me my motherfuckin' Rolex
Yes bitch, that's a Presidential

Motherfuckers tryin', to harass a player
Man I ain't goin' for this ol' crazy ol' shit
Dealin' with you scandalous bitches
Y'all need to pop some of these crooked ass motherfuckin' judges
But here go the motherfuckin' fetti, I'm out on bail
I'll see you motherfuckers at the next show
By the way, where is my bitch?
You know, that's that ol' real thug shit
Real live thug shit, genuine
Y'knahmsayin? I wouldn't waste yo' motherfuckin' time with no bullshit baby
Trust me, it's that real shit
Talkin' 'bout that shit you can be tellin' your grandkids about y'know?
I ran with a thug nigga, believe that
This is for my fuckin' nigga 'em and the motherfuckin' boys
In case you wonderin', we doin' this shit, hell motherfuckin' yeah
An ounce of that shit, sittin' in yo' motherfuckin' lap
Now press rewind nigga



These some hard times we livin' in
Churches burnin', planes fallin' from the sky
Murder, the good die young
Hahaha, The good definitely die young
This is a lil' somethin'
To help you get through the day
If it could

It was more than a tragedy, emotions be grabbin' me
Plane fell from the sky, we tryna figure what happened
Burnin' churches, fearin' God, who can be so cruel
We all ignorant to AIDS 'til it happens to you
Just be a man, make plans, listen to your voice
A woman's tryin' to make decisions, we should leave them a choice
Cause who we to say who lives and die, breathes and stops
All this judgement on other lives needs to stop
What are we livin' for, givin' more back than takin'
On my knees still waitin' for my own salvation
Now I feel abandoned cause Pat Buchanan say I'm greedy
You can take my taxes, send me to war but can't feed me
It's so easy to regret thangs after they done
Babies catchin' murder cases scared to laugh in the Sun
The tragedies that we all need, love in doses
In times like these we feel closest the good die young

Does anybody have an answer why
Can anybody tell me why
Can anybody tell me why
It seems the good die young
Does anybody tell me why
Does anybody tell me why

Now in my world will it get worse
When I been trapped since birth
But I had to sleep in a hearse, cause it was my bed first
My grands probably burnin' turnin' in they grave
Some folks ain't even get to see a high age
But they did, so I ain't afraid
And this money got me feelin' like a star
And this murder got me feelin' like my death ain't far
And the land of stolen cars, don't get no better
Don't get no weaker or no harder
I was raised in a rush without my moms and my, father
So tell me somethin'
If I grab my gat and get the dumpin'
Would God get to lookin' at me funny uhaha
Rest in peace to my mother Aquillah Beale
Rest in peace to my father Salek Beale
Rest in peace to my grandparents
And thug in peace to my brother Seike
You know I love you

Which is worst, first Storm and then Al
Pac and then Yak
Regrey Brown
Coulda' sworn I seen ya face in a cloud
Family grievin' on your last breath
Close to the heart whether you know it or not
I swear the love won't stop
Jewel, that's my boo, Mom, Duke and Nu
From jump you kept it true
Helped to feed the crew
The good die young
Livin' fast jumpin' the gun
Mama blamin' the community for killin' her son
My cousin Darren wasn't scared of goin'
But never knowin' he was dyin' slower
I guess I see ya when I see ya soulja

It seems the good die young
Can anybody tell me why

I know my life ain't promised
That's why the wise move in silence
Analyze these scandalous times
It's hard dogg but we managed
Schools turn to war zones
Even homes unsafe
Leavin' children to play caged and raged they hate
How come!, someone explain "why the good die young"
Why the bad die slow and outlive everyone
It's time somethin' is done
For our young kids
They growin' hopeless
That ain't the way to live
Tell me why

Days go past and as they pass, time move, quicker
No time for wastin', put your hustle down my young dealers
Cause the end is nearer
But at least that's what they tellin' me
Hell, all I know brothers ain't ridin' 4-3 felony's
It's time to plan, plot, and strategize
Capitalize, mobilize
We in the war y'all
It's for all y'all
My family to the ones that stand me
Little bit mo' love is what's recommended
The seeds from you and me
Gon' be the ones to lead us towards unity
That's if we treat them right
Man, teach them right
Raise your kids better than you was
And see what it does
But if you don't
Man, we sure to be dumb
And we'll all see exactly why the goods die young

Can anybody tell me why
Can anybody tell me why
Can anybody tell me why

I send this out for all my homeboys that passed away
And all yo' homeboys that passed away
I send this out to all the former fallen soldiers
That's in the cemeteries buried
Never got to see they dreams
For everything I touch you touch
For every step I take you take
For every breath I breathe you breathe
Every dollar I make you make
I told you we'd make it to the sunshine one day
You just got there a little quicker
But like my homeboys Thugs say
I'll catch ya at the crossroads
The good die young

This song is dedicated to all them
Young kids that died innocent
That died young
At Columbine High
Outlawz
Tasha Harlins, all them
All the fallen kids
The dead babies
The closed caskets)



"I got a head, but ain't no screws in it"

Roll up and get swoll up, hold up
How ya gonna play me like a sunkin dunkin donut?
I ain't came a long way to get checked
So give me respect when I get wreck
Or get your motherfuckin chin checked
Once again, it's your friend outta Oakland
Hoping I can rock the shit to get ya open
Say your looking for some real shit
Then catch a funkified batch
Like that!!
Oakland's on the map
2Pac is on the big screen strivin
Gotta love a nigga for survivin
I wear alot of old schools jewels
Look how the fools drool, ooohh
Stop lookin at me hard cause you're buffer
But I'll just buck them bigger motherfuckers
Turnin men to suckers
Niggas wanna start a little ruckus
Better duck cause I'll be poppin' them motherfuckers
They wanna throw their hands up, that's tight
Hit em wit my eight, never had shit left, right
Then hit em wit the uppercut, duck quick
Shit outta luck, fucked and stuck with that rough shit
Fuck a pop song, fuck a video, fuck Arsenio, fuck the radio
Do you hear me though?
Give a holla to my niggas in the pen
And my murderous partners wit their Mac 10s
I represent the real cause I'm ill, G
Glock cocked the day they kill me
I'm representin'

Peace to Redman, Treach, Vin Rock, Kay Gee the great one
Mary J. Blige, Pete Rock and Troy, the late son
Heavy D, CL Smooth, and Queen Latifah
Too Short, Tony Toni Tone, LayLaw beat cuts
Ed, the special motherfucker and the Lover
The Tribe, A Tribe Called Quest, and Jungle Brothers
Das EFX, EPMD, and Ice Cube
Cypress Hill, yeah, the ill niggas
Raw Fusion, Organized Konfusion
Wicked and the Mouse Man, Spice 1 and Pooh Man
TLC, Eric B., Rakim, then Scarface
Stretch, Maj, K-Low, pumpin the Squad's bass
Thorough Heads, Poonannynans, The Click
E-40, The Governor, and Richie Rich
Young Guns in the house pumpin the flava
DJ Ditch for their behavior
Off the head, my freestyle flow
Just a couple of motherfuckers that I know
I'm strictly representin

1 motherfucker, 2 motherfucker, 3 motherfuckers
Damn, who did I forget?

I'm a soulja, daddy was a soulja
Strong in the struggle
Must contend so it's on
Raised in a house full of bad motherfuckers
Mad motherfuckers
Never had so we grab from the stacked motherfuckers
Now they know me, the homies
Raised by some crazed ass well payed OG's
Ah shit!
Pulled up in a benzy, snatch
The wheel as I peel out. Catch a cop's tail
Rock shells hit. Raise a fist so they know to make a hit
Can I flip it? I may get wicked as I rip it
It's for the gifted, pump your fist if you wit it
Here's your ticket to see Mr. Wicked rip shit
All I wanted to be was a soulja
Bang bang boogie, it's a stick up
Quit now, nigga, eat a dick up
Huh, I'm representin'



Ready nigga? Ready for that raw dog shit nigga?
Okay, Alright
Let me see how im gonna hit you with
You wanna set it off?

I'm scared to do some freestyle flow
I'm too high and I might go of tempo
But now I'm back to let these niggas know just how deep
My game run 2Pacalypse don't sleep
I keep a motherfucking Glock in my car
If I'm holding in the club, I gotta be the fucking star
So everybody wanna smile, and raise they hands
Cause you know how niggas be, they wanna see
If Pac is real or is he like that nigga in the movie
I guess I gotta prove my point
Slicin' motherfuckers now I'm doing the joint
I got my nigga B-I to the G beside me
Bitches on my dick you know them hoes wanna rob me
And my other homies out here like Spike Lee
They got the camera on a nigga guess they like me
But now I'm bout to pass this motherfucker on
Cause this Tanqueray is getting hella strong

Money, hoes and clothes
Blunt smoke coming out the nose is all a nigga knows
Flippin' on foes, puttin' tags on toes
Watchin' the stash grow, clockin the cash flow
The neighborhood gravedigger
Gettin' paid so much all the bitches wanna see a nigga
I guessed they figured I'm paid I wanna get laid
Or since I got loot I wanna knock boots
Huh, i rather beat my dick then trick
And if she don't suck then we don't fuck
Huh, I rather lick a buck drive a fat ass truck
Grab the nine, two clips and run them up
Yes, flex out the 2 or 3 benz's since I wreck shit
What the fuck do you expect it
A fly guy, well fuck it I'ma high guy from Bed-Stuy
Puttin' the swellin' on your eye
And your nose even, when I choke ya you stop breathin'
And when police come, I'm leavin'



There R no words 2 express
how much I truly care
So many times I fantasize of
feelings we can share
My heart has never known
the Joy u bring 2 me
As if GOD knew what I wanted
and made u a reality
I'd die 2 hold u or 2 kiss u
or merely to see your face
my stomach quivers my body shivers
and my heart increases pace
2 give me $ or lots of gold
would not be the same 2 me
I prayed and watched the distant stars
and finally u came 2 me!

Faithfully Yours,
Tupac Amaru Shakur



We goin' all out, we goin' all out
We goin' all out
Watch your motherfuckin' mouth, niggas!
Do it, do it, do it!

Come hell or high water, down to slaughter opposers
Just another lost soul, stuck, callin' Jehovah
Outlaw 'til it's over, brandish my strap, back like a cobra
I stay drunk, ‘cause I'm a mad man whenever sober
On a one-man mission, my ambition's to hold up
The rap game, while I pluck holes in niggas, like donuts
And still down to die for all my soldiers, like hillbillies
They don't fear me, so we feud, bringin' war to the city
With each breath, death before dishonor
Never let you swallow me, no apologies, Your Honor
A general in war, I'm the first to bomb
With a squad of trusted killers, quick to move shit, heavily armed
I'm similar to Saddam, sometimes I question who's sane
Like fiends frantic for that last vein, stuck in the game
I hit the scene like sandstorms, then transform, watch me
I take the figure of 30 niggas who all got me
While bitches wonderin' who shot me
No love, keep a grudge, shootin' slugs like Muammar Gaddafi
Murder my friends, build a new posse
We takin' shots at paparazzi
Go and fly now, nigga, like Rocky
You got a lot of nerve to play me
Another gay rapper, bustin' caps at Jay Z
While y'all caught up in the rapture, still after me
I'm in Jamaica, sippin' daquiris
No doubt, we used to havin' nothin'
Then grabbin' somethin' and bustin'
Wanted to be the thug nigga that my old man wasn't
I can't tour, fear of catchin' cases, litigation
Niggas playa-hatin', got me crooked in all fifty states
I'm screamin' "Death Row!", throw my Westside, ain't no thang
We was raised off drive-by's, brought up to bang
We claim mob, M.O.B. if you be specific
We control all cash from Atlantic-Pacific
Father, how the hell did I survive these five shots?
Live it up or give it up, and like demons
Late night, hear them screamin', "We goin' all out!"

We goin' all out, bomb first 'til they fall out
Take them the war route, without a doubt
Ball, which means we all ride if it's on
Each nigga handle your own, bring it on strong
If you got bills to pay, nigga, go all out
Bustas playin' with your papes better go all out
Tryna see the next day, nigga, go all out
Obstacles in your way, you better go all out

I'm on my last leg, walkin' through the belly of the beast
Feelin' like I'm all out, drunk as can be
It's plain to see, that we mob niggas hidin' in bushes
Claimin' that they ride rough, but they softer than cushion
They softer than bitches in the worst way, drownin' in blood
Outlawz, my blood brothers, I'd die for these thugs
Say hi to this slug
It's a shame how some niggas on the West Coast
Was ridin' with 'Pac, but when he died they went pop
I'm out in Jers, to the fullest, like some West Coast love
But after 'Pac stopped rappin', it ain't no West Coast thug
Just West Coast, slut, to my real niggas stuck in the street game
‘Cause rappers like Jay Z be pumpin' Kool-Aid through they veins
Is it true what I'm sayin'? Slap your soft ass to the floor
And watch my fo'-fo' put peek holes through your door
I ride or die, but these other fag niggas be bitin' this
It's all from my heart when I was writin' this; all out!

We goin' all out, bomb first 'til they fall out
Take them the war route, without a doubt
Ball, which means we all ride if it's on
Each nigga handle your own, bring it on strong
If you got bills to pay, nigga, go all out
Bustas playin' with your papes better go all out
Tryna see the next day, nigga, go all out
Obstacles in your way, you better go all out

Now, we all ride, and down to die — who with us?
Speak up, or get treated like you comin' to kill us
They ain’t nothin' but squealers
In this rap game, swearin' they rough
Tattooed up, and now them niggas swearin' they 'Pac
Stop that, and watch your back, we ain't forgot 'bout ya
These Glocks hot, and when shot it'll bring the bitch up out ya
It's me, Kastro with the goattee
Walkin' like a OG, ‘cause all these fag motherfuckers owe me
I pray to thug lords like them motherfuckers holy
Frontline soldier, 'til the Heavens call me
I go all out, and if you real, you real
Feel what I'm talkin' 'bout, ‘cause this game is ill
I live it, forbidden fruit, shoot, 'til they feel it
Livin' proof, Pac breed niggas they can't deal with
Holla back, right back, and watch your mouth
Or get blood in it, what; we goin' all out, nigga!

We goin' all out, bomb first 'til they fall out
Take them the war route, without a doubt
Ball, which means we all ride if it's on
Each nigga handle your own, bring it on strong
If you got bills to pay, nigga, go all out
Bustas playin' with your papes better go all out
Tryna see the next day, nigga, go all out
Obstacles in your way, you better go all out

Fool, you better go all out
Keep goin' all out
All my niggas goin' all out
Without a muthafuckin' doubt
Aye, you niggas just gon' think you gon' be uhh
Talkin' slick on all of these motherfuckin' records
And we ain't gon say shit
Now it's 1999, it's a different grind
Don't disrespect the Don
It's still war, motherfuckers
So let's see you act like you know



Fuck 2Pac that nigga ain't shit
That nigga ain't from muhfuckin' New York
That nigga be out there with them Cali niggas
Yo nigga man fuck 'Pac that nigga West Coast
That fucker that always with them New York niggas
Seen them with that nigga man that nigga ain't from the West Coast
Man fuck 'Pac fuck that nigga that nigga ain't really down
Rapin' ass nigga I didn't do it fuck it with that nigga
Fuck that nigga man fuck that nigga let that nigga go to jail right
And fuck that nigga fuck that nigga fuck you too nigga

I'm in this, motherfucker
I guess these muthafuckas tryin' to take me out the business right
I guess I ain't East Coast enough for my niggas back in New York
And I ain't West Coast for these niggas on the West huh?
Fuck e'rybody

*laughing*
Thug style out this, motherfucker, niggas, throw ya hands in the air
If you got jeep make ya speakers pop
I want motherfuckin' police tryin' to pull niggas over on this one
We takin' this one to the whole 'nother level gutter style thug style
You feel me, things that we can only do as a real G
We ain't dead yet

Hit me, I got my Hennessy find ya foes
In a room full of niggas tryin' to hide ya hoes
I'm gettin' high off buddha cause the times be slow
I keep my mind on dough you never find me broke
And who me? A nigga livin' life like a G
In that artillery keepin' niggas off of me
I can't sleep livin' in these wicked times, peep
Niggas after me cause they see I'm stackin' G's and heat
You can holler if you want to, please!!
I ain't runnin' with no punk crew be, bleed!!
Enemies and my range is on, you're in the danger zone
My fuckin' game is strong, now hotline
You suckas better find ya mind I got mine
From hustlin' and bustin' them rhymes
To my niggas up in Quentin, Down on Rikers Isle
Stay rile, but a nigga gotta use his styles

These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Bitch-made ass niggas don't know my style
These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Bitch-made ass niggas don't know my style

I could be wrong but I never got along with cops
It's like they stuck from makin' niggas duck from Glocks
And all the time, my mind's full of thoughts of ends
My fake friends say they love me but I know they lie
Cause in the dark see they hearts full of homicide
My mama cried when they took me off to jail
Only me inside the cell, straight locked up in this hell
I hear some sucker screamin' like the demon's inside
Will 'em away in the mornin', only the strong survive
I cry, but in my own way swallow my pride
Pick a reason to hide from all the niggas that die
Cemetery full of brothers I buried it's goin' down
Even now I wonder will I still be around
My hometown is the gutter I was born a wild
I came up out this dust with my heartless style

These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Bitch-made ass niggas don't know my style
These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Bitch-made ass niggas don't know my style

I remember Uptown, run catch a kiss
Listenin' to Mr. Magic
Cuttin' up the hits And even though I had a habit
Makin' words rhyme I was caught up in the madness
Juvenile thugs come on
I tell the whole story nothin' but truth
Halloween throwin' eggs from the project roofs
And Pete and Lee young G's with a gift of gab
Tryna hook up with the hookers who was quick to stab Remember mama's cookin', no school straight hookin'
And tryin' to get with light skinned cause she good lookin'
And jumpin' over turnstiles cause we ain't payin'
Call the cuties cuss words but we only playin'
I'm prayin' I can get a buck no luck
I had to move around a lot cause my moms was stuck
I had family but I was way too wild
Had to move to the West to regain my style

These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the cross, but my force was wild
Bitch-made ass niggas don't know my style
These, niggas don't know my style
Quick to smile, juvenile, was a problem child
Try to put me in the mothafuckin' cross, but my force was wild
Mothafuckin' bitches

Swear y'all know nigga
Ever heard motherfucka say all in Kool-Aid know the flavor hahha
This shit thuggish, fo' life, I told y'all, it's album three see
G sound, freestyle
Motherfuckin' Young Thugs in this motherfucker



In this motherfucking life I lead, shit
A hell of motherfucking road blocks
And crooked cops
We still ride though
What side? Westside

I want money in large amounts
My garage full of cars that bounce
Movin' my tapes in major ways, ‘cause every dollar counts
Busters is jealous and half these niggas is punks
They runnin' off at the mouth 'til I fill it up with my pump
They jump, my automatic keep 'em wary
Why you frontin' like you Billy Badass? Nigga, you scary
I've been knowin' you for years
We was high school peers, in junior high
I was itchin' to kill, and you was ready to die
While you bullshittin', niggas was dyin' and catchin' cases
Bustin' my automatics at motherfuckers in foreign places
Leavin' no trace, they see my face and they buried
Them bitches die in a hurry, still I ride, I'm never worried
Mr. Makaveli tell me to ride, and I'ma ride
Pick my enemies out the crowd, and motherfuckers die
It's not the way I wanna live, my nigga, it's how it is
Homie got into a fight last night that killed his kids

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

I ain't a killer but don't push me, dawg
For the family I'll send that ass straight to God
In this life I lead, I seen the most of my 23 years
When vision is blurry, the money is clear
Some of my peers eternally will sleep in a coffin
And when Nob' on the road, I'm extremely cautious
It happen that fast, split second you gone
At the top of my tombstone put "Nob' was raw"
Outlaw 'til I'm under the floor, for Kadafi the Prince
I stack dough like I clocked all the bricks
With a watch on my wrist, dawg, I know the time these days
We already in the history books, 'Pac made sure of that
Whatever you took, we takin' it back
You know it's all for the foundation
Outlawz, we still buildin' the Thug Nation; holla at ya homie!

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

It ain't nothin' but in-between nuts, oxygen is gettin' hot
Got a problem, old fag-ass nigga, kick rocks
*Bin Laden* on the phone and that nigga talkin' crazy
I don't know who to blame, him or *Bush* for killin' babies
I'm a New Jerz' Devil, the street, creative rebel
Only got one shot to produce on every level
This is bags I must, go the max I must
Nigga, I came from not much, so money I clutch
Uh-uh, Napoleon the strength of the strong-arm
When they think they was in the right
I prove they movin' wrong
I'm a hardcore product of the ghetto
Been blessed fo' sho' to eat from out the ghetto
I maneuver, in the right lane, quick to push back brains
Switchin' to the left lane, I'm playin' my hands
And I'm plottin' on the fortune, it's gettin' hot and scorchin'
I'm diggin' like a scorpion that torture they enemies

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

Now with this Outlaw lifestyle that I been introduced to
Money and hoes keep us closer to Lucifer
Steady seducin' us and now I'm all for it
This the life for me and the law can't spoil it
So you can call it what the fuck you want
But I'm a ballin' alcholic with a sawed-off pump
My momma ain't raised no punk; and neither did 'Pac
So when it jump off, I breathe for Yak'
Been puttin' in work, so I walk with a bop
Thug livin', uhh, what the fuck'd be better?
I do my dirt with the family so we dyin' together

We on a mission for mo', gangsta shit on you hoes
We ain't fuckin' with you most
Just crooks and niggas about they flow
Tryin' to live Godzilla
E.D.I. went from a Bad Boy to an anybody killer
Look out, wanted man, guns in hand, stand firm
Nuts and my pride, now let's burn
Bound to the fam going down swingin'
Holding my ground, now we the last ones breathin'
Won't stop until we even deep in the trenches
So many killings it's senseless
So in this life I lead, I stay protected
By God, my squad, and this thing in my palm
Now all my hustlin' motherfuckers, get your money, sing along

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

This motherfuckin' life I lead, nigga
You know what time it is
Westside, Death Row
Bad Boy killer, So So Def killer
Thug Life, Death Row
E'rybody killer; fuck all y'all niggas!
If it ain't Westside, nigga, it ain't poppin'
That's on my mama



Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome

Somebody wake me I'm dreamin', I started as a seed the semen
Swimmin' upstream, planted in the womb while screamin'
On the top, was my pops, my momma screamin' stop
From a single drop, this is what they got
Not to disrespect my peoples but my poppa was a loser
Only plan he had for momma was to fuck her and abuse her
Even as a little seed, I could see his plan for me
Stranded on welfare, another broken family
Now what was I to be, the product of this heated passion
Momma got pregnant, and poppa got a piece of ass
Look how it began, nobody gave a fuck about me
Pistol in my hand, this cruel world can do without me
How can I survive? Got me askin' white Jesus
Will a nigga live or die, cause the Lord can't see us
In the deep, dark clouds of the projects, ain't no sunshine
No sunny days and we only play sometimes
When everybody's sleepin'
I open my window jump to the streets and get to creepin'
I can live or die, hope I get some money 'fore I'm gone
I'm only 19, I'm tryin' to hustle on my own
On this block where everybody and they pops tryin' to slang rocks
I'd rather go to college, but this is where the game stops
Don't get it wrong cause it's always on, from dusk to dawn
You can buy rocks, Glocks or a herringbone
You can ask my man he's a mind reader
Keep my nine heated all the time this is how we grind
Meet up at the cemetery then get smoked out, pass the weed nigga
That Hennessey'll keep me keyed nigga
Everywhere I go niggas holla at me, "Keep it real G"
And my reply till they kill me
Act up if you feel me, I was born not to make it but I did
The tribulations of a ghetto kid, still I rise

Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome

I stay sharp as always
Runnin' ya bricks with blitz, through ya project hallways
Dumpin' crews like two's, nigga all day
Secrets of war prepare me for the worst
A life that's lavish full of cabbage or a life that's in a hearse
But now my dreams it seems though, be placin' triple beams and things bro
Diamond pinky ring got the loot poppin' out my jeans

Dynamically this dude or twist this shit ceramically
Able to write a Fatal verse with no profanity
It's on for Al G. Nikko Storm and Nasty New
Put a hole in your crew, tryin' to pass me
With no remorse
You get blasted full force
A Nike endorsement doin' shootings on a horse
World wide supremacy
All y'all remember me
Hung over from Hennessey
With a menace intendancy
Police be clockin' me
So I be dippin' Slippin' sloppily
Sippin' Vodka B
And ditchin' clips On private property
When five O be comin'
Niggas be runnin'
For they life and freedom
The type to beat 'em here engagin'
Breakin' and try to lead 'em
Two big terriers
Monclair gettin' scarier
They nine's they shoot 'em in secluded areas
The barrier, Not me
I'm buried 'em once they ditched they in Scott-free
Two tass Harass my ass
Tried to have the F Lofty
My nigga fell
Givin' a whole essence county trigger hell
Runnin' the fuckin' block and duckin' cops tryin' to get a bail

In ninety-six my Glock's my plastic, passion for blastin' bastards
No faces for open caskets, peelin' ya cap backwards
Ya cowards ain't prepared for pistol practice
I send my missiles through your mattress
Leavin' holes in your body like a cactus
While me and my crew be boppin' more greens than topic
And loot to keep the seams in my motherfuckin' jeans poppin'
Leavin' ya spleen to pick up
Half of you niggas is softer than a Snicker
Let's go to war and see who draw quicker
And still I rise, and still I rise

Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome
Ninety-six big body
Sittin' on chrome



Dear baby, it's me again, stuck inside this max pen
Tryna pay my debt for all my sins
See, these penitentiary times be so heavy on my mind
At times it's like I'm livin' just to die
I'm livin' in hell, stuck in my jail cell
Stranded in the county jail, waitin' for my chance to post bail
I wanna be paid in large stacks and mash in fast Jags
I blast and wonder "How long will I last?"
My memories fade when I'm intoxicated
Bustas are shady so I'm dumpin' on cowards crazy whenever faded
I know I said it all before, but now I mean it
Visions of me and you ballin', so crystal clear I seen it
Even though you mad at me, you'll be glad to see the strategy
Of makin' these chips come so easily
I max out in the morning, baby, life is good
Me and you against the whole hood – soon as I get home

Grab my straps, locate my comrades
Let's get my enemies not knowin' I'm comin' back
Soon as I get home
Go get the money out the safe
It's time to turn the streets into a war zone
Soon as I come home

Sittin' here lookin' at pictures of me and you livin'
But now you out in the world, while I'm twistin' in prison
Love letters come daily, words of affection
You send me money and nude pictures, beggin' for some sexin'
Stay wide open, keep your eyes peeled
And my advice is "Keep it real or you can die squeelin'."
Plus, I never had to worry 'bout a visit, ‘cause you're there daily
Guards tryna get your number, you don't dare tell me
Tongue-kissin', steady humpin', tryna touch up somethin'
Before the C-O in the corner jump in, frontin'
Late night reminiscin', everybody's quiet
I think something's in the air, prepare for the riot
It's padlocks in my socks, steel from the bed springs
I touch 'em with thug love and then let they heads ring
I started a war but now I'm gone
Release me to the streets in the mornin', it's on soon as I get home

Grab my gats, locate my comrades
Let's get my enemies not knowin' I'm comin' back
Let's get my money out the safe
It's time to turn the streets into a war zone
Soon as I get home

Since you've been gone
My whole life's been like a game of Cee-low
Thinkin' big, like the kid from Casino
Fulfillin' my dreams like Nino
Brown, the whole town be shook up
And me and Mama survivin'
Depends on how many rocks a nigga cook up
Narcotics got traffic, seen those niggas you blasted
Wantin' me in a casket, on a ground, kind of plastic
Yeah, nigga, I heard, Lil' Mu gave the word
You get paroled on the third, it's all love
We out here frontin', still here but all about nothin'
But double O's is what I'm wantin'
And I'm tryna see somethin' that we ain't never had
Luxury life, results livin' bad
Tricks of the trade, shit that shoulda been taught by Dad
But learned through the crew
Lessons between me and you
And once we lock this shit down it ain't a thing they can do
Meanwhile I stay waitin' by the phone
Hopin' I'll get a call tellin' a nigga that you home

Grab the gats, locate my comrades
Let's get my enemies not knowin' I'm comin' back
Go get my money out the safe
It's time to turn the streets into a war zone
Soon as I get home



You know what gang violence is, mostly?
If somebody shoots your family member
Of course you retaliate, You know what I mean?
Same thing the U.S does except nobody even shot their family members
They see that, somebody bomb a school
And all these people get killed
So the united states feel like ooh thats messed up
We gotta go show em who tha real killers
This country was built on gangs, you know
I think this country still is run on gangs
Republicans, Democrats, The Police Department, The FBI
The CIA, those are gangs, you know what I mean
The correctional officers
I had a correctional officer tell me straight
"We the biggest gang in New York state
Straight up."

Suppress the revolution of premeditated scheme
Introduce a drug called crack, to us ghetto teens
Got a law for raw niggas, now playa what it be like?
When will niggas see they got us bleeding with three strikes
Can't seem to focus hopeless, with violent thoughts I wrote this
Got these Devils petrified, hiding from my hocus-pocus
And so I learned to earn my currency in over time
Affiliated, clearly click a military mind
May God forgive us though we dwell inside a paradox
Thugged out and drug dealin, from the womb to the block
My live mind got me survivin five rounds
My forty-five got my fortified with live rounds
When shit's thick we plot hits, when our Glock spits
All hail, Out on Bail, Wrath of the 2Pacalypse
Forever ghetto necessary picture food stamps
Outlaw Thug Niggas never left the boot camp

We got the real live shit from front to back
To my niggas in the world, 2Pac is back
Where the fuck my soldiers at?
Where my soldiers is at?

Now I was born as a rebel, making trouble for the devil
Can you feel me now?
Armies in every city
Definition of power
Players are you with me?
See the war is the prophecy
Survival is the strategy
Rest in peace to my comrades that deceased


Walking down the streets of time
Youll have these devils petrified of a nigga in his right mind
They tell us that we hopeless and hell bound
This fo the brothers in penetentiaries jailed down
I got you in my heart till tha day I die
Think of tha damage we can do, if we wasn't high
Can you picture me loc? Its a thugs wrath
Political contracts and blood baths
For Matulu Shakur up in the Rikers
Though they got you, I never let them stop me
The struggle continues

Now if we do want to live a thug life and a gangsta life and all of that
Ok, so stop being cowards and lets have a revolution
But we dont wanna do that, dudes just wanna live of character
They wanna be cartoons, but if they really wanted to do something
If they was that tough, alright, lets start our own country
Lets start a revolution, lets get out of here, lets do something

We got the real live shit from front to back
To my niggas in the world, 2Pac is back
Where my soldiers at?
Where my soldiers is at?



They claim that I'm violent
Just cause I refuse to be silent
These hypocrites are havin fits
Cause I'm not buyin' it, defyin' it
Envious because I will rebel against any oppressor
And this is known as self defense
I show no mercy, they claim that I'm the lunatic
But when the shit gets thick, I'm the one you go and get
Don't look confused, the truth is so plain to see
Cause I'm the nigga that you sell-outs are ashamed to be
In every jeep and every car, brothers stomp this
I'm never ignorant, getting goals accomplished
The underground railroad on an uprise
This time the truth's gettin' told, heard enough lies
I told em fight back, attack on society
If this is violence, then violent's what I gotta be
If you investigate you'll find out where it's comin' from
Look through our history, America's the violent one
Unlock my brain, break the chains of your misery
This time the payback for evil shit you did to me
They call me militant, racist cause I will resist
You wanna censor somethin', motherfucker censor this
My words are weapons, and I'm steppin' to the silent
Wakin' up the masses, but you claim that I'm violent


The cops can't stand me, but they can't touch me
Call me a dope man, cause I rock dope beats
Jacked by the police, didn't have my ID
I said, "Excuse me, why you tryin to rob me?"
He had tha nerve to say that I had a curfew
Get out the car, or I'll hurt you
So here I go, I better make my mind up
Pick my nine up or hit the line-up
I chose B, stepped into the streets
The first cop grabbed me, the other ripped my seat
They grabbed my homie and they threw him to the concrete
"What you doin' man?", They tried to frame me
They tried to say I had some dope in the back seat
But I'm a rap fiend, not a crack fiend
My homie panicked, he tried to run
I heard a bullet fire from the cop's gun
My homie dropped so, I hit the cop
I kept swingin', yo, I couldn't stop
Before I knew it, I was beatin' the cop senseless
The other cop dropped his gun, he was defenseless
Now I'm against this cop who was racist
Given him a taste of tradin' places
And all this, cause the peckerwood was tryin' this
Frame up, but I came up, now they claimin' that I'm violent


As I was beatin' on the cop, I heard a gun click
Then the gun shot, but I wasn't hit
I turned around it was my homie with the gun in hand
He shot the cop, now he's a dead man
I said, come on, it's time for us to get away
They called for backup, and they'll be on their way
Jumped in the car, and tried to get away quick
The car wouldn't start, we in deep shit
So we jumped out
We drove a little ways thinkin' that we got far
But I looked up and all I saw was blue lights
If I die tonight, I'm dying in a gunfight
I grabbed the AK, my homie took the 12 gauge
Load em up quick, it's time for us to spray
We'll shoot em up with they own fuckin' weapons
And when we through sprayin', then we steppin'
This is a lesson to the rednecks and crooked cops
You fuck with real niggas, get ya fuckin' ass dropped
So here we go, the police against us
Dark as dusk, waitin' for the guns to bust
What's next, I don't know and I don't care
One things fo' sho', tomorrow I won't be here
But if I go, I'm takin' all these punks with me
Pass me a clip G, now come and get me
You wanna sweat me, never get me to be silent
To claim that I'm violent



The day u chose 2 leave me
it rained constantly outside
in truth I swore the rain 2 be
The tears in Cupid's eyes




This for all the homeboys that couldn't get they happy home
Let's turn this house into a happy home
Long as one of us got it, some of us got it
Let's turn this house into a happy home
You know how that is, stay down for mine
Outlaw.. look

Now we've been kickin' it for quite some time
Remained beside me through my trials in this life of crime
We done fought so many times I forgot to count
I never hit you, not a coward, rather leave your house
Remember back in December when we was tight?
Sippin' Alize and Cristal, whylin' every night - in my bedroom!
Promised that I commit to you soon
Tongue-kissed me every time you seen me step inside a room
Straight out the hood
We promised to be good to each other, plus I love you
So I know you gon' make a good mother
Just try to understand if I change in time
It's only 'cause I never owned anything that's mine
So I'm tryin you can stay with my momma but keep the drama to a low
Never call the police, I never call you bitch or ho'
We were all born hungry in this world alone
Finally moved out my mom's house, and got a happy home

Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..

Born through hard times, ghetto child of mine
I wonder if you have to suffer for your father's crimes
To be honest it's a hard road
Just keep your faith in God, knowin' you'll get scarred though
Look at him walkin' and talkin', a lil' child with my eyes and mouth
Father watch over lil' seeds, help me guide them out
Had to change my whole lifestyle, married my baby's momma
Made her my wife now, I'm tryin' hard y'all
Maybe in time I'll be a better man
Watchin' the older couples, handle it like veterans
Show me the meanin' of forever and together we rise
If it would help our child grow, then together we'd die
Why - question my love, it's so easy to see
Without my family all I'm left with is a shadow of me
After all the arguments, and the nights alone
Now it's time to live the good life, inside a happy home

Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..

All these problems got me goin
We got a family, of our own
I just wanna happy home
No man's made to stand alone
I promise I won't do you wrong
I just want a happy home

Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Ha..ppy.. home..
Happy home..



Now we was once two brutha’s of the same kind
Quick to approach a ghetto cutie with the same line
You was just a little smaller but you still roll
Got stretched to Y.A. and hit the hood swoll
'Member when you had a jheri curl never quite learn
Drinking 90 proof on the roof trippin' off sherm
Collect calls to the till, sayin' how ya changed
Oh you a Muslim now, no more dope games
I just got the phone call, heard you got bail
Wanna go to the Mosque, No time for females
I’m losing touch with my homie he’s a changed man
He hit the pen and now no sinnin' is the game plan
When I say I’m living large, all you see is the struggle
When I say I’m still thugging, all you see is the trouble
Congratulation on the weddin', I hope your wife know
She got a playa for life, and everybody miss ya
I know we grew apart, you probably don’t remember
I used to fiend for your sister, but never did get with her
And I can see us after school, we’d BOMB
On the first playa hatas with the wrong set on
Now the whole things changed, ‘cause we don’t even kick it
Got a big money scheme, and you ain’t even with it
Hmm, knew in my heart you was the same young brutha that
When it’s time for war go toe to toe we’ll watch a brutha’s back
I can’t even lie, 'cause I ain't laughin' at cha
You tryin' hard to maintain, but go ahead
'Cause I ain’t mad at cha

I ain't, mad, at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't, mad, at cha

We used to be like distant cousins, fightin', playin' dozens
Whole neighborhood buzzin', knowin', that we wasn’t
Used to catch us on the roof or behind the stairs
I’m gettin' blitzed and I reminisce on all the times we shared
Besides bumpin' 'n' grindin' wasn’t nothin' on our mind
In time we learned to live a life of crime
Rewind me back, to a place was much too young to know
I caught a felony lovin' the way the guns blow
And even though we seperated, you told me you’d wait
Don’t give nobody my lovin' while I be locked up state
I kiss my Mama goodbye, and wipe the tears from her lonely eyes
Said I’ll return but I gotta fight the fate’s arrived
Don’t shed a tear, 'cause Mama I ain’t happy here
I’m through trial, no more smiles, for a couple years
They got me goin' max, I’m knockin' busters on they backs
In my cell, thinkin', “Hell, I know one day I’ll be back”
But as soon as I touch down
I told my girl I’ll be there, so prepare, to get loved down
My homies wanna kick it, but I’m just laughin' at cha
Y'all play too many games, but I ain’t mad at cha

I ain't, mad, at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't, mad, at cha

Father forgive us for livin' while all my homies stuck in prison
Barely breathin' believin' that the world is a prism
It's like a ghetto we can never leave
A broken rose givin' bloom through the cracks of the concrete
So many other things for us to see
Things to be, our history so full of tragedy and misery
To all my homies never made it home
The dead peers I shed tattooed tears for, when I'm alone
Picture us inside a ghetto heaven, a place to rest
Findin' peace through this land of stress
In my chest I feel pain come in sudden storms
Life full of rain in this game watch for lead thorns
Our unborn never got to grow, never got to see what's next
In this world full of countless threats
I beg God, to make a way for our ghetto kids to breathe
Show us sign, make us all believe
'Cause I ain't mad at cha

I ain't, mad, at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't, mad, at cha
I ain't, mad, at cha
I ain't mad at cha
I ain't, mad, at cha



{"Niggas!"} Yeah.. uh..
{"Niggas!"}

Who's afraid of the punk police?
Niggas run the streets, no justice no peace
Fuck the law, I'd rather draw than do time
Don't fuck with mine 'cross the line
My two 9's go BIYA BIYA when I shoot 'em
Korean motherfuckers was crooked
So niggas had to burn and loot 'em
Now the streets ain't safe at night, my niggas
.. uhh, straight take his life
So don't sleep when my team creep up, how we hit 'em
Empty the clip, then dip cause we did 'em
Lickin off shots for Latasha, that's proper
Love for my niggas but a Glock for the coppers
So what the fuck you wanna do now?
I packed a 9 last year, in '99 I'm packing two now
And even if they pull they triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothing's gonna stop the plan of true niggas

{"Niggas!"} Yeah, niggas - can't fuck with us
{"Niggas!"} Yeah, niggas
Cause bein a nigga means you love niggas, haha
{"Niggas!"} I was raised in this society so there's no way you can
Expect me to be a perfect person, cause I'mma do what I'mma do

Aiyyo!

My dimes make the fiends go to sleep, so they call 'em Bedrocks
Niggas is like photographers, all they take is headshots
Your last words'll be, damn, what's all these red dots?
Niggas nowadays they worry me
My bars is therapy, as long as you usin 'em thoroughly
Muah 'til the day that they bury me
My niggas is stronger and tighter now than they probably ever be
And I'm a product of the 70's
The hood got niggas on punishment, that's why they never leave
If I ain't eatin wit'chu I'm probably beefin wit'chu
If no money ain't involved ain't no need for me speakin wit'chu
I know you got a gun but I'm hopin you keep it wit'chu
Cause unfortunately I'm one of the rappers that keep a pistol and
Know what the llama do, Shady/Aftermath
Ruff Ryders, D Block, and of course Amaru
Lot of people honor you, probably cause the way
That you used to bring the drama to, whoever you wanted to
You a leader when you can get a leader to follow you
But, anyway, life goes on
So I'll see you when I art in heaven like our fathers do


{"Niggas!"} Nigga! Can't fuck with us



Ma-ah-an, it ain't easy
They got me goin' cold-hearted
Probation, violation, incarceration, frustration, you know
Fuck that, nigga, damn near about to start basin'
Watch out, nigga

Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Daz in this, motherfucker
Alright boy, drop that shit
Wassup man?
Always listen to that shit?
That thug criminal shit?
Peep game, nigga, peep game
Feel me

Travel through my mind, am I blind it's a shame
Young niggas gettin' murdered straight took out the game
As I sit here puffin' on a cigarette
Gotta be ready, never know who's plottin' on a niggas death
These are the rough times, best to hurry up
And duck muh'fucker 'fore I buck mine
It's gettin' crazy and everybody's strapped
Surrounded by niggas but nary a motherfucker down to watch my back
These are the bitch made niggas, you been played, nigga
While you starvin' and broke they pullin' six figures
Oooh, what can you do?
When you can't trust your crew
Time to bust out the twenty-two
Boo-yaow!
Ran out of weed, so I'm sippin' on this Hennessy
Tell me, do you feel me?
Hey, I have no remorse
As I take another sip of my liquor and spit my sick thoughts, oooh

Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Thuggin' to the fullest, got my strap, I'ma pull it
I'm the first muh'fucker that can outrun a bullet
It's them Thug Life niggas and we don't like tricks
Got these punk wannabes and they jockin' like bitches
Now my riches is gettin' hoes on it's own
Fuck a mystery, do you wanna get with me, then let's bone
I'ma take her to my hideout, cause I'm smokin' that spinach
And stayin' strong to the finish and then I ride out
See you on the freeway, sorry baby
But I gotta call my homie, see what he say
I ain't got no time, I gotta get mine
I keep my mind on my loot, I'll shoot every time
And ain't no way I'ma let bitch made nigga worry me
Catch me slippin', empty the clip and bury me
Hell nah, nigga, have to plug me twice
Ain't no slippin' when you thug for life
Motherfucker, can you see?

Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Never bow down let these other bitches crawl
I'm a thug motherfucker and these thugs only ball
Ain't no half steppin' here, from the cradle to the grave
I'm a muh'fuckin' fool, but I choose to get paid
Now my pockets gettin' empty, and I'm panicked in a fright
Me and my bitch named Nina are fiendin' tonight
Ain't nobody livin' safe, got a plot and I'm stressin'
All I want is my muh'fuckin' money, ain't no question
Don't try to stall, little trick, cause we hit
So bring in the scissors and get to clippin' at his dick
I'd rather die young than die old and broke
That's why I stay drunk, and I constantly smoke
My memories as a youngsta, hangin' with the homies
Cause this is Thug Life nigga and we're crazy
Tell me, do you see?

Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Yeah, constantly runnin' from danger ain't no stranger to cop cars
Gettin' arrested and tested wearin' a vest and don't drop my guards
My life is hectic my homies send mail from jail
Niggas in hell got some horrible stories to tell
I'm catchin' cases and still tryin' to stack a grip
The IRS is tryin' to stress off a nigga's shit
A young nigga never had a prayer to prevail
And all my peers doin' years locked up in jail
What can I do, stay strapped, get a bigger crew
And creep around with them Dogg Pound niggas, too
And now we rich ain't no bitch that can touch us
And it's a trip, how we clown, when we fuck sluts
Bust nuts then I cut, that's my new thang
And motherfuckers got on do-rags

Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Now tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
















They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- I'm losin my mind
Look down the barrel of my nine and my vision's blurry
Fallin to pieces, am I guilty? I pray to the Lord
But he ignores me unfortunately cause I'm guilty
Show me a miracle, I'm hopeless -- I'm chokin off
Marijuana smoke, with every toke it's like I'm losin focus
Fallin to sleep while I'm at service, when will I die?
Forever paranoid and nervous because I'm high
Don't mention funerals I'm stressin, and goin nutty
And reminiscin bout them niggas that murdered my buddy
I wonder when will I be happy, ain't nothin funny
Flashbacks of bustin caps, anything for money
Where am I goin I discovered, can't nothin save me
My next door neighbor's havin convo with undercovers
Put a surprise in the mailbox, hope she get it
Happy birthday bitch, you know you shouldn'ta did it

Everybody's dyin am I nextx3
I see my enemies they creepin, don't make me blast

Everybody's dyin am I next, who can I trust?
Will they be G's, and they look at me before they bust?
Or will they kill me while I'm sleepin, two to the head
While I'm in bed, leakin blood on my satin sheets
Is there a heaven for a baller? I'm gettin suspicious
Of this bitch the line busy everytime I call her
Now she's tellin me to visit, who else is home?
I check the house before I bone, so we all alone
After I nut I hit the highway, see ya later
To all the players watch the fly way a nigga played her
The bitch is tellin all her homies -- that I can fuck her
Like no other now them other bitches wanna bone me
I'm under pressure gettin drunk, somebody help me
I drink a fifth of Hennesey I don't think it's healthy
I see my enemies they creepin, don't make me blast
I watch the five-oh's roll, the motherfuckers pass

I see my enemies they creepin, don't make me blast

They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- no need to lie
I pray to God I don't scream when it's time to fry
Nowhere to rest I'm losin homies, ain't that a bitch
When I was rich I had clout, now a nigga's lonely
I put the pistol to my head, and say a prayer
I see visions of me dead, Lord are you there?
Then tell me am I lost cause I'm lonely
I thought I had friends but in the end a nigga dies lonely
Nowhere to run I'm in terror, and no one cares
A closed casket at my funeral and no one's there
Is there a future for a killer? I change my ways
But still that don't promise me the next day
So I stay Thuggin with a passion, forever blastin
I'm bustin on these motherfuckers in my madness
They wonder if I'm hellbound... well Hell
Can't be worse than this, cause I'm in Hell now

I see my enemies they creepin, don't make me blast

I ain't scared to die
Do you wanna live forever?
Are you scared, to die?



What of a love unspoken? Is it weaker without a name?
Does this love deserve 2 exist without a title
because I dare not share its name
Does that make me cruel and cold
2 deny the world of my salvation
because I chose 2 let it grow
People tend 2 choke
that which they do not understand
Why shouldn't I be weary
and withhold this love from MAN
What of a love unspoken
no one ever knows
But this is a love that lasts
and in secrecy it grows



This ain't livin'.. nigga!

I hear even the smaller G's be dippin' Chevy Impalas
While flossin' their gold D's, O.G.'s, is who they follow
We swallow tomorrow's seed, what we leave is hollow
We feed violence and greed, let 'em lead tomorrow
In time, they grip a nine, sippin' wine, they rap
Still I be starin', watch the parents sacrifice their child
The love's gone, a thug's home, with no love
Feelin' so strong, make young boys into drug dealers
Now one for adolescents, now dos for those
Keep your friends by your side, even close your foes
Now three for Johnny Law tryin' to take my chips
I never pulled the trigger, didn't touch that bitch
Throw your hands in the air, it's a robbery
Let's go see what our enemies talkin' 'bout
When G's enter the house nobody's walkin' out
This ain't livin', it's similar to prison, we're trapped
My homies jealous plus they tell us that the phones is tapped
I watch my back twenty-fo' seven
And never let a busta send a G to ghetto heaven, you know
This is how it goes when we floss with flows
Before I toss your ho, it'll cost you mo'
I do shows, make a lot of dough, murder my foes
But I'd give it all up, if it would help you grow
This ain't livin'

This ain't livin'
Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do
This ain't livin'
Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do

Peep it - gunfire is produced at alarmin' rates
Today's youth, quick to shoot, get in the car and break
"It Takes a Nation of Millions" if we intend to stop the killin'
Just search your feelings, participatin' should be appealin'
They're our seeds and when they bleed, we bleed
That's what becomes of lonely children, they turn to G's
Heavenly father can you rescue
My young nation, rest the Lord will protect you, respect due
Not a threat as I step in blue, and check those
That oppose when I froze them fools
And who are you, to watch me fall farther?
Follow me now
Skippin' class, and livin' fast, will get your ass
Stuck in the Pen', doin' life plus ten
Young brother pump your brakes for me
Before you choke, won't you soak up some game from your big homie
This ain't livin', we givin' you jewels, use 'em as tools
Explode on they industry and fade them fools
You know the rules, gotta be a rider
You can run the red lights but read the street signs, hey
This for all of y'all that keep on raisin' hell
Put a pistol in your hand and let you fade yourself
It ain't right, what you put your momma through, young G
Gotta change your life, take the game from me
This ain't livin'

Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do
Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do
Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do
Can’t find a better way to break through
This ain't livin', I gotta do what I gotta do



Niggas.. fuckin' with the wrong nigga

My seductive introduction be specific
Still elusive, but exclusive's what I give you when I kick it
And I'm still lifted; niggas can't get with Mr. Wicked
Picture me flippin' my adversaries, gettin' the dick swiftly
Niggas is swingin' wild, but they styles miss me
You can bring that bitch, but your whole click will still get treated shitty
Business never personal
I'm up before the sun come up, I'm tired
Just a ghetto star, a drop top double-R is what I'm ridin'
Nigga, if you was half the man your bitch was
Bring yo' artillery when you come for me, ‘cause we sick thugs
No hesitation when I pull and blast, ‘cause Syke was bustin'
Plus, Bo had 'em duckin', screamin', "Get they cash!"
So now I got the law on me
My phone's tapped So I had to send word through my lil' homies
Tell them niggas this the year when they pull the trigger
Shit, this is what you get, for fuckin' with the wrong nigga

This is what you get
When you fuckin' with the wrong nigga
Hehehehe, yeah, nigga, peep it

Before I lay me down to sleep, I pray and thank the Lord
For givin' me another fruitful day
I wanna be a peaceful, man, but still when niggas come for me
All I can see is gettin' 'em killed
For real, it's how I feel
Reflect my thoughts, flowin' on these reels
Make my enemies deal with my steel; they caps peeled
We still cool, but you played yourself
Give him the MAC and make him spray hisself, heyyy
Fallin' legends clutchin' chrome three-five-seven
Puttin' two bullets to they dome, wanted to die in Heaven
Why call in shots? Nobody really as clear as me
Ain't tryin' to help the feds get a case for conspiracy
Murder, my foes get disposed of
We all homies to the death, so my true niggas show me love
God, forgive me for my lifestyle, a negative figure
But why they fuckin' with the wrong nigga
You know?

It's like.., why you fuckin' with the wrong nigga?

I was raised by thugs, schooled by killers
Learned my mathematics skills from real drug dealers
Tried to rise, but they tried me
I guess they all had to die, ‘cause we tried peace
I die in these streets
Blast 'til they recognize
Still do or die, all my niggas gettin' high, watchin' time fly
Best strategize on the way to profit
Best organize how you ride, so they can't stop it
Then keep it poppin', lot of busters wanna see me fall
I fucked your bitch, and now this new shit, gon', fade 'em all
My niggas ball, made a call for some back-up
For lil' homies and my dogs in the black truck
"Buck buck" was the sound as they gats burst
No need for ambulance, baby, bring the black hearse
Should've never fucked around, buster
How you figure makin' moves on the wrong nigga

It's what it sounds like, ding ding ding..
When you fuckin' with the wrong nigga
Niggas gettin' hit, when they fuckin' with the wrong nigga
Fuckin' with the wrong nigga



Quit starin' at me like an infrared nigga
Don't fall to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't fall to sleep
You can get ya cash on

Pictures of penny, sippin' my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi—automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, 'cause I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die wit' open eyes
Scare to take a nap, it's a trap, a long maze
Dreamin' of gettin' stacks, makin' scratch the wrong way
What the song say, we murder motherfuckers daily
Black out blow the crack out, my lyrics never fail me
I inhale strong weed, then release the stress
Deliver the bomb shit from the east to west
Like yay-yo
Niggas pull out when I say so
Commence to poppin' motherfuckers copy me, it’s fatal
Efficiently I delete then flee
The art of war, livin' sucka free, get wit' me
Motherfucker don't sleep

Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

I'm starin' through my rear view, doin' 'bout 90
The pedal to the metal, so I can't see what's behind me
Buckle up your seat belt eyes on the road
They know we ridin' dirty gotta play it how it go
They close down the projects the clubs been closed
And then they wonder why niggas breakin' down o's
I'm a run away slave
Ya get it nigga off the chain
I got that thug life shit runnin' through my veins
And now they scare, they know that I been heaven sent
And yeah we know the dope comin' from the president
But look at us, we ain't got shit to lose
Feel like we ballin' if we got a new pair of tennis shoes
In the ghetto or better yet home sweet home
This is the land of the free, but to me that's wrong
I'm on my way to the white house strapped wit' my heat
So don't fall asleep
Come on niggas

Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

They say that the mo' they hate ya the mo' that it motivate ya
My mind set on grind, my mental set on the paper
62 hours and countin', and I'm still awake
And they slippin' me sleepin' pills, wit' the will I break
Broke nigga always tellin' ya how to make ya cash adjust
So I just stop listenin' and now my cash is up
Red dotted the media 'cause they always mad at us
I don't see 'em tryin' to mediate, when we get gats and bust
They just instigate and as soon as the get the tape
It's dropped from my nigga life just as soon as they get the case
Personally I ain't trippin' on all this rappin' stuff
I'm takin' back my money counter 'cause it wasn't fast enough, yep
Just those that love me to pretend to love me and say they buddies
Sometimes I want to maneuver with the Ruger
To live like Freddy Krueger these nightmares just ain't as bloody
In meetings they always askin' what my passion is
I can't relax 'cause it's like I'm a fetti activist
Might see me on TV never a mat-tress

Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep



Get money nigga
Yeah - aw yeah
Dedicate this one to all the hustlers
That get up every motherfuckin' mornin' and put they work in
I see you - I see you boy

I'm up before sunrise first to hit the block
Lil' bad motherfucker with a pocket full of rocks
Learned to throw them thangs, get my skinny lil' ass kicked
Niggas laughed, 'til the first motherfucker got blas-ted
I put the nigga in his casket
And now they coverin' the bastard in plastic
I smoke blunts on the regular fuck when it counts
Tryin' to make a million dollars out a quarter ounce
Gettin' ghost on the five-o, fuck them hoes
Got a forty-five screamin' out surviv-al
Hey nigga can I lay low, cook some ya-yo
Holla "five-o" when I say so
Don't wanna go to the Pen', I'm hittin' fences
NARC's on a nigga back missin' me by inches
And they say how do you survive, weighin' one-fifty-five
In the city where the little niggas die
Tell mama don't cry, cause even if they kill me
They can never take the life of a real G


Yeah, get paid nigga
Watch out of all this, nigga

Still on parole and I'm the first nigga servin'
Pour some liquor on the curb, for my homies that deserve it
If I wanna make a million, gotta stay dealin'
Kinda boomin' round the way, think today I make a killin'
Dressin' down like I'm dirty, but only on the block
Just a clever disguise, to keep me runnin' from the cops
I'm gettin' high, think I'll die if I don't get no ends
I'm in a bucket but I'm ridin' it like it's a Benz
I hit the strip I let my music buck
Drinkin' liquor and I'm lookin' for a bitch to fuck
Rather die makin' money, than live poor and legal
As I slang another ounce, I wish it was a kilo
I need money in a major way
Time to fuck my girl, she gettin' paid today, ha hah ha
I live Thug Life and let the money come to me
Cause they can never take the game from a young G


Yeah nigga, get paid
That's how we run the shit in '93 boy

Damned if I don't, and damned if a nigga do
Now watch a young motherfucker pull the trigger too
RAISE UP, and don't let them see ya cry
Dry your eyes, young nigga time for do or die
I pack a pistol in my pocket, ready on my Glock
Ain't no time for a nigga to even cock shit
I done seen a motherfucker peep pain
At point blank range cause he slept on the game
Ain't a damn thing changed, they shakin' the dice
Now roll 'em if you can't stand pain better hold 'em
Cause ain't no tellin' what ya might roll
You might fold catch AIDS from a slight cold
You better live ya life to the fullest
Be quick to kill a bull got a pistol motherfucker better pull it
And even if they kill me
They can never take the life of a young G


That's right nigga, that's right boy enough for love
Pass the shit



I was so money orientated, initiated as a thug
Fiendin' for wicked adventures, ambitious as I was
Picture a nigga on the verge of livin' insane
I sold my soul for a chance to kick it and bang
Now tell if I'm wrong
But sayin' "Fuck the world" got you deeper in my songs
Drinkin' 'til I earl, spendin' money 'til it's gone
It's the good life - maybe niggas got it goin' on
Now maybe if I died, and came back, wouldn't have to slang crack
Addicted to the game, so obviously we came strapped
Please forgive me for my wicked ways, fuck a bitch
Bad Boy niggas eat a dick a day, bumpin' this
Lord have mercy it's a slaughter
So wicked that my tracks is wettin' niggas like it's water
I learned my lessons as a thug in these wicked ass hood fights
But I'm a baller now, nigga, I live the good life

This is the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust the hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die
See, we live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die

No one knows what the, future holds, for you
Haha, listen closely
They say reach in yo' heart and you'll find your mind
Every day in the streets, got my foresight blind
My after time is narrow, peepin' down the barrel of a foe
Just a nigga or a killer I don't know so
Who makes the call will I fall a victim like the rest?
Slug in the chest, one in the dome and make sure I'm gone
Send me home all alone in these cold streets
In desperation constantly drinkin' and I can't sleep
Neck deep strugglin' tryin' to survive
Some wanna die I wanna stay alive, eyes on the prize
Let me modify this whole region
I declare this sucker duckin' season, give me the reason
Why I should change, into a softie
.. after livin' so loftily
It cost me my soul out of control in a devil's world
Me, my niggas, and my girl - livin' the good life!

We live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die
Uh ha, We live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die

I spend my days and nights not knowin' if, strays in flight
Gon' finally catch me, it's the good life, can you hear me?
Clearly over the edge, soon as I wake up
Last night we off the hook, doin' way too much
But it's the fast lane only, big dealin' big ceilin'
All for the money, some kill some squeal
All for the money, most ain't even real
But we still call 'em homies, now what the fuck is that?
Fake love, fake thugs are, all in the game
I watch 'em all plot and fall while we come up and gain
Outlaw never surrender is the call when you hear us comin'
Bitch nigga get to runnin' 'fore my click get to gunnin'
Still in the midst of all the stress and pain
We still tryin' to get a hold of the game
Livin' that good life

We live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die, uhh
We live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't, uhh
We live the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb niggas that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die, uhh
This is the good life, fuck my foes
God bless the dumb bitches that, trust these hoes
Found a way to stack money guaranteed to rise
And live the good life, 'cause thug niggas don't die



Late night coolin' with my homies
Drinkin' Hennessey and cold brew
After smokin', stopped in Oakland
Got the munchies for some soul food
So we stopped to get a bite to eat
At the local barbecue
It's just another boring Monday
And there's nothing else to do
Now as we stepped out of the car
I heard someone behind me fighting
So I turn to look and find out
What's the cause of this excitement
The brother was a dopefiend
And the other was a dopeman
And the dope man had an AK
Said he'll spray and he's not jokin'
Well it seems to be the dopefiend
Owed the dope man for his product
And he swore if he did not pay
He would end up getting shot up
Now I could not walk away
Cause I got caught up in the scene
Wondering what would happen to this
Poor and helpless fiend
Well my homie, Michael Cooley
Said let's go and make our order
What's the use in watchin' two men
Stand out here fight over quarters
While I walked inside the diner
And all the Dope Fiends waived to me
Heard the sound of several gun shots


Cause another innocent died

All the people in the diner
Ran outside to see the big show
It was just another party
For them to see just who they would know
But for me I held concern
I wanted to go see the outcome
Would the mother have her son tonight
Or would she live her life without one?
I made it to the streets I
Almost cried right on the spot
Not only had the fiend died
But a small girl had been shot
My heart could take no more
I felt a tear roll down my face
That was daddy's bullet
But she took it in his place

What's Going On?
Cause another innocent died

Tried to make my way through the crowd
So I could go help the baby
She could barely speak
But she whispered
Mister could you please save me
So I screamed out, someone help me
But I dont think they could hear
And if they did, they didn't care
Oh how I hated everyone there
The baby lie here dying
And I wondered what could I do
The camera men and newspapers had come
To get their interviews
To them it's just a story
And they can't see the tragedy
To them it doesn't matter
Cause it ain't it wasn't their family
I don't think I'll be back
Cause it'll never be the same here
So I wipe away the tears
And leave the scene the way I came here
Though some people say it's crazy
And the food could have been finer
I'll never forget, never forget the night
At Dopefiend's Diner

What's Going On?
Cause another innocent died
A mother cries

Do, do, do, do, do, do, do, do...



"Nobody's, closing me out of my business"
"Nobody's, closing me out of my business"
My definition of a thug nigga
"Nobody's, closing me out of my business"

I played the cards I was given, thank God I'm still livin'
Pack my nine til it's time to go to prison
As I'm bailin' down the block that I come from, still gotta pack a gun
Case some young motherfuckers wanna play dumb
I guess I live life forever jugglin'
But I'll be hustlin' 'til the early mornin' cause I'm strugglin'
Like drinkin' liquor make the money come quicker
Gettin' pages from my bitch it's time to dick her
I ain't in love with her, I just wanna be the one to hit her
Drop off and let the next nigga get her
That's the way it goes, it's time to shake a ho, make the dough
Break a ho when it's time to make some mo'
I keep my finger on the trigger of my Glock
Ridin' down the block lickin' shots at the punk-ass *cops*
And spittin' game through my mobile phone
The type of shit to get them hoes to bone
My Definition of a Thug Nigga

"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season... to be servin'"

Well I roll with a crew of zoo niggas
They're quick to pull a nine when it's time do niggas
Comin' through like I'm two niggas, a true nigga fuck a Zig Zag
Roll me a blunt and pass that brew nigga
I'm drivin' drunk on the freeway, so take it ea-sy
Lookin' for a new face to skeeze me
Everybody's lookin' for a nut but I'm searchin' for the big bucks
Give a fuck, rather die than be stuck
In a one-room shack, and, kickin' back
So how's that from the mind of a Thug Nigga
Bought a fo'-five cause I heard that the slug's bigger
Figure the first motherfucker to jump'll find hisself
Gettin' swept off his feet by the pump
I put that on my moms, word to the motherfuckin' trigger
Before I go broke I'll be a drug dealer, a Thug Nigga

"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"What you doin'?"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker"
"Tis the season... to be servin'"

Short than a motherfucker snatched up by one-time
Make a phone call and be back to ball by lunchtime
So here we go, we in the inner city
I keep my hand on my gat and stay cool, my attitude is shitty
Niggas don't like me cause I'm makin' ends
Roll in a Benz and I blaze a blunt, cause I'm all in
And any nigga tryin' to take what I got'll
So here we go, I can't be faded
Happy in the motherfucker, finally made it
Got my money in my pocket, finger on the trigger
And I ain't takin' shit from no niggas
I'm just tryin to make some money right
Put some motherfuckin' food in my tummy right
I'm feelin' good like I'm supposed to, ready to ball
Find a spot and we can serve em all
My Definition of a Thug Nigga

"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker every single day"
My Definition of a Thug Nigga
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker every single day"
My Definition of a Thug Nigga
"Tis the season, to be servin'"
"Mob-mobbin' like a motherfucker every single day"
My Definition of a Thug Nigga
"Tis the season... to be servin'"






As the world turns…
As the world turns my niggas grow and grow and grow
And get dough and roll and ride
Niggas die and mommas cry
Niggas got alibis and suicides and homicides
And three strikes and yo' life and my life and times change
And niggas fame, as the world turns…

Though I walk through the valley of Hell the shadow follows me. Wisdom hard to swallow tomorrow, expect apologies
You probably panic, stranded in search of a better planet
Realism hard to understand, we stand slanted
And still stranded. Merciless thieves stole the best of me
I pray to black Jesus to please take the rest of me
And still, the best of us build and reach monetary gains
Some of us kill, but still, most of us can change
If we search deeper
God bless the hustler, curse the first sleeper
Enemies get beside me, flows go deep as Poseidon
When we ride, plots keep all my enemies blinded
Time will soon show, a thought can last for years
Outshinin' your fake smiles, plastic tears
Like last year, niggas stuck in the past, and it's clear
Just some busta ass bastards allergic to cash this year
Makaveli for the mob, M.O.B
Killin' busters is my motherfuckin' job, him or me
Lyrically fatally driven, niggas reported missin'
My competition dead or in prison, as the world turns…

As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns, and steady turnin'
My niggas grow and grow and grow
And gettin' dough and dough and dough
From this state to that state
From this cell to that cell, as the world turns)

As the world turn, burnin' paths, starin' through my rearview
It's a war goin' on, and the President is here too
I hear 2Pac sayin', "Watch 'em, they'll kill you."
Sippin Thug Passion, scrub actin' like he feel you
Steady plottin', ready or not; Outlawz lost but not forgotten
From Gittere to Compton, a spitter of the hotness
I need cream to buy Ellene a dream house
She no longer fiend out y'all, Outlaw!

Another lonely nigga with a 12-gauge pump, with a 12-hour rush to run and get this money, fuck these punks!
Road rules, I swim in the dirt, I stay in some skirt
I hit where it hurts, I ride or die for my turf
I ride or die for Makaveli, the legendary war thug nigga
Kadafi better unslug this nigga, Seike betta undrug this nigga
Out of the buildin', we street children with no souls
Our hearts gon' stay cold, the war gon' stay on
We serve 'em, like 'Pac told us to, catch 'em wreck with the TEC
Hit 'em in the neck and watch him die like he supposed to
Rider for the mighty dollar, rather drunk than sober
Nigga talkin' thug walkin' all through yo' squad
Y'all niggas scared by a dog, I got my 44 for y'all
It's like a hot-heated day, homie
Warfare, don't play, homie, better be prepared
Then try to duck away from these strays, homie
Worlds turn, things burn, all in one shot. Rest in peace to the fallen soldiers, all that we got, as the world turns…

As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns… and steady turnin'
As the world keeps turnin' round and round

Only haters caught feelings when my homie caught millions
And acquired the desired status of boss livin'
We cross driven, cornered into a life that's hellish
Payin' our dues with bloodshed, ain't shit y'all could tell us
Fellas – mount up, it's time for battle, it's on now
Two worlds collidin', armies ridin', soldiers gone wild
Sometimes I think my glory days was back in my youth
I sought too for family, but I got it lost in these ounces
Now, as the world turns court adjourns, I'm sentenced to burn
The cost of my sins too much, nothin' left to earn

October 9th 1977 first day out my baby carriage
Married my MAC-11 hit the block playin'
Only five years up in this bitch, papa runnin' from the feds
Puttin' peanut butter on the walls to hide his prints
Me on my own, not yet grown, but only man of the home
To protect my zone in these streets I roam
Dough on d-low, downin' straight shots of Cristal Brothers
100 dollar snot box on cee-lo, fuck eighth
I need a kilo, got a plot, move my block down state
Got the drop on the spot, movin' pounds of weight
Fuck my fate and lots of loot to burn, a hustler's yearn
For this dirty money earned as this crooked world turns

As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns… and steady turnin'
As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns…
As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns...
As the world keeps turnin' round and round
It's gon' be goin' round as the world turns… and steady turnin'
As the world keeps turnin' round and round
As the world keeps turnin' round and round
As the world keeps turnin' round and round

Hahaha… as the world turns…
And turns and turns and turns… haha. This for the soldiers out there involved in the everyday struggle
Hopin' to bubble, keep on hustlin', as the world turns
Money come and go, hoes come and go, foes come and go, friends come and go… my soldiers stay eternal
Outlaw Immortalz, dedicated
I send this to black Jesus, only he can feed us
When you need us, as the world turns
Throw this shit in the deck, hahah
Niggas gettin chin checked
From the East to the West, best to wear a vest
Nigga we ain't the ones to test, fuck you!
As the world turns… Outlaw ridahs, Mutah right beside us
Camillion, wanna make a million
Haha legit, as the world turns, haha… burn, baby, burn

A lot of niggas gettin' burned as the world turns
Gettin' burned as the world turns)



My child is out there somewhere
under the skies above
waiting anxiously 4 u and me
2 bless it with our love
A part of me a part of u
and a part of this love we share
will protect my unborn child
who lives dormant out there somewhere
Sometimes in my dreams
I imagine what it would be like
How could I properly guide him
when even I don't know what's right
Whether he is born in wealth or poverty
there will be no deficiency in love
I welcome this gift of life
given from GOD under the skies above



High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
The Shit don't stop
Til my casket drop
I'm High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
The Shit don't stop
Til my casket drop
I'm High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
Shit don't stop
The shit don't stop

Game rules, ain't got time for fools
Money on my mind, so my nine rules
Time to, make weight, niggas gettin' crazy paid
And hatin' bitches for the games they play
So nigga, pull quick
But better be quicker than the next, motherfucker on the, trigger
Cause I'm static
Startin' to be a fuckin' havoc gotta keep my automatic, or get my ass kicked
When I'm in traffic, it's kinda rough and, I drive a bucket
Live the Thug Life nigga screaming, fuck it
I love to throw my middle finger to the police
And no bucks, no justice, no peace
Yeah, nigga, gettin' assed out
Rollin' in my nigga's glass house
Drivin' fast, talkin' to bitches, whippin' cash out
I'm with my niggas, so fuck the suckers, I'm buckin the busters
Smokin' chronic motherfuckers causin' ruckus
It's the last of the drank, pull over
Can't hear a damn thing sober

High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
The Shit don't stop
Til my casket drop
I'm High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
The Shit don't stop
Til my casket drop
I'm High 'Til I Die
Loced 'Til they smoke me
Shit don't stop
The shit don't stop

Lord help me save me
Mama keep prayin' for a young motherfucka
Tryin' to duck an early grave
In the city where you can't tell the fakes from the snakes
Enemies from phonies, friends from your homies
Around the corner there's another nigga waitin' to jack
He don't know I got a Glock 'til his ass get shot
Like a mutha fuckin' Thug disease
Cravin' Peace, like they motherfuckin' trustin' me
Hey, what's up with bitches tryin' to screw me
Do me cause I did a movie
Throw the pussy to me
But before they never knew me
Rather die then let yah
Play me for like a Busta
And with my Glock
I'm a plotin' ass rotten mutha fucka
Hey don't let that movie fool yah, let me school yah
Screamin' Thug Life nigga when I do yah
It's the last of the drank, pull over
Can't hear a damn thang sober
Cause I'm a




When your heart turns cold
it causes your soul 2 freeze
Spreads throughout your spirit
Like a ruthless feeling disease
The walls that once were down
Now stand firm and tall
Safe from hate/love, pain/joy
until u feel nothing at all
When ure heart turns cold
a baby's cry means nothing
A dead corpse is trivial
Mothers neglecting children is daily
Lonliness becomes your routine friend
Death seems like tranquility
Sleeping is never pleasant
if you even sleep at all
u forget ideals and turn off the reason
2 make sure the product is sold
You don't understand how I behave
Just wait till your heart turns Cold!



against an attacker I will boldly take my stand
because my heart will show fear 4 no man
but 4 a broken heart I run with fright
scared 2 be blind in a vulnerable night
I believe this fear is in every man
some will acknowledge it others will fail 2 understand
there is no fear in a shallow heart
because shallow hearts don't fall apart
but feeling hearts that truly care
are fragile 2 the flow of air
and if I am 2 be true then I must give
my fragile heart
I may receive great joy or u may return it
ripped apart



Hey 'Pac, it's yo' boy
Hey man so far I've been listenin' to your album
And I ain't heard nuttin you could kick back and smoke a beadie to
You know?

Yeah like that
Some of that mellow shit
Some of that shit that make bitches drink
Make niggas think
And help you check a fat-ass bank, hahah
So why don't you kick some of that shit, nigga only you know how
Hahahah, feel me?

I'm barely standin', and plus my secondhand say it's midnight
Some Alize and Cristal guaranteed to get right
Like misdemeanors is a small thang
With DJ Quik in this bitch, I let my balls hang
Runnin' through the street lights, cause we like
Yo' nigga get your mob on show 'em what a G like
Around the corner it's like Vegas, or better yet like Reno
Niggas poppin', welcome to our casino, cause you and me know
Hundred percent like a C-note
Lookin' for a bitch that's half-black and Filipino
And when I meet her I'ma offer her some Indo
Tongue-kissin' on the window of a pearl white limo
Don't wanna be your man, I'm your nigga
Touch me here, I'll get bigger
While I'm diggin' I'll get deep into your liver
I'm game type
Love fuckin' bitches in the same night
My words are aphrodisiacs if you say 'em right
The club be poppin' so I'm stoppin' at the Fat Burger
Look through the paper it's another black crack murder
The city's full of surprises, you can live or you can die
You can fuck on the first night, or try
In the late night

"Last night.. last night changed it all"
In the late night!
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"
In the late night!
"Last night.. last night changed it all"
In the late night!
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"
In the late night!

Around my way we lamp, many styles get cramped
I clock rocks in the rain 'til my socks is damp
Ain't nuttin like bein' a thug when I can just
Sit on the Row of Death straight knowin' that I'm blessed
Hussein Fatal, flawless fatality
Overdosin' on crime, three steps from reality
Get up to get down, represent your town, last night
Was poppin' like like cocked Glocks with hollow-tip rounds

From booty-calls to bail sheets
It ain't no tellin' if I wake up in the county in my jail sheets
My intuitions and ambitions up in the late night
Probably involves me comin' up with just to see another day
Might
Be me who bites the bullet
In these streets where a man journey
With crooked cops and a society who tryin' to burn me
I'm like a pit in a cage, spittin' my shells in a gauge
Deadly as AIDS, niggas gettin' crossed like a maze
Now picture me livin' my life like a king, maybe one day
Until then I'm livin' Monday through Sunday
Bringin' the gun play for all these beefs and battles
When we collide, I'ma ride on that hide like cattle, cowards best to skedaddle
In the late night

"Last night.. last night changed it all"
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"
"Last night.. last night changed it all"
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"

Money and multiple gunshots are shown, large amps are blown
Niggas in low-lows, pursuin' mo' hoes, then go home
The life of a California star, and when you see me
In the drop-top Jag', how many niggas wanna be me?
Game is automatic, mandatory I sell
To live or die, I survive, but with a story to tell
Cause when you gettin' some riches, watch for dumb bitches
They have you labelled a rapist before you get to tongue-kissin'
It's a mean world nigga you strapped, must be a throwaway
Will I survive the late night, to see dawn of day?
Nobody knows me, I'm a shadow
My army fatigues made for battle, pockets full of ammo
Cause when I'm out in the streets, I'm on point, where the static?
Too many done died from semis, so now we automatic
I disappear whenever heated, ride whenever needed
For my niggas up in Clinton gettin' weeded
Continue to roll until I'm old, ride until I die
Supply long as you motherfuckers buy
My homies rolled by in a bucket, but they ain't short and duckin''
Slappin' niggas known for tellin' bitches fuck-it
In the late night

"Last night.. last night changed it all"
It's in the late night!
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"
In the late night!
"Last night.. last night changed it all"
Holla at me in the late night!
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"



Held captive 4 your politics
They wanted 2 break your soul
They ordered the extermination
of all minds they couldn't control
4 u the fate was far worse
than just a brutal homicide
They caged u like an animal
and watched u slowly die inside
As u Breathe your first air of freedom
on the day u become a free man
Raise your Regal Brow in Pride
4 now you R in God's Hands
The life of many were given
so that the day would one day come
That the devils in Power at Pretoria
would pay for the evil crimes they've done



If there be pain,
all u need 2 do
is call on me 2 be with u
And before u hang up the phone
u will no longer be alone
Together we can never fall
because our love will conquer all

If there be pain,
reach out 4 a helping hand
and I shall hold u wherever I am
Every breath I breathe will be into u
4 without u here my joy is through
my life was lived through falling rain
so call on me if there be pain

Faithfully yours,
Tupac Amaru Shakur




Now I've got task on a nigga's ass
Tell me will they blast me
I think of an alias in case these crooked bitches ask me, now
It's gettin' crazy after dark
These narcs be like tryin' to shut me down but I'm too smart
Now picture me scared of the penetentiary
I've been movin' these things since the days of elementary
Now tell me what ya need when ya see me
I'm stackin' G's buyin' all the things on TV, believe me
I got some killas on my payroll and they know
When it's time to handle business nigga lay low
Although I'm young I'm still comin up
I'm gettin' paid pullin' razors on niggas when they runnin' up
The first to pull the strap when there's drama
Buster you ain't heard?
I been slicin' motherfuckers since I lost my mama
There ain't a cop that can stop me
My posse is cocky and they don't wait until they drop me
I'm loyal to the game

I do my thing respect my hustle I ain't playin'
You get in my way and I cock and pop that thing
If you know what I know then you know I ain't playin'
Nigga get in my way and I'll blow out your brain

Possessed by the streets you can't tell me that this ain't home
I can't eat if the rest of this shit ain't gone
I'm gettin' used to the needles on the bathroom sink
Gotta close my door because the bathroom stink
See, daddy don't work, and mama don't drink
But daddy do dope, and mama can't think
So look like I'mma be the man of the house
Gotta have somethin' to put in the air when it's out
Up early in the mornin' the first to get it
They say if you really want it then come on with it
Sacrifice my life for this ice and these cars
And I only spent 30 days behind bars
I ain't never had a job but my rent got paid
I handled any beef that they sent my way
So send me to the pen but you know I won't change
It's thug in my veins
I'm loyal to the game


Yeah
It ain't my fault I came up fast
And your the name niggas bring up last
And all the dames get a king up ass
10 grand on every ring I flash
Deep frog--and I'mma have to fling your ass
I'm on the block where it's scorchin' hot
If you get caught in the crossfire they have to throw you off the block
I get 'dro by the pickle jar
These broke niggas wanna get the star
So I don't keep the four-nickel far
My lips is zipped I'm loyal to the game
Bring your bitch around me I'm spoilin' her brain
Get more slugs to boil in your frame
Cause you got rocks and they got aluminum foil for a chain
The paint's the same color as oil in the Range
I'm stingy ain't got nothin' for you but some change
I'm good now but the fact still remains
That the struggle that I'm from is attached to my name


2Pac's in this motherfucker!
G-Unit in the motherfuckin' house
Banks!
Buck!



Now of course I want peace on the streets, but realistically
Paintin' perfect pictures ain't never worked, my misery
Was so deep, couldn't sleep through all my pressures
In my quest for cash I learned fast, usin' violent measures
Memories of adolescent years, there was unity
But after puberty, we brought war to our community
So many bodies droppin', it's gotta stop, I wanna help
But still I'm steppin', keep my weapon, must protect myself
The promise of a better tomorrow ain't never reached me
Plus my teachers was too petrified in class to teach me
Sippin' Thunderbird and grape Kool-Aid, callin' Earl
Since my stomach was empty it seduced me to fuck the world
Watch my lil' homies lose they childhoods to guns
Nobody cries no more, ‘cause we all die for fun
So why you ask me if I want peace if you can't grant it?
Niggas fightin' across the whole planet
So it could never be peace

Will there ever be peace, or are we all, just headed for doom?
Still consumed by the beast?
And I know there'll never be peace
That's why I keep my pistol when I walk the streets
‘Cause there could never be peace

Somebody owes me. Will they control me? Not
I ain't a hater player, but I want all you got
Y'all babies had babies, now we fightin' each other
My dawgs got frabies, they bitin' each other
And it ain't hard to find a friend like mine
Bigfully is a bullet and he don't mind dyin'
And I gotta be blind, missed sign after sign
Time after time after time after time
And I don't like nobody, they don't like me more
And I'm good with that finally, but they heard it before
Dawg, we livin' in a prison, losin' our religion
On Thanksgivin' we thankful, just for livin' in Hell
Damn, homie, I don't mean to be harsh
But there's a devil in the ghetto tryin' to tear it apart
And if we make it up out, we still stuck in the dark
Will there ever be peace? Just a piece of my heart. Never!

The only peace we got is a piece of our heart, piece of our mind, or that damn piece that we hold in our waistline
You feel me, dawg? C'mon, uhh

So will there ever be peace
Or are we all just headed for doom?
Still consumed by the beast?
That's why I keep my pistol when I walk the streets
‘Cause there'll never be peace

Thangs is changin', nigga, you better read the signs
I'm only concerned about me and mine in these times
The world is a ghetto and peace is not a part of it
We all believe God's new plan to make it out of this
Niggas spendin' too much time hatin' on each other
Niggas buyin' guns, loadin' 'em up, aimin' at each other
And the victim is you and me, it's sick, but it's true indeed
The good die, mostly over bullshit, repeatedly
Deep in me there's a part that wants nothing but love
But the rest of me know, war is what's waitin' for us
So I stays ready, keep my pay heavy and boss up
Stack my funds and my guns, never rely on luck
Askin' God to point out the impostor
Never let no weapon formed against me prosper
‘Cause there'll never be peace, so don't rely on it, soldiers dyin' for it, and in the ghetto, they cryin' for it. But fuck peace!

Will there ever be peace, or are we all just, headed for doom?still consumed by the beast?
And I know there'll never be peace
That's why I keep my pistol when I walk the streets
Fool, there'll never be peace
Will there ever be peace, or are we all just, headed for doom?still consumed by the beast?
And I know there'll never be peace
That's why I keep my pistol when I walk the streets
Nigga, there'll never be peace
Will there ever be peace, or are we all just, headed for doom?still consumed by the beast?
And I know there'll never be peace
That's why I keep my pistol when I walk the streets
Nigga, there'll never be peace
Will there ever be peace?

Will there ever be peace? Shit, fuck peace!
On the strength 'til my niggas get a piece, we can't have peace
How the fuck we gon' live happy when we ain't got nothing?
You motherfuckers are smilin', but I'm mean muggin'
Why? ‘Cause I gotta be thuggin'
It seems drugs done turned this whole mothafuckin' hood out
All us niggas actin' up, wild-ass motherfuckin' adolescents
These niggas ain't even got no childhoods no more
How the fuck can you have a childhood
And you at the funeral every motherfuckin' weekend?
Pssh, and you motherfuckers talkin' about peace?
Nigga, it ain't no motherfuckin' peace
You ain't seen the news motherfucker? You ain't heard? Lil' babies gettin' smoked, motherfuckers killin' they whole family
Lil' kids gettin' thrown off buildings
Motherfuckers gettin' abused
Peace? Nigga, is you out your fuckin' mind?
Fuck peace! We can't never have peace 'til you motherfuckers clean up this mess you made
'Til you fuckin' clean up the dirt you dropped
'Til we get a piece, fuck peace! Westside



'Cause I hate to spend my life, my life, my life, my life
How it start, how it start?

Started off with runnin' from coppers
Duck and hide from helicopters
We open fire, who can stop us?
Livin' the life of trife juveniles, hopin' for Rikers
Gettin' 25 to life if the judge don't like us
In my clearest pictures, I see authorities itchin' to get us
ATF state Feds, scandalous bitches
How was it promised to us, wasn't bitter or sweet
See, if a nigga don't hustle, then the nigga don't eat
On these streets, livin' do or die, circle complete
Repetitive motions of felons in a rush for G's
Please understand my history, a man of many hats
Livin' Thug Life, comin' equipped with plenty gats
Maybe I was just a lost soul, trapped in time
Livin' in between life, in the cracks, but blind
Even though we have hope for dreams that never came
Yet and still we all feel pain

Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time
Stranded in the County in the worst way
Hell of a way to spend my 21 birthday
Born in the ghetto as a street thug
It's for the neighborhood and weed spots that we love
Lost souls… lost souls, nigga
For my homeboys that passed on
Words from the mind of a lost soul
Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time

My brother Sean, first on my list, he stuck with a three-five
When he get out, would I be dead or alive?
He taught me the rules so much, but still In Thugs I Trust
When in danger never hesitate to keep my fuckin' trap shut
My mom dukes got a little bit of thug in her
Sometimes I feel like the streets are takin' over
Never stayin' sober, the brain over and over
Backtrack, my stack's fat, I used to take new
One love to my crew, ayo, this one's for you

R.I.P. … rest in peace to Mu grandmother
Know what we gotta do, baby, one-time

Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time
Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time!
One-time! One-time! One-time!

I was born 22 years ago yesterday
But see, I saw no reason for me to celebrate
Let me demonstrate
Entered the world from out a poisonous womb
Heroin bein' consumed, already predictin' my doom
Soon to be one of the many misguided
Always the first one on the block to be done, tried it and liked it
Lost before I had a chance to find my way
Now I travel through life, not knowin' the time of day
Crime for pay, I'm on my way
But don't know where I'ma end up
I swear to God, it's just a set-up
And these are the words from the mind of a lost soul

Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time
Just wait until rain turn to sunshine
‘Cause I hate to spend my life
My life, my life, my life duckin' one-time

All of y'all, keepin' y'all in hell
To all of y'all, keepin' y'all in hell
Just to see you smile and enjoy yourself
To all of y'all, keepin' y'all in hell
Just to see you smile and enjoy yourself

For all my dogs, keepin' y'all in hell
Just to see you smile and enjoy yourself
For all my dogs, keepin' y'all in hell
Just to see you smile and enjoy yourself
For all my dogs, keepin' y'all in hell
Just to see you smile and enjoy yourself

Throw your hands up!
Throw your hands up!
Throw your hands up!
Throw your hands up!



you ask me 2 communicate
what it is I feel within
I search 4 words 2 assist
but I find none 2 help me begin
I guess love is just complicated
Love
just
complicated.

I thought I knew my heart's desire
I thought I quenched my burning fire
I thought I wanted "A"
But "A" was 2 mixed up with "B"
Then "C" made me more confused
So "A" turned off me and "B" feels
better. "C" is upset and lonely
and me, I think Love is complicated.
Love
just
complicated.



Well, I just heard some shit on this record
I send this out to that biatch; you too, nigga!
Believe that like you believe crack kills, you stupid mothafucka!

You must be so so crazy
Bitch, I'll beat your boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades
Bitches can't fade me
Plottin' but they ploys crashed
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades

Have you really thought about your part in this participation?
My prediction bloody murder similar to ministration
Now in fairness to conversation
‘Cause it's your fate so take the time
To contemplate what you'll be facin'
Talkin' that Hip-Hop shit, don't get shot, bitch
‘Cause you can tell all in your clique to eat Pac's dick
The clip's in, prepare for the mothafuckin' death blow
‘Cause every rapper in the industry is history, it's Death Row
Not Bad Boy or So So Def
I make you bow before Tha Row like them other hoes
The intricate design of my lethal lines, criminal rhymes
From the mind of a thug shaking state time
Take it to the next phase; you had your time to talk shit
Now bitchless busters getting checkmated
These days mothafuckas talk shit and turn snitch
When you see 'em they ain't talking about shit; Westside!

You must be so so crazy
Bitch, I'll beat your boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades
Bitches can't fade me
Plottin' but they ploys crashed
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades

See, by now the way this shit is situated
Niggas is getting eliminated simply for being affiliated
Clearly stated and, man, I know you hate it
We got a whole list to play with
And y'all niggas is at the top, now let's make this
Happen, fuck the rappin', let's get to scrappin'
So niggas can see what happens
When you get caught up in dirty-mackin'
EDI'll send you packin', you know we love action
Sneak up on attack, pull back, let's the slugs snap in
Your chest section, Death has now stepped in
Bitch, should have learnt your lesson
While your chance was still present
But now it's past tense, no question askin'
Out West it's called mashin', bailing the corner blastin'

You must be so so crazy
Bitch, I'll beat your boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades
Bitches can't fade me
Plottin' but they ploys crashed
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades

You must be so so crazy; bitch, I'll beat yo' boy bad
Driving in the truck with my black MAC
Thinkin' about the shit I never had, so I'm loading up one
And the two things that I cherish is money and guns
I love my ones and I'll put blood on you
Snatch money from you, leave slugs in you
Ain't no nigga breathing fucking with Pac
Every album that he drop, nigga, number one spot, nigga
Locked, nigga, let me represent for my dead ones
Eat with my loved ones, squeeze when the beef come
Chill when the freeze comes, I do that shit
You think you heavy in the game? Watch me move you, bitch!
This Napoleon, why did I say I again?
You punk niggas already know I ain't for show
And I'll die for the dough, nigga, that's for sho'
Never die for a ho, nigga, that's a no-no

You must be so so crazy
Bitch, I'll beat your boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades
Bitches can't fade me
Plottin' but they ploys crashed
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades

Who I'm gonna call when a mothafucka feeling sad?
My mothafuckin' comrades
Who I'm gonna call when a mothafucka doing bad?
My mothafuckin' comrades
And fuck yo' bitch, ‘cause you a trick anyway
‘Cause my comrades was raised on pistol play
And boss playerism mixed with this thugism
So ain't no love in 'em, nothin' but the fuckism

Last verse is for them trick people, this is the sequel
I'ma treat you with evil, living forever illegal
Now homicide got me preoccupied
Be a lie if I told you that I never wonder when will I die
Be assured, nigga, word born
‘Cause now it's on, you can only survive if you be strong
Until I'm gone I'll bust on Bad Boy
Middle finger to Da Brat, don't get your young ass smacked

You must be so so crazy
Bitch, I'll beat your boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades
Bitches can't fade me
Plottin' but they ploys crashed
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades

Look here, you mothafuckas knew when you wrote this shit
When you spoke this shit, when you smoked this shit
Uh, that you couldn't fuck around with us
Now what the hell possessed you to get on record
And play yourself like that?
Nigga, is you fuckin' nuts? Do you know who the fuck we are?!
Nigga, do you know who the fuck we are?!
Rectify yo' silly ass, you better put out an apology out, nigga
Before I yank that ass out the game, stupid mothafuckas!
Don't you know I don't give a fuck?
I'm mad at the world, fuck all you trick-ass niggas!
This Thug Life, nigga, Outlaw Immortalz, Westside
Thought you knew, Westcoast, nigga
All day long, fuck the world!
You must be so so crazy; bitch, I'll beat yo' boy bad
Standin' in the midst of my comrades, ha ha ha
Fuckin' with the midst of my comrades
My mothafuckin' comrades!



Pictures of plenty, sippin' my glass full of henny
Hands on my semi—automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact 'cause I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire niggas die wit' open eyes
Scare to take a nap, it's a trap a long maze
Dreamin' of gettin' stacks, makin' scratch the wrong way
What the song say, we murder motherfuckers daily
Black out blow the track out, my lyrics never fail me

It's like a throne that he don't even own
He won't sit down give him a crown he just throws it around
It's like a joke he's like a king but he don't do a thing
He don't want the diamonds, want the gold or want the jewelry
He don't want the room or want the loot he's in it for the sport
Running circles 'round his competition on the court
He appreciates your support but he ain't begging for it
And you can love and you can hate it
But you can't ignore it, you can't be that ig-nor-ant
But you can try to sell him short
But you can't fuck with his last joint or the one before it
And he was born to raise hell like them country boys
And If I'm fronting man you better come confront me for it

The one I wore on Mondays and Wednesdays
While niggas flirt
I'm sewing tigers on my shirt
And alligators
Ya wanna see the inside, huh, I see ya later
Here come the drama, oh
That's that nigga wit' the fake, blaow!
Why you punch me in my face?
Stay in ya place
Play ya position, here come my intuition
Go in this nigga pocket

Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

Often, it's a young nigga, in a coffin
Tryin blossom, got shot down walkin, heh
Bleek a high to hot guy, turned cold
Bring the body bag, see the bullet hole and a burned soul
Don't cry, he chose the life
Fast lane, in the brain, he supposed to fight
How you smile at a momma when she lost a child?

I inhale strong weed then release the stress
Deliver the bomb shit from the East to West
Like yay-yo
Nigga's pull out when I say so
Commence to poppin' motherfuckers copy it fatal
Efficiently I delete then flee
The art of war, livin' sucka free, get wit' me
Motherfucker don't sleep

You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep



Punk Police
FUCK THE POLICE

Oh you too, nigga
Don't think we ain't talking about your punk ass
You ol' fake ass nigga

Here we go
Turn it up let it start
From block to block we snatchin hearts
And jackin' marks
And the punk police can't fade me
You made me
Crooked-ass beast something daisy

But right now
I got my mind set up
Lookin down the barrel of my nine
Get up
Cause it's time to make that pay back
Fact
And my brothas on the block better stay strapped
Black

And accept no substitutes
I bring truth to the youth
Tear the roof off the whole school
Oh no, I won't turn the other cheek
Case you can't see
This what we burned the other week -uh

Now we go him in the smash - blast
How long will it last until the po' get mo' cash?
Until then, RAISE up
To my young black males, BLAZE up

Life's a mess
Don't stress - test
Or give in
But be thankful that you livin bless
Much love to my brothas in the Pen
See ya when I free ya
Not when they shove me in


Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin' it fly

Tell 'em

Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin 'it fly

Tell 'em

Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin' it fly

Tell 'em

Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin 'it fly

Pump your fists like this
Holla if you hear me
Pump pump if you're pissed
To the sell-outs, livin it up
One way or another you'll be givin' it up - hugh

I guess cause I'm black-born
I'm supposed to say "peace" sing songs and get capped on
But it's time for a new plan - BAMN!
I'll be swingin like a one man klan

Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin' it fly

Tell 'em

Thug for life
High till I die
Shootin crooked-ass cops
Lettin 'it fly


"The good part about is, we get to show the human side of cops doing what they do
Cause, it's always been my belief that cops are just a gang themselves- with the good and the bad
Like I believe the gang bangers on the street got both good and bad like the police officers do
They got stress and they got character flaws that come from their lifestyles

I could be the best actor that anybody seen
Given the chance, the opportunity, and the experience and the lessons from people, I could be the best...
But right now I don't wish to the best, I just want to be one of them

If you look at it from a stereotypical point of view, like how people say, you know
'All your troubles with the law, how can you play a cop?'
Just from a stereotypical point of view
Who could play a cop better?
More than anybody, know what I mean? I been there. I just got out of maximum penitentiary



Pssst... psssssst... heyyoo...
Are you afraid to die, or do you wanna live forever
Tell me, which one ?

They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- I'm losin my mind
Look down the barrel of my nine and my vision's blurry
Fallin to pieces, am I guilty?
I pray to the Lord but he ignores me unfortunately cuz I'm guilty
Show me a miracle I'm hopeless -- I'm chokin off marijuana smoke
With every toke its like I'm losin focus
Fallin to sleep while I'm at service, when will I die?
Forever paranoid and nervous because I'm high
Don't mention funerals I'm stressin, and goin nutty
And reminiscin bout them niggas that murdered my buddy...

The motherfuckers pass
By me like they know me, smilin as they laugh
I put up my middle finger then I dash
Niggas don't like me cuz I'm thuggin' and everyday I'm a hustler...
Lookin to get paid

I wonder when will I be happy, ain't nothin funny
Flashbacks of bustin caps, anythin for money
Where am I goin I discovered, can't nothin save me
My next door neighbor's havin convo with undercovers
Put a surprise in the mailbox, hope she get it
Happy birthday bitch, you know you shouldn'ta did it
Everydoy's dyin am I next -- who can I trust?
Will they be G's, and they look at me before they bust?
Or will they killin me while I'm sleepin, two to the head
While I'm in bed, leakin blood on my satin sheets
Is there a heaven for a baller? I'm gettin suspicious
Of this bitch the line busy everytime I call her
Now she's tellin me to visit, who else is home?
I check the house before I bone, so we all alone
After I nut I hit the highway -- see ya later
To all the players watch the fly way a nigga played her


The bitch tellin all her homies -- that I can fuck her like no other
Now them other bitches wanna bone me
I'm under pressure gettin drunk, somebody help me
I drink a fifth a Hennesey I don't think it's healty
I see my enemies they creepin, don't make me blast
I watch the five-oh's roll, the motherfukers pass
They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- no need to lie
I pray to God I don't scream when it's time to fry
Nowhere to rest I'm loosin homies, ain't that a bitch
When I was rich I had clout, now a nigga's lonely
I put the pistol to my head -- and say a prayer...
I see visions of me dead, Lord are you there?


Then tell me am I lost cuz I'm lonely
I thought I had friends but in the end a nigga dies lonely
Nowhere to run I'm in terror -- and on one cares
A closed casket at my funeral and on one's there
Is there a future for a killer? I change my ways
But still that don't promise me the next day
So I stay thuggin with a passion, forever blastin
I'm bustin on these motherfuckers in my madness
They wonder if I'm hellbound... well hell can't be worse than this cuz I'm in hell now
Don't make me hurt you I don't want to -- but I will
Seen motherfuckers killed over phone bills
Never will I die I'll be back
Reincarnated as a motherfuckin mack
I love it cause in Heaven there's no shortage on G's
I'm tellin you now, you motherfuckers don't know me... you don't know me


Hustlerrrrr



Nuthin' but a gangsta party
Nuthin' but a gangsta party

Got me up against the fence, back against the wall
Get to actin' like a fool if ain’t no justice for the Dogg
Got to take it out on all, y'all
Better read the papers, all my homies goin' crazy, baby
Only God could save us
Got my, mind on currency, hurry, see I ain't worried
It's a gangsta party so, Bad Boy gettin' buried
Snoop Dogg, why they fantasize
When we ride it’s a must adversaries die every time

Yes, yes, y'all, not $hort but Snoop Dogg
And you know it's like that y'all

I'm so smooth about my paper check it just how it's done
I'm servin' any on a platter Snoop Dogg Corleone
Corleone, now do you know what that mean?
A Teflon Don to this hip-hop game, super supreme
It's like what happen can happen but will it stop
That won't happen I'm feelin' good about the mission for jackin'
*singing*
Ayo Pac, can you feel me?
Why these fools, tryin' to kill me?
*rapping*
It's so hard to stay focused on my eyes and prize
But if I don't, the Dogg won't survive

We ballin' in my opinion, eternal was wild wheel spinnin'
Once implemented it’s represented for five minutes
Two of the livest wanted dead or alive
We riders, ban us cause we inquired and watch the G's ride
Two of America's most, straight out the West Coast
Bow down fool, this is Death Row
Been waitin' way too long, fresh out the pen, now it's on
C'mon, Snoop Dogg, time to bone

Ain't nothin' changed too down to hang I slang a bang with a rhyme
Me and the homey Pac trippin' Death Row on knobs
Gon survive by Eastside of DPG'z
Still creepin bump through the hood, always involved in the streets
Snoop Doggy Dogg homie, did you forget who I was
The big homie to you, there it is and there it was
Now take a look through the eyes of a G
And just ride to the rhythm of a gangsta beat

All my homies tellin' me
Ain't no love for a real G
Straight cowards all you playa haters kill me
Throw up your hands if you feel me
We gettin' dollars, homie, holler if you hear me
It's one time for my comrades doin' bad lockdown
Fresh out bust the top and bounce drop down
Can you visualize perfection
Cause every ryder in my set labelled a vet best in their profession
Don't hold your breath, stick to Smith & Wesson
Steady study your lessons to keep the crowd guessin'

Straight gangsta, y'know
Money to be made, situations get deeper
Niggas always tryin' to creep
But I know what time it is

Gangstas, yeah yeah yeah
Yeah, gangstas
Play or stay
Yeah, play or stay
Y'know? Stay a gangsta
All my doggs, all my niggas on lockdown, Big Dogg
It's for you nigga
We gonna ride this motherfucker til the wheels fall off
Yeah yeah
Play or stay
Yeah, play or stay
Yeah yeah, play or stay
Yeah yeah, Death Row!
Yeah yeah, my nigga 2Pac rest in peace
Dogg Pound
Dippin real hard y'knowhatI'msayin?

Yeah yeah, stay down
Gangstas gangstas
Foe life, Eastside!
Westside of the coast
Yeah, Eastside!
Mmmm, for all my soldiers
Yeah
Where ya at?
Yeah

Y'know? Yeah
Stay down
For real
Y'know? What it look like?
Mmm, what it feel like?
It ain't easy, y'know? Death Row




Stand in formation, my motherfuckin' real troopers
Let's do it like soldiers - all and together now!
Ready? Hell yeah, y'all niggas better get ready
No retreat, no surrender, death before dishonor motherfucker!
Do it to 'em, c'mon never die thuggish, uhh - YES YES YES
Where my real thugs, where ya at, where ya at?
Where my real thugs, where ya at, where ya at?
Where my real thugs, where ya at?!
Hehehe, send cases to the drug dealer
Real thugs, where ya at? You motherfuckin' home
Do it to 'em, do it to 'em
They love the way we do it to 'em, we do it to 'em

Suppress the revolution of premeditated scheme
Introduce a drug called crack to us ghetto teens
Got a law for raw niggas, now, playa what it be like?
When will niggas see they got us bleedin' with three strikes?
Can't seem to focus hopeless, with violent thoughts I wrote this
Got these Devils petrified, hidin' from my hocus-pocus
And so I learned to earn my currency and over time
Affiliated, clearly click a military mind
May God forgive us though we dwell inside a paradox
Thugged out and drug dealin', from the womb to the block
My forty-five got me fortified with live rounds
When shit's thick we plot hits, when our Glock spits
All hail, out on bail, wrath of the 2Pacalypse
Forever ghetto necessary picture food stamps
Outlaw Thug Niggas never left the boot camp



They called us for assignment, one of the squad's finest
Skills in guerilla warfare and blessed with refinement
My rap sheet, contains sections of bomb sessions
Says I'm responsible for black Smif-N-Wessun
Puttin likkle yout's in a military state of mind
Dangerous like chronic and yard when combined
Cocoa Brovaz 'pon de borderline
Test de sound and ye dead same ti-ime

Man to man, I'm facin' the Devil with a plan
Judo stance, first glance, I'm makin' my advance
Animal instincts, intelligence of an assassin
Masked men, ninjas that surround me, ready to attack
I react swiftly, what father taught me sticks with me
Never forget the method, stick and move strictly
Shit be seemin' like it's closin' in
With no regrets I hold position
Cause I suppose I'm one of the chosen men

Picture being put in a position to move
And you can't move cause your move is blocked by the knight
At twelve o'clock, that's when the madness begins
So I start to focus in, my thoughts on the war
Cause the rule is the law, and the law that we live by
Is to stay true to self, in this case, BDI
Why try if ya body lie
By the block true soldier mentality, this is how we rock and roll

Stick and move, time to show 'em how to make a move
Or get moved on, let's see who strong

In the gaze of the strange, where nothin stays the same
Where new faces come through with similar game
Now who you thought was them, really ain't
They catchin' deja vu's of the game people play
It's a call for readjustment, fine tune yo' position
You slippin' and trippin' 'stead of bobbin and dippin'
But never let this world of stress get the best of me
Takin' breathin' techniques, slay you with Tai-Chi

What does it take, to get a break in the world of snakes
And dose who fake
Elimination I'm facin' destruction
Outlawed, so I duck and down, fo'-fo' is bustin', no one to trust in
Rushin' to the goal line
Catch a nigga beat him treat him like he stole mine
No swine I'm a soldier, soldier I control mine
Time to, take you, back into time - follow dis here

One way out, this black hole
For this black soul, shit is outta control
I'm fightin' for my position to be a fetus in this world I'm enterin'
And my face is sentencin' for repentance
Before my body was fully formed into a human
I was already consumin' weed
Cause my moms used to smoke back in the 70's
Maybe that's why in the 90's I drop G's when I drop degrees
When I ease across the block with 'Pac
Got all y'all niggas shocked
You didn't think Boot Camp Clik would link, with a Outlaw mind?
If you do you press rewind
And you can peep guerilla tactics in every line

Yeah, and this is how we do it!
Where my real thugs, where they at?
Let me, see my real thugs, now where ya at?
Won'tcha, see my real thugs, where ya at?
Let me, see my real thugs, where ya at now?
Where my real thugs, let me see, where ya at?
Tell me where my real thugs gots to see, where ya at?
Where's my soldiers - where ya at?
Where my, real soldiers - where ya at?
Where my soldiers at; where ya at, where ya at?
Get yo' strap my nigga; where ya at, where ya at?
Where my soldiers at; where ya at, what ya at?
Getcha, thug niggas where ya at, witcha strap?
Where my soldiers at, where my true thug niggas
No longer drug dealers cause we now, thug niggas
Where my soldiers at, no longer drug dealers
Cause we now, thug niggas, let me, where my
Where my soldiers at?, put your pistols in the air
Where my soldiers at?, put yo' guns up
Tell me where my soldiers at?, put yo' pistols in the air
Where my, SOLDIERS, my true thug ROLLERS
Yes, it just doesn't quit, YES!
This is that real hip-hop shit YES!
Fuck what you heard
From the ghetto to the 'burbs, know we meant, every word
Where my SOLDIERS?, where my soldiers at
Where my SOLDIERS?, where my soldiers at
Put yo' hand on the pistol, put yo' pistols in the air
Where my soldiers at?, where my soldiers at?
Where my SOLDIERS?, where my soldiers at
Where my SOLDIERS?, where my soldiers at
When Bob Dole and Delores Tucker wanna know
Where my soldiers at, GO VOTE!!



let's not talk of money
let us forget the world
4 a moment let's just revel
in our eternal comradery
in my Heart I know
there will never be a day
that I don't remember
the times we shared
u were a friend
when I was at my lowest
and being a friend 2 me
was not easy or fashionable
regardless of how popular
I become u remain
my unconditional friend
unconditional in its truest sense
Did u think I would forget
Did u 4 one moment dream
that I would ignore u

if so remember this from here 2 forever
nothing can come between us



From my mind 2 the depths of my soul
I yearn 2 achieve all of my goals
And all of my free time will be spent
On the 1's I miss I will lament

I am not a perfectionist
But still I seek perfection
I am not a great romantic
But yet I yearn 4 affection

Eternally my mind will produce
ways 2 put my talents 2 use
and when I'm done no matter where I've been
I'll yearn 2 do it all again.



Ahahah yeah!, my homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Uh, yeah!, my homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Westside, westside
Part two of the war

Cross this nigga here, now Biggie tell me who do you fear?
Ain't a livin' soul breathin' shall pump no fear here
My last foe flashed then I mashed his ass
Bastard, fuck with me, bet I blast your ass
So many follow but can't reach me, caught in the maze
Catch them, mimickin' my style tryin' to walk this way
Impossible my posse droppin' you, we Death Row riders
No need to beg, motherfucker, ain't no mercy inside us
Feelin' blessed, the richer I get, the more I stress
Smokin' lye watchin' time fly, waitin' for death
Dear God I been feelin' like I'm close to Jesus
Paranoid with my pistols close, smokin' trees
Keep my eyes on my foes, those close to me
Watchin' niggas catch strays, shake, choke and bleed
Me, a mercenary for the streets, check my pedigree
Bustin' motherfuckers it's the thug in me
Now niggas talk a lotta Bad Boy shit, then get to squealin'
Bitch made catchin' feelins

Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins

Yeah, Napoleon!

Picture me sippin' on 1-5-1
Drunk than a motherfucker droppin' my gun
Or high as a kite hittin' hoes for fun
But that ain't me, dog, my mind's now clear
And that ain't fair, dog, your heart pump fear
In the state I, shoot you better hide nigga, chute is near
And you know just as well I do
You ain't no killer, so kill that, you wouldn't kill if you had to
We might wobble, but we don't fall down
We take the gospel from Makaveli, pass it around
Holla "let's hit", we gon' taste the power
We started the thug trend, the game is ours
Now we coast together, put our thoughts together
Won't question when we die together
Cause the hour soon to come
Kadafi trained soldier, I show you how to use your gun
Bring it

Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins

We yellin' "M-A-D-E N-I-double G-As
Motherfuckas, and we here to stay
From curb surfin', we workin' the industry, you kiddin' me
It's really nothing to me and my king, you see
We in the big things, eat a dick man, if you're hatin'
We're gonna ride 'til the wheels fall off, pay attention
Screamin' "Bye bye bitches, untouchable sound"
Ride or die niggas, and we huntin' you down
Representin' all the real niggas stuck in the trap
Bangin' out with the po-po, tryin' to get to some more
Street life, young strugglers racin' the clock
Ain't no tellin' when it all can end, roll a rock
That's the world with feelings, this a man's world youngin
The bitches in business, so learn a little something
Hey, stop runnin' your mouth, you're on the verge of squealin'
Bitch made catchin' feelins

Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins

Everybody's a gangsta, but don't put in work
Instead of puttin' on the armor, niggas put on skirts
These drugs ain't helpin', it only makin' it worse
And the streets ain’t got nothing for me but a hearse
I can't trust the church or the mobs, I can only trust God
And to tell you the truth I gotta ride
I only roll with the real
Cause rollin' with the fake got my loved ones killed

Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins




By age thirteen I was buckwild, good at my knuckle game
Made it through a tough childhood never be the same
Walked in my daddy's shoes
No time to be a peaceful man had to shatter fools
That's 'til I put my eyes on you
God damn, sweetheart you got some thighs on you
Now I can't wait to get you home, get you all alone
In my bedroom, baby can we bone, and get it on
Tell me lady how you like me
And if you want it harder baby, come and bite me
But do it lightly
Cause that excites me to lay the pipe
And if you lick me right, I'll do it all night
Only got fucked by a drug dealer
Though I like the way you scream when you lovin' me
I'm goin' deep, it's the thug in me
So whatchu sayin' girl?

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you, give it to me
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you.. can you check it

Moan baby when we bone it's on
It's so strong niggas in the next room'll cum
I got ya head swingin'
Give me space, as I lick ya face, stick the place
Synchronize so I drive when they kick the bass
Love fuckin' in tha mo'nin'
I get ya wet and bust a sweat, then I'm gone
Left you on yo' own girl
Tell me what you feel like
Blindfolded, I'm cold do it real nice - that's if it feel right
Maybe it's the thug in me
I pull ya hair while we fuckin' in the chair, when ya lovin' me
Up against the wall, you can have it all; just try
Bet my kiss, to get you high, don't pass by
Grab me by my nuts when I'm lovin' you
Now open up and let me put the thug in you

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you, give it to me
That I wanna put in you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you, can you check it
I got a lot of thug in me, do you want it

Say baby what's your phone number?
Be warned, I'm like a storm with my own thunder
I make the room rumble, in and out long stroke
Hold ya breath now, close your eyes deep throat
Did you like it?.. Oooh I'm excited!
Cause it's a party in my bedroom, you're invited
C'mon now, let me see ya shake your rump
Tell me, how long will it take to cum
Havin' fun, do it one on one and we can all get involved
First y'all do me, then I'll fuck y'all
When you call me the next day
To get sexed by a nigga in the best way
Yeah baby it's a price to pay
Only play in the fast lane
When you a hustler, motherfuck a cash came
I gotcha goin' wild, 'cause I'm lovin' you
Drugged out with this motherfuckin' thug in you

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
I got a lot of thug in me
That I wanna put in you and you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
I got a lot of thug in me
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
That I wanna give to you girl

Oh yeah!.. like me!..yeah.. look at me baby..yeah..yeah
Like me! .. you do..

I hold a lot of thug in me, you hold a lot of thug in ya
I hold a lot of thug in me
I hold a lot of thug in me, I hold a lot of thug in ya
I hold a lot of thug in me
Now c'mon, I hold a lot of thug in me
Hold a lot of thug in you, hold a lot of thug in me
C'mon, hold a lot of thug in me
Gotta be some thug in ya, gotta be some thug in me
C'mon, hold a lot of thug in me
I gotta be some thug in ya
Can you feel it?
I hold a lot of thug in me, I gotta be some thug in ya
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah

I don't wanna talk, I don't want no explanations
I don't got no motherfuckin' explanations, y'knahmsayin?
It's the thug in me
Don't be askin' why I'm pullin' your hair
And why I fuck so motherfuckin' thuggish
That thug passion, y'knahmean?
Bitch, no mercy
What you scared of?
You ain't come over here for me to be
Strokin', and all that bullshit
Shit, if I ain't fuck you thug style
Bitch you'd leave my house talkin' bout, "2Pac can't serve me"
Won't have me crossed up in that bullshit, hahaha
Turn over! maybe it's the thug in me! ..



2Pac and Lil' Mo, hmm, how gangsta is that?
Hehe.. ooooh-oooh, ooooh-oooh, ooooh-oooh

{*Mo keeps harmonizing in the background*}

One two.. to a nigga nature, haha..
No need to cry now, go wipe your tears, be a woman
Why you actin' surprised? You saw the bullshit
Comin' fake hair, fake nails, fake eyes too
So why you, bound to fuck wit fake guys too
Ain't nothin' hard about it why you lookin' sad? Shoulda though about it
Say you learned, I truly doubt it
I guess you got a problem with affection, kinda loose with the love
Gettin' freaky with the thug niggas up in the club
Ask to buy you a drink, you holla Dom Pérignon
Knowin' I'm a cash getter still I, remain calm
Let you chill with me; plus you was smilin' 'til the bill miss me
That's what you get for tryin' to dick me
Missed me with that "Buy me this, buy me that" syndrome shit
Bitch get a job if you wanna be rich
Gettin' mad cause I cursed and I scream I hate'cha
Introduced you to a nigga nature, feel me?

Kissed the girls, made them cry
Thuggin' life, and gettin' high
Why you gangsta, all the time?
Though sometimes, I can deal with it
I realize, that I'm feelin' it
It's a love and hate relationship
But that's a thug's nature

I'm probably too nice at first, I let you kiss me where it hurts
Me and you gettin' busy, slingin' dick in the dirt
Met you at a pool party it was cool to kick it
See us, tounge-kissin', you was truly with it
Little ecstacy, Hennesey, mix with me
Picture me pay for pussy when the dick's for free
Hey now, where my niggas at? Tell these hoes
Before I pay; I jerk off, word to Moses
Visions of you sittin' there sweaty and wet
Pointin' to the places that you want me to hit
Give me room all up in the womb, call the cops
Nigga, hittin' walls 'til them bastard drop
Label me Makaveli - thug nigga with bite
Livin' life like a rock star's Friday night
Make money, get pussy, always keep a pager
Cell phone in the ride to complete my nature now!

Kissed the girls, made them cry
Thuggin' life, and gettin' high
Why you gangsta, all the time?
That's a thug's nature
Though sometimes, I can deal with it
I realize, that I'm feelin' it
It's a love and hate relationship
But that's a thug's nature

Haha.. started as a seed from the semen; straight outta papa's nuts
Lustin' for creamin' - bitches with big butts
Curves make a nigga cry, tits and shit
When I'm locked down beggin' you for porno flicks
Sneak weed in, help a nigga pass the time
Put my name tattoo'd so that ass is mine
Tell everybody; 'Pac put it down for good
A local legend through the whole hood, follow me
I got a gun on me, goin' for none on the run baby
You know a nigga need some, is my son crazy?
Why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high; dear God
Understand my ways, livin' major
Blessed with a thug's heart.. and a real live nigga nature

Kissed the girls, made them cry
Thuggin' life, and gettin' high
Why you gangsta, all the time?
Though sometimes, I can deal with it
I realize, that I'm feelin' it
It's a love and hate relationship
Kissed the girls, made them cry
Thuggin' life, and gettin' high
Why you gangsta, all the time?
Though sometimes, I can deal with it
I realize, that I'm feelin' it
It's a love and hate relationship

It ain't my fault
Hehe, Q.D., where you be? Ahh
Don't blame me blame my momma, a nigga nature

QDIII, and Lil' Mo
I realize, that I'm feelin' it
Cause that's a thug nature
Though sometimes I can deal with it
I realize, I'm feelin' it
Love and hate, relationship
Yeah yeah yeah.. yeah yeah yeah..
Yeahhh yeah.. and that's a thug's nature
Where you at? Holla



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists
The power of a gun can kill, and the power of fire can burn
The power of wind can chill, and the power of mind can learn
The power of anger, can raise inside until it tears you apart
But the power of a smile, especially yours, can heal a frozen heart

And tomorrow, we'll wake up with the promise of a smile, smile
Yes, maybe tomorrow, we'll wake up with the promise, of a smile

Rest in peace..
2Pac, Bone Thugs
In His Own Words
Let's go

And tomorrow, morrow, morrow, and tomorrow, morrow
And tomorrow, morrow, and tomorrow we


Well, we still looking for better days
Hoping tomorrow can bring us some bigger and better things
So we can escape this maze, and they give us our change in every way
And maybe tomorrow, can bring us the truth
And there'll be no more use, for the pain and sorrow
Let's put it to use and then maybe the youth, can come and follow
And we can leave all our problems in the bottle, tomorrow
Maybe god'll wipe our eyes and we'll never have to cry no more
Or even better, have to die no more
Politicians can't tell us lies no more, he decides no more
Maybe tomorrow, it can be our daylight
Just might be our sunshine, sunshine..
Yesterday is filled with so much misery and drama
And today it don't seem like I'm getting any further
Praying tomorrow we can somehow come out of the struggle
And need no more hustle, no stumblin cause we all one muscle..
Still looking for a better day, day, and a better way, way, way..
So let's hope tomorrow... can lead us to the place we tryin to be..
In heavenly harmony, in heavenly harmony!


Where there's a will there's a way, don't let it stand in your way
Look 'em straight in they face, let 'em know you ain't playing no games
We searching for better days, wanna live them better ways
What I promise, heart is all you need to rock
Be honest, succeed, just look at me!
If I can do it, you can do it, we can do it, just believe, believe, believe!
When I lay down, I think about some of the wrong things I done
So I pray now, for God to erase some of that wrong
Wipe my soul clean, to be wanted, when he calls me, when he calls me!
So I can't sleep, cause I'm worried, I done did things, lord forgive me!
It's a damn shame, the things we do to get it our way!
Snitch on thugs, just to get it, your pay!
Nowadays I act right, in the past we used to fight
Where the loyalty at? Where them real street thugs? Where the thug life?
Where there's a will there's a way!


So as the hours pass by, in the event of my demise
Tell my momma not to cry, these are the words of the wise
Look at liberty needing glasses now that the promise been broken
For the better, keep on hopin, powerful words that's spoken
What I'm quotin is a G, acquired his knowledge from the streets
Makaveli, 2Pac Shakur, was the rose that grew from concrete
America's most complete artist, regardless, one of the hardest
On a mission to make it better, with the soul of Malcom and Martin
Mixed with a little Garvey, today he got us callin
Our brighter star is fallen, but now before he was ballin
Out of control, quick to let a nigga know what he stood for, be a friend or foe
And I bring the truth in the booth cause ain't nobody gon help me
This is life, it's a gamble, and I'mma scramble till my pockets wealthy
Fuck what they tell me, I'm all about my biz
Bitch, street biz or showbiz, I'mma make y'all know this
And I'mma say this to every man, woman and child
Don't you ever be afraid to smile, smile for me now
And I'mma say this to every man, woman and child
Don't you ever be afraid to smile... the power of a smile!
Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone! Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone!
Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone! Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone!

Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone, Bone
Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone, Bone-Bone-Bone-Bone




Te quiero
Te quiero cojer, te quiero cojer
I'll let your ass have it, te quiero cojer
Te quiero cojer, oh real?
Te quiero cojer

Now you've been actin' like you want it for a long time
All up in a nigga face, givin' me them strong vibes
Look in my eyes and you'll find peace
A Gemini, so you really blow my mind freak, come on
I got my clothes off, hard as a nigga in jail
Skinny niggas throw the dick well
Everybody get their condoms, brother cause it's time to fuck
Hurry up and put it on nigga, time is up
What's next? - got my mind on some group sex
Where you goin', baby? I ain't even through yet
Do it like a true vet, love it how I threw it to ya
In and out make it good to ya, remember me?
I love fuckin' slow with the lights low
Black, Puerto Rican, even White hoes; bellisimo
Que Linda, dame beso, come to Papi
Fuck until the shit is sloppy, if you really want it

You really want it, you really want it
If, you really want it, if you really want it
If, you really want it, if you really want it

Alright all my real niggas and my real bitches
Let me see you do it like this, c'mon

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to

Daddy rock a player body 'til I tell you to stop
Hit the right spot if not leave money and kick rocks
I'm a thug ho, I need a thug nigga up beside me
A player that can ride me, a cat that can rob me
Make a jazzy ho like me bust a sweat
Hit it from the back, grab me by my neck, demand your respect
I'm not a on my back ho, I ride the dick and hit it 'til it cold
Bustin' fits of nuts, get 'em up
I'm a Sagittarius freak, my real hoes feel me
Legs open wide, nigga dick inside
Like Barry White "Tonight's the Night" for you to hit it doggie style
Lay me on my stomach while I'm countin' them hundreds
Fake bitches wanna front like they don't wanna keep it real
You know you want a thug nigga just to see how it feel
Hoes wanna rock Gabbana, Dolce and Versace

Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body

Yeah, like that? Yeah

Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body

Yeah, yeah, yeah, I feel you
Do it, do it, do it, do it

Yeah, uhh, c'mon, uhh

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body ..
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock..

See, it all started simple, turned into me lickin' the nipples
Fuckin' you doggie style to this instrumental
Hands up, all up inside ya, hell I can stand ya
Eyes open I don't plan to bust, just hold on
Baby let me zone in, whaddyou mean?
Can you scream let it go beotch, how does it feel?
Got a nigga like steel in ya, to keep goin'
Now I'm fuckin' like I'm killin' ya, let's go another round
Baby is you down really, two shots of ecstasy
Lick a nigga down silly, your body next to me
I could touch you inside, and you'll cry
So good when a nigga leave, you'll die
My mama told me baby be a man put it on her
Hittin' bitches like, switches comin' around the corner
I wanna let me get my ride on
It's yo' dick baby but it's my song, now if you really want it

Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, and if you really want it


Gots to send this one out to the freaky bitches
Definitely all the Scorpios, and the Geminis, and the Virgos
You know I know the truth about you Scorpios and you Virgos
No doubt gotta give it to the Capricorns
They some freaks too on the down down
The Libras, they like it even but they still like fuckin'
No doubt, Aquariuses, Libras, I said those
Leos, yeah they some freaks, Leos is freaks
They always wanna run shit in bed
Sagittarius, Taurus, Cancer, all you freaky fucks
I'm a zodiac fucker I'll do you all one at a time
And all down the line, let's get busy



M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

Thugs known to bust on sight
God bless my crazy life la vida loca homie livin' that thug life
Been raised in violence homicide's my lullaby
Came with the homies and learned to kick it until we die
Boss players you wonder why
I live the life of a ghetto kingpin, just let me ride
Bitches and niggas in Penitentiary suits
I send 'em letters and money orders and make 'em my troops
As for you females, I got no time, I gotta get mine
You cannot blind me addicted to a life of crime
My time as shorty was full of car chases
While runnin' with John Gotti's and Scarface's
Niggas knew, I'd be the Don in my own crew
A million niggas with automatics who swarm through
You wonder who shot me here's a clue, stay alert
Cause we comin' for you, and keep it money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

I blow you up on the spot, these Glocks hot 'til you drop
All you wannabe cops, you don't wanna see shots
I beef deep with the police, peep what these streets do to me
Actin' all new to me, I creep on you like puberty
You don't wanna see the bad image of this scrimmage
From here to East Greenwich through every state with a sentence
Frozen weight in the cooter, ten plates to soup ya
1 2's we oughta cruise right by the state troopers
When I'm drinkin' Cristal, start thinkin' 'bout Al
Bacardi coverin' my body at the wink and a smile
Bag a hottie or two, cause butter shotties for you
I got more bodies then Drew, I drink Mynotti on New, fuck your crew
This type of shit I do for a petty hobby
Fuck the world it's Fatal dog against everybody

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

My shit's phenomenal, droppin' like domino
Comin' with the real yo, and fuck what you feel yo
This is not for all the freaks in short skirts
This is for my niggas nationwide doin' work, get your feelings hurt
Lose mo' faith than a composure, money and the doja
Bitches is a cobra, with deadly venom
Move as smooth as I get 'em
Stackin' G's, my niggas crosstown got ki's
Hoes get diseased and fleas, for these enemies
Money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

I'm hittin' sixteen switches, my money over bitches
The struggle continues I'll miss you on my road to riches
I'm contrited to strive never laggin'
Disappear in the night with my 64 dragon, rag flaggin'
As I get 'em up and leave 'em stuck
Pager blowin' up but I don't give a, fuck
I'm fully stocked on the block, pockets full of rocks sellin'
Loc'ers and smokers engaged twenty-fo'/seven
So what can you do for me and what can I do for you
But stay true, and do the things that we do
Blinded evil-minded no option for my offspring
Reminded can't find it complications what the future brings
Losin' my mind why you sweatin' me all the time
I'm caught in a bind, quality time on my grind
Rather be lonely honey and dodge you like snitches
I'm 'bout my riches, money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

That's from the time a nigga close his eyes I'm hopin', I hope he awoken
Payin' my own that's tokin' chokin' off-a Glocks smokin'
Money and power watch these bitches cause they skanless
Gettin' niggas fucked 'n stuck from Timbuk' to Los Angeles
Ain't a nigga ruggeder than this grimy Heine' guzzler
Cowards better duck before my calibers start rubbin' ya
Me and my troops play blocks in groups, runnin' in flocks
Deuce-deuce in my socks keepin' a watch out for cops
Gettin' kicked, I keep my mind on my riches
While uncontrolled schemes keep me choosin' my money over all my bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

That's right nigga
Money over motherfuckin' bitches
M.O.B. on 'em nigga
Keep your motherfuckin' mind on your money, fuck these hoes
You need some motherfuckin' money
Get your mind right nigga, keep your game tight
Play right play by the rules and you'll get paid fuck the fools
We up out of this bitch here..
BIATCH!



I'm going in2 this not knowing what I'll find
but I've decided 2 follow my heart and abandon my mind
and if there be pain I know that at least I gave my all
and it is better 2 have loved and lost than 2 not love at all
In the morning I may wake 2 smile or maybe 2 cry
but first 2 those of my past I must say goodbye



U say that u'll love me forever but what about today
As the dusks become dawns and the years pass on will u love me the same way
If so let us rejoice and bathe in constant pleasure
If not spare my heart today and I shall recover before forever
And if my doubts and ?'s upset u, forgive my fragile heart
I just wanted 2 know if you'd love me forever
Before Today would START!



I know not what I search 4
But I know I have yet 2 find it,
Because it is invisible 2 the eye
My heart must search 4 it blinded.

And if by chance I find it,
Will I know my mission is achieved?
Can one come 2 conclusions,
Before the question is conceived?

Just as no one knows
what lies beyond the shore,
I will never find the answer 2
what it is that I search 4



Now I've got task on a nigga's ass, tell me will they blast me?
I think of an alias in case these crooked bitches ask me
Now, it's gettin crazy after dark, these narcs
Be like tryin to shut me down but I'm too smart
Now picture me scared of the penitentiary
I've been movin these things since the days of elementary
Now tell me what you need when you see me
I'm stackin G's, buyin all the things on TV, believe me
I got some killas on my payroll, and they know
When it's time to handle business, nigga lay low
Although I'm young, I'm still comin up
I'm gettin paid, pullin raises on niggas when they runnin up
The first to pull a strap when there's drama
Busta, you ain't heard?
I've been slicin motherfuckerss since I lost my momma
There ain't a cop that can stop me
My posse is cocky, G, and they don't quit until they drop me
I'm loyal to the game

*Chorus*

Without no doubt I ain't no slouch and it ain't time to back down
So I jumps in and try to stop-a and watch-a
Slap you cock-eyed like Popeye fucks spinach
Forgotten more shit than most crews ever know, or ever knew
Was born with 7 flows and only heaven knew
For beat the boot sex, the news breaks, the you shakes
Worse, they heard we got more nerve than a 2-fake
Yoo-hoo to you crew and you too so you knew
I'm from Jersey and I'm a teen so your block more than you do
Whose the new crew?
Show me your neck brotha, and here's another
Smack your mother's mamma's mother
In the first mob of all those other crack lovers
Back was bitch-ass, trick ass, cluk-clow-cluk-clow
How ya like me then, how ya like me, hey-ho, how ya like me now?
Ow, pow, hurt, don't it? Bow, bow, don't run up on it
The same thing minus "P" hangin possies like an exponent
Oh yes, rock in slums, ya gots to run it
It makes no sense to smell like shit
If old ass George could be Washing-tons

*Chorus*

Now I be loyal to my niggas on the blocks, just buckin the shots
And packin the Glocks
And dodgin the cops, and takin over niggas spots
Poppin after poppin the fools be droppin, the hoes be hoppin
On my thing cause it hangs like the nets from Above the Rim
You lookin grim, is it me or him or him
Or be with me, we be together
So what's up? We can do whatever
Cause real niggas stick together
Till they make it up to heaven
Through the stress, through the hell, through the 1-8-7
The shorter the nigga, the bigga the trigga
The deeper they dig the ditch-a
The Naughty the Treach
Then through to the Pac I brings the Glock I wets up
You fuckin body, I'm like, Oh my Gody
Did I really shoot him? Yo I shot him
So I got him, now I puts the crime behind me
And finds me, a place to lays my head low
I lives doin my rap, but I dies for my hood row
So all you fuckin fools better recognize, and know my fuckin name
I be Riddler to my niggas and I'm loyal to the game




Shit, I'm a changed man
Ay, turn the lights out
Big baller 2Pac up in this bitch
Y'know how we swing this shit, look

By age sixteen I sold to dope fiends
Not yet a drug dealer, but I watched 'em closely
Until they noticed me
I got the feds wonderin' who broke the law
Far too inhibited for gun smoke, I broke his jaw
Words harder than a fuckin' diamond
Mobile phone call to Simon
Niggas trippin' homey, when we ridin'?
Fuck them slowly like Jodeci
And stick a needle in my eye if I don't live and die for M.O.B
And fuck your homeboys nigga we can drop the guns
I hit your block and we can box for fun
Nigga one on one, last to fall is a ballin' cat
It's Death Row, why the fuck you think we call it that?
So if you knew me in my past life
Don't act like we homeboys, ain't no love in the fast life
I switch gears on them jealous bitches, who do you fear?
The gameplan of a changed man, so what I'm sayin' is

I changed plans but I'm still the same old rider
Fuckin' with a changed man
I slang a new dope to the world but the people still buy it
Nigga you fuckin' with a changed man
All my real thug niggas, go and get your hands up
You go and drink the Henn' up
A changed man, you're dealin' with a changed man

In drop top, the Glock cocked
Got rocks in my socks Cops
Spot Watt niggas but hardly stop niggas
Not if they got niggas, doughboys and hot niggas
Who mighta shot niggas but only by skrilla
I'm for respect nowadays they expect me
To be in a Ferrari or the old SL
Or anything you see flashin past and can't catch
Dat's me, gauge on the Escalate back seat - don't creep
I'm fin' ta introduce you to the old me
You walk in, exploded and leave reload
You don't like a rugged nigga, fuck you, blow me
But you will respect me or get it in your neckpiece G
No three niggas here are gonna let me be
Or get you inside there's codes to the streets nigga

I changed plans but I'm still the same old rider
You fuckin' with a changed man
I slang a new dope to the world but the people still buy it
Nigga you fuckin' with a changed man
All my real thug niggas, go and get your hands up
You go and drink the Henn' up
A changed man, you're dealin' with a changed man
You fuckin' with a changed man

A nigga so cold when I flow, bow down to Death Row
Three wheel motion, comin' through coastin'
Who's that nigga in the G-ride
Screamin' out M.O.B.! Nigga we ride
I hit the charts like a stick-up kid
Number 1 in the nation
I fucked the world, the Judge gave me probation
Faced with incarceration
Move tapes like it's big weight, slangin' to the whole nation
GIMME MINE, or I'm blastin' on every song
Murder my enemies, I'm mashin' until I'm gone
One love to my thug niggas
And fuck a bitch, cause a true sister love niggas
Throw yo' hands in the air, close your eyes and hope
Never come against the mass of smoke, on Death Row
My adversaries BLEED
But fuck 'em all 'til the talk cease
Fuckin' with a changed man

I changed plans but I'm still the same old rider
You fuckin' with a changed man
I slang a new dope to the world but the people still buy it
Nigga you fuckin' with a changed man
All my real thug niggas, go and get your hands up
You go and drink the Henn' up
You fuckin' with a changed man
A changed man, you're dealin' with a changed man
Nigga you fuckin' with a changed man

I changed plans but I'm still the same old rider
You fuckin' with a changed man
I slang a new dope to the world but the people still buy it
Nigga you fuckin' with a changed man
All my real thug niggas, go and get your hands up
You go and drink the Henn' up
You fuckin' with a changed man
A changed man, you're dealin' with a changed man
You fuckin' with a changed man

E'rybody think they understand me
Shit, you niggas don't know me
Y'all know that nigga on the rap song
Y'all know that nigga in the movies
You don't know this nigga in 3-D
Real live right up against you in front of yo' face
Shit..
Westside, Outlaw Immortalz, hehehe
Nigga, you fuckin' with a changed man
Hahaha, you fuckin' with a changed man
Hahaha, I ain't the same, you fuckin' with a changed man
We ain't the same, you fuckin' with a changed man
We ain't the same, fuckin' with a changed man
Changed man



      Please wake me when I'm free
I cannot bear captivity
where my culture I'm
told holds no significance
I'll wither and die in ignorance
But my inner eye can c a race
who reigned as kings in another place
the green of trees were rich and full
and every man spoke of beautiful
men and women together as equals
War was gone because all was peaceful
But now like a nightmare I wake 2 c
That I live like a prisoner of poverty
Please wake me when I'm free
I cannot bear captivity
4 I would rather be stricken blind
than 2 live without expression of mind



Secrets R hidden within the clouds
of Darkness,
And in this place no one Dares 2 Breathe
in Fear of self-expression
It has been this way
forever and a day
until she came 2 shine
with a spark of innocence and questions
only 2 be answered with Darkness
Not just Darkness but the silent kind
that steals your soul and kills your mind
There was no compassion
for this thriving star
only exploitations
and confused jealousy
u saw no hope and brought the end
Never acknowledging the star within



Then she never should've called you)
I dedicate this to my nigga, Mike Tyson

You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it

Jack of all trades ballin' like Jordan you punk
Fake inside the paint in fact I know you can't
Do half of the shit that you was claimin' in the county
Suckas on yo jock you claim you run the block
Polyurethane busta cracked in half
You claim you foldin' bank but I know yo bank stank
I lived around the corner I seen you fully smoked
Must I say some more you weighed a buck 04
You sold ya TV for a buck cause it was way too late
Now they sent you upstate and you done gained some weight
You's a baller lyin' to them youngstas quick
Got them thinkin' you sick and representin' yo click
But you's an old basehead kickin' too much hype
Yo bicentennial pipe it got rally stripes
And if they knew yo identity
You ain't got to lie to kick it

You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
You ain't got to lie to kick it
Out to get a nigga's riches

You ain't got to lie to kick it
Y'all don't hear me
I got these niggas yackin' in my face
About some shit that never took place
And what you see is what you get, that's what he told me
I peeped it in his pose, Exposed the fuckin' phony
I'm gettin' richer so they claim to be my homie
With them bitches, they be speakin' down on me
Hey, it's gettin' drastic
Gunnin' niggas down cause they plastic
Sleep on a G and get that ass kicked
And stuffed in a casket
Rippin' the shit like it's my muthafuckin' last hit
Hey they wonder why a nigga's nothin' nice
And every time I bust a nut I fuck for Tyson
Cause I know the real on the bitch
I pray to God that the bitch don't get no dick
And got a nigga screamin' Fuck That Bitch!

You ain't got to lie to kick it
To the tricks and the bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it

Well if a bitch'll be a bitch
Then a trick'll be a trick
I got my nigga Richie Rich and we be all up in the mix
This is Thug Life baby rollin' hoes like Vogues
Stay the fuck up out of mine
And I'll stay out of yours
It's a Oakland thang and bitch you wouldn't understand
This Tanqueray got me screamin', Fuck yo' man
But now you beefin' on the strength
That you was thinkin' I was jockin'
Hey bitch I got no time for hoes I'm steady clockin'
And if it ain't about a buck I gives a fuck
It's raggedy hoes like you that keep a nigga stuck
So what's up with them low life bitches tryin' to play me
Trickin' niggas better catch up on they pimpin'
Cause bitches love to catch a nigga when they slippin'

You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it
To them tricks and them bitches
Out to get a nigga's riches
You ain't got to lie to kick it..



When your heart turns cold
It causes your soul 2 freeze
Spreads throughout your spirit
Like a ruthless feeling disease
The walls that once were down
Now stand firm and tall
Safe from hate/love, pain/joy
Until u feel nothing at all
When ure heart turns cold
A baby's cry means nothing
A dead corpse is trivial
Mothers neglecting children is daily
Loneliness becomes your routine friend
Death seems like tranquility
Sleeping is never pleasant
If you even sleep at all
U forget ideals and turn off the reason
2 make sure the product is sold
You don't understand how I behave
Just wait till your heart turns Cold!

I know my cold heart turns warm at the front door
Love my family, love my Outlawz
But when I step outside I feel my blood freezing
Question if it's a blessing that 'm still breathing
Sometimes I wonder if I'm better off dead
They say God don't make mistakes but what if he did
But what if he didn't
So I'm supposed to be living this life that I'm living
And feeling how I'm feeling
Black rain shower, the pain builds character
My heart turned cold, yeah I learned to be a scavenger
Listen, no love received and no love given
Don't blame us blame the hate that you gave the children

No remorse for life and y'all forced to fight
In the event of my demise I hope God's the guiding light
In hind's sight, I'm lost, misguided by lies and truths
Confused bout what to do, refer to smoking, drinking brew
We be the hearts of the heartless, riding few from the bunch
Bosses have falled, bosses have caught you don't be the next one
Sleeping never pleasant even if you sleeping at all
The reason that I'm breathing is I'm an example for y'all

When your heart turns cold
It causes your soul to freeze
Spreads through your spirit like a deadly disease
When your heart turns cold
You feel nothing at all
A baby's cry means nothing at all
When your heart turns cold
A dead corpse is trivial
And death seems like tranquility
When your heart turns cold
I thank God above
Through the pain, hate, joy, and love
When your heart turns cold

Your loneliness becomes your only homie
Lose a piece of you survive all that
Now it's on, you need a way up out of here
You click on some be next shit

When your heart turn cold that's when the heat go off
And the means die slow, that's how the streets show off
Cemeteries filled with victims those with cold hearts
Deep in the dark when the pistols spark
My life one big movie of strife
Scene after scene filled with nothing but sad dreams
No wonder my heart pumps ice water
Gotta live according to the lessons that life taught you
Lonely is the road of a tortured soul
Who only knows the roles of a heart turned cold
Caught in the middle when the pistols blow
That's how it go when your heart turns cold





Yeah, you got the Live Squad in this motherfucker
We get my nigga Treach from Naughty By Nature up in this motherfucker

My nigga Apache up in this motherfucker

My Mossberg goes boom, gimme room, can I catch it
Talkin' quicker then a vic that's tryin' to keep from gettin' blasted
I had enough I put a hit upon them bastards
Boo-yaa, turn this Benz into a casket
Now they after me, prowling for a niggas bucks
Time to see, who's the G, with the bigger nuts
Buck buck, big up and livin' reckless
Niggas with a death wish step in with a TEC and I'll wet this
Yeah this shit is hyper
True to what I'm writing, representing and I'm striking like a viper
Huh, I got my mind made up, I got my nine
Ring the alarm, and strong arm what's mine
Some niggas need to feel me with a passion
I'm old fashioned, run up on me, nigga, and get blasted
With five deadly venomz

That old deadly shit. Aiyyo Treach where you at?
Step up and hit they ass up with the wickedness.)

We come to hit you with a sock full of Brooklyn
To the Onyx of your nose, punk is funky like skunk blunts
Stunk like funk cunt
I come to take you on a war rough and rugged route
And if another doubts I blow your fuckin' mother out
And after she's crossed out
I shout, "I'm de MC wit de nasty mouf!" and kick the bitch out
Sue me? I pay the lawyer for ya oh boy yeah
Plus my style's ten to twenty fuckin' pounds more
I take you quicker than a picture of a punk ya pickin' shit
Pickin' pockets with a razor stoppin' Russian rockets
Not shoplift, I'm liftin' shop
Once you sound hot, 'cause if you ain't a perfect ten
My sign is stop!
It's twenty mother-crooked-fuckin' styles in 'em
Like women I did 'em I'm in for deadly ready venom

Yeah, as I take a puff I get rough, Big Mad
To put it on, can't none come tougher see
I'm down with the sound of the Squad hard, boom!
Breakin' 'em down, I make 'em see their doom
Coming straight from the dome where I roam it's a job to
Rob and steal and runnin' from the coppers
Who hold a, boulder, turn the gun controller
Started from a punk now to be a high roller
Youngest, reckless, crazy, disaster
MAC-11 blaster, and I run faster
Than a lot of cops I can't be stopped till my head gets popped
A lot of fuckin' bodies will drop
It's a disaster, I'm coming for the blood splatter
I make 'em scatter, leavin' trails of brains and bladders
Blowin' 'em out the frame with no shame
Game tight, drop a body then get out of sight
Count my loot after I shoot, leave my kicks up and it's
Something I don't wanna do, something that I never did
I try to get him, I think I hit 'em, I lit him
He's out! A poison, a deadly venom

KnowhatI'msayin? Squad in effect, YG'z in effect
Now you know a nigga like me gotta represent)

Once again, back to rip shit, quick on the flip tip
The psycho, represent the real to take the mic flow
Deadly, rock a head G, check the melody
Niggas can't touch me when I wreckin' G you better flee
'Cause I'm gifted with a jab and a forty-four Mag
So nigga flip or take a trip in a body bag
Uhh, boom you slipped up, now you're zipped up
Yeah one more statistic, fronted and got ripped up
No joke, you be yolk, no matter how it sound
We're taking all fake niggas back to the stomping grounds
Line 'em up single file, dome runnin' in 'em
A nigga hit 'em with the venom, the fourth deadly venom

I told you, we takin' over, yo 'Pac.)

Five deadly venomz verse five be the livest
Strugglin' and strive, keep a nine in my waistline
Take mine, you better bury me, G
Punk ass niggas don't even worry me, see
I got a Glock that say 'Pac run the block
Fuck the cops 'cause my gauge gets me... PAID
As I sit and reminisce about the old days
Hugging on my AK, fuck getting played, hey
I say niggas need to get they mind right
Until they do I pop a clip and grip my nine tight
Now it's on everyday could be my last day
That's why I blast on they ass as I passed let the glass spray.
First you had a mouth full of fronts
Now your mouth's full of chunks, Pac's out puffin' blunts
Deadly venomz

Apache bout to clean shit up.)

Throw up your middle finger! Start the track for the maniac
Only thing I'm givin out is black donuts and dirty backs
Let me tell how you rough I get
I pop shit behind your back get in your face and pop the same shit
You can't get in because my gate's bigger I'mma snake nigga
My act guards me so hard I pull the fuckin' trigger
I'm a cinch in a clinch, your punch is like a pinch.
Test the rhyme I'll knock your hairline back an inch
Fuckin' up pooh-butts, cut 'em like cold cuts
Choke 'em with my boot lace, then leave 'em hangin' like old nuts
Clip up and move out, time to get 'em
That's the results of fuckin with the fifth venom in denim

Five motherfuckin deadly venomz, in effect for ninety-three
Ninety-four ninety-five all that other shit
We takin this motherfucker over this larger hit
YaknowhatI'msayin? Follow us, come along. Yaknowhat I'msayin?
We takin this motherfucker over. TRUST. We out.)



Haha, aight
Storm, motherfuckers
Ain't really knowin' if you can flow or not
So, do this shit like last time


Holler my name, nigga, you ridin' to scream
Must be a thug with a heart to be a part of my team
It seems we got a problem
We ain't lettin' no women and the feminine side
Has been denied time to give 'em a try

Finally made it, now focus
Now who the dopest?
The brothers or the sisters
I agree, it's a man's world, but why must niggas diss us
I ain't tryin' to hear it, witness my thug spirit

They keep on screamin' 'bitches'

'Cause niggas love to hear it
Called on my dawgs, 'cause they rowdy then a motherfucker
I love you niggas like brothers, but don't fuck with me

Oh bad now, look what we got
Miss Billy Badass runnin' round, packin' double Glocks, uh
So all you niggas be warned
From the dusk til the dawn
We might trip, but I dare you tricks to fuck around with Storm
We Outlawz
I said it and meant it
And when you see me live on TV
It's strictly representin'
Now, let me hear you scream


This is for my niggas
Only for my niggas
For my niggas
Let me see you throw your hands up

This is for my sistas
Only for my sistas
For my sistas
Let me see you throw your hands up

Verse 2

Now when I say Pig
You say B-I-G
When I say Bad Boy killer
Then you say me
When I say Puffy is a punk, you scream word on my life
I wrote this shit while fuckin' Big's wife

Now I been told that Lil Kim thinks she hot

She not

Better get that additude adjusted 'fore I mash your spot

Plus now Da Brat's trippin'

Must want an ass whippin'

We be the first ones to fuck with you and Bad Boy, weak bitch

Bustin' through Brooklyn, lickin' my shots to Queens
'Cause I'm lookin' for Little Shawn, that bitch ass fiend
I made him scream like last year
Best don't come to California, we don't want your busta ass here

We outlaw, ryders, thugs til we die
Sistas get they groove on

Niggas gettin' high

Call me a motherfuckin' troublemaker
Send me to jail
But watch me bust on LL
Now let me hear you scream


This is for the riders
Only for the riders
For the riders
Let me see you throw your hands up

This is for the riders
Only for the riders
For the riders
Let me see you throw your hands up

This is for the bitches
Only for the bitches
For the bitches
Let me see you throw your hands up

This is for them bustas
Only for them bustas
For them bustas
Let me see you throw your hands up

This is for my niggas
Only for my sistas
For my riders
Let me see you throw your hands up

Look at it, did it
We up outta here
2Pac and Storm
Outlaw Immortalz
Death Row, west side
THUG LIFE, beyatch...



Unstoppable
I know that you want me to fail
But no I won't
I'll keep fighting until the day I'm in a box
Until I sit in Heaven I will never stop
I will never stop

After the fire comes the rain, after the pleasure there's pain
Even though we broke for the moment, we'll be ballin' again
'Til I make it, yo, my military be prepared for them bustaz
Similar to niggas too scary, get too near me, we rushin'
Visions of over-packed prisons, visions of niggas thug livin'
Pressures and three strikes, I hope they don't test us
They pull the heat out, ammunition in crates
Psssh! Move without a sound as we slide down pistols in place
They got me fiendin' for currency, the money be callin'
It’s like I’m - dreamin', seein' scenes of me ballin'
Participated in felonious behavior
Cock the cocked 45, snatchin' niggas pagers
Labeled a mark soon as we start, it was hard to quit
We started out drinkin' 40's, moved to harder shit
God damn, now I'm a grown man, I follow no man
Nigga got my own plan

I am unstoppable
I know that you want me to fail
But no I won't
I'll keep fighting until the day I'm in a box
Until I sit in Heaven I will never stop
I will never stop

I got a handgun habit, nigga front I'll let you have it
When the shots go off, cops sayin 50 back at it
I'm allergic to the feathers on these bird-ass niggas
Front and I'll put your brains on that curb fast nigga
I ain't a marksman, one spark and I spray shit
Nuff rounds from that H-K, I don't play bitch
Move like I'm militant, back on that gorilla shit
Moody, disrespectful, unruly, but niggas can't move me
I squeeze till I run out of ammo, if it's a problem it's handled
I have your people pourin' our liquor and lightin' candles
You fuck around I blow your brains on my New York Times
Run home, turn to the sports section and read your mind
It's crystal clear, you should feel when that gat bust
First there's crime scene tape, then you end up in that black hearse
We don't go to funerals, but we'll go to your wake fam

I am unstoppable
I know that you want me to fail
But no I won't
I'll keep fighting until the day I'm in a box
Until I sit in Heaven I will never stop
I will never stop


There's a certain mystique when I speak, that you notice
Cause that's sort of unique cause you know it's me
My poetry's deep, and I'm Stillmatic, the way I flow to this beat
You can't sit still, it's like trying to smoke crack and go to sleep
I'm strapped, it's known any minute I could snap
I'm the equivalent of what would happen if Bush rapped
I bully these rappers so bad lyrically
It ain't even funny, I ain't even hungry, it ain't even money
You can't pay me enough for you to play me
It's cockamanie you just ain't zany enough to rock with Shady
My noodle is cock-a-doodle, my clock's coo-coo
I got screws loose, yea the whole kit and caboodle, I'm just brutal
It's no rumor, I'm numero uno, assume it
There's no humor in it no more, you know
I'm rolling with a swollen bowling ball in my bag
You need a fag to come and tear a new hole in my ass

I am unstoppable
I know that you want me to fail
But no I won't
I'll keep fighting until the day I'm in a box
Until I sit in Heaven I will never stop
I will never stop




You certified crazy

I got to work with what you gave me
Claiming' I'm a criminal and you the one that made me
They got me trapped in this slavery
Now I'm lost in this Holocaust headed for my grave G
I told Sam he could fuck the war
And got a busted jaw for sayin' fuck the law
And if you wonder why I'm mad check the record
What's a nigga got to do to get respected?
Sometimes I think I'm gettin' tested
And if I don't say yes a nigga's quick to get arrested
That's the reason I stay zested
I keep a vest on my chest in case the cops are gettin' restless
Walk around ready to light shit up
And since my life is fucked, some say I'm slightly nuts
Buck, buck is the sound as I move up
Other niggas pay attention when I'm fool, bust
They make a nigga be a killer I used to be a dealer
But they wanted to see who's realer
Now them same mothafuckas wanna murder me
I need loot so I'm doin' what I do
And don't say shit until you've walked in my shoes
There was no other destiny to choose
I had nothin' left to lose so I'm singin' nigga blues

Can't you see, we're raised to all be thugs
Make's us do the things we do
Got to let a Outlaw make moves

A nigga got to pay the fuckin' rent

Poppa need brand new shoes
But what the fuck can a nigga do
My little boy got to eat too
So why must I sock-a-fella
Just to live large like Rockefeller?
And did you ever stop to think
I'm old enough to go to war
But I ain't old enough to drink
Cops want to hit me with the book
And you're hooked on my eye don't give a fuck look
Make your rules I'm a break 'em
No matter how much you make 'em
You show me bacon I'mma take 'em
So don't you ever tempt me
I'm a fool for mine nigga and my pockets stay empty
To my brothers In the barrio
You livin' worse than the niggas In the ghetto so
I give a fuck about your language or complexion
You got love from the niggas in my section
Got love, you got problems with the punk police
Don't run from the chumps get the pump from me
We ain't free I'll be damned if I played a trick
Down with my homeboy Rich
Fuck a snitch and a groupie ass bitch
And the nigga with a cellular phone
And you wonder why we blazin' niggas
And they bound to be fuckups too
Drinkin' forties of brew singin' nigga blues


Come on, Come on Now I'm headin' for the mothafuckin' penn

Can't you see we're raised to all be thugs
Makes us do the things we do you got to let a Outlaw
Make moves and get a grip
That's to you



She's a part time mutha

Meet Cindi
She's twenty-two, lives right on the dope track
Used to be fat now weighs less than a Tic Tac
Now what's that say about this big epidemic
This hypocritical world and the people in it
Now speakin' of, in it Cindi loved to get buckwild
Fuck with a smile single file she'll bust enough styles
That would be cool, if she was your lover
But fuck that, Cindi was my dope fiend mother
Welfare checks never stepped through the front door
Cause moms would run to the dopeman once more
All those days, had me fiendin' for a hot meal
Now I'm a crook; got steel, I do not feel
So don't even trip, when I flip with my thirty-eight
Revenge is a bitch and my hit shake the murder rate
Word to the mother, I'm touched
When moms come by, niggas hush or get rushed
Maybe one day she'll recover
But what will it take, to shake, or break
My part time mutha
I gotta live with a part time


I grew up in a home where no-one liked me
Moms would hit the pipe, every night, she would fight me
Poppa was a nasty old man, like the rest
He's feelin' on my chest, with his hand in my dress
Just another pest and yes I was nervous
Was this a test? I just don't deserve this
I wanna tell mom, but would she listen
She's bound to be bitchin' if she hasn't got a fix in, so
Now I lay me down to sleep, Lord don't let him rape me
If he does my soul to keep, don't let the devil take me
Can't concentrate I contemplate in my classroom
Thinkin' how my step dad raped me in the bathroom
Every day I make class and yet I'm missin' periods
The thought of pregnancy is in my head and now I'm fearin' it
I gotta tell mom before she sees me
I told her how he treated me and she didn't believe me
Callin' me a slut cause my butt's kinda big so
Still that ain't no way to be talkin' to your kids though
I can't believe the way he caught her
Got her believin' him and dissin' her own daughter
Time for me to break and find another
That's when I discovered
The ways of the days of a part time mutha

I gotta live with a part time


I rush to tend her, talked as I touch her
She blushed, the clothes came off and I bust her
I'm up now, ready to get drunk on the block
Here, take a cab, thanks a lot for the cock
She's gone and I'm thinkin' that my game's so strong
Pat myself on the back and move on
Is this just how it is hell no
Cause she came back with the kid and yo
I been payin' ever since
The clothes the food the cars and, oh, the rent
All of my time gets spent at the workplace
No time to kiss her got me this in the first place
So, I do the dishes and clean the floor
When I sleep I can't dream no more
Oh no, now I'm a part time mutha
And I change the diapers and clean the shit
The tables are turned I can't take this
Oh no, now I'm a part time mutha







More controvery surrounding 2Pac Shakur ...



Shakur underwent surgery today ...





A smoking-ass nigga robbed me blind
I got a TEC-9 now his smokin' ass is mine
I guess I felt sorry for the bastard, he was broke
I didn't know he smoked so I didn't watch him close
He caught me on the sneak tip, now the punk's in deep shit
Catch him on the streets, I'mma bring him to his feet, quick
Pass the clip, I think I see him comin' now
Fuck the bullshit, posse deep and let's run him down
Gots to be the first one to hit ya when we meet
Comin' quickly up the streets, is the punk ass police
The first one jumped out and said "Freeze!"
I popped him in his knees and shot him, punk, please
’Cause cops should mind they business, when we rush
Now you're pleadin' like a bitch, cause you don't know how to, hush
Now back to the smoker that robbed me
I tell you like Latifah, motherfucker give me body
One to the chest, another to his fuckin' dome
Now the shit can rest, yo tell him to leave me the fuck alone
Two very bloody bodies on the streets
A nosey ass cop and a nigga that robbed from me
Run from your backup punk, how you figure?
My finger's on the trigger for you crooked ass niggas

Crooked ass niggas

Now listen to the mack of the crooked nigga trade
With the fine criminal mind, cold rips like a blade
It's already quick steppin to the niggas with the props
And any motherfucker with the flim-flam drops to the knot
Ten o'clock, is a motherfuckin' gank move
Stretch is Uptown, clockin' weight the shit is real smooth
A nigga's tryin to play me like he know me but he don't
Sittin' on ten kis, I'mma get him, think I won't?
My nigga 2Pac, got the fuckin Glock cocked, and he's ready
When the kid, didn't even bring the weight bag, instead he
Welcomed us, into his apartment
Oh, this even better, two to the head, he's dead a clean get a-WAY!
Niggas got PAID!
And yet another sleepin' ass nigga got slayed, word up
By a crooked motherfucker named Stretch
And the T-U-P-A-C, the police can't catch

The crooked ass niggas
Yeah, you don't stop!
Crooked ass niggas

Now I could be a crooked nigga too
When I'm rollin' with my crew, watch what crooked niggas, do!
I got a nine millimeter Glock pistol
I'm ready to get witcha at the drop, of a whistle
So make your move, and act like you wanna flip
I fire thirteen shots, and pop another clip
I bring luck, my Glock's like a fuckin' mop
The more I shot, the more motherfuckers dropped
And even cops got shot when they rolled up
Best to bring a knot, or get popped, I'm a soldier
I ain't the type to fetch ya, ask Stretch, he's my witness
Smoke til I'm blitzed, fuck a motherfuckin' piss test
I'm trigger happy, try to 'tack me and I'll drop you quick
Long as I got a clip I got some shit to hit 'em with
The nigga killer I get iller when the shit gets thick
My brain flips, I start thinkin' like a lunatic
I rip shit, came equipped with a bigger crew
I thought these niggas knew, I'm a crooked nigga too

Crooked ass niggas come in all shapes and sizes
They wear disguises, backstabbing's what they specialize in
They'll try to get 'cha, they'll sweat 'cha to get in the picture
And then they hit 'cha, son of a bitch! Now he's richer
Crooked ass nigga
Criminal behaviour)
Crim-criminal behaviour
Criminal be- crim-crim-crim-crim-crim--
Criminal behaviour-- criminal behaviour)



Here me and my closest road dogs
The return of the mashers, you know how we do it
Hahaha!

Shit half the times we fought and caused trouble
My closest road dog it was cool cause I love you
Fuck what they talkin' bout
Let me take you back in time, rewind to eighty-nine
Introduced me to this life of crime, but we was blind
Little nappy-haired juveniles, livin' wild
No smiles on our faces, thirteen catchin' cases
Indeed, it was misery
Driven by my own demons, cause they was killin' me
How can I be sure I'll be saved soon?
Catch me dip into the light, of a stray moon
It's gettin' deeper now, let me get yo' mind right
Fuck yo' enemies, nigga grip yo' nine tight, tonight's the night
Murder murder Mr. Lucifer
Pictures of the devil DUCK when he shoot at cha, it's all political
Runnin' from the future, escapin' in the fog
Live yo' life like a hog nigga, me and my closest road dogz

Every ghetto street got a crosswalk
Let me get to the other side with my road dogz
All roam in the scary place called home
Take a second victim and if they all gone, my closest road dogz
Every ghetto street got a stop sign
Can I trust in you my road dogz on mine?
Even when I'm goin' through hard times
I still got my closest road dogz lookin' out for all mine

Haha.. bring artillery and ROLL with a nigga
They could never take the soul of a M.O.B. soldier nigga
Cowards get rolled up, mob on 'em Makaveli
Boy you's a boss player, that's what all the bitches tell me
Even if I died now
I live my life eternally and never lie down, why cry now?
Fooled a few but never 'came a gamer
Ain't tryin' to hear it
Evil spirits hide at total strangers, yo' life's in danger
Prepare nigga be aware, cause we ain't scared
M.O.B., 'til I die, when we ride niggas disappear
Fill 'em up with pistol smoke
Never forget to blow a hole in his head
For leakin' information to the feds
The burnin' bed was the tellin' sign
Two hired guns bustin' everyone, yellin' everybody die
Why the fuck they fuck around, we left 'em in the fog
Bleedin' like a stuck hog, me and my closest road dogz

Every ghetto street got a crosswalk
Let me get to the other side with my road dogz
All roam in the scary place called home
Take a second victim and if they all gone, my closest road dogz
Every ghetto street got a stop sign
Can I trust in you my road dogz on mine?
Even when I'm goin' through hard times
I still got my closest road dogz lookin' out for all mine

Fuck they feelings, that's what they get for squealin'
That's the pressures of a gangsta, dangerous this drug dealin'
See me in physical form, my niggas swarm
Take the figure of a circle beatin' jealous niggas 'til they purple
Simon Says take they heads homies
And send them phony motherfuckers to dwell with all they dead homies
Fishin' for fake niggas, observe and shake niggas
The only way to see six figures, is break niggas
Me and Mussolini set to ride we high
Big Bogart got the alibi,homicide ask us why
Labelled a Capo in the mob as big as the globe
To live and die as a millionaire, on ..
Set to explode, my M.O., is kill them hoes
My pistol's like a disease, my enemies and foes
Get murdered and disposed of, we in the fog
Makaveli the Don, and my closest road dogz

Every ghetto street got a crosswalk
Let me get to the other side with my road dogz
All roam in the scary place called home
Every ghetto street got a stop sign
Can I trust in you my road dogz on mine?
Even when I'm goin' through hard times
I still got my closest road dogz lookin' out for all mine
Every ghetto street got a crosswalk
Let me get to the other side with my road dogz
All roam in the scary place called home
Take a second victim and if they all gone, my closest road dogz
Every ghetto street got a stop sign
Can I trust in you my road dogz on mine?
Even when I'm goin' through hard times
I still got my closest road dogz lookin' out for all mine



pretty smiles
deceiving laughs
and people who dream with their eyes open
lonely children
unanswered cries
and souls who have given up hoping
The other thing that breaks hearts
R fairy tales that never come true
and selfish people who lie 2 me
selfish people just like u



"You could get the finger.. the middle!" {​*1}​
"Come and get some!" {​*2}​

Ahh yeah, they love to point the finger
{​*1}​ {​*2}​

Boom boom boom on your black ass, bitch
You could get the finger...the middle!

I thought I hit rock bottom, they ban my album, point the finga
I guess nobody loves a real nigga-slash-rap singer
I thought I'd bring a little truth to the young troops
I brought proof that the niggas need guns too
Wouldn't you if we could trade places?
I got lynched by some crooked cops, and to this day
Them same motherfuckers on the beat gettin major paid
But when I get my check they takin tax out
So, we payin for these pigs to knock the blacks out
Ain't that a bitch, some officers are gettin rich
Whoopin on thugs and robbin drug dealers for they shit
As far as jealousy, bein a celebrity
No matter who committed the crime, they all yell at me
And the media is greedier than most
You could sell em your soul or they'll be on ya til a niggas ghost
And everyday I read the paper there's another lie
They show my picture for the crimes of another guy
Now how's that for the life of a big shot
A dead cop, a law suit, a little kid shot
I play them nuttin ass marks in the park
For tryin to earn they stripes in the dark
Only jealous motherfuckers beef, and point the finga


Boom boom boom on your black ass, bitch
{​*1}​ {​*2}​

As I run up on em madman, a nutcase with a screw loose
A zoot troupe full of foolies with toolies
Niggas run to me don't come to me with beef
Take your jewels and your jeep, boom boom! Let that ass sleep
It's gettin hectic, niggas run, quick
Buckshots are the payback for dumb shit
All you niggas on the block tryin to test me
Best wear a vest or get open like, sesame
I'll run up on you mad deep; while you're tryin to sleep
I'm steady pumpin bullets in your sheets
Wake up, motherfucker, don't stutter
Point blank by a nigga from the gutter, yeah!
Gimme mine, gimme mine, gimme, mine
Ban my rhymes, now I'm back to bustin, nines
And bustaz can't get none, hell no
A quick flurry and he's buried with a swelled jaw
I came up from the amateurs to pro hits
At 5-0, so you know I take no shit
And everybody wants to kill a bringer
Of bad news, so they choose, to point the finga

Chorus

One two three, peace to the real G's
Still me, til these motherfuckers kill me
I bring skills and I build, kill at will
Smoke sess til I'm ill, still feel me?
I say one two three, peace to the real G's
Still me, til these motherfuckers kill me
Pick it up, pick it up, give it up
Best to duck or get fucked for your bucks
Scream one two three, peace to the real G's
Still me, til these motherfuckers kill me
I can't give up, it's a black thang
And I ain't goin back to the crack game
Bitches, let em point the finga
Snitches, let em point the finga
Yo, one two three, peace to the real G's
Still me, til these motherfuckers kill me
I guess nobody loves a rap singer

Boom boom boom on your black ass, bitch!
You could get the finga! the middle!



I have this new project coming out along with some other brothers called "One Nation"
It's like an East Coast/West Coast collaboration
To kill this whole new vibe everybody want to be on about it
Like a war between the East Coast and the West Coast
The East Coast West Coast thing is something that
The journalists and People are making up just to get paid and so it can drag out MTV music awards

Is it, money or women to funny beginnings, tragic endings
I can make a million and STILL not get enough of spending
And since my life is based on sinning, I'm hell-bound
Rather be buried than be worried, living held down
My game plan to be trained and, military
Mind of a Thug Lord, sittin' in the cemetery cryin'
I've been lost since my adolescence, calling to Jesus
Balling as a youngster, Wondering if he sees us
Young black male, crack sales got me three strikes
Living in jail, this is hell, enemies die
Wonder when we all pass is anybody listening?
Got my, hands on my semi-shotty, everybody's bitchin'
Please God can you understand me, bless my family
Guide us all, before we fall into insanity
I make it a point, to make my peep bumpin' warlike
Drop some shit, to have these stupid bitches jaws tight

All my niggas on the East Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the West Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the East Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the West Side
Throw your guns up

Who the fuck wanna squeeze?
My Desert E's make MC's freeze
You wakin up in cold sweats, they just dreams
You still apologizin, analyzin, my size and your size and
Realizin, a fist fight would be asinine
You just pop wines I must pop nines
Genuine steel piece, nozzle in your grill piece
You're shook up, two bricks, every cook up
We can hook up, all I see is the future
Disrespect, I shoot ya
By the way, them bricks, get flipped weekly
Sold by soldiers that mix weed with the leak leak
Die for a dollar nigga, life ain't sweet
Play for keeps wet shirts with experts on the creep
Our beef is my fiance, about to marry it
Illegal transactions in Farragut with Arabics


Niggas ain't shit in the 90's, I don't trust 'em
And bitches on my dick but they ain't shit, so motherfuck 'em
Eazy know's what's up cause see he really don't give a fuck
Cause it don't concern me if don't pertain to money or a nut
But then again I talk to a few of my friends
Nine times out of ten 'bout some ends or some skins
Cause I'm the type of nigga that gotta have it like a rabbit
Rappin' is my hustle bustin' ho's is a habbit
I stab it like a true no good nigga should
I do it the way a down O.G. nigga would
And now Niggas know Eric Wright ain't no busta
Another platinum cut from the Compton thugsta
My name is


The penalty is death, especially when I'm mentally stressed
My enemies hang with me 'til I eventually flip
I never reject an offer to battle
Slap a coffin on the saddle
And rattle like a wooden horse to el barrio
Niggas talk but they babble cause they ain't sayin nuttin
If ain't blazin somethin with the mac I'm in the shack bakin muffins
Fake the funk and get your rump roast
One dose of the toast'll make you jump if you come close
Pun spoke, ain't no more debatin; my Squad been waitin
For the perfect time to give you what you all been waitin
An orgi-nation of veterans built
With genuine skills to pay the heat, gas, and the rest of the bills
Invest in the real, don't get left in the hills
My tech and my steel turn your whole crew into vega-ta-bills
We blessed with the will to never surrender
Cause my every agenda's in and out, unseen like I entered the ninja
It's my world

All my niggas on the East Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the West Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the East Side
Throw up ya guns
All my niggas on the West Side
Throw your guns up



Hahaha

And uh, I started out dumb, sprung off a hood-rats
Listenin' to the radio, wishin' that I could rap
But nothing changed, I was stuck in the game
'Cause everybody in the industry was fuckin' me, mayne
Listen, I got a scheme, break away, do my own thang
Drop some conversation, sit back and let the phone ring
Niggas ain't wanna see me rise
97 watch me cut these motherfuckers down to size
And if I catch another case, Lord knows how they hate me
Got a player in the court room, please don't let 'em frame me
I've been dealt a lot of bad cards livin' as a thug
Count my blessings and throw my stressings in this land with no love
Maybe they seen me rollin', look at all this green I'm holdin'
I get this why they envious and get they eyes swollen
Hopin' the heavenly father love a hustler
Meet the hardest nigga on the Earth to ever bust a nut
My homies tell me, "Have a heart" — fuck they feelings
I've been tryin' to make a million since we started, we cold hearted
Niggas in masks that'll blast at the task force
Empty out my clip, time to mash, they asked for it
Me, Makaveli, I'm a motherfucker
We break bread, now we thug brothers, haha
Niggas talk a lot of non-shit I choose to ignore it
A war? They ain't ready for it haha

Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Tell me now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?

My nine is Thug lord, my mind on my grind
Outlawz is my heart, they shine when I shine
My rhyme is my grind, my team be on role
Proceed with the onslaught, indeed they all talk
They all marks and it's an Outlaw holocaust
When I got the sawed-off, niggas gettin' hauled off
Yeah, nigga beware, stand clear
This nigga's scared, man, I don't really care
I've been lost love, my heart need a hug
My bite need blood, I fight with a grudge
The life of a thug nigga might need gloves
But you'll never know with a price on your mug
Them fight strips snug right around your hands
Makin' sure you can never grab the mic again
Dog, you fuckin' with a grown man
Can't I can't afford to lose
Where we from niggas torture dudes
So whatcha wan' do?

Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Tell me now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Tell me now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?
Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you

Haha, watch me clown, give me lovin' when I'm high
I'm a outlaw baby, I'll be thuggin' 'til I die
In my drop-top, double-R, life as a rap star
Hustle like a crack fiend 'til they catch me
Go ask somebody to your show
Watchin niggas out of sight, in my night scope
Cookin' white dope, got my nigga 25-to-life stressed out
Tryin' to have all the better things in life
While Makaveli — a born leader, 10 millimeter
Change a nigga's future like a schizophrenic palm reader
Heed, from out the Bible I read
See the meek shall inherit the Earth and the strong will lead
Hittin' weed like it's alright
I'm in the studio makin' music all night
My enemies cry whenever I rise, they hated 'til the death
Tryin' to beat me out my last breath
Whatcha gonna do?

What y'all gonna do?
What y'all gonna do?
What y'all gonna do?
What y'all gonna do?
Now whatcha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
What y'all gonna do?




Tell me, how many real motherfuckers feel me? I smoke a blunt
And freak the funk until these jealous motherfuckers kill me
I'm out the gutter, pick a hero
I'm 165 and staying high til I die, my competion's zero
Cause I could give a fuck about you, better duck
Or I'll be forced to hit yo ass up I give a fuck
I'm sick inside my mind, why you sweatin me?
It's gonna take an army full of crooked ass cops to come and get me
Niggas know I ain't the one to sleep on, I'm under pressure
Gotta sleep with my piece, an extra clip beside my dresser
Word to God I've been ready to die since I was born
I don't want no shit but niggas trip and yo it's on
Open fire on my adversaries


This nigga is scared


Ain nobody scared man I just told you how to do this anymore


Fuck that shit

You're goin Saturday night and that's it


Ayo, I shoulda been out
I'm deadly when I pull the pin out
Keep frontin', I'mma try yo' chin out
I knocked a lot of men out
I left 'em on the floor spittin' phlegm out
It's either that or I'mma squeeze the gat and pop ten out
You see Corleone, ice spinnin', jigged out, white linen
And if a bitch don't like me she must like women
Every time I come around you see your wife grinnin'
Don't be mad 'cuz yo' career's in the ninth innin'
It's over now, nigga, leave the game
I'm from the danger zone where emcees get slain
We're thugs that never hesitate to squeeze the flame
We're niggas be takin' drugs just to ease the pain
Hustlers flip cokey, 48 Hours like Nick Nolte
When I was OT your bitch rode me
First day home I dived in it
Left her thighs dented
Now that bitch be pagin' me every five minutes
Emcees I squash and disgrace
It's all about the Benjis So why your bills got Washington's face?
A lot of cats be frontin'
Mad singles wit' a fifty on top
L tryin' to have the city on lock
Peace to Biggie and Pac 'cuz they really were hot
Rap game, heavy hitters, it's a shame they no longer wit' us
Niggas wanna be L, ladies wanna see L
If I go to jail you'll wear a shirt sayin' "Free L!"
What

Oh shit
Yo be careful with that man it's loaded
I'll hold on to the gun
Why should he hold on to the gun?
Cuz I already got it motherfucker!


It's not a game it's war, plain and raw
Blood stain the wall, when I bring the chain with the saw
Bring the pain to your door like death was knockin
Unless you got my ends, I'mma make you twins with the Headless Horseman
Hell extortion, sell your soul, live your dreams
A killer fiends for blood, screams of thugs like
Fiends for drugs, I don't need no love
Give me your fear, murder, respect, beer, honies and sex want here
I'll bend them checks for years, hungry and stressed
You fuckin with Chris - fuck Pun - dead the wrath for later
Get your calculator, go 'head Decapitator's back forever
Can't count how many heads I had to sever
Half the niggas I keep, I put em back together
That's the terror, cut open your girl
And make a truss out her flesh, like Buffalo Bill
You fuckin with reel to reel, rap axe maniac
Sound bwoy killer, hack hack chain-react
Two for one - double the death, same price
What would Big say? "Huh, you know that ain't right"

Yo you got the juice now


Excuse me partner can you keep that shit down you see me watching TV

Made it ma ... made it ma




Hehehe, yeah
These are my words to my firstborn

Can you picture young niggas in a rush to grow?
'Til hard-timers in the pen' had to crush his throat
Probably never even saw it comin'
Too busy bullshittin', caught him with his mouth runnin'
Ain't this a bitch? They got me twisted in this game
The feds and the punk police pointin' pistols at my brain
I wonder if I'm wrong 'cause I'm thugged out
My homies murdered execution style, runnin' in the drug house
What was supposed to be a easy hit
Now shit is flipped,'cause niggas died over bullshit
It's not my dream, I'm seein' pictures of a broken man
No witnesses only the questions of who smoked the man
Young adolescents in our prime live a life of crime
Though it ain't logical, we hobble through these tryin' times
Livin' blind—Lord, help me with my troubled soul
Why all my homies had to die 'fore they got to grow?
And right before I put my head on the pillow, say a prayer
One love to the thugs in Heaven, I'll see you there
It's written for the young and dumb that wasn't warned
Help you make it through the storm
My words to my firstborn—feel me!

My words to my firstborn
My words to my firstborn

Since my very first day on this Earth, I was cursed
So, I knew that the birth of a child would make my life worse
And though it hurt me, there was no distortion
'Cause wild seeds can't grow, we need more abortions
Quiet your soul, 'cause you know what you had to do
And so did victims of a world they never came to
I understand it's a better day comin'
Sometimes cats be sleepin' on the dead end, drivin' with the car runnin'
Blinded, ain't no love in the hood, only hearts torn
Love letters to the innocent and unborn
All the babies that died up on the table
Wasn't able to breathe, 'cause the family wasn't able
Can't blame her, I would do the same
All I could give her was my debt and my last name
'Cause in the game things change, livin' up and down
This hard life got me walkin' with my head down
Flashin' frowns wasn't meant to be, was I wrong?
But I'll never get to know, so I carry on
It's written for the young and dumb that wasn't born
My words to my firstborn—feel me!

My words to my firstborn
These are the words to my firstborn
Hey, nigga, talk to your born!
Talk to your seed, nigga!

Two thousand somethin' somethin' mention a new era
A nigga's too real, now see shit too clear
See, there's more than just this scrilla and this tilt
And makin' sure my kittens got they milk
Let my kids know I'm at this
Attack this, the Mack must roll, hood stroll
Ain't no question, is it? Above the Law hustlers
If it's related to chips, homie, we'll handle ya

Yo, although we never take advantage
Though we always into ery'thang
By all means, stack green, gangsta lean
They say money make the world go 'round
So, only associate yourself
With paper chasers and niggas that's truly down
And keep God first
And give thanks for the good times, as well as when it hurts
It's player haters every corner you hit
Touchin' their tits, hella thick, tryin' to get you for yo' grip
I know you stressed-out and fed-up
But come out, gun-blazin', and keep yo' head up
You can call it what you want to, but it ain't gon' change
Above the Law, 2Pac, O.G.'s in this rap game
And we done lived a long hard life
And we done shed so many tears under these bright lights
Y'all, although we grew up corrupted and scorned
We still got a lot of wisdom to give to our firstborn

What you gon' tell your kids, nigga?
Who was you? What was you doin'?
How did you put it down?
These my words to my motherfuckin' firstborn
So, they can know, y'knahmean? Hehehe
Ain't nothin' but a motherfuckin' rider
Westside 'til I die, that's all it was
It's a crooked-ass hand they deal a motherfucker
I just played to win, just played to win
Motherfucker gotta bet against the odds, y'knahmean?



Yo 'Pac
That's right, hehehe
Yo, I heard you got beat up by the police
Got a big fat lawsuit and everything
Yeah..
Niggas just wanna know
If you still gon' be on some crooked-ass nigga shit

Please tell me what's a nigga to do, and it's true
Ain't nuttin new, so I do, what I can to get through
Now first they had me trapped and now I'm pissed
A loaded AK-47 layin' on my hips so I don't trip
One motherfucker from the Underground
And Big Stretch buckin' niggas if they fuck around
Yo why I got beef with police?
Ain't that a bitch, the motherfuckers got a beef with me
They make it hard for me to sleep
I wake up at the slightest peep, and my sheets are 3 feet deep
I guess it's hard for you to see
But now I'm pointin' the finger at police
Instead of them motherfuckers blamin' me
I got the right to bear a pistol
And when the punk motherfuckers get to trippin' I got shit too
And maybe then you'll see the truth
But until then, I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too

It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth; OOOH!
But until then I gotta do what I do and stay a crooked nigga too
It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth; OOOH!
You can't fuck with the crew, of crooked nigga too

Y'know you really can't say that ya blame niggas
Fuck being tame, set a flame, time to aim triggers
2Pac'll spark a revolution, fuck the Constitution
I want my bucks for restitution
This time you got a bigger problem
Time to face the niggas from South Central, Oakland, Brooklyn and Harlem
That's my motherfuckin' brother, so Dave Duke, run for cover
And all the bitches from the Klan
Come feel the wrath of a black man that doesn't smoke crack and
Genuine Draft, ganja ganja, and my fuckin' TEC-9
They know they scared to see us sober

It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth; OOOH!
But until then I gotta do what I do and stay a crooked nigga too
It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth; OOOH!
You can't fuck with the crew, of crooked nigga too

Why me? Play like Jasmine Guy and try me
I'll be damned if I die, come look at the rage in my eyes G
They got my homies in a jail cell
And it's the Rebel and the Devil, and one of us is goin' to Hell
I got the whole place covered, with loc'd out brothers
And nuttin but love for each other
So motherfucker make a motion
I give a fuck, slice you up, and throw your ass in the ocean
Temperatures drop; see it's cool to shoot a nigga
But they hate it when we pop the cops
That's when they gettin' petrol
You better watch your step or you'll be left on death row
But I learn to look ahead of me
Stay strapped watch your back keep your eyes on the enemy
We blowin' up precincts and OOOH
You can't fuck with the crew, of crooked nigga too

It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth, OOOH!
But until then I gotta do what I do and stay a crooked nigga too
It's all up to you, but until then I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too
And maybe then you'll see the truth, OOOH!
You can't fuck with the crew, of crooked nigga too



Maybe it's the thug in me

Ever since I was a young scrub
I was a thug on the corner with my niggas slangin drugs
And runnin from the narcs when they pass by, don't ask why
I'm a hustler, till my ass die
Even if I do come up, I'll be ready when they run up, huh
I'll be a nut to put my gun up, huh
I never trust these hoes at all
Fuckin with them tramp-ass sluts you supposed to fall
Said she played you for your money but the shit was cool
Guess it's true, niggas be bitches too
You can't see how she worked you, all up in the skirt
Now you lookin like a jerk cause she hurt you
Now head's up, don't be a playa hater, just peep game
Keep your mind on your money watch the bitch change
See hoes love thugs, and thugs love loot
Hand it over motherfucker 'fore I shoot - who do you love?

Maybe it's the thug in me, maybe it's the thug in me
Tell me who do you love?
Maybe it's the thug in me, maybe it's the thug in me
Who do you love?

I'm livin that, thug life bay-bee!
Steady smokin indo, goin cra-zy
Baby come and hug me when you rub me, turn the lights down
We in the dark, do you love me?
Everybody's talkin 'bout they, KNOW ME
But they ain't down like my motherfuckin homies
Tell me what you need when you, SEE ME
And we can get it on, BEOTCH, take it ea-sy
Don't try to hold me, control me
But you can take my number baby call me when you lone-ly
Cause it's a man's world, ain't no need to ask why
I'm high 'til I die, and strapped with my fo'-five
Cause you can lose it in the gutter
I wonder if I'll die by the hands of another broke motherfucker
They call me the alcoholer, I'm all in
Thug for life nigga ballin
I'm gettin tired of these hoes tryin to play me
You can't fade me and my niggas goin crazy
All day long I'm straight thuggin, and constantly mean muggin
Breakin the bitches that be buggin tell me who do you love?





After realizin, to master enterprisin
I ain't have to be in school by ten, I was in
Began to encounter, with my counter... parts
I holla burn the block apart, break it down into sections
Drugs by the selection, some use pipes, others use injections
Syringe sold separately, Frank the deputy
Quick to grab my Smith & Wesson, like my dick was missin'
To protect my position, my corner, my layer
While we out here, say the hustlas prayer
If the game shakes me or breaks me
I hope it makes me a better man
Take a better stand. Put money in my moms hand
Get my daughter this college plan, so she don't need no man
Stay far from timid
Only make moves when your heart's in it
And live the phrase Sky's The Limit


Why do you keep
On whispering
Talking with your face turned away
You say that love
Don't come easy for you
What makes you think I'm not afraid?


Ever since I met you I could beat the pressure
It's like your man don't understand
All he does is stress ya
I can see your state of misery from the introduction
It ain't about no suckin' and touchin', just harmless discussion
Maybe we can see a better way, find a brighter day
Late night phone conversations would that be OK?
I don't wanna take up all your time, be the next in line
Tell me your size, let me find you things with you in mind
I can see you're cautious and I'm careful not to scare you
But anticipation of love making got you shaking when im standin' near you
News of precision will prepare ya in case you get scared
Just ask the man in the mirror
Now the picture's gotten clearer all he does is hit you hard
I tell you to leave him and you tell me keep my faith in God
I don't understand, I just wanna bring ya home
I wonder should I leave you alone and find a woman of my own


Why do you keep
On whispering
Talking with your face turned away
You say that love
Don't come easy for you
What makes you think I'm not afraid?


A nigga never been as broke as me, I like that
When I was young I had two pairs of Lees, besides that
The one I wore on Mondays, on Wednesdays
While niggas flirt, I'm sewing tigers on my shirt and alligators
Ya wanna see the inside, huh, I see ya later
Here come the drama, oh, that's that nigga with the fake, huh, BLAOW!
Why you punch me in my face , stay in ya place
Play ya position, here come my intuition
Go in this nigga pocket
Rob him while his friends watchin'
That hoes clocking, here comes respect
His crew's your crew, or they might be next
Look at they man eye, BIG man they never try
So we roll with em' , stole with em'
I mean loyalty, niggas bough me milks at lunch
The milks was chocolate, the cookies, buttercrunch


Why do you keep
On whispering
Talking with your face turned away
You say that love
Don't come easy for you
What makes you think I'm not afraid?



I'm Down with strictly Dope "So"
That means I'm more than u can handle
"Hot" I'm hotter than the wax from
a candle
"Him" that's Roc he's my microphone companion
"Lyrics" full of knowledge truth and understanding
"Hobbies" rapping is my only recreation
"retire" u must be on some kind of medication
"why" because I'll never loosen up my mic grip
"Drugs" never cuz I'm living on the right tip
"sex" only with my girl because I love her
"Babies" impossible I always use a rubber
"Bored" rarely cuz I'm keeping myself busy
"Scratch" nah I leave the cutting up 2 Dize
"Dize?" yeh that's my D.J. he's the greatest
"Word" nah he's paying me 2 say this
"the mind" is something that I cultivate
and treasure
"Thanks" you're welcome and besides it was
my Pleasure



All of my life I dreamed of meeting one
with immense beauty, and once I found her
I would charm her and she'd be mine
forever.

I have found her and indeed she is all
I wished for and more but she is
not charmed nor intrigued. Then I
think 2 myself "What can I offer her?"
The tears warm my eyes and blur my
vision. I stick 2 my stance of bravado
and give her the same uninterested look
she gave me. She was so beautiful
But what can I offer her



Rebel ... rebel
Rebel
Rebel ... rebel

They just can't stand the reign, or the occasional pain
From a man like me, who goes against the grain
Sometimes I do it in vain
So with a little bass and treble
Hey mister, it's time for me to explain that I'm the rebel
Cold as the devil
Straight from the underground, the rebel, a lower level
They came to see the maniac psychopath
The critics heard of me, and the aftermath
I don't give a damn and it shows
And when I do a stage show I wear street clothes
So they all know me
The lyrical lunatic, the maniac MC
I give a shout out to your homies
And maybe then, the critics'll leave your boy alone, G
On the streets or on TV
It just don't pay to be, a truth tellin' MC
They won't be happy 'til I'm banned
So point blank in your face
Pump up the bass, and join the human race
I throw peace to The Bay
Cause from The Jungle to Oaktown, they backin' me up all the way
You know you gotta love the sound
It's from the rebel - the rebel of the underground

Rebel, he's a rebel
Rebel of the underground

Now I'm face to face with the devils
Cause they breedin' more rebels than the whole damn ghetto
And police brutality
Shit, it put you in the nip and call it technicality
So you reap what you sow
So reap the wrath of the rebel, jackin' 'em up once mo'
Now the fox is in the henhouse
Creepin' up on your daughter while you sleep I got her sneakin' out
2Pac ain't nothin' nice, I'll be nothin' how I wanna
And doin' what I'm gonna
Now I'm up to no good
The mastermind of mischief movin' more than most could
So sit and slip into the sound
Peep the rebel - the rebel of the underground


They say they hate me, they wanna hold me down
I guess they scared of the rebel - the rebel of the underground
But I never let it get me
I just make another record 'bout the punks tryin' to sweat me
In fact, they tryin' to keep me out
Try to censor what I say
Cause they don't like what I'm talkin' 'bout
So what's wrong with the media today
Got brothers sellin' out cause they greedy to get paid
But me, I'm comin' from the soul
And if it don't go gold, my story still gettin' told
And that way they can't stop me
And if it sells a couple of copies, the punks'll try to copy
It's sloppy, don't even try to
I'm a slave to the rhythm, and I'm about to fly through
So, yo, to the people in the ghetto
When ya hear the bass flow, go ahead and let go
Now everybody wanna gangbang
They talkin' street slang, but the punks still can't hang
They makin' records 'bout violence
But when it comes to the real, some brothers go silent
It kinda make you wanna think about
That ya gotta do some sellin' out, just to get your record out
But 2Pacalypse is straight down
So feel the wrath of the rebel - the rebel of the underground

2Pac is a rebel
Rebel of the underground



West side, it's 187 on a motherfucking hook
Niggas out of bounds should have shook
We bangin' by the book
Got shot in the neck tryin' to get away
And to a vigi it ain't nothin' but gun play

HEEY!
Got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin' thug niggas?
Used to love niggas, now I plug niggas
And slug niggas, am I wrong?
Niggas makin' songs, tryin' to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I BUST! Then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin' back to brighten up the sky, how many die?
Heard the Fugees was tryin' to do me - look bitch!
I cut your face, this ain't no motherfuckin' movie
THEN! We watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin' at my motherfuckin' sideshow
BAM! Set my plan in mo', time to exterminate my foes
I can't stand you hoes, uhh
Now label this my fuckin' trick shot
My lyrics runnin' all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we ride - on our enemies

Nigga to catch this nigga, I'm ready to peel one
Instead of the shoulders I gotta diss toward a niggas grill some
Vigilante and villain regime niggas come with steel guns
Get ready to sleep cause you tripped when you fuck with a villain
Which one of y'all motherfuckers said fuck Tech N9ne
Shady Pacino turned C-ho when I clutched that N9ne
Me and my nigga C-Bo Yuk mezzole not only bust that rhyme
We can do it illegal so the evil'll give a fuck next time
Nigga don't you ever spit my name
And thinking that shit's the same
"Allah hu akbar" - is what I say before I buck you
Motherfuck busters like vell Bacardi yeah nigga had enough ya'll
Get ready to suffer - kneel down
Nigga, Tech N9ne Killer Klown
Nigga, six feet underground is where your found
Nigga, 40 water would never did a song wit you if he knew the song
Was about me never make a million
Next time say my name say my name like destiny's children - bitch


Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain
Nigga, time to die, say goodbye
Watch my eyes - when I pull the trigger
So right before you die you bow before a bigger nigga
Now dry your eyes, you was heartless on your hits
Niggas love to scream peace after they start some shit - pay attention
Here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you then I, run a train on Mobb Deep!
Don't fuck with me!
Nigga you're barely livin', don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin' well, hell
How many niggas wanna be involved?
See I was only talkin' to Biggie
But I'll kill all'a y'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up, by the fuckin' Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody heard
Know I meant, every motherfuckin' word
When we ride on our enemies

Buck these niggas, I'm a killer screamin' regime
Deep navis with heat like the A team
And when my K scream, it's causin' nothin' but murder
Bucking these niggas makin' hate me
Yeah, nigga, we don't give a fuck, nigga we thug lords
Connected from Tech N9ne and touched for the thug war
Whose got love for these niggas with no love
At all give a fuck guns clutched
Only left a ball I know you heard of me wanna murder me
Moms itchin' had the whole gang unwrappin' chickens
Nigga and we was headed for the jack strapped
With a fat gat, all my niggas down to rat-tat-tat-tat
West coast bad boys we was yellin'
Now West Coast Mafia regime and thug zellin' Nigga




I haven't yet for reasons of your own
But soon I'm sure you'll tire from being alone
u haven't recovered from the pain of the past
So u show me affection behind the wall of glass
But when I do finally kiss u
u will realize at last my heart was true



Mr. Shakur, can you please explain the meaning
Behind your violent lyrics?

Explain the meaning?
The fuck these niggas talkin bout?

* sounds of running and sirens in background *


* gun shot *

My attitude is shitty
My message to the censorship committee
Who's the biggest gang of niggas in the city?
The critics or the cops?
The courts or the crooks, don't look so confused
Niggas get they neck broke daily
Tryin to stay jail free
What the fuck does Quayle know
What young black males need?
Please tell me
Message to the censorship committee
Who's the biggest gang of niggas in the city?
Huh, I pack a nine millimeter cause I gotta
Livin hotter than the 4th of July, if I gotta die, I gotta
Momma told me, "Don't let em fade me..
.. nigga don't let em make you crazy!"
Game is what she gave me
Gotta watch your back, strapped
Real niggas rat-pack
If you get your ass taxed, bring a gat back
That's not the way we made it
That's just the way it is
Slangin rocks, fed a nigga's kids
I came up
My message to the censorship committee
Who's the biggest gang of niggas in the city?
Cops pull me over, check my plates, but I'm legal
You couldn't get me, figure fuck with a niggas people
They got me trapped, gat with the motherfuckin hammer back
Cops on my back, just cause I'm black, Snap
Now I'm guilty?
Message to the censorship committee
Who's the biggest gang of niggas in the city?
All you punk police will never find peace
On the streets til the niggas get a piece, fuck em!
They kill you to control ya
Pay top dollar for your soul
Real niggas don't fold, straight souljah!
Can't find peace on the streets
Til the niggas get a piece, fuck police, hear them screamin
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
Til the niggas get a piece, fuck police, hear them screamin
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
Til the niggas get a piece, fuck police, screamin
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
Til the niggas get a piece, fuck police, screamin
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
Fuck em! Can't find peace on the streets
The niggas scream fuck em!
Thinkin they run the motherfuckin streets
It's mo' niggas than it's police
One nigga, teach two niggas
Teach mo' niggas, and we could run this shit!
I hear ya!

They finally pulled me over and I laughed



Aye, we doin' this for the fans
For the motherfuckers that be in our corner
This right here is some live shit
Ain't one word written down
Ain't no words from my mind
This is the shit right off the level
This how we do it
Cause most of the time, what niggas like

Niggas know me!!!
They don't know oh-oh-oh
I say they swear they know me!!!
They don't know oh-oh-oh
My niggas down with me!!!
Until the day I d-i-e-e-e
You ho's know oh-oh-oh
I say my niggas down with me!!!
Until the day I d-i-e-e-e
You ho's know oh-oh-oh

If there's a cure for this
I don't want it, I don't need it
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it
If there's a cure for this
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it

I'm up early in the mornin', tryin' to get paid
Cause my mind's on my money, everything is so made
I play game in the youngster, as a youngster
Finally made the status
Gladys Knight and the Pips
Snoop Dogg 'bout to trip
Catch your grip and then I'll dip
Makin' money is a must for me, I gots to have it
Cause you know my lifestyle is like 2Pac's, it's just so lavish
Just movin' on paper; movin', makin' and shakin'
Leavin' fools in a daze, as if, I was a Laker
Break 'em down and shake 'em, pass it off to 2Pac
And let him take a jump shot
Because he gon' give it all he got

Back in the old days, niggas was suckers, tried to belittle me
But that was when I was much smaller, just a little G
But now I'm a just a bigger baller
Niggas don't wanna see me, because I'm larger and taller
Made my money get bigger, bank account is larger
Niggas don't wanna see me
They label Dogg the father
When they see us on the streets, niggas scream peace
They don't want it
Cause they screamin' they "Can't C Me"
You heard the album, All Eyez On Me

If there's a cure for this
I don't want it, I don't need it
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it
If there's a cure for this
I don't want it, I don't need it
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it

Cause I gots to get my grip and fingers gots to keep it on
I'm scratchin' for some scratch and some scrilla
Tryin' to get the big paper
Cause yo, paper is a killer
Leavin' niggas on daze
Cause yes, money pays
Cause, if you ain't got it
Then it seems you out plottin'
Tryin' to do you a robbery, or some type of assault
But you just might get caught
But you know it ain't my fault
I'm gon' dip away and slip away
And look for my nigga 'Pac
Gon' and take the ride away

Well I'll be right there homie, uh
What's up baby?
This Thug Life, baby, Outlaw Immortalz
I thought I taught you
Baby we don't do it, but we fought you
And when we did, we beat you ass niggas in the streets
To the motherfuckin' studio
Soundin' like Phil Collins, singin' su-su-sudio
You niggas is booty

If there's a cure for this
I don't want it, I don't need it
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it
If there's a

I say niggas know me!!!
But do they know the D-O-double G?
You don't know oh-oh-oh
Until the day I D-I-E
You ho's know oh-oh

It's like a family
Snoop Dogg 'bout to do it like Mussolini slow
E.D.I. what up nigga? I see you, I feel you real now
Snoop Dogg 'bout to show how you, how I peel the crowd
I step back, relax
New jacks, they get smacked up against the wall
When they, think that they can get with that, nigga Doggy Dogg
Cause, I'm a true killa when it come to makin' scrilla

Them niggas know, I suppose they froze
Once they seen me and the Dogg, doin' clothes in the videos
Bitches pause, we all up in them drawers
Baby you know the secret, uh, I gots to keep it
Money, paper, and bitches, my only motto
Drink out the cold forty bottle
Now me and Snoop came up, and built our name up
Bitches thought they had us crossed, but bitch I got my game
Plus, I'm a motherfuckin' baller, alcoholic
You can ask my homie K
He'll tell you, I've been ballin' since around the way
And E.D.I., had a baby
He's needy, but he's crazy
Got these niggas runnin' wild from this fuckin' .380, now uh

Check this out
I don't want it, I don't need it
And if there's a cure for this
I don't need it, I don't want it
If there's a cure for this
You don't want it biatch



Life… What the fuck is life for niggas like us?
Been wakin' up to another mothafuckin' day
I'm the type of soldier
A nigga that seen everything in my mothafuckin' eyes
I seen my parents get killed to my mothafuckin' eyes
I seen my brother kill himself in my eyes
I seen 'Pac, Yak die in the struggle in my eyes
So I know anybody can be touched
You know what I mean?

Oh God, forgive me, somebody please say a prayer for me
Needed my parents, but they was never there for me
Believe in everything they feed me, I'm seein' demons
I wake up screamin', who believe me or was I dreamin'?
Five fingers on the .45 chrome
Dead aim at my brain, infrared with no lights on
I ain't afraid to die, I wanna see what's after this
I'm livin' blind, writin' rhymes 'til they capture this
And if we die, let the world understand why
Soldier my eyes, hate to see a young thug cry
They seein' us inside a casket, that's how they see us
Oh God, forgive us ghetto bastards, we human beings
They leavin' us inside this hell hole
Just waitin' to fail, so then they tell us that's what jail fo'
Adolescent young teens turned violent
It's floatin', in a world turned silent
'Cause you could be touched

Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched
Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched

I live life high speed, movin' a million miles per hour
Towards my destiny, makin' decisions carelessly
Yeah, it's me, yo' nigga man-child
Bomb first, stand proud, ain't lookin' for hand-outs
Twenty-five years up in this bitch
And I'll be damned if I ain't leavin' rich
And leave my kids a grip
I let my blood drip off in this thug shit
You can be touched
I catch you slippin' while I'm on a money mission
Like right now, thirty dollars to my John Hancock
Try to get more so my shit don't flock
I lick off shots for everything they owe me
And when it's my time to go I pray the Lord hold me

I was born in the city that never sleeps
Schooled by the realest of the real niggas that ever breathed
And I was big when I was young
And now I see that I was dumb
My nigga Lonnie just got hit with ten
Ten years for trustin' a friend
They left him stuck in the pen
I love him, we all here just to die here
Plus, nobody cares what got here
Touched by a angel and kissed by the Lord
Praise the thug ways and I'll never be bored
Touched by a angel and kissed by the Lord
Y'all praise the thug ways, so forever it's on, baby

My young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched
Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched

Why grieve this life, planted by the fiends and pipes?
Green lights so I'm seein'-seein' everything twice
Pretty much of nothin' nice, we suckin' it up
Even when we get a job, we fuckin' it up
Like it can't happen to us, I could never be a bum
Yeah, right, you wound up one
God forbid I'm touched, y'all keep livin' it up
Look and learn, next it could be your turn, word

Yes, this a felony's hobby that got me here, thinkin' robbery
Day to day all year long, Teflon protects my body
It's such unimportant in this criminal cartel
I'm caught and supportin' me
So in these streets of hockey I play the goalie
Secrets of war licks, and score shit
Share between clients and homies
Remember what Pacino told me
Before he past, watch them clowns
With them crocodile smiles
'Cause they phony, I get that cash, stay lonely
And I'm point like a thong, and it's survival of the strong
Livin' outside the laws of this crooked world I was born
Touched

My young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched
Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile, still livin' child-like
Thinkin' he can make his pay, too in a rush
Niggas better slow down, 'cause you can be touched




High speed
For all my niggas livin' in the rush
Slow it down just a notch baby
It's goin' be alright, it's goin' be alright

Life at high speed, life at high speed
Fuck the punishment, Thai weed
Buy me a gun, liquor and puffin' Thai weed

I live life high speed
Slightly disillusioned by weed
I breed thug muthafuckas even worse than me
When I bleed, my enemies best to flee quickly
Harm me, my army
Niggas decease swiftly
Look at you now, why you wanna act out?
I pull the hammer back
Strike wit' a cannon that'll blow yo muthafuckin' back out
They blast but I'm still standin'
Slightly scarred
Deep questions for the lord "Why he don't like me, god?"
So, though my life was hard with no remorse
I absorb all lessons, provide protection for the boss
Rollin' in my double R, rugged and ruthless
Keep a vest through these hard times, knowin' it's useless
And my crew, we crooked, be mistaken for Jewels
We all about our cash, blast if you break the rules
Fools turned snitch for the D.A., be heaven-sent
Switched like a stone-bitch, turned state's evidence, why?
Then they wonder why niggas die
Put your family in danger, just to get high
Now, what the hell can we get from jail?
More tricks for the crime trade, this is hell
Bail out, a thug nigga fresh out the jailhouse
Open your safe count and take all the mail out
Whatever happens happens
Whoever falls dies
We fresh out of time, livin' blind, so we all ride
In times like these, chronic or Thai weed
Puffin' through this high speed
And people say...

Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night

Verbal assassin, I hit the corner fast, blastin'
Hot plastic stretch your chest plate back like elastic
No need to push me to split ya
I love beef, like pussy and pistols
For all you pussies that's softer than tissue
I ride by like the fall guy out the roof
Give me the joints low to verdict wit' mine
Get that ass attacked, murdered, and robbed, blind from behind
Rapid shots pourin'
Catchin' niggas while they snorin'
Kickin' his door in
I'll leave your whole fuckin' family in mournin'
Bust me, you itchy-bitchy types can't touch me
Frontin' like you're hard
I'll play your fuckin' yard like a trussel

Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night

At times, I look through times wit' so much anger
Wonderin' why it keeps on passin', pushin' me into danger
No stranger to hard times or the good ones
At times I'm amazed
At what the motherfuckin' hoods done
What we do to get paid
All day, for the almighty, dollar
Don't even bother to holla
We all destined to be swallowed
By the same thing we lust for
Threw away our morals and values and dust more
Niggas is dying tomorrow
We, bailing on borrowed times
Nigga the clocks tickin'
Approachin' is the day you gonna need money or Glocks spittin'
Cops sittin', politicians passin' laws you ain't know what
Soon that money gon' be illegal when you die to
Keep your dough up
But I ain't goin' tell you "what?", to stop chasin' paper
Man, I'm just like y'all, I worry 'bout that shit later
Put the metal to the pedal, slash up nigga, blaze
Let's get blowed out high speed 'til the end of my days
Now my people say

Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
I'm gonna buy me a gun
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night

Whatcha gonna do when you get outta jail?
For my niggas on the West Side and the East Side
And the North Side and the South Side
From Compton to Jersey
Gettin' it real hard
From Atlanta, Georgia to Utah
From St. Louis to Alabama
From Mississippi to Oakland, from San Francisco to San Diego
Seattle to Florida
Maine to Mass, haha
Food and sex
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
Then what's next?
Food and sex, house parties in the projects
We goin' all night
High speeds
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
And it don't stop, and it won't quit
Outlawz with that rough shit, baby!

Learn about it
Pac you goin' rap?



I ain't got no motherfucking friends
What y'all niggas talking about?
Hell yeah I'mma do this motherfucking track
And they know exactly who I'm  talking about, too, you old bitch-made niggas

Cause uh, niggas talk plenty shit, so many tricks
I fucked your bitch cause I'm true to this, witness the hit
You talk bad about a nigga when I got blasted
Hope you made a little money while the funk lasted
Heard they call you Big Poppa nigga, how you figure?
Cause to me you'll always be a phoney fat nigga
I can't be copied even wearing Versace, nigga you run or ruck
Scared as fuck, if the guns would bust, now niggas talk
I got a list of player haters and fakes
You bitch niggas getting blown away
You cross-eyed Down syndrome crack baby
So you and Puffy are tough? Now that's crazy
I got your ass in my sight, niggas dying tonight
We screaming, "West Side for life"
And I can't wait to see you niggas in traffic cause we gonna get 'em up
When you see me, you better bust cause I'm a hit 'em up

Grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac
Who shot me? But you punks didn't finish
Now you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga we hit 'em up

It's hard to explain, this wasn't my thang when I was younger
Before my shit, I swear to God, I'll make you stick just to make a come up
Niggas run up cause more murder for the money
Got caught up tryna make a harder record, should have been on checked
Cause I bet you and it's for life
You'll never gonna see a nigga like me wanting a battle up on T.V
I'd rather release some of these
And put a slug to you buster ass niggas that continue to squeeze
I got some niggas back in Jersey that would rather be jacking cars
And robbing bitch niggas like y'all for emergency
Let's take it back to the West Side
Them niggas sure gonna be riders and plus we Thug Life niggas, so call us multiply
Finger on the trigger, bitches stand and rise
But we don't trust 'em and they might be the first that we gonna bust up
Just label me a Bad Boy Killer
You Mobb Deep bitches gonna feel us when we turn into killers
Hit 'em up

Now this is me, BBK all day, ain’t no blunt, ain’t no creeping
Strictly Bad Boy killing, shoot that ass like a squealer
Now let this motherfucking top down, I'm fitting to drop rounds
Letting these sounds, pop and then I'm hot bound
Seeing them shatter, shooting my shit to work a lease go
What's up to the riders in L.A, don't preach on up to the East O
Shooting that so, C-Lo, circle, that shit don't hurt you
___________ made to turn you purple
Wanna take a plane, but we enemies to the game
Well get that ass tamed, simple and plain, y'all know the name
Drama, riders, through the whole night
Niggas get taught, then we bobbin' through, they hits slow
No need for running cause we don't give a fuck
Beside the funky man, we got to hit they ass on up

Get out the way, yo, get out the way yo
Biggie Smalls just got shot
And I'm a true eagle storming, nigga don't need your fat ass in California
I catch you on any East Coast corner and you's a goner
Puffy weaker than fucking block, I'm running through nigga
And I'm smoking Junior M.A.F.I.A in front of you nigga
With the ready power, tucking my gats under my Eddie Bauer
You clothes petty sour, I push packages every hour
My sons past when slapping nickels on glass 40s
So hand me cash, you made on that F without your ass shorty
I got a team of simple boutable souls
With my ears like Yoda quick as a cobra and never sober

I'm on a 12 O' Clock cruise to Brooklyn and I'm looking
For the thirl in your barrel ready to get his life tooken
So where your killers at you fake trick
E.D.I. will leave your coward ass stripped and a full clip in your stomach
You been all year nigga running
Popping every coward and every nigga behind you
I made it about impossible
For you niggas to escape another 'mergency visit to the hospital
I can't wait meet up with all you bitches in the streets
So I can leave all you cowards leaking in your fucking seats
When we hit 'em up

If you a big bad mothafucker come step to this
I got points in the clip and worms on the tits
Who wanna test this to the 1 2 3 bound to get they ass put under
Cause the Storm is bringing nothing but thunder
Who's the bomb nigga quick to feel that ichy finger
Situation of my nine who's the bigger trigger
I approached a true G you though I was easy
Now you begging on your knees pleasey



Uh, world wide mob figgaz
Check game you little young punks
We world wide mob figgaz
All you niggas is jealous cats
What, what?

Uhh, Uhh, now put them hands up
Rich niggas throw the grands up, and what?
I gotta prosecute to get what's mine in the nine lime
It's my time motherfucker try to stop it gon' see nine lives
Baby girl, fuckin' you now before I blow up, you know what?
I seen your kind before
High saditty, but really like it raw, in the closet like the rider type of whore
But I'm collectin' these vicks when I put the dick on her
O.U.T.L.A.W.Z
You fuckin' with a nigga livin' destructively, pump and pee
Tuckin' T's often it counts from the flow on
I'm tryin' to handle my business full grown
This shit is on, it's gettin' crazy after dark
Where the real thug niggas? Here you are
We world wide mob figgaz

We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang
We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang
World wide mob figga, let me see a nigga nuts hang

Nigga, duck down, bust first, make 'em feel somethin'
Shouldn't shot your gun if you ain't kill nuttin'
Nephew gotta face the devil and got four heavily armed
So we ride with the left of us, best of us
Plus we wake up with our TEC on us
We test yo' nuts in a heartbeat, sleep on the street
Obey the rules of the ones who want yo' beef I'll eat
Y'all niggas weak, in a motherfuckin' way it's so pitiful
I'll leave you motherfuckers critical
We heard the slick shit you said on fuckin' Too Short tape
But you only stepped your way into an early wake, early grave
That's what you brave niggas get for fuckin' with this
You had your chance to mob first you didn't you missed
Just switched to fake
Napoleon be the motherfuckin' last nigga with the gat to break
The last to fade, earthquake aftershock, is what you got
Fuckin' with niggas that give a damn about hip-hop
This how it go in our family
Cause this Outlaw shit is what we stand for gradually
We world wide mob figgaz

We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang
We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang

World wide motherfuckin' mob figgaz
Weed smokin', gun-totin', drinkin'
Ridin' on our motherfuckin' enemies
Y'all know how we do it
World wide mob figgaz
World wide mob figgaz

I be the Young N-O, to the B-L-E
Last name O-U-T-L-A-W-Z
M-A-R was the for starters, squeeze the whole cartridge
Your lady called the squad and the whole sausage
Sip Coronas when we bendin' the corner, brothers hit
Urban legend, dirty third still reppin'
Still double-S to bumrush your session
I get it dirty and burn ya' just a nigga in a skirt
Drinkin' Squirt, punk duck, hit the dirt
Sprint to the church that you got comin'
Outlawz on the ride picture God runnin'
Ain't nuttin but a thug thang, bust your brains
'Pac passed the rock so we tucked the game
Under our belt, we huntin' the wealth, you fuckin' yourself off
Don't you know not to go against the Outlawz

We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang
We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang

Hey watch out man, look out
Known for doin' scandalous deeds, no handlin' me
And nah, it ain’t the drugs, it’s the straight thug nigga in me
I swoop down and cause havoc
My rapid delivery is automatic, lettin' niggas have it
I've been labelled as a thug nigga
Since they don't sell my shit to white folks
Ship it to the drug dealers
And catch a—catch a nigga world wide
A fuckin' mob figga West coast, who-ride
When we rob niggas money make my squad bigger
But we ain't sell our souls
Bustin' on my enemies, murder my foes
At my shows I'm a nut, lights camera time for action
Now get to clappin' to my cuts, a world wide mob figga

We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight, givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang
We got homies on the front line, livin' it up
We got ladies in the back straight. givin' it up
It ain't nothin' but a thug thang

Ayo, get that motherfucker right there
Ayo, K, pull out on that motherfucker and blast
Yo Mo, get over there, get over there
Ayo Malc, get 'em
Ayo bust on ‘em mother fuckers
Hey bust on 'em, bust on that nigga
Ayo Yak, c'mon, Fatal, let’s get the fuck outta here
Fuck them niggas
West Coast nigga, West Coast
World wide mother fuckin' mob figgaz, nigga
We thug life
Nigga know what time it is
Get the fuck out of here
You ain't dead! You ain't dead, nigga, come on
Hey come the fuck on
We out nigga, Westsiiide!
Outlaw Riders, biatch



I hope u heard me when I asked
u that night 2 be my wife
Not for this year or next
But mine for all your life
2 accept me when I sin
and understand me when I fail
Not 2 mention standing the rain
which comes down as hard as hail
I am not the best of men
My faults could scare the night
But my heart is always pure 2 my wife 4 life



* Ron Isley harmonizes throughout but sings no real lyrics


Why'd you slang crack? I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
A nigga gotta pay the fuckin rent

Crazy, I gotta work with what'chu gave me
You claimin I'm a criminal and you the one that made me
They got me trapped in this slavery
Now I'm lost in this holocaust headin for my grave G
I told Sam he could fuck the war
And got a busted jaw for sayin fuck the law
And if you wonder why I'm mad check the record
What's a nigga gotta do to get respected?
Sometimes I think I'm gettin tested
And if I don't say yes a nigga's quick to get arrested
That's the reason I stay testin
I keep a vest on my chest in case the cops are gettin restless
Walkin around, ready to light shit up
But since my life is fucked, some say I'm slightly nuts
Buck buck is the sound as I move up
Other niggas pay attention when a fool bust, huh
They make a nigga be a killer; I used to be a dealer
But they wanted to see who's realer
Now them same motherfuckers wanna murder me
And I wonder if the Lord ever heard of me, huh
I need loot, so I'm doin what I do
And don't say shit until you walked in my shoes
There was no other destiny to choose
I had nuttin left to lose, so I'm singin nigga blues

Why'd you slang crack? I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
A nigga gotta pay the fuckin rent

Poppa need brand new shoes, but what the fuck can a nigga do?
My little boy gotta eat too
So why must I sock a fella
Just to live large like Rockefeller?
And did you ever stop to think
I'm old enough to go to war, but I ain't old enough to drink
Cops wanna hit me with the book, huh
And you're hooked on my "I Don't Give a Fuck" look
Make your rules, I'mma break 'em
No matter how much you make 'em, you show me bacon I'm take 'em
So don't you ever tempt me
I'm a fool for mine nigga and my pockets stay empty
To my brothers in the barrio
You're livin worse than the niggas in the ghetto so
I give a fuck about your language or complexion
You got love from the niggas in my section
You got problems with the punk police?
Don't run from the chumps, get the pump from me
We ain't free, I'll be damned if I play the trick
For a blonde-haired, blue-eyed, caucausian bitch
Down with my homeboy Rich, huh
Fuck a snitch and a groupie-ass bitch
And the nigga with a cellular phone, leave his baby at home
So he can go out and bone, huh
And you wonder why we blazin niggas
Cause you punks havin babies can't raise the niggas
And they down to be fuck-ups too
Drinkin forties of brew, huh, singin nigga blues

Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Now I'm headin for the motherfuckin pen
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Now I'm headin for the motherfuckin pen
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Why'd you slang crack? Cause I had to
Now I'm headin for the motherfuckin pen




a creative heart, obsessed with satisfying
This dormant and uncaring society
u have given them the stars at night
and u have given them Bountiful Bouquets of Sunflowers
But 4 u there is only contempt
and though u pour yourself into that frame
and present it so proudly
this world could not accept your masterpieces
from the heart

So on that starry night
u gave 2 us and
u took away from us
The one thing we never acknowledged
your Life



Because we all spring
from different trees
does not mean
we are not created equally

Is the true beauty in the tree
or in the vast forest in which it breathes
the tree must fight 2 breed
among the evils of the weeds

I find greatness in the tree
that grows against all odds
it blossoms in darkness
and gives birth 2 promising pods.

I was the tree who grew from weeds
and wasn't meant 2 be
ashamed I'm not in fact I am proud
of my thriving family tree



Imagine if we could go back
I mean the first motherfuckers that came in the slave ships

We back for everything you owe, no longer oppressed
Cause now we overthrow those that placed us in this rotten mess
But let's agree on strategy and pick out enemies right
Who stands accused of the abuse my own, kind do right
Pardon, not disregardin' what you thinkin' but you must abandon ship
Cause once I rip your whole shit is sinkin'
Supreme ideology, you claim to hold
Claimin' that we all drug dealers with empty souls
That used to tempt me to roll, commit to violence
In the midst of an act of war, witnesses left silent
Shatter, black talon style, thoughts I throw
It remains in your brain then of course it grows
Maybe, even your babies can produce and rise
Picture a life where black babies can survive past five
But we must have hope, quotin' the reverend from the pulpit
Refuse to turn the other cheek we must defeat the evil culprit
Lace me with words of destruction and I'll explode
But supply me with the will to survive, and watch the world grow
This ain't bout talkin' 'bout problems, I bring solutions
Where's the restitution, stipulated through the constitution
You violated, now I'm back to haunt your nights
Listen to the screams, of the lives you sacrificed
And in case you don't know, ghetto born black seeds still grow
We comin' back, for everything you owe

I'm comin' collectin' the shit that belong to me
Motherfuckers are runnin' and duckin'
I'm a crazy nigga on a mission wit' a bad mentality
Armed with missiles guns grenades
Pull out the pin, free I'm comin'

How do you plead Mr. Shakur, how do you plead?
How do I plead?
Yes sir, how do you plead?
Shit, you know how I plead
C'mon!!
Psssh

Not guilty on the grounds of insanity it was them or me
Bustin' at my innocent family, say they lookin' for ki's
I was home alone, blind to the prelude
Bust in, talkin' bout, "Where is the quaaludes?" What you say fool?
Where in the hell is the search warrant?
No feedback is what he uttered, before he screamed "Nigga motherfucker"
Dropped me to my knees, I proceed to bleed
Sufferin' a rain of blows to my hands and knees
Will I survive, is God watchin'?
I grab his gat and bust in self-defense, my only option
God damn!
Now they got me goin' to the county jail
And my family can't pay this outrageous bail
Try to offer me a deal, they told me if I squeal
Move me, and my people, to a mansion in Brazil
Not me, so this is how it ends, no friends
I'll be stressed and they just, repossessed my Benz
Told the judge it was self-defense, he won't listen
So I'm bumpin' this in federal prison, givin' everything I owe

I'm comin' collectin' the shit that belong to me
Motherfuckers are runnin' and duckin'
I'm a crazy nigga on a mission wit' a bad mentality
Armed with missiles guns grenades
Pull out the pin, free I'm comin'
I'm comin' collectin' the shit that belong to me
Motherfuckers are runnin' and duckin'
I'm a crazy nigga on a mission wit' a bad mentality
Armed with missiles guns grenades
Pull out the pin, free I'm comin'



excuse me but Lady Liberty needs glasses
And so does Mrs. Justice by her side
Both the broads R blind as bats
Stumbling thru the system
Justice bumped into Mutulu and
Trippin' on Geronimo Pratt
But stepped right over Oliver
And his crooked partner Ronnie
Justice stubbed her Big Toe on Mandela
And liberty was misquoted by the Indians
slavery was a learning phase
Forgotten without a verdict
while Justice is on a rampage
4 endangered surviving Black males
I mean really if anyone really valued life
and cared about the masses
They'd take 'em both 2 Pen Optical
and get 2 pairs of glasses



It's like all we got left – teardrops and closed caskets
Tell me how you feel, homie

You recollects and see how crazy it sounds
Since birth, eyes set on gettin' bigger
Just another wild-ass nigga
Couldn't be no sex without that gold Lexus
Seein' visions of people smokin' and niggas catchin' vapors
They got a plot to make a profit with they Glocks spittin'
Still no one's knowin' so they kept goin'
Catchin' dealers comin' out they cars
So peep the lesson, but wait a minute, back to Precious
She's snortin' dope in the back seat of Trigg's Lexus
Teardrops and closed caskets

Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?

Hopin God's blessings stick with ya
Picture the neighborhood kingpin, who's gettin' bigger
Familiar face, but a man now, it's Lil' Trigga
Now Lil' Mo was a soldier to the fullest
Down for his homies, always the first to spit bullets
Never pictured his truest homeboy would fall in love
Now Precious is pregnant, Lil' Trigga is happy
But Precious was lonely, while Lil' Trigga was makin' dough
She's slippin' in secret places and gettin' with Lil' Mo
The neighborhood's buzzin', now people are talkin'
Lil' Trigga's gettin' pictures of the both of 'em walkin'
Now jealousy's dangerous, and if you don't believe me
Then watch the way that this story ends and maybe you'll see
There ain't no heroes or villains, ain't no pleasure in killin'
Just the smoke from the cap peelin', a man with no feelings
Teardrops and closed caskets

Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?

Now with the problems of poverty and the tricks to these tales
How many people'll die? How many'll live to tell?
Although best friends before, Lil' Trigga and Mo
They in an all out war, over a fiend they ain't know
Behind the curtains their privacy lust is already laid down
The results is the same with different names and it turns out

Y'all know how it is, same old thing in the same old town
Lil' Trigg got his nose wide open on this one trick
Now he's played out

From misdemeanors to felonies, small-time to sellin' ki's
I can't believe the shit they tellin' me
They opened fire, three bodies dropped, so call the cops

Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?
Will I!!.., forever be!!.., alone!!!?

Aye, QDIII in this motherfucker
All the homies that didn't make it to see this day
Yaknahmean? I know it's hard out there, heheh
With teardrops and closed caskets
It's like that's all we got to look forward to these days
Murders, brothers dyin', funerals
Shit, it's like I done ran out of suits, homie
I done ran out of tears
Know we gon' have to do something y'all
We gon' have to do something
I send this out to Mutulu and Geronimo
And to all the fallen comrades, all the soldiers
All the homies that fell, all the homies
May God bless your families
May you always live in the motherfuckin' heart
Rest in peace, nigga
May your enemies be deceased, dead on the streets
We can't have peace 'til the niggas get a piece



I want to be, yo, let me fuck that nigga down
You heard that shit, nigga
Ay, yo, what you going with that big ass
My ghetto love song, set it off, set it off
Let's be friends, where my niggas' at
Where my niggas', where my niggas'
Where my niggas' at, all my real niggas'
Where my niggas', where my niggas'

Let's be friends, throw your hands in the air
There's no need to front
Let's see you just throw your hands in the air
Let's be friends, Westside in this motherfucka right here
Throw your hands in the air, Westside

Approach you and post a minute, yeah
All on my double 'R', tinted
As you pass bye winking
My eye's freshly scented
What's the happ's baby, what's up
Come get with me and perhaps lady
You can help me multiply my stacks, baby
Currency seems small, I need companionship
Through with that scandalous shit
I bet your man ain't shit, ain't shit
So why you're hesitating
Acting like your shit don't stink
Check out my diamonds, bitch, everyone's going to blink
This be a thug paid outlaw nigga with riches
Cream dreaming motherfucka on a mash for bitches
Check my resume, sipping on Cristal and Alizé, puking
Smoking on big weed, keyed the Cali way, Westside!
Don't like tricking but I'll buy you what fit
I can't stand no sneaker-wearing nappy head bitch
Let my pedigree breathe reason, this' OG
Putting bitch-made busters' to sleep with no grief
Mash on my so-called car, who the man
While I'm tugging on your made-bitch's hand, Westside
Understand this, ain't no nigga like me
Fuck Jay Z, he's broke and I smoke daily
Baby, let's be friends

Friends, where's my niggas' at, come on y'all
No need to front, let's be friends
Because I know you want to fuck
Let's be friends, no need to front, let's be friends
Because I know you want to fuck

I met you and I stuttered in passion
Though slightly blinded by that ass
It was hard to keep my dick in my pants
Every time you pass, got me checking for you hardcore
Staring and watching, me and you one on one
Picture countless options, was it prophecy
Clear as day, visions on top of me
Erotic, psychotic, would possess my body
Far from a crush, I want to bust your guts
And touch everything inside you from my head to my nuts
You got me sweating like a fat girl going for mine
Just a skinny nigga's fucking like she stole my mind
Back in time, I recall how she used to be
I guess money and fame made you used to me
What's up in nine-six, fine tricks in drag
Fuck Dre, tell that bitch, 'He can kiss my ass'
Back to you, my pretty ass caramel queen
Got my hands on your thighs, now let me in-between as friends


Can you imagine me in player mode, rush the tricks
I got her ready for a booty call, I fucked your bitch
Was it me or the fame, my dick or the game
Bet I scream 'Westside' when I came, Westside
Scream my name because, baby, it's delicious
Got a weak spot for pretty bitches
Up and down, similar to switches
My movement, baby, let your back dip into it, make it fluent
In and out, all around when a nigga do it
You've got me high, let me come inside
I love it when you get on top, baby let me ride
Who wants to stop me, am I top notch
Fuck player-hating niggas' because they cock block
You'd probably hate to see a real thug with vision
What's the game, rather see a nigga up in prison
Why have you changed
Made a living out of cuss words, liquor and weed
A bad seed turned good in this world of G's
Baby's got me fantasizing, seeing you naked
It's a fuck song, check the record, so check my record


Make money, take money, let's get paid
Come on, get your cash on, let's get paid



Bone Thugs-N-Harmony. I know you niggas been waiting for this for a long time, well here it is nigga, here it is. What you gon' do with this shit?

And labeled me worthless
Who could've knew me
Before they analyze,  me bail
Been tricking psychologists since 12 or whatever
Can I get bail? Or will I motherfuck myself? Well I'm off to The Land with a hand full of balls that's all
Just some of my dogs Mo! Thuggin' thuggin'
Ready to maul on y'all with a forty-five
Y'all fall and don't you call them laws


Thugs is convicts in God's prison, hands on the strap
Praying so Father please forgive me! Police be rushing when they see me
We all gonna die. We bleed through similar veins
Please explain to me, now. Don't panic when my guns burst
Heard the last jam, nigga? This one's worse!
My nigga Bone held the chrome 'til I came home
Thug love players tell these bitch niggas "bring it on"
I caught a plane out to Cleveland late last evening
To help my niggas clean up some niggas no longer breathing
Now, who do you believe in? Hit the weed and breathe
It's a cold-ass world; niggas kill you in your sleep
Watch me until they stop me, bury, murder me or drop me
I got thug love for my nationwide posse. Feel me!

A bitch like Sylk-E catch ya slippin' soon as you forget and trippin'
South Central stompin' motherfuckers bloodin' and crippin' lil' ripstress
So let me kick it, I'm tired of hearin' that fake shit
I roll with real bitches, thugstas, and pimps
Got to repent, heaven sent since I was a small girl
Asked The Lord to save my soul from this cold ass world
Life unfolds, I unload to keep my sanity
I guess it's just the B.I.T.C.H. in me

Well, it must be close to the Armageddon, Lord
Know that I won't fly by that lesson
You taught me to pull out my Wesson you bought me
And I'm not stressing it softly
Get 'em up off me, cause all we
Wanted was harmony, been bombing em
Yell up out of my ghetto, I won't settle, get on my level
They can't stop me and pop me
Nigga, they got me? Fuck no
Little Pac gets schizophrenic, and manage to damage all y'all
I'll talk about 'em, and you don't really want it
Cause they're cornered, and I'm want 'em to not jump
I'd rather say that we came to shut 'em all down
So quick to test, bullet, yes, declare war
Roll, I'll flow when I get the gun for the murder
Mo' horror! Why? They did it all, pause for the cause
And I finna to pull a 9 or pistol, and lit a nigga with mine
Fuck them niggas, it's on
All y'all fall! Bizzy getting bitches to test me
Bless the floor, and any attempt to arrest me, stress me
Lord, looking at death with the last of my breath
Follow, follow, my kids!
No, don't sin in my steps!
Yet the weapon is kept with the best of my secrets
Deep in the reach, I'm alone. Nigga believe
That I can see it, if needed, and if you really with me
And well then let it be, get the greens
And we running up over Cleveland, Cleveland, Cleveland, Cleveland, Cleveland...



Yo E, somebody come in this motherfucker with me man
I'm with you nigga, you don't need nobody, I'm with you nigga
Come on nigga what's up?
LS and 'Pac, Greg Nice
You're looking at me through the window
Asu, set it off with you nigga
Come up in here with me y'all
Yo' ha ha ha ha ha yo' yo'
We in the motherfuckin'... west coast right now
Word to mother, my nigga Kurupt
K- Kurupt, word, I got my nigga Greg Nice
Baby Jesus and the Allstars
Tha Outlawz, takin' off their draws, niggas
Yo' we 'bout to... check it out

What does it take to shake and bake nowadays?
Niggas in crime, get made cause it pays
Bodies get sprayed with motherfuckin' ultra-rays
When shit gets too smooth I get's, rude with the lipper
Any kind of liquor's company like Jack Tripper
There's been times when I flip like acrobats
Fuckin' coast to coast, chickenheads to hoodrats
Tools to Gats, Lowriders to Ac's
I wish you rap niggas frustrated
The rhyme stated updated; as I migrated
I'm direct from Strong Island, New York
Where I be smilin', profilin', wildin'
With my niggas in the Acura Coupe
Some days I can amaze the youth with proof that
Arrestin' motherfuckers that don't like investin'
And it don't stop

Ha ha ha, yeah nigga, that's how we do that shit
LS in this bitch, nigga that's how we do that shit
Live live on the westside, eastside right, niggas can't understand it, no doubt, no doubt
My scandalous family, insanity
It ain't no playin' nigga we're takin' over the whole industry
You bitch made niggas can't believe that shit
LS and niggas so crazy
You only have to pay, to pull up on that bitch
You've been clowned, to make it to that ground
These niggas snatchin' your business kid

Everything I got is double 2's 4's and barrels
Once that ass slipped we gots to burn it like Carrol
Somehow someway real niggas know real niggas yeah yo why is that?
When you roll Asu, you end up with them tires flat
The names Asu, it starts with A and ends with you
Whatever you want to do, I got my whole fuckin' crew
Up over the mountain there's fountain of phrases
I'm countin' pages, ages is givin' up wages to heal the rages
I don't riff, I stay cool let the sanity build
All I need is a starter and the horror that's worse than Amityville
No disrespect, all we want is bacon G
Pack them bags; they have them hotel got vacancy

That's right nigga set that shit 'til they motherfuckin' chincheckin' we wreck it, Look here

My niggas crooked, though it seems
My every single, thought is caught up, in collectin' cream
A made nigga, Picture me dyin' in the blaze, or gunfire
Will not retire 'til I'm paid, turn the bass up high
When we ride, we fly by, bitches blow me kisses
Niggas from Compton to Brooklyn come on get your riches
From Crenshaw to 1-2-5 and do or die
Rollin' with niggas from Long Beach, to Long I
I hardly smile, cause my heart froze
Once I, commence my show, I rip apart foes
Now I, got one nation its a crooked compilation
Just to end the bullshit let's get back to money makin'
Tell 'em bustas that I rolled on, controllin' our house
My shit's so wicked when I flip, niggas  closin' they mouth
Them Cocoa brovaz, Buckshot the BDI thug
Greg Nice, LS, Asu, so show a nigga love
Outlaw!

You feel that shit nigga!
You know what time it is, ha ha ha ha, yeah!
Hit them niggas with the shit that made Nice & Smooth nice nigga
Greg Nice feel me nigga?
I know u fucked a lot of drug dealers
But she never got fucked by a thug nigga
Come on! I know she fucked a lot of drug dealers
But she never got fucked by a thug nigga
Come on! I know you fuck a lot of drug dealers
But you never got fucked by a thug nigga, baby never
Come on! I know you're fuckin' with some drug dealers
But you never got fucked by a thug nigga
Ha ha ha ha, yeah yeah!, all like that nigga
Ha ha ha ha, hell motherfuckin' yeah, Thug Life baby
It don't stop, this song is twisted and crazy
Yeah nigga, that nigga 2Pac
From this block to your block, you can tell the kids nod
One Nation, fuck around and get shot, you know, One Nation
East side, West Side, ha ha ha ha, yeah
All my niggas on the East Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas on the West Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the East Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the West Side, throw your guns up
Niggas from the East Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the West Side, throw your guns up
All my niggas from the East Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the West Side, throw your guns up
Niggas from the West Side, throw up your guns
All niggas from the East Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the West Side, throw up your guns
All my niggas from the East Side, throw your guns up
Ha ha ha, yeah nigga, Outlawz yeah, Thug Life
Ha ha ha ha ha, yeah, energy makes plenty of enemies, you feel me?
Throw your guns up!!



"Alright now, here we go"

Tell me, how many real motherfuckers feel me?
I smoke a blunt and freak the funk until these jealous motherfuckers kill me
I'm out the gutter, pick a hero
I'm 165 and stayin' high 'til I die, my competition's zero
Cause I could give a fuck about you, you better duck
Go or I'll be forced to hit yo' ass up, I give a fuck
I'm sick inside my mind, why they sweat me?
It's gonna take an army full of crooked ass cops to come and get me
Niggas know I ain't the one to sleep on, I'm under pressure
Gotta sleep with my piece, an extra clip beside my dresser
Word to God I've been ready to die since I was born
I don't want no shit but niggas trip and, yo, it's on
Open fire on my adversaries, don't even worry
Better have on a vest aim for the chest and then you buried
It's a man's world, niggas get played, another stray
Hope I live to see another day, hey!
I'm gettin' sweated by these undercovers
Who can I trust, got my mama stressin', thinkin' it's a drug bust
Gotta get paid but all the drama that's attached
We livin' a drug life, THUG LIFE, each day could be my last
Will I blast when it's time to shoot? Don't even ask
That's the consequences when ya livin' fast
Six bricks of tricks, for my niggas, I gotta come up
And recoup, you keep the dope just bring me six figures
Is it a bust? I hear the sirens, run for cover
Over the fence and open fire

"Alright now, here we go"

These motherfuckers on my ass I'm in traffic, will it be tragic?
I'm comin' round the corner like I'm Magic
Doin' ninety on the freeway, and hittin' switches
In a high speed chase with these punk bitches
Don't turn around I ain't givin' up, cause they don't worry me
Pussy ass bitches better bury me
Runnin' outta gas time to park it, I'm on foot
We in the hood, how the fuck they gon catch a crook? Haha
I got away cause I'm clever
Went to my neighbors for a favor now you know players stick together
I watch the scene from the rooftop, spittin' loogies
At the coppers that pursue me, beotch!
I be a hustler til it's over, motherfucker
Open fire on you bustas

"Alright now, here we go"

Don't try to follow me, I'm headed outta state
I gotta pay my fuckin' bills, so I'm transportin' weight
Change my plates, pick up my nigga, and now we rollin'
Droppin' keys like they stolen, hehe
Tell me who do you fear? I'm outta town until the coast is clear
Enough dope to last a year
They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target
I hit the corner doin' ninety, ahhhh shit!
Them bitches right behind me
They take a shot and hit my fuckin' tires
Now, jump out the car then I open fire, sucka!

Hahahaha! Thug Life, bitch! Goin' out like that



Your ways R similar 2 the rays of the sun
Warm 2 many but 2 strong 4 some
The more u R needed the brighter u shine
Watched 4 2 long and your brilliance will blind
The eyes of mortal men who threaten u with Doom
They regret 2 c u set but it is time 4 the moon




You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
It's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
It's as simple as that for me and my niggas

War time, war time, it's either yours or mine
Outlawz be on the grind and a mission to shine
And ride on 'em, leave 'em stuck and fucked from the gate
Set it straight, regulate, with a bomb I'm about to detonate
Boom! Hesitate? Aww, now you know what
Ya'll niggas were here to go if you know it was good for ya
Bunch of toy soldiers all dressed in fatigue
But I'm E.D.I. Amin on a mission to make 'em bleed
Nigga what? Nigga who? It was cool? And at you?
What the fuck is you gonna do? Barbecue and boo-hoo
Ride or die, get money, all at the same time
Split the pie with the homie, ball at the same time
Any nigga slippin', fall at the same time
We all links in the chain, tryin' to gain, do time
We all see the sunshine, but when you could do yours
We'll bring these motherfuckers war

You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
It's as simple as that for me and my niggas

As I approach the scene
From smokin' green got my eyes closed
Niggas so cold on my foes, I make 'em die froze
Watch me make 'em bleed, makin' G's, Lord, help me with it
Got me paintin' pictures of a meal ticket, help me get it
See me and pray for options, but the pressures nonstop
Niggas get the pistol poppin' and watch his body drop
I'm a lethal threat, watch me hit your set, flash on
Blast on them bitch-made niggas with my mask on
Do it for profit, plus I'm lookin' for punks to bust on
If you ain't screamin' "Westside!" you can get the fuck on
I'm seein' demons, hittin' weed, got me hearin' screamin'
Scared to go to sleep, watch the scene like a dope fiend
Probably be punished for it, though you can't ignore it
I live the life of a thug nigga, and die for it
Niggas pass the clip and watch me bring 'em to the floor

You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
See it's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
Look it's as simple as that for me and my niggas

We do this thug life shit, like 4, 5, 6, stick 'em
Down with no rounds left up in the pound when the sounds
Squeeze the lead off, I blow his motherfuckin' head off
Signal all the other Outlawz to get this shit set off
Yaki Kadafi, it ain't a cop here to stop me
These streets is black hockey and raw, we get sloppy
Put a pamper on your silly ass prestyle grammar, locked in the slammer, while I'm layed cocked back like a hammer
Ya'll newly weds that in honey moons, times 'bout up, y'all
That means I leave no trace found with you face, bounce stuck
Your pig scanners can't come close touch or even hit me
Doin' my dirt, puttin' in work, you see shit, what you gon' do?

You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
See it's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
Look it's as simple as that for me and my niggas

Check the murder rate percentage, niggas is finished
Get blood checks from clinics, this thug shit is in us
Flowin' through my system, you a victim
Blunts, I twist 'em. Fuck the whole world, it's us against them
You got some heat? Pull it out, cock the hammer if you with it
Don't make no difference here with the 25-to-life sentence
We already doin' life on the streets
Like Al G., niggas be heated when they walkin' the beat
This shit is flaky, makin' backs shaky, niggas hate me
Scared to face me, knowin' that the Outlawz blaze me
Pull me up on game, put me up on a hustle
Once I suck my money muscle, all the G's got devils
Movin' shit like a dollar, beatin' niggas like Rodney
Turn a killer like Kadafi, and a nuke stream to stop me

You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
See it's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
Look it's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
Man it's as simple as that for me and my niggas
You either ride wit' us or collide wit' us
See it's as simple as that for me and my niggas

Bring it on, and all you lil' young ass soldiers
Teach these bitches a lil' somethin'
You know what I mean? Secrets of muthafuckin' war…



Where the fuck do these niggas live where all this shit be goin' down?
You want to know how I did this shit? You want to know how real my shit is?
Nigga, go read the mothafuckin' newspaper, you trick-ass nigga

How many broke-down rappers got some shit to say?
I sit and strategize, in due time, them bitches pay
Plus all day, I puff weed till my eyes bleed red
Undercover tactics, leave my enemies dead
Check this, I know you niggas got no love for me
But how the fuck your whole clique turn to thugs, homie?
Like misdemeanors, it's a small thang
You niggas ain't ready for war, let my balls hang
Bust it, I took apart your whole crew, lack heart, I ain't concerned
I bust at Bad Boy, Mobb Deep and murder The Firm
When you scream "Fake thugs," who the fuck you mean?
Get more cream than all of y'all, nigga, fuck your team
Now Dre want to switch sides, tricks hide in war
Last year, I shed tears, but I don't cry no more
Plus Jay-Z tried to play me, won't last long
Go ask King Sun how it feel to have your ass gone
Listen Doo-Wop, don't get your shit knocked, you can't win
Tell 'em all to let the games begin, we havin' war games

Yeah nigga, y'all niggas can't fade this shit
Got shot 5 times, got out of jail on bail
And sold 5 million

I'm a self-made millionaire!
Thug livin', out of prison
Pistols in the air
Sold more records then all you trick muthafuckaz put together
More then the Firm, more then Bad Boy, murder Mobb Deep)




First off, fuck your bitch and the clique you claim
Westside when we ride, come equipped with game
You claim to be a player but I fucked your wife
We bust on Bad Boys, niggas fucked for life
Plus Puffy tryna see me, weak hearts I rip
Biggie Smalls and Junior M.A.F.I.A. some mark-ass bitches
We keep on coming while we running for your jewels
Steady gunning, keep on busting at them fools
You know the rules
Little Ceasar go ask you homie how I'll leave you
Cut your young ass up, leave you in pieces
Now be deceased
Little Kim, don't fuck around with real G's
Quick to snatch your ugly ass off the streets
So fuck peace
I'll let them niggas know it's on for life
So let the Westside ride the night
Bad Boys murdered on wax and killed
Fuck with me and get your caps peeled
You know






Oh shit, jumped on my man's dick
Heard he had a twelve inch, now the bitch is lovesick
Who's to blame, the guy or the groupie
Heard I was down with D.U., now she wants to do me
Oooh-wee! This is the life
New bitch every night, never tripped off a wife
It ain't right, but it's cool how they come quick
Don't try to flip with the lip cause I run shit
Hip hip, hooray for the AK
Spray when I lay competition, what a great day
Make pay, next is the wet sex
Hexed with the vex now they wreck with the complex
I'm set, wonder what I tote, check
Bloody as a Kotex, snappin' motherfuckers' necks
Revenge so sweet when it comes from
Niggas get done with the drum, watch my foes run
Nigga keeps comin when they can't slip
Full of that shit, another hit from tha' lunatic

Yeah, fuck that God! Word up
Blowin' niggas out the motherfuckin' frame, you know what I'm sayin'?
Constantly, fuck that trick, we ain't havin' it

Leave me the fuck alone, you get none of this
It's suicidal, you lose your title like Doug-las
Cause I'm nothin' nice and, I'm icin' like Tyson
I'm grippin' the mic and my DJ is slicin'
I'm tired of motherfuckers steppin' to me with the same old
Tryin' to do me like Nintendo
How the fuck you think I ever got this far?
By bootin' motherfuckers like a shootin' star
Cause I'm out to show that I'm a dope MC
Think crack had you fiendin', wait'll they get a load of me
Bitches on my dick like a motherfuckin' condom
Niggas wanna flip, let 'em step, and I'll bomb 'em
See somethin' you want, why don't you come and get it
And then get waxed and taxed, like the government
Then I leave you sittin' there, wonder where your money went
While your bitch is callin' me, tellin' me to come again
Nigga I'm loc'ed, when I smoke, from the indo
But we can be friends though, after you get broke like a window
That's what you provoked, and now you're smoked out
Lookin' like a bitch, cause your whole fuckin' posse, broke out
Punk motherfucker couldn't roll on
He couldn't hold on, game is too strong, nigga
Leave me the fuck alone, you get none of this
Feel the wrath, and revenge of tha' lunatic

Yeah Tu', tell 'em motherfuckers, word up
We ain't havin' it, none of that shit!
Bitch ass niggas, niggas can't fuck with us Tu', word up
'91, we takin' this whole motherfucker over
Niggas got problems in '91, '92, and '93
And all that other shit, word up

Recognize game when it smacks you, bitch I'm back to rip
Puttin' this on the map with this mackin' shit
Time will tell if it's made well
Well I raise hell and excel cause it pays well
Jordan couldn't dunk it any harder, pump it any farther
I'm funky, that's word to the father
Act like you know 'fore I thump the bolo
Thought you was a pimp, now you're simpin' for my solo
Oh no, not another new jack, swearin' that he's ruthless
Ducked and now he's fucked and left toothless
I can hear the fear in your flow, you ain't prepared
You're scared and you're bound to go
It's somethin', I guess I let the beat keep bumpin'
Stop trippin' off these niggas cause they ain't about nuttin'
Or should I say naythin'
Punk put my tape in, fuck all the fake-in
I'm sick of the bullshit
Come equipped and get ready to rip
Or get the dick of tha' lunatic

Ah yeah, fuck that, you know what I'm sayin'?
Yes Tu'!
Tell them niggas what time it is, 'kna'm sayin'?
Niggas can't fuck with us, word up
Bitch ass niggas, fuck 'em

Fuck all them niggas
I'm tellin' these niggas that they ain't got
Naythin' on a nigga like me
We squashin' these punk motherfuckers in '91
'92, '93, and so on
So let the beat float on
While I spray these punk bitches
With these dope ass lyrics
Thanks to Poppa for supplyin' the dank
Now it's money in the bank
And all y'all niggas shit stank
Compared to this shit
Fuck y'all punk bitches!
Tha' Lunatic *echoes*



The power of a gun can kill
And the power of fire can burn
The power of wind can chill
And the power of the mind can learn
The power of anger can rage inside
Until it tears you apart
But the power of a smile,
Especially yours, can heal a frozen Heart



Hear me! Boo-yaow!
What type nigga be a Thug Life nigga?
Them Thug Life niggas be the craziest -- run up nigga!)

There's no way to survive in the city it's a shame
Niggas die from my hollow-point bullet to the brain
Will I survive or will I die is what I wonder
Puffin on blunts and gettin' drunk to keep from goin' under
Gettin' lost in the madness, blunted gettin' tipsy
Got my pistol out the window screamin', "Lord come and get me"
Am I sick, or am I just another victim?
Unloadin' my clip, I'm watchin' every bullet spit when I kick 'em
Niggas die from automatic gunfire
Your time to expire, nobody cry every man gotta die
When they bury me, they bury me a G
Rest in peace, to all the homies got to heaven before me
Pour some liquor on the curb for the niggas that's caught
Had a motherfuckin' warrant but he didn't go to court
God damn, and one day we'll all be together
Until then I'm ready for whatever, c'mon

It's all about makin' money, gettin' yours
And knockin' coppers off the motherfuckin' planet
Word to the motherfuckin' nine nigga
We gonna make this motherfucker ours
If they don't feel me, they gon' kill me
So Syke, get skanless nigga)

Am I going to Hell or will I reach Heaven?
After all this shit I did with my MAC-11
Did I sell my soul? Mama would have saved me
That's the way that daddy raised me
Oh God, help me I'm losing it
So fuck it! Take me I'm doing it!
I need to change and look for a better way
I got a hundred round clip to my AK
Committing sins I might die in vain
So fuck it! We'll live off the street fame
God didn't send me in the right direction
I'm getting hit by a diesel in the intersection
I know you're out there help a young brother
Til then I'ma smoke motherfuckers
Things wouldn't be so bad
If we got the things that we never had, I'm ready for whatever

Big ballin'-ass Syke
Yeah nigga, you schooled them young bustas
On how it is to be a real motherfuckin' G
In the nine-trey motherfuckers is dyin' daily so you best be packin'
If you ain't, boo-yaow motherfucker!)

Dear mama I know you worry cause I'm hardly at home
Every other night in jail, got you patient by the phone
Wanna shake it cause I can't take it got me livin' in Hell
Like I'm walkin' with a secret that'll kill me if I tell
I live the Thug Life and can't nobody, change me
Not to the brain, going insane, just a part of the game
So much pain in the fast lane, finally a dry eye
When I die, bury me with my fo'-five
And let the devil feel the wrath of a nigga
Goin' to Hell with my finger on the trigger
Now everybody's starin'
Got a nigga losin' hair and they wonder if I'm all there
Well don't blame me, blame the flame that flickers
Now tell me if you wanna live forever
Niggas dyin' so be ready for whatever

Ready for whatever
Thug Life niggas and we be ready for whatever
Let me go like this, ready for whatever
Huh, Big Syke he be ready for whatever
My nigga Kato, ready for whatever
Pain, he's ready for whatever
And my nigga Bam Bam, he ready for whatever
My nigga Banks just be ready for whatever
Modu, he's ready for whatever
Big Serg, we ready for whatever
Charlie Tango, ready for whatever
My nigga 'Pac, be ready for whatever
Yeah, ready for whatever
Ready for whatever
My big-ballin' ass nigga Boom, ready for whatever fo' sho'
Yeah, you know!
This how the player's do it
I know you standin' there confused
You wonderin' -- what type of nigga is a Thug Life nigga?
Yeahehehehe nigga, we be the ballin' player-ass nigga
About gettin' riches, bitches, and plenty loc
Ya hear me?)

Ready for whatever



I couldn't help but notice your pain
It runs deep
Share it with me!

They'll never take me alive
I'm gettin' high with my four-five
Cocked on these suckas, time to die
Even as a youngster causin' ruckus on the back of the bus
I was a fool all through high school kickin' up dust
But now I'm labelled as a trouble maker who can you blame?
Smokin' weed helped me take away the pain
So I'm hopeless
Rollin' down the freeway swervin, don't worry
I'm about to crash up on the curb, cause my visions blurry
Maybe if they tried to understand me
What should I do?
I had to feed my fuckin' family
What else could I do?
But be a thug
Out slangin' with the homies
Fuck hangin' with them phonies in the clubs
Got my mind on danger
Never been a stranger to homicide
My city's full of gang bangers and drive-bys
Why do we die at an early age?
He was so young
But still a victim of the 12 gauge
My memories of a corpse
Mind full of sick thoughts
And I ain't goin' back to court
So fuck what you thought
I'm drinkin' hennessey
Runnin from my enemies
Will I live to be 23?
There's so much pain

Everywhere I go
I see the darkness
Covering skys
Everywhere I go
Everywhere I go
Trouble seems to find me
Blood in my eyes
Everywhere I go

What would you do, if you couldn't make it to the NBA?
What would you do, if you couldn't sing, like a Mary J?
What would you do, if you couldn't hit a white ball, like Tyga?
If you wanted to model, but you wasn't skinny like Tyra?
What if you wanted to be Eminem
But the closet thing to him, was a pack of M&M's?
You can be Eminem, and I got proof
Or you could be Obama, and bring back troops
Or you could be Osama, and tear off roofs
Or be Corporate America, and reject all youth
Be the fly on the woodgrain, inside my Coop
Or be the sole, inside my shoe
So you can see where I walk, you can see where I been
See my father raping my sister when she was just ten
9, 8, 7, 6, NASA take me away, life's a bitch

Everywhere I go
Trouble seems to find me
Blood in my eyes
Everywhere I go

They got me mobbin' like I'm
Loc'ed and ready to get my slug on
I load my clip and slip my motherfuckin' gloves on
I ain't scared to blast on these suckas if they test me
Trust, I got my Glock cocked playa if they press me
Bust on motherfuckers with a - paaassion
Better duck cause I ain't lookin when I'm - blaaastin'
I'm a nuttin, drinkin' Hennessey and gettin' high
On the lookout for my enemies
Don't wanna die
Tell me why cause this stress is gettin' major
A buck-fifty across the face with my razor
What can I do but be a thug until I'm dead and gone
Keep my brain on the game and stay head strong
These sorry bastards
Want to kill me in my sleep but will they can I see
And everyday it's just a struggle
Steady thuggin' on the streets
And I'll be ballin' loc
Don't let 'em make you worry
Keep swingin' at these suckas till you buried
I was born to raise hell
A nigga from the gutta
Word to mutha I'm tough
I'm kickin dust up
Ready to bust
I'm on the scene steady muggin' mean
Until they kill me
I'll be livin this life
I know you feel me
There's so much pain




Growing up as an inner city brotha
Where every other had a pops and a motha
I was the product of a heated lover
Nobody knew how deep it screwed me
And since my pops never knew me
My family didn't know what to do with me
Was I somebody they despised?
Curious look in they eyes
As if they wonder if I'm dead or alive
And poor momma can't control me
"Quit tryin' to save my soul, I wanna roll with my homies!"
A tickin timebomb, can't nobody fade me
Packin' a 380 and fiendin' for Mercedes
Suckers scatter but it don't matter I'm a cool shot
Punks drop from all the buckshots the fools got
I'm tired of being a nice guy
I've been poor all my life, but don't know quite why
So they label me a lunatic
Could care less death or success
Is what I quest cause I'm fearless
Now the streets are deathrow

The streets are deathrow.

I just murdered a man, I'm even more stressed wearin' a vest
Hopin' that they're aimin' at my chest
Much too young to bite the bullet
Hand on the trigga
I see my life before my eyes each time I pull it
I hope I live to be a man
Must be part of some big plan to keep a brotha in the state pen
Counting pennys over the years I'd done stacked many
Proving wrong those
Who swore I'd wouldn't live till twenty
Now they gotta cope
Since it's the only thing I know
It's difficult to let it go
I'm startin' to loose my hair cause I worry
Hustlin' to keep from gettin' buried
But now I gotta move away now
Cause these suckers love ta' spray where I lay down
My homie lost his family, he snapped;
Shot up half the block to bring them back
The streets are deathrow


I'm dangerous when drunk I only drink beer
Gin makes me sin
Unable to think clear
Henessey makes me think my enemy is getting close
BOOM BOOM BOOM
Got me shooting at a ghost
Some call me crazy but this is what you gave me
Amongst the babies who raised up from the slavery
I sport a vest and hit the sess to kill the stress
Moved out west and I invest in all the best
Those who test will find a bullet in they chest
Put to rest by a brotha who was hopeless
Grow up broke on the rope of insanity
How many pistols smoking coming from a broken family
I'm sick of being tired
Sick of the sirens, body bags, and the gun firing
Tell Bush, "Push the button!" cause I'm fed
Tired of hearin' these voices in my head
The streets are deathrow


The streets are deathrow
The streets are deathrow
The streets are deathrow
The streets are deathrow
This goes out to my partners in the Live Squad
And all my partners involved in that 187
Watch your back
There got to be a better way
There's too many of us in the cemetary
Come on, what we gonna do now
The streets are deathrow



Live back at 'cha Westside baaaaby
Aight fuck it, we gone flip some new shit now
You heard "All Eyez on Me," niggas know what time it is
Rhymin and stealin, sellin five million
Fresh out on bail, niggas still can't see me
That's how it is
Now we got a new motherfuckin plan, and a new mission
Competition, so they say, these niggas is gay
Blast me? It could never happen
At least not while I'm walkin and rappin
Heard of some niggas on the other side of town who wanna ride wit me
They can't hide, listen to the rough shit, my click

I said many times busters still can't see
I been, handlin stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin tattooed tears; now, I
Said many times busters still can't see
I been, handlin stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin tattooed tears

Now, Rock-a-bye baby, I'm thugged out and so crazy
Don't want to hurt a soul nigga, so don't make me
I got a dream to see my whole team in Lexus Coupes
My enemies dead n buried, now the stress is through
But that's a dream, though it seems like reality; there'll
Never be peace long as there's fiends on these Cali streets
Even on the other side brothers die, but ride
Niggas get high off a slow form of suicide
Hide the closest thoughts, the war is fought as casualties
I live my life to fuckin mo', exposin tragically
How can we find some peace and niggas still ain't get a piece
I know I'm probably hellbound, but we got to eat
I'm seeing Satin infiltratin; my military mind
Make me hustle all the time, go out for cash makin
Forgive my adversaries they don't understand what we go through
To become a man, we sheddin tattoed tears


I said many times busters still can't see
I been, handlin stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin tattooed tears; now, I
Said many times busters still can't see
I been, handlin stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin tattooed tears


We don't shed tears we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug? HUH? WHAT?
We don't shed tears we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug?

Yo, criminal ways of thinkin made me crave Abe Lincolns
The days I spent stinkin caught victims on the weekends
Seeking a better path, expose a better half of me
Blast for me, the task after me
For a few years sheddin tattooed tears
Like Gram' Sammy, we feudin for the whole damn family
We scarred up, homies is barred up for mad time
Outlawz locked down for some past crimes
Fast dimes made my stash grow smaller
Your block ain't no harder, fake baller

Nigga it's like this
I been thuggin just for the cause of it
Out to get all of it, but I'll never loose my balls and shit
And it's all for the pressure
That'll make me cock my shit up off the dresser
Made nigga mafia of course my niggas gonna test ya
Answers to the questions, bullets to my Smith N' Wesson
Still stucked up in a fuck session, Jersey where the niggas flexin
Po-po's guessin if the stolen car gonna do a drive-by
Wet em up from his shoulders, leave him bye-bye
Now mama cry-cry, but it ain't my time to either die-die
So ask me why-why, but I feel that God owe me my life
For the things he did, but I turn my pleasure into sin
Blazed out sheddin tattoed tears

Chorus

Shit.. ain't no unity in my community it's do or die
Seein my opprunities through these bars of hell while gettin high
As life replays like time; underhanded schemes
To get that cream and thangs while livin this life of crime
My enemies want me squeezed
They get dumped like 3's, with 57 wasted at they knees
Please beware we thugs revolution size
Criminals dare be last mental me intitutionalize
Locked down, got many shell shocked, now
Holdin down fort like I'm stuck in court cell block style

Yo I been loosin sleep, stay awake way past late
Visions of killers en masse at the blast mayne
As I lay here gatted down and tatted
Knowin now it's hard to slow down for a addict
It's been years of stugglin, guzzlin beers
Beefin and never even, ain't no love in the air
And I suffer my shit in hell, talkin to the heavens
Walkin thru the valley of death with my fellas
I lost a lot, startin with hope I tried
And for every tattoo I got a moment I cried
I'm thru with the lies, the two in my eyes, yell pain
Step in my shoes, nuttin to lose, but my brain
I'mma hold it down tho', with all the struggle to bear
Ain't nothing to fear, cryin these tattooed tears
Come on...




In the event of my demise
When my heart can beat no more
I hope I die for a principle
Or a belief that I have lived for
I will die before my time
Beacause I feel the shadow's depth
So much I wanted to acomplish
Before I reached my death
I have to come to grips with the possibility
And wiped the last tear from my eyes
I loved all who were positive
In the event of my demise

In the event of my demise don't shed no tear
I'll share my wizdom with the world, they'll know I was here
Know I was clear, every thing I said I ment
A outlaw, when I was born they prepared my ditch
Said I won't live long, statistic showed
I'm tryna past 24 realistic goal, listen all
You gotta stay cold inside
That's what I tell myself when I feel alone sometime
But I can't cry, I don't tear no more
I love god, from death I don't fear no more
A part taken in this movment to better my people
Though they see me on TV, I tell them we equal
Don't look at me as a stranger, I'm one of your own
We was rised in concrete and grew as a rose
Still I rise, but never get a chance to fly
Mama please don't cry
In the event of my demise

In the event of my demise
Can't breathe no more
Hope I die for a princeple
Something I lived for
Dying before my time
Feel the shadows of depth
Trying to fulfill all my dreams before I reach my death
Came to grips with the possibility
The world's killing me, and my soldiers die young with no sympathy
I wipe the last tear from my eyes
I loved all who stand strong
In the event of my demise

If I should die before I awake
Let my family be stairght of the money I make
Give my son, what he needs, other than his father
Is it self respect, better get his honor
With the law come to swallow my soul, it's so big
Cause the street took enough of my life, we all see
It's a cycle make you feel psycho
Everything struggles behind this man, see nobody love you
Got a piece of the streets and it's gonna die with me
May your, soul forgive me
Makaveli's within me
In principle we stand by stronger than power
We gon' die by the rules you can never devour
On the earth from my birth fell nothing but pain
Only thing I ever gave was the baby the name
That's my heart, and if I should go I'll go on in sparks
That's the event of my demise, and it lurks in the dark


Now as I stand here, a man here
Not a perfect one, but a searching one
Seek in another, blazing time
Sound crazy but I'm actually tryin to escape my mind
Tryna rise in time
But hoping that you didn't notice
When I was at my low as
So I knew they were watching, I couldn't stop it
So many things I wanted to accomplish
Too many dreams, wasted with no promise
From out the darkness I struggle to see the light
Rumble deep in the night
Hustlin with all of my might
Some won't see it that way
But us is given praise
But all of them will dream
That I did it my way
In the event of my demise

I was born to a storm that won't lead up
And I was rased to stay brave with my head up
But thing ain't got better
We still gettin wetter in this bad weather
I need more than a sweater and a leather
Yo, ain't nothin ment to last forever
So the stuggling and the suffering ain't gon' last forever
And my will, probably be like two lines long
It will read I'm dead but my soul lives on
And my spirit still living though my body is gone
In the event of my demise I love all who stay strong
I love all who stay strong
In the event of my demise, com'on

In the event of my demise
When my heart can beat no more
I hope I die for a princeple
Or a belief that I have lived for
I will die before my time
Beacause I feel the shadow's depth
So much I wanted to acomplish
Before I reached my death
I have to come to grips with the possibility
And wiped the last tear from my eyes
I loved all who were positive
In the event of my demise



Yes lord, yes lord
Death Row said so
All hail, all hail
Outlawz
Let's get ready to rumble
Let's get ready to rumble
HAHAHAHA
Yeah!
Throw ya hands up!
Throw ya hands up!
Throw ya hands up!
In this corner
The ghetto gladiator
Iron Mike Tyson
Never been defeated
Can't keep a good man down!
And in this corner riding with him
Ha Ha

All they see is black venom, in my silhouette
Just watch the fear reappear in they eyes when I hit the set
Oh no, 2Pac wit' team Tyson, Seldon was seldom seen
Iron Mike cut his head like a guillotine
Time for some action
You making me high, like Toni Braxton
Bustas switching like Dennis Rodman
We still mashin'
I put my hand up to God, life is hard, filled with stress
Throwing blows in this square circle to see who's best
Mike don't hurt 'em!
What they scream, wait!, what they mean?
Tyson put in work, his head touched the whole colosseum
Better act up when I see him
We loud in the front row, hype up the crowd
If you don't like it, what you come for?
All hail
To fortified to fail, the Bed-Stuy ass kicker
Split the water like a sharks tail still strugglin'
May god help me bubble
Hit the ring, do my thing, all opposed feel trouble
Get it on!

Let's get ready to rumble
Let's get it on
Throw ya hands up, throw ya hands up
Where they at?, where they at?

Round 2
Right, left then left, right I seen him stutter WHAT?
He didn't duck and got stuck wit' yo' uppercut!
Now hear the crowd screaming, It's like they fiendin'
Oh, don't you love how that black man swing?
We keep it real, tell Holyfield, he next in line
So get his heart problem checked before he steps to mine
And Seldon, I hallelujah, don't bother me to show ya
Let ya head get gassed by that fast promoter
Be real forever, so feel my leather in combinations
Connecting like dot to dot in steady formations
Swift and deadly, 'cause this be heavy
I'm a soldier, it's too late now
I tried to told ya, get it on!

Let's get it on
Aight this ain't goin' last long, y'all know how Tyson do it
And then we go all, go party at 66 deuce mob style
So Tyson do ya thang boy... do ya thang
Where ya at?, where ya at?, where ya at, now?
Where ya at?, where ya at?, where ya at, now?
Where ya at?, where ya at?, where ya at, now?
Hey Holyfield, you next! HA
Where ya at?, where ya at?, where ya at, now?
Where ya at?, where ya at?, where ya at, now?
HAHA
Where ya at?
Yeah, Iron Mike Tyson, team Tyson of theme song haha
By the thug you loved 'day
2Pacalypse now, Makaveli The Don
Outlawz, Death Row, Westside 'til we die
It don't stop hahaha
It's going down nigga



As long as some suffer
The River Flows Forever
As long as there is pain
The River Flows Forever
As strong as a smile can be
The River Will Flow Forever
And as long as u R with me
we'll ride the River Together



Poetry has a beat like no other
Words of inspiration, you can share with another
It breathes and lives with a life of passion
Who cares the style, is always in fashion
The topics are endless, and so are the meanings
The sparks that STRIKE, bring so many feelings
It's in the way I drag my S'sss
And drop my G's
That has you so in love with me
Or should I say my poetry
The chemistry is so in sync
Envy in will drive your crazy and quake your nerves
But you thought these were only words?
No it's my soul that's creepin up your back
My spirit with YOURS, is what you lack
But yet you still fail to understand me
The truth I write is never tangled even though the words
Are influential to my no name brain I'll rock your world, and I'll change your tastes
I move so swiftly, with so much grace
Some call me a mystery
And others can't see
But in the depths of my valley, I am called
Po-e-try

Whoahhh, whoahhhh
La la la la la lahhhh, poetry
Whoahhhoahhhoahhhh poetry
Ahhh-ahh-ahh-ah-ahhhhh poetry
Yeahhh, ooooh

Uh yeah, poetry word
MVM, uhh, yeah, damn, word, uh-huh, yeah
Pacskids, uh-huh, yeah
Aiyyo 'Pac ain't no need for you to worry no more man
We got you
Your words mean so much and we here now
We here to hold it down
We here to hold you down
Amaru, you know how we do
And Afeni Shakur, thanks for everything you done for us
We love you, peace, we out



That nigga rappin' about my motherfuckin' life!
The fuck you talkin' about
Let's get it on now
He got shot and left the hospital the same day
Bring the noise
Bring the noise
How you talkin' about gattin' and shootin'
You ain't firm nigga, you soft
Where the fuck do these niggas live where all this shit be goin' down?
Soft ass nigga
Fuck your clique nigga
You want to know how I did this shit?
Bunch of skinny motherfuckers
You want to know how real my shit is?
Nigga, go read the motherfuckin' newspaper, you trick-ass nigga

Heyyyyyyy, huh
How many broke-down rappers got some shit to say?
I sit and strategize, in due time, them bitches pay
Plus all day, I puff weed till my eyes bleed red
Undercover tactics, leave my enemies dead
Check this, I know you niggas got no love for me
But how the fuck your whole clique turn to thugs, homie?
Like misdemeanors, it's a small thang
You niggas ain't ready for war, let my balls hang
Bust it, I took apart your whole crew, lack heart, I ain't concerned
I bust at Bad Boy, Mobb Deep and murder The Firm
When you scream "Fake thugs," who the fuck you mean?
Get more cream than all of y'all, nigga, fuck your team
Now Dre want to switch sides, tricks hide in war
Last year, I'd shed tears, but I don't cry no more
Plus Jay-Z tried to play me, won't last long
Go ask King Sun how it feel to have your ass gone
Listen Doo-Wop, don't get your shit knocked, you can't win
Tell 'em all to let the games begin, we havin' war games

Yeah nigga, y'all niggas can't fade this shit
Got shot 5 times, got out of jail on bail
And sold 5 million
Sold more records then all you trick motherfuckers put together
More then the Firm, more then Bad Boy, murder Mobb Deep
More then all you bitch made niggas

Now won't you just, signal me
Before you try to take another one of my folks
Took they breath so they choke
And I know I did a lot of dirt
But grand said it wouldn't hurt
My death is comin', cause I feel it, smell it
When I work, did you see me
Comin' up I tried to take it easy
Plan at the wrong place, at the wrong time
I leave you with a broken mind
Ya whole block is fucked
Whole family is cryin', when the guns go bust
I went from Jersey to Cali, nigga
I seen it all, when niggas get they head busted
And didn't fall

Huh, yeah
I be that young nigga, EDI, Amin, huh
Rappers is fixin' to come up short
If ya don't come clean
Check it, I'm at home watchin', shittin', sittin'
And I see some niggas on a T.V. line, what a pity
Ain't nothin' but a copy, of a copy
Reincarnation of an imitation, sloppy
Don't even know you got these white folks laughin' at cha
How the hell, you gonna base your lifestyle after a movie character
I'm dumpin' back at cha
Huh, fully loaded and you can quote it
Thug niggas casket is ridin' roll it

I'm hell-bound, One Nation
My destination is jail bound
Penetration to get ya niggas shot down, it's my town
Put your B'9s and Glocks down
Outlawz drop down
Shuttin' your whole spot down
We rock towns daily
Sippin' on the baileys with thug passion
Mashin' with Mr. Makaveli, so tell me
Which one of y'all niggas want the war to be civilized?
Ill as killa keise and I be cockin' in your enterprise
Criminalize, thoughts
When I be thinkin' draw fast, haul ass
When you see a nigga reachin' for what, the heater
Back streets I know, critically in Italy
Like Bellissimo
But down in Mexico, policio try to track me
Transform my Jersey army to some Killa' Cali
Khaki so Kadafi back me

Ehhhhhhhh yoooooo
They wanna strangle me and trap me
We flip and cock back like a fifth

After the fire comes the rain, after pleasure there's pain
Even though we broke for the moment, we'll be ballin again
Time to make it yo; my military be prepared for them bustaz
Similar to, niggas that scary, get too near me we rushin'
Visions of over-packed prisons, visions and niggas thug livin'
Pressures and three strikes, I hope they don't test us
They pull the heater ammunition it cranks, ssshhh
Move without a sound, as we slide down, pistols in place
They got me fiendin' for currency, the money be callin'
It's like I'm - dreamin', seeing scenes of me ballin'
Participated in felonious behavior
Cock the cocked fo'-five, snatchin' niggas pagers
Labelled a mark soon as we start, it was hard to quit
We started out drinkin' 40's, moved to harder shit
God damn now I'm a grown man, I follow no one
Nigga got my own plan, WATCH ME, uh

Ehhhhhhhhhhhh yooooooooo
Ooooooo oooooo
Get that money nigga
Yo nigga come here come here nigga
Come on come on, whassup whassup
Eh yooooooo
Yo niggas down the block, yo yo
Ehhhh yoooooo
That nigga Mu ridin in a hot car
Yo that nigga Mu got a stolen car
Yo, eh yo, Mu got a stolen car, oh shit
Eh Mu, that nigga bout too, eh yo
Watch out, that nigga rollin in stolen
Hhahahehehehahahahaha
That nigga Mu crazy as fuck
That nigga Mu, rollin' in stolen
Nigga doin' donuts in the middle of the street
K diggity watch out watch out
Eh, yo K, hahahahehehe look at the nigga
Look at that, K drinkin' a gallon of fuckin' Tanqueray
Eh K, eh Malcolm watch out the police, nigga
Policia, watch out nigga, you rollin' weed right in front of the fuckin police
Stupid nigga hahahahahahaha
Eh yo Yak, you got weed?
I don't know man, I had some
Who got the strap
I lost, I lost the herb running motherfucker
Where the strap at nigga?
I got the strap
Eh yo who dat? Eh yo who dat, who dat? Eh yo who dat?
Watch out, watch out, watch out, watch out
Yo, yo, yo, eh yo, eh yo, eh yo
Eh, yo why you let that nigga come through the block?
Nigga not supposed to be down there
Eh, Malc come here, come here
Eh yo, get money
Yo the next one mine yo, next one mine
You got that, you got that
Moneyyyyyyyyyyy
Let me get down, let me get down, let me get down
Let me get down
I just came out here, nigga come on man
Hehe



The day I met u I saw strength
and I knew from that point on
that u were pure woman 2 me
possessing a spirit that was strong

I want smiles 2 replace the sorrow
that u have encountered in the past
and since it was strength that attracted me 2 u
it will take strength 2 make it last

My negative side will attempt 2 change u
but please fight that with your all
it will be your strength that keep us both standing
while others around us fall



Are you scared to die?
Is reincarnation
Are you - are you afraid to die?
My only fear of death is reincarnation

My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition be my prophecy I hope it's heard
My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition be my prophecy I hope it's heard

Hard words is spoken, many promises broken
As if it's, useless to hope, they got me constantly smoking
My role model was a cold bottle of O.E
Surrounded by my closest homies but nobody knows me
I pray to God it ain't easy
Half the cops in California got a hard on to squeeze me
Running through the backstreets, hopping over fences tryna shake the fucking K-9s, running around senseless
I'll probably be a mystery to many, but a legend to some
I've been a man for many women, but a husband for none
In case you see me out in traffic, looking nervous and high
My hands, holding my pistols will they serve us or die?
May God forgive me for my crooked ways, I didn't mean it
Knew I'd fall in love with money the first day that I seen it
Maybe now they can understand it's my occupation
It's clear that my only fear of death is reincarnation

My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition be my prophecy I hope it's heard
My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition be my prophecy I hope it's heard

I keep my shit on safety
I've been shooting rocks lately
Everybody gots, they nickel plates to penetrate me
I was supposed to be the murder first to go
Them niggas missing, grazed my wrist, I took it personal
Kato told me that I was slipping
Got his strap and started tripping
Slipped two clips on the table
Twist an L and said "Fatal listen"
Everybody don't be missing keep your vest on, baby
And you know that shit that happens to the Teflon, crazy
You ain't gotta pack a gat I got your back keep your front line
Or we can stall that, from the Cadillac we about to bum shot
All we thought about was plastic and murdering bastards

My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition is my prophecy I hope it's heard
My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition is my prophecy I hope it's heard

I spend my days and nights
Not knowing if a stray's in flight
They'll probably catch me
Leaving my foes hella happy
Cause look, at any moment
The game could be my main opponent
Niggas be swimming where the sharks are and man they don't even know it
But I stay focused, concentrate on my surroundings
Cause if I'm slipping, well that's when niggas will get to clowning
And I can't have it, I got a mission to complete
Raise my kids upright, make sure they got something to eat
And my daily ritual is, protect my physical biz
I just can't see now, I choose death before the penal
Cause what good am I?, to that little nigga with them big eyes
If I'm incarcerated, feel me now, I gots to make it
And If I don't, Re-Reincarnation ain't an option
Leave my ass dead until it's really poppin'

My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition is my prophecy I hope it's heard
My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition is my prophecy I hope it's heard
My only fear of death, is reincarnation
I use my last breath, to reach the whole nation
How can they call me murderer for my spoken words?
This composition is my prophecy I hope it's heard

How can y'all call us murderers and shit and
Blame all the problems of the world on us young thugs, Thug Niggas from the streets, ain't that a bitch
Tell me y'all ain't giving a fuck about us when we was broke and poor
How come when we get a little money, motherfuckers wanna stop us and block us
What part of the game is that?
What type of shit is that?
Fuck 'em all

I still whizz for the top Dollar
High power, small drama, made niggas
Top Drazed with a mean way to play 'em
These days, Homie I'm saying though, they tryna play me
I gots to get them, hit 'em and lay low
I told you before, my, only fear of death is momma, crying for help and papa tryin' to help
When I know we ain't got it but shit I gots to handle it, it's hard
They hand it to me, snitches, suspicious bitch niggas who ain't insanity
Never worry
Apparently, I think I never buried but if so I gotta go, my nigga's will always love me
Thug family ties, I know they want me to die but I'ma survive, see the look in my eyes

I'm done, I went out, Oh Shit, put this back



Staring at the world through my rearview
Starin...

Multiple gunshots fill the block, the fun stops
Niggas is callin cops, people shot, nobody stop
I wonder when the world stopped caring last night
Two kids shot while the whole block staring
I will never understand this society, first they try
To murder me, then they lie to me, product of a dying breed
All my homies trying weed, now the little baby's
Crazed raised off Hennesey, tell me will my enemies
Flee when they see me, believe me
Even Thugs gotta learn to take it easy, listen
Through the intermissions search your heart for a plan
And we turnin Bad Boys to grown men, it's on again
I give a holla to my niggas in the darkest corners
Roll a perfect blunt, and let me spark it for ya
One love from a thug nigga rollin with a posse
Full of paranoid drug dealers, to the end my friend

I'm seein nuttin but my dreams comin true

I'm seein nuttin but my dreams comin true

As life grows bigger, thangs is looking smaller through my
Rear view mirror, my days is growing shorter
As my time goes nearer, but I can't be mad cause I've seen my dreams
Fly higher than I've ever seen

Now I was raised as a young black male
In order to get paid, forced to make crack sales
Caught a nigga so they send me to these overpacked jails
In the cell, countin days in this livin black Hell, do you feel me?
Keys to ignition, use at your discretion
Roll with a twelve gauge pump for protection
Niggas hate me in the section from years of chin checkin
Turn to Smith and Wesson war weapons
Heavenly Father I'm a soldier, I'm gettin hotter
Cause the world's gettin colder, baby let me hold ya
Talk to my guns like they fly bitches
All you bustas best to run look at my bitches

Now I know the answers to the question, do dreams come true
Now I know the answers, do dreams come true
Starin at the world through my rearview

They got me starin at the world through my rearview
Go on baby scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin fast cause it's time to die
Gettin high, watchin time fly -
And all my motherfuckers

Starin at the world through my rearview
Go on baby scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin fast cause it's time to die
Gettin high, watchin time fly -

As life grows bigger, thangs is looking smaller through my
Rear view mirror, my days is growing shorter
Fly higher than I've ever seen

Funny how thangs is looking smaller through my, rear view mirror
I'mma talk to God I made it, he can hear me now that I'm closer
I dun lived my dreams in reality over and over

As life grows bigger, thangs is looking smaller through my
Rear view mirror, my days is growing shorter
Fly higher than I've ever seen

You ain't knowin what we mean by starin through the rearview
So since you ain't knowin what we mean let me break down understandin
The world, the world is behind us
Once a motherfucker get an understanding on the game
And what the levels and the rules of the game is
Then the world ain't no trick no more
The world is a game to be played
So now we lookin at the world, from like, behind us
Niggas know what we gotta do, just gotta put our mind to it and do it
It's all about the papers, money rule the world
Bitches make the world go round
Real niggas do what they wanna do, bitch niggas do what they can do

Starin at the world through my rearview
Go on baby scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin fast cause it's time to die
Gettin high, watchin time fly, ya know

Starin at the world through my rearview
Go on baby scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin fast cause it's time to die
Gettin high, watchin time fly, ya know

Starin at the world through my rearview
Go on baby scream to God, he can't hear you




It’s 'Pac, Makaveli
I'm in tha studio drunker than a motherfucka
Ready to freestyle this shit, and do it wild
Live
Fo all my dogs
Fo all my dogs out there raisin hell
Just to see a young nigga raise tha mail
Stepped out on tha streetz fresh from jail
All tha police wanna rag and tell
Not knowin’ that I stacks my mail, uh
All these niggas wanna see me fail, uh
That’s just tha intro
As I sit back and rock this instrumental, uh

After the fire comes tha rain
After pleasure there’s pain
Even though we're broke for the moment
We'll Be Ballin’ again
Time to make your, my military be prepared fo tha bustas
Similar to bitches too scary to hear me rushin’
Visions of over packed prisons
Millions of niggas thug livin’
Precious, Big Straps, hope they don’t tell us
They pull a heater
Ammunition in grace
Shh, move without a sound
As we slide down
Pistols in place
They got me finnin’ fo currency
The money be callin’ me
It’s like I’m dreamin’
Singin’ seizing me ballin’
Sophisticated, and this fuckin’ misbehavior
Got tha cocked 4-5 snatchin’ niggas pagers
Label tha marks
Soon as we start
It was hard to quit
Started out drinkin’ forties moved to harder shit
Goddamn, now I’ma grown man
I follow no man
Nigga got my own plan
In my hand got tha 45
I kick it live to survive
Make these niggas die
While gettin’ high
Though we cry when these thugz bug
Niggas’ll leave in their caskets
That’s what ya get fo being playahatin’ bastards
Me and my clique so legit
We keep a 50 on us niggas know
You can’t touch us
When they get to come against us
These niggas’ll be defenseless
It’s senseless
Knockin’ niggas back on tha fences
My whole clique be sick
And though we rip whole crews
Niggas knew
We came through
Drinkin’ 22’s of brew
And though we drink Hennesseys
We provide our enemies with mo’ shit
Tha art of war so legit
I read, my name out, Makaveli
With the Thug Life tattered on tha bottom of my belly
Can these niggas understand this
My whole family is sick is so scandalous
Let me introduce my clique
Castro, when he blasts y’all
Niggas run and hide
Napoleon will provide
Tha game
Let me explain
Why E.D.I
Provide shit, fo tha needy
And take from tha greedy
Kadafi, is not sloppy
And not a copy
He’s tha only one
Bring tha gun
If ya want it Young Noble
Bring ya soul
To tha true, let em know we come through
In a bucket or BMW
We trouble you
The W for Westside
Niggas die
When they try to infiltrate my crew
We never hide, we ride
And die, together
And when you see my clique we always ride for ever
Me, my whole clique is sick
We smoke sinsemill
Can you convince the G
That they can’t come against me
You can see me on TV
Or live
Niggas die when they try to come against me
Never hide
In my own zone, in my own dome
In my mind I’ma don
Nigga knew it once I came oveh
Splash tha niggas
Will I dash your niggas
Once I mash these figguz
I’ll be badder nigga
It’s me, makaveli
A.K.A Tha Don of this whole clique
Niggas you so sick
That’s my freestyle drunken flow
Just so you bitch ass niggas in tha back row know
Whether it’s New York or Texas
Ride through in a Lexus
Or BMW
I trouble you
Throwin’ up fo ever this big ol’ W
Huhhuhhuhhuhu
My double R proves I’ma big rap star
Rockin’ tha room
Niggas where ya at
Where ya are is tha back
In tha front, when ya bump this shit
I keep a gat inside my trunk legit
Always, though I’m on probation
I still rock tha nation
Out on bail, though last year I was in jail
Raise hell, until I get my mail
Will I fail, hell nah niggas bite my nails
I keep a manicured
Though you panic you’re
Still gonna die
When Pac get high
Smokin’ Indo
I roll my window down
A smooth criminal
And though I pack this pound
3-5-7 or 4-5
Will I hide, will I die
Will I ride, niggas never know why
My whole crew, a family clique
Are we sick
Are we live
Though we struggle to survive
In this motherfuckin’ ‘95
Turnin’ ‘96
’96 turnin’ ‘97
I keep a 3-5-7
Mack 11
Back home I got a M-R
What did I say, a mini 14
Haha, my double R
Ride with my clue, ride with my crew
You don’t have a clue, nigga when we’re comin’ fo you
We hit tha house of blues, actin’ like fools
My nigga Fatal
Put a gun inside his club I keep this fucker prenatal
Had to bang inside his chest, no no
Bang inside his belly, nah nah nah
It was Makaveli, that told him to bring the gat outside his belly
I say yo Fatal what are you crazy
Them dudes pissin’ outside tha front
Niggas say Goddamn
Niggas is funny as hell
What you want
You want tha funk
Hell no, niggas don’t want no beef
That’s why we left that motherfucker in a Rolls
A Limo I mean
With bitches inside to meet
I was chillin’ in tha back
Puttin’ on some hits, look I just did a dope ass show
Them niggas’ll always remember me
Came from Italy
Bellisimo, was tha call
Yeah nigga I got Versace
Armani
All them niggas wanna fuck with me
Y’all know
I always represent my people to tha fullest
Yeah, I'm that same motherfucker took 5 bullets
Count em, came out
Rappin’ and stealin’ and makin’ 5
Motherfucka records got sold millions millions
Haha, platinum, I make 5 platinum shits, know what I’m sayin’
Niggas can’t fuck with me
2pacalypse, not known fo playin, huh
I took shots
And gave shots
Fuck tha cops
Will I stop
Until my shit, reach tha top, hm
Niggas out there wanna do me
But it’z mob deep
Bad Boy and Fugees, hahahahaha
Y’all niggas’ll never stop me, never drop me
Never make me fall
Me, 2pacalypse all I know how to do iz ball ball ball!!!
My crew
Survive reincarnation after I’m dead
They rock n roll
And Bring tha funk to tha whole nation
And you know
Each one of These niggas have a gun with my name on it
You know
I spit tha game so clear is plain on it
You know, huh
When I’m dead
My niggas’ll ride for me
Kill everybody
They each got a city to pick to make it our part



This go out to C. Delores Tucker, Bob Dole
And everybody else who feels like uh
They stronger than the constitution
Freedom of speech big baby
Freedom of speech
Ha ha ha
Outlawz
Goddamn! Rap music I hate that
It's just so violent and it destroys everybody, it makes the kids crazy
The kids kill people
There cop haters
Here goin' against society, I don't understand the music
It's too loud, it's too loud it's too rowdy, it's too violent
Let's ban all rap music
Ban 2Pac, ban the Outlaw Immortalz ban 'em

Listen it ain't no stoppin' I gotta hustle
Cop it make it double
Try to stop it and touch it
I'ma cock it and bust it
Niggas fuck it I'm tryna get it addicted to fast livin'
Get rich or die tryin' nigga ask 50
I've been Operatin' Under Thug Laws As A Warrior
Oppressed by the industry the Hip-Hop government
Washed around by the Hip-Hop Police
Why you think Nas screamin' Hip-Hop deceased?
All the judges got grudges
Givin' my niggas life for a little next to nothing
So wherever you are, just a little extra something
You ain't the only one, we all goin' through the struggle
Penny pinchin'
It's like you really ain't livin'
Resultin' on a 211’s, I'm cookin' in the kitchen
Like we lookin' and we wishin'
Prayin' will he hear it?
It's eatin' at my spirit
Speakin' for the spirits

You can't break me, never make me busta soft the beats
This Outlaw style got a brother off the streets
Miss Delores Tucker sue me I won't stop
'Til we get justice for these crooked cops on my block
Time Warner full of sissies, tell 'em all to miss me
A bunch of hypocrites whistlin' Dixie
Good riddance cause you never should of touched me
You cowards knew you couldn't take the pressure I'ma make you sorry
Trust me
Tryna sell 4 million copies
If I wasn't spittin' it'd be prison or death
This rap game all we got left
So try to comprehend where we comin' from
Life as an Outlaw, ain't meant for everyone
So here we come
Recognize how we organize
Strategize now we unified brothers on the rise
And we can't stop

No way no how we got to keep movin'
And puttin' it down
We can't stop
Until we reach the top
Through the music we speak to the blocks
Believe it or not

I don't know what you've been, told
Real niggas don't stay on they go
Can't stop until I get that you know
Won't stop until I get that keep goin'

Bury me with a Makaveli suit and a MAC
If God strike me with lightnin', I'm shootin' him back
Skinny cause I won't work out, my man is in the gym
Long as I'm strong enough to put a hammer on your chin
Trapped in the storm, fuck the world 'til I'm gone
I'm buckin' at Corey Brooke he treatin' my niggas wrong
Until I'm gone
They gon' see who I be
I picture this bricks duckin' from the penitentiary

Mysteriously it seems
Through my deepest thoughts and dreams
It's all wrong pop too long gone
And now 18 I'm stranded on my own
Abandoned here in the zone
Protect my throne pow like a king, Al Capone style
Fake no jacks on this grind
Coked up with crack I get mine
Livin' life as a Don, guess Gortex, Louis Vuitton

Yeah your boys back with the proper team
When they think I'm wearin' Red I'ma rock the green
On a whole 'nother episode
Cops never heard of ya
The otherside'll hide down the block from the murder scene
Catch ya man he dead with the fifth
When it's hot on Nu he G-Ride from the clear to the bricks
So gangster how he switched from the clear to the bricks
Niggas hate it but they scared of the fifth

Outlawz!

No way no how we got to keep movin'
And puttin' it down
We can't stop
Until we reach the top
Through the music we speak to the blocks
Believe it or not

I don't know what you've been, told
Real niggas don't stay on they go
Can't stop until I get that you know
Won't stop until I get that keep goin'

This rap game like a robbery
Cause it seem somebody hidin' me my nigga
Make a motherfucker cop a Ki'
Motherfucker ain't no stoppin' me my nigga
It's Mussolini see me all in the midst
I'm still chillin' like I'm bottle of Crys'
Enemies, sharpen they miss
So when you see me they can give me a kiss
The one posin' with the frozen wrists
Outlaw immortalized we survived and curst
So I claim it like I'm bangin' a turf
Yeah it's easy like I'm puttin' in work
Not an easy you wanna jerk
Call me squeezey I'm ready to murk
Outlaw, Makaveli nigga ready to flow
So baby are you ready to go?
Outlaw my niggas what they screamin' at night
But Big Syko with the thug in your life
My nigga

This Hip-Hop thing just won't stop
It's number one at the top of the charts
Here to stay like 'Pac
Man I just can't let it go
So when I flow, I gotta do my thug thing
For the hood the under privileged and oppressed
Young nigga get rich, cash more cheques
Take the hood life
Put it on on wax
Get stakes now we livin' the good life
Car brand new and it shine so clean
Bought momma a house, on sweet sixteen's
And we, sittin' clean in the latest edition
From the block to the movie screen deep in and pimpin'
Recognize how we organize
Strategize now we unified brothers on the rise
And we won't stop

No way no how we got to keep movin'
And puttin' it down
We can't stop
Until we reach the top
Through the music we speak to the blocks
Believe it or not

I don't know what you've been, told
Real niggas don't stay on they go
Can't stop until I get that you know
Won't stop until I get that keep goin'

Outlawz...
Outlawz



Introduced with innocence
who would have ever guessed
That u were the one I had
Been so desperately searching 4
u Talk as I do but yet u don't
understand when I mumble
u c as I do but your vision is
blurred by naivete
This is the barrier that separates us
I cannot cross yet
There is 2 much of me that
would frighten u so I live in
heartache because we cannot
fully explore this love and
what of your heartache
Does it feel as sharp as mine
No matter where I go or how long it takes
I will never recover from this mutual heartache.



The power of a gun can kill
and the power of Fire can Burn
The power of wind can chill
and the power of the mind can learn
The power of anger can rage
inside until it tears u apart
But the Power of a Smile
especially yours can heal a frozen Heart



One, two
To a nigga nature
Hehe

No need to cry now, go wipe your tears
Be a woman, why you actin' surprised?
You showed the bullshit; commin' fake hair
Fake nails, fake eyes too
So why you bound to fuck wit fake guys too
Ain't nothin' hard about it
Why you lookin' sad, should'a though about it
Say you learn, I truly doubt it
I guess you got a problem with affection, kinda loose with the love
Gettin' freaky with the thug niggas up in the club
Ask to buy you a drink, you holla "Dom Pérignon"
Knowin' I'm a cash dealer, still I, remain calm
Let you chill with me
Plus you was smilin' 'til the bill miss me
That's what you get for trynna dick me
Missed me with that "buy me this, buy me that"- syndrome shit
Bitch get a job if you wanna be rich
Gettin' mad 'cuz I cursed and I screamed I hate ya
Introduced you to a nigga nature, feel me

Why, why, tell 'em that it's my good nature
Why, why, when I do that way

Probably too nice at first
I lettin' you kiss where it hurts
Me and you gettin' busy, slangin' dick in the dirt
Met you at a pool party it was cool to kick it
See us, toungkissin', you was truly with it
Little Ecstasy, Hennessey, mix with me
Picture me pray for pussy when the dick's for free
Hey now, where my niggas at? Tell these hoes
Before I pay; I jerk off, word to Moses
Visions of you sittin' there sweaty and wet
Pointin' at the places that you want me to hit
Give me room all up in the room, call the cops
Nigga, hit them walls til the bastard drop
Livin' life as a Rock Star friday nights
Make money, get pussy
Always keep a pager, cell-phone in the ride
To complete my Nature now!


Started as a seed from the semen
Straight outta Papa's nuts, lustin' for creamin'
Bitches wit big butts, curves make a nigga cry, tits and shit
When I'm locked down beggin' you for porno fleeks
Sneak weed in, helped a nigga passed the time
With my name tattoo'd so that ass is mine
Tell everybody; 'Pac put it down for good
A local legend through the whole hood
Follow me, I got a gun on me
Goin' for nun on the run baby
You know a nigga need some, is my son crazy?
Why I cry, when I be thuggin' til I die
Picture of nigga in heaven high, of weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies with the phonies that died
Hit the weed and hope it get me high
Dear God, understand my ways, livin' major
Blessed with a thug's heart
In a realla nigga nature!




Today is filled with anger
Fueled with hidden hate
Scared of being outcast
Afraid of common fate
Today is built on tragedies
which no one wants 2 face
Nightmares 2 humanities
and morally disgraced
Tonight is filled with rage
Violence in the air
Children bred with ruthlessness
Because no one at home cares
Tonight I lay my head down
But the pressure never stops
gnawing at my sanity
content when I am dropped
But 2morrow I c change
A chance 2 build anew
Built on spirit, intent of heart
and ideals based on truth
And 2morrow I wake with second wind
And strong because of pride
2 know I fought with all my heart 2 keep my dream alive



So what the fuck you talkin about?! Aw, shit
Goody, goody, gumdrops
Nigga, get your hoodie and your gun cocked
Rock it till the drum stops, hip hop
Even if my shit flip flop
It probably wouldn't stop, talk shit and get socked
How ya hang em?
Know a realer nigga? You could bring him
If I don't represent the shit, I'll kick it
We could sway him, hunh! As if I know ya
Then I could show ya
But if I don't know, I gotta .44 fo' ya
So, so peep game, at point blank range
The fame can't change what the game maintains
Strange! Went against the grain
Aw shit! Flick or no flick I trips for no bitch
Catch up on your pimpin', I ain't simpin', I'm a diss her
Couldn't be my sister if she's actin' like I missed her
Tell me why they, tell me why they, tell me why they play me
Don't these niggas know that neither one of y'all can fade me
I ain't big, I ain't buff, I ain't deisel
But fuck wit 2Pac and pop goes the weasel
Me and Threat made a bet on how many fellas
Would jock a mothafuckin' real nigga cause they jealous
They do it for the fame
Explain, insane What's in a name? What's in a name?
Peep game

Punk bitch, how ya like me now?
Can't fuck around wit the funky style
Put it together like a puzzle builder
If Threat don't get cha, Pac gon' kill ya

Killa Cali
The state where they kill
Down wit Oaktown? What's up homie, can I chill?
The bitches lookin funny
Film at elev,film at eleven wit they minds on they heaven
Wit they .357
-Where you at?
*On the freeway, leaving LA
-OK, see you when get here loc
-Here I am. Here I am
*Goddamn that was quick
-Told ya I was comin. Who is that? Is that your woman?
*Na, that's just a hoochie looking for some juice
-What's up my nigga? What ya know? A nigga got a little bigger
That's all folks know
Fat gold ropes
Gotta keep a low key for my attack
When I approach, I want the diamonds, the pearls
The round the way girls
Cuz baby got, baby got back out this world
Would you give a fee? Never
Fly like a feather
Make more money than your daddy and your mama put together
The game is to be sold, not to be told
So buy it
Can't afford it?
Low budget hoes gotta brother
Peep game


Don't sell out
Get the hell out
Cause here I come
Hit em with my bop gun
They came and they blast
We got witt they ass
And oh, pop this vest and all the rest of that mess
Comin through like Terminater 2
Boost your crew cuz we ain't afraid of you
You know what time it is wit me once the clock stike 3
We goin coo-coo for Cocoa Puffs. Whooo eeii!!!


Time to get paid, time to get paid. Check
Time to represent the west homie, nuttin' but a vest on me
Got my hands on my Glock, eyes on the prize
First sucka jump, first nigga die
Gimme mine, gimme mine, gimme mine like I told ya
Hard as a boulder
Motha fuckin soulja
Boom bam boom!! It's a stick up
Vice president Dan Quayle eat a dick up
Peep game


Punk motha fucka
Fuck all those motha fuckas, they all can eat a mothafucking dick up
Word up. Fuck the police. I don't give a fuck
Bobcat in this mothafucka boy
Big up! Big up! To the criminals
Fuck em
"This is serious business"
Yeah, microphone mafia
2Pac, Threat, Bobcat
93 shot
Yeah nigga, bitch



Yo c'mon man, what do you mean you don't wanna ride with me, nigga
C'mon, get in the car, get in the fuckin' car, man
Yo why you trippin' man? Get in the fuckin' car, man
Get in the fuckin' car.. get in the car
'Cause you, you think niggas gon' be blastin' at it
It ain't even that deep baby)

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes

Repetitive blows are thrown, to my foes
No love shown get disposed of blasted full blown
My unknown tendencies to mash my comp
Gettin' wicked with my ski-mask, find the stash and dump
While niggas run I'm the last one standin', the rest die
Victims of my lethal chrome cannon, westside
Though it's worldwide no one can deny my views
Tracked it to my very fabric once the plastic blew
Five shots changed my whole life, throats were slit
Niggas die by my orders when I wrote this shit
Though we go back like wild knights at Latin Quarters
Niggas tried to kill me, and I fed their wife and their daughters
Blazed the weed, draped they seeds, gave 'em cash
Pass the fame and let the game go rollin' past
Why you change, it's a cold world taught me life
Retaliation proves niggas never caught me right
Say they shot me in my nuts, out of luck
Quit bullshit nigga 'cause I'm still fuckin' yo' bitch
Niggas got me twisted in a bad way, why you change?
Fuck with me, all this shit pay, nigga fuck the fame

Y'all remember "Hit 'Em Up," don't make us do it once more
Yo' niggas know, you ain't fuckin' with them Out-lawz
We keep souljas, souljas from Compton to Brooklyn
Your the type to get sniped, when the cops is lookin'
Don't nobody give a fuck 'cause you done crossed the game
Lost in fame, and you should take, all the blame
You made yo' bed nigga lay in it
You scared to come up out that cell nigga stay in it
It's not a game only got one click we Outlawz from the do'
Dirt stains when I buck on the fo', you kissin' the flo'
We dirty as the motherfuckin' streetz of Jerz
We sweep niggas with the words though the heat's preferred
Holla

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one click, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes, let the punks know

'Pac I wish I was in the motherfuckin' car wit'cha
I'd have took every bullet that they threw, hand of God, nigga
I only got one click, Outlawz 'til I'm gone
Heavy in the game and we comin' for they fuckin' throne
The love is gone well it is what it is
And plottin' on us, they best be prayin' for they kids, mayne
You don't have to worry 'cause I ride for ya
Like K said over loyal we even tell 'bout a lie for ya
You put me in the game and dog I owe it all to ya
And when it get to poppin' I'ma fuckin' ball for ya
And everything I do gon' have your names on it
I'll never let them forget I put my seeds on it

You gon' die before yo' time, come face the truth
In the middle of the desert nigga lace your boots
As a youth, hundred proof, tap my chest is a dead rest
You studio niggas still remind your vest
Why the fuck you ain't done yet, swallow yo' teeth
In the field you woulda been need a straw when you eat
Fuck a Glock nine that shit is weak on the streets
And if you can't strategize then you just can't eat
If your life in another nigga hand, you dead
And if it's beef and your man disappear then don't sweat it
Another fake nigga usin' my strengths to get credit
I mean you might face sound scared but your heartbeat said it

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one click, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck these hoes, let the punks know

I was born ugly, unlucky and dusty
But now I'm a rider, connivin' gutsy
And I don't trust nobody, so don't nobody trust me
And that's how I'ma go about it 'til somebody bust me
I play for keeps like the OG's raised me
If I sleep I won't eat, who gonna feed my baby?
And I think I'm goin' crazy 'cause my hair is gettin' thinner
I've been drinkin' on the daily, I can hardly remember
I got - bad nerves, paranoia destroyed me
I love the Lord but the church can't cure me
I sleep light, I wake peekin' out my window
With guns under my mattress and guns under the pillow
And that's the way it's gonna be 'til they bury me
But don't twist it 'cause none of y'all niggas worry me

What the fuck you didn't know?
Kizza-Kastro, Young Noble with the criminal flow
You nervous nelly ass niggas belly up in the river, no dizoubt
My niggas couldn't fade me with some clippers
You put it down, look all around, 'til we find you we hound
Penitentiary bound, to remind you

Kadafi I bring the lingo to the click
Tasty like a Pringle, sneakin' through your chimney like Kris Kringle
On some shit, get me fee to let my ice click Ka-pling, ka-plow I been a thug shootin' slugs since a child

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one click, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck these hoes, let the punks know



Straight outta Oakland, California where we spark it on ya
Give a shout out to my partners in the darkest corners
I remember drinkin' Hennessy, smokin' weed
Fantasize about the things we'd grow to be
Had a partner named Snupe, loved to clown a stank
Smoke a pound a day, commenced to down a drank
Shootin' craps in the alley 'til they chased us off
Pour a little for my homies, but don't waste it all
Ooohweee, who popped that coochie best?
On my tattooed chest is where the hoochies rest
Havin' house parties in a crowded spot
And you can tell it's hot, they talk loud a lot
Everybody wanna dance when the slow jam come
Lookin' dumb, cause you waitin' for your chance to hump
Straight grindin', everybody havin' fun
And it's cool, 'til a fool pull a loaded gun
Cause another dude kicked his Bacardi over
He had to act a fool, now the party's over
Gun shots rang like it's thunder
And everybody bum rushin' and I'm rushin' to get a number
Says she got a man but she's lyin'
Why? I seen her talkin' to this other guy and
He's a dealer so you know she gonna sweat him
I ain't trippin', I just hope he get 'em, I got nuttin but love

Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours

I love to go back, to the block I got my game from
And pay respect to the place that I came from
Cause uh, old man still drinkin', his breath still stinkin'
He'd love to tell ya what he's thinkin'
But I can't diss him he's my elder
He been livin' here longer what that tell ya?
And little girls playin' double dutch
Still blush, cause she don't get in trouble much
It's uhh, ponytails and barrettes
I gotta make it back home, before the sun decides to set
And little boys playin' stick ball, quick y'all
Get out the street before they hit y'all
And as I reminisce, I think about my ghetto bliss
And wonder how we came to this
I help an old lady across the street, the cost is free
I can't take what she offers me
And this is how the world could be
This is how the world should be
Feels good to be back on the streets
Cause I know they got love for me, nuttin but love

Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
I'm down for yours

When I was young I used to want to be a dealer see
Cause the gold and cars they appealed to me
I saw our brothers gettin' rich slangin' crack to folks
And the square's gettin' big for these sack of dope
Started thinkin' bout a plan to get paid myself
So I made myself, raised myself
'Til the dealer on the block told me, "That ain't cool
You ain't meant to slang crack, you a rapper fool"
I got my game about women from a prostitute
And way back used to rap on the block for loot
I tried to make my way legit, haha
But it was hard, cause rhymes don't pay the rent
And uhh, it was funny how I copped out
I couldn't make it in school, so finally I dropped out
My family on welfare
I'm steady thinkin', since don't nobody else care
I'm out here on my own
At least in jail I have a meal and I wouldn't be alone
I'm feelin' like a waste, tears rollin' down my face
Cause my life is filled with hate
Until I looked around me
I saw nuttin but family, straight up down for me
Panthers, Pimps, Pushers and Thugs
Hey yo, that's my family tree, I got nuttin but love

Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Yeah, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Yeah, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Uhm, nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya, Yeah!!
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Nuttin but love
Ain't got nuttin but love for yam, Yeah!!
Oaktown
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya
Ain't got nuttin but love for ya



Guess who's back?

Drop the drums, here it comes, only got
Two minutes to bounce, and every second counts
Better press REC on your deck
Here we go, set? Pass the Moët
My trickery's more slippery when wet
Wicked as I flip, don't trip, get a grip
It'll kick, if the bass line's thick, it's a hit
Everybody's got a mic now, it's like a hobby
But more like a job, cause bootleggers tryin' to rob me!
And little man wants to be a rap, star
Make papes, hit skins, drive a fat car
It ain't easy, sleazy even
Deceivin those we believe in
No benefits, just tricks and chicks
Knock a pig to pick, so here's a stick to lick
I shoot a gift, til there ain't none left
And if I find that the track sound def
I catch wreck till I lose my breath
That's how it goes in the land of broke
I dispose of those, rock shows, and collect my dough
Now I suppose I'm the bad guy, why?
I say, "Hi," and try to stay high
Life's a mess don't stress, test... of givin
But be thankful that you're livin... blessed
Guess who's back, comin back with the track supplied
By Special Ed and Ak, comin right and exact
I'm fightin it back but now I snap, where they at?
When it's time to go to combat, guess who's back

"Yes I'm back" - Special Ed
"2Pac is" .. back!!

Drop the drums, here it comes, only got
One minute to bounce, and every second counts
I went from hustlin dicks to makin hits, bustin flicks
Now I'm sure to be rich for ninety-six
I pull my 'capes on tapes, and make, papes
Trace the bass, to the tape with the baddest bass to date
I try to shake it but the pace is hard to break
Good thoughts I wait, cause they hate my black tape
Yeah, it's on, and it's packed in the rap race
But if ya got a black face, it's a rat race
I struggle to be rugged and raw, Dukes
Tryin to survive in the trials and lawsuits
Everybody wants to test me, WHY ME?
No lie, niggas cried when they try me
Givin up the roughness, justice
I'mma bust as I'm rippin up 'nuff hits
And guess who's back? No longer trapped
Cause I snapped on the ones that held me back, feel the contact
Ride the track, get I grip as I flip
Ghetto wickedness I kick. Guess who's back?


"Yes I'm back, cause I never did front"



Young Thugs in this motherfucker
Don't break up the fight, let 'em rumble
Don't make enemies with me
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me

Some say my criminal experience is legendary
I do what's necessary
Niggas wanna see me buried
Worried, if you comin' hurried
I ain't goin' down, fuck the world I'm a thug
Tell 'em can't nothin' stop me but a slug
I went from drug dealin' to a shot caller
From off the block, no longer rock
And puttin' money in my pocket, nationwide baller
Bitch nigga I'm prepared to die, Before I fry
I hit the weed so I be forever high
My eyes has seen so much in misery, So before I flee
I open fire let the lord pick the first to bleed
Bitches don't wanna see me leave, forever thuggin'
Tell 'em bury me a G on everything I love
And fuck the law cause the raw niggas ain't free
This picture's clear but we can't see, hahaha
This game is jealousy, Don't let 'em change
That's what they keep on tellin' me, motherfuck the fame
I can't sleep cause I keep hearin' peeps
Loaded Mossberg wrapped in my sheets

Don't make enemies with me
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me, nigga
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me

The game is gettin' deeper with this I couldn't stop, I'm reminiscin'
And havin' flashbacks when them niggas came up missin'
Wish in my heart, these niggas they ain't have to start
Now therefore they gotta see in dark
Played the part with heart when we spark they part
Runnin' silly through the court, they don't really wanna start
How you wanna do?, yo K, anyway
These motherfuckers wanna play we can do it all day
So I stay, sippin' on my aray to keep my head fine
And I squeeze when I say I'm comin'
Straight gunnin' on enemies if it's really me that they wantin'
Cause it ain't nothin', y'all niggas is frontin'
Do you really want it? niggas dyin'...

Don't make enemies with me
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me

Now, we're in '94, Niggas get bust through the do'
Galitter tell 'em 'bout that trife shit You wanna fight?
A nigga struggle too hard for what I got
Hustle And doubled every fuckin' yard that I cop and stop
Hell nah! I couldn't see it
Facin' a century in the Penitentiary but so be it
And Jesus couldn't help me out the state
Prepare for an early date to see my fate at the pearly gate
But wait No time for stallin' But death is callin'
You wanna stomp on it somebody's gotta start fallin'
True, what I do from sun up is for a come up
Wake up with my gun up Cause when I sneak that's when they run up
So It's time to spray like Ray
And put the freeze on these fake G's You know how we do

Don't make enemies with me
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me, nigga
I try to tell these motherfuckers they ain't see
Don't make enemies with me
You rather fuck with these other little G's
Don't make enemies with me

What nigga? Young motherfuckin' Thugs, let's out do it
Don't make enemies with me nigga
Y'all better fuck with these other niggas
You don't see it
Don't make enemies with me
Motherfuckers is fatal nigga
I swear by the Gods
Don't make enemies with me nigga
Niggas gonna see they caskets fuckin' with these bastards
Don't make enemies with me
It's for all those motherfuckers that's swearin' to God
That they be doin' something
Don't make enemies with me
That they touchin' something
That they being something
Y'all niggas ain't shit
That's on my mama bring the drama, nigga
Young Thugs, fuck the drugs
These niggas makin' records, y'all niggas best to check it
Cause y'all gonna get yo asshole tore
They tearin' patches out you niggas ass
All y'all niggas, I don't give a fuck who you runnin' with
This is thug life nigga, the new generation motherfucker
Young Thugs we chin checkin' all you junior high school motherfuckers
Y'all better feel this shit, don't make enemies with these niggas
You better be friendly motherfucker, I swear to God
We runnin' through, smile from handshake



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Please.. wake me when I am free
I cannot bear captivity
Where my country, I am told, "Hold no significance"
I waited and died in ignorance
But my inner eye can see, a race
Who reigned as king in another place
The green trees were rich and full
And every man spoke of beautiful men and women together as equals

War was gone because all was at peace
But now like a nightmare, I woke to see
That I live like a prisoner of poverty..

Please.. wake me when I am free
I cannot bear captivity
For, I would rather be stricken blind
Than to live without expression of mind

{*Babatunde Olatunki begins to speak in another language*}



everyone knows ure Face
The world screams ure name
Never again R u alone



Just when I thought I'd seen it all
our paths crossed and met
and I knew from the First glance
that u would be hard 2 4get
your eyes attracted me First
but you reeked of sultry confidence
I couldn't wait 2 touch lips
and kiss with my Heart's intentions
when we did it was what I expected
and 4 that moment we erased the tension
of the awkwardness of First Date Jitters
and the initials Blind Date First impressions
we kissed again and I felt the passion
and This was CUPID'S Blessing



Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Something wicked, this way comes
Something wicked, this way comes

'emember
More than an adversary, I'm very quick
I'm ready to hit 'em with this gift, I'm equipped to kick
So, grab your coat and your hat, cause I'm prepared to clown
Let's carry this end that throw these motherfuckers down
Oh shit, 2Pacalypse is back and strapped
Attackin' the packs, I'm kickin' the facts for stacks to rap
And those that max, relax and let the blacks get jacks
I'm gettin' taxed, my packs is packed with angry blacks
I'm ready to go
I'm rippin' the shows, hittin' the dough
Gettin' the hoes, clothes
Pumpin' the flow, thanks to the hump
Cause the nose knows
Check the pose, froze, when you see me close
Punks you gonna roast, host in a cloud of smoke
Broke, choked on some potent dank smoke
Wrote, rhymes that'll bring me bank notes
Nope, I ain't the type of fella that you're used to
Ki-ki-ki-kickin' the funky flava
Pumpin' the deuce with no producers
Run for cover when you hear the bass drum
One verse is all it takes
Something wicked this way comes
Come come, come come

Something wicked, this way comes
Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Some-Something wicked, this way comes
Something wicked, wicked, wicked, wicked
Something wicked, this way comes
Wicked something wicked, this way comes
Something wicked kick it, this way comes
Wicked kick it, this way comes
Something wicked wicked wicked wicked ,this way comes
Something wicked wicked wicked wicked ,this way comes
Something wicked wicked, this way comes
Wicked wicked, this way COME
{​monster sound}​



My road to glory filled with thorns
Fluent thoughts from my brain and I train to remain strong
They said I couldn’t do it, lock me in chains 'til I
My struggles closer to the pain of a trained killer
Please believe that I’ll never be shamed again
Again I'll be the next heavyweight champion
Call me crazy but no one can fade me
I’m the product of the projects, lost and crazy
Throw your hands up, Mr. Bruno, RIIDE
Big Mike Tyson 'bout to brutalize that ass tonight
No hesitation in front for the whole nation
I beat that ass so bad I prolly violate probation
Through demonstration as I strategize information
Intend to kill so it’s real like I’m catching cases haha
Let the world know I planned to die
If I don’t leave with what I came for I’ll be denied

Now, my first round is for the times that I spent in this cell
My second round is for the media and the lies they tell
The third round is for the pain that I felt inside
Best recognize I won’t be denied
When we ride
First round is for the times that I spent in this cell
My second round is for the media and the lies they tell
The third round is for the pain that I felt inside
Best recognize I won’t be denied
When we ride



Dear mama

I'm caught up in this sickness
I robbed my adversaries
But slipped and left a witness
Wonder if they'll catch me
Or will this nigga snitch
Should I shoot his bitch
Or make the nigga rich?
Don't wanna commit murder
But damn they got me trapped
Hawkin while I'm walkin
And talkin behind my back
I'm kind of schizophrenic
I'm in this shit to win it
Cause life's a Wheel of, Fortune
Here's my chance to spin it
Got no time for cops
Who trip and try to catch me
Too fuckin trigger happy
To let them suckers snatch me
Tryin to find my stash
Whip out the nine
Now I'mma dive and pump your ass
Peter picked a pepper
But I can pick a punk
Snatched him like a bitch
And threw him in the trunk
The punk thought I was bluffin
But swear I'm nothin nice
Before I take your life
First wrestle with these, mice
I listen to him scream
Tray Deee went insane
I guess the little, mices
Had finally found his brain
New Rovers pull me over
I'm sentenced to the pen
Remember that little, bird
He snitched and told a, friend
It's trouble on my mind
I'm with the old timers
And fuck five-oh, blaow blaow

Dear mama

They sentenced me to death
Today's my final day
I'm countin every breath
I'm bitter cause I'm dyin
So much I haven't seen
I know you never dreamed
Your baby would be dead at 16
I got beef with a sick society
That doesn't give a shit
And they too quick to say goodbye to me
They tell me the preacher's there for me
He's a crook with a book
That motherfucker never cared for me
He's only here to be sure
I don't drop a dime to God
Bout the crimes he's commitin on the poor
And how can these people judge me?
They ain't my peers and in all these years
They ain't never love me
I never got to be a man
Must be part of some big plan
To keep a nigga in the state pen
Steer clear of these Aryan motherfuckers
Cause once they got you locked up
They got you trapped
You're better off gettin shot up
I'm convinced self-defense is the way
Please, stay strapped, pack a gat every day
I wish I woulda known while I was out there
Now I'm straight headin for the chair

Dear mama

These cops don't understand me
I turned to a life of crime
Cause I came from a broken family
My uncle used to touch me
I never told you that
Scared what you might do
I couldn't hold you back
I kept it deep inside
I done let it fuel my anger
I'm down for all my homies
No mercy for a stranger
The brother in my cell
Is 16 as well
It's hard to adapt
When you're black
And you're trapped
In a livin Hell
I shouldn'ta let him catch me
Instead of livin sad in jail
I coulda died free and happy
And my cellmate's raped on the norm
And passed around the dorm
You can hear his asshole gettin torn
They made me an animal
Can't sleep, instead of countin sheep
Niggas countin cannibals
And that's how it is in the pen
Turn old and cold
And your soul is your best friend
My mama prayed for me
Tell the Lord to make way for me
Cause when they come for me they find a struggler
To the death
I take the breath from your jugular
The trick is to never lose hope
I found my buddy hangin dead from a rope



MEN!
u shouldn't listen 2 your selfish heart
It doesn't really have a brain
Besides keeping u alive
Its existence is in vain
"How could I be so mean,
and say your heart has no place?"
Because mortal men fall in love again
as fast as they changed their face
I may be cruel, but think awhile about
The hearts that u have broken
Match that with the empty vows
and broken promises u've spoken
I am not saying females R perfect
Because men we know it's not true
But why must u be unfaithful
If her heart is true 2 u!!!!

-Shakur



Dear baby you the picture of perfection
Straight from your million dollar smile
To my attraction to your complexion
No hesitation needed; you got me
Inhalin' the aroma of your perfume, and feelin' heated
I move closer to drop the lines of my introduction
Hold out my hand, and grab yo' hand, now we touchin'
My lyrics are poetry, so baby get a ticket to go with me
Thugged out so you notice me
It's a positive attraction; see pictures of us
Layin' butt-naked on the beach kickin back relaxin'
And only you can calm, the savage beast
Look in my eyes are you surprised, that it's me?
I wanna make you mine
I'm so lonely in my bedroom, lookin' at the walls
Withcha number in my hand, wonderin' should I even call her tonight

Anytime you like, baby you can call me
Never find nobody like me
And girl you know I got you
And shorty it's all on you
Baby call on me

Been gettin' nuttin' but bad news, ever since the day you left me
I sit and wonder is there a way, you could forget me
Remember my phone calls, my late visits
Us havin' breakfast in bed, then we straight kick it
Me and you in satin sheets, 'til after two
Come take a walk on the wild side, enjoy the view
Whenever we collide; it's bound to be a pleasurable time
Makin' love 'til the early light
Sweetheart don't fight the feelin'
Come get a shot of this plain dealin' and concentrate on the ceiling
It's my intention to brush up
Beware of the fireworks, cause every time we touch..
.. it's bound to be, so relax, clown with me
As if you're down with me, get around and see
The brother with tattoos and no fears
Runnin' my fingers through your hair
If you call me

Anytime you like, baby you can call me
Never find nobody like me
And girl you know I got you
And shorty it's all on you
Baby call on me

Pardon me, but let's be specific
Baby cause if you down with me, nigga we can kick it
And let's take trips and ride airplanes
A hundred thousand dollar car on dem gold thangs, so can you hang?
I got a big suite at the Hyatt , if it feel right
My only wish is to be witcha
You got me steady strivin' to getcha
Fantasizin' of friendly pictures
The pressure's gettin' major
I wonder will you answer my call, if I page ya
Got me goin' wild with anticipation
Face to face with us locked up in strange places
What will it take? cause the heartache be heatbreak
Is my prediction when you falsify and start fake?
In my position I'm a careful man, but a player when I ball
Got my eyes on you baby, can I call?

Anytime you like, baby you can call me
Need a thug up in yo' life, never find nobody like me
Cause I know what you want, and girl you know I got you
You got what I need, and shorty it's all on you
Anytime you like, baby you can call me
Need a thug up in yo' life, never find nobody like me
Cause I know what you want, and girl you know I got you
You got what I need, and shorty it's all on you
Baby call on me



Straight out the motherfuckin' Bay
Here we go

Lord help me, save me, Mama keep prayin'
For a young motherfucker tryin' to duck an early grave
In the city where ya can't tell the snakes from the fakes
Fakes from the phonies, enemies of homies
Around the corner there's another nigga waitin' to jack
He don't know I got a Glock 'til his ass get shot
Like a motherfuckin' thug disease
Cravin' beats like they motherfuckin' drugs to me, hey
What's up with bitches tryin' to screw me? Do me cause I did a movie
Throw the pussy to me but before they never knew me
Rather die then let ya play me for a, buster
And with my Glock I'm a plottin' ass rotten motherfucker, huh
Don't let the movie fool ya, let me school ya
Screamin' Thug Life nigga when I do ya
I'm goin' crazy, gettin' dizzy
And then I snap again a motherfuckin' breather bring me back
I'm tellin' ya I'm losin' it

Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind

I'm goin' crazy, niggas can't fade me
On the real I kill when I step to ya fuckin' grill
So let me kick it let me flip it let me get wicked
I'm not a buster from the hood sellin' wolf tickets
I hang with G's flippin' keys and smokin' weed
I get the cash and dash and never learn to read
So fuck a bitch fuck a ho and I let ya know
Because they come and go like the wind blows
What am I givin' how I'm livin' what I'm givin' up
You can take my life and I don't give a fuck
Cause I'm the trouble most comin' from the west coast
Where the niggas is bangin' 'til the overdose
Killers and murderers, psychos and lunatics
Nobody knows what makes my mind click
Is it the demons, screamin' inside of me?
Hell no it's just the Thug Life mentallity
I'm goin' crazy shit don't phase me
I'm livin' like a thug 'til six niggas carry me
Death is on the trigga so pull it
I can't take it no more, nigga, I'm losin' it

Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind

Shit was talkin' to me, my gat screamed fire
The bullet told me shoot that motherfucker he's a liar
I talked to me 3-80 like a bitch on a stroll
When my niggas try to dick me
Nigga, I can't get fucked in this game I'm a psychopath
My AK told me to shove him up some niggas ass
I'm havin' long conversations with Mr. Millimeter
He's one of my best friends bitch ass nigga eater
And Miss Mossburg love it in the back trunk
You know that old school bitch she like to get it funked
And spittin' motherfuckers by the seems
My grand daddy Mr. AR-15
By the evil motherfucker
Talked me into takin' over a dope turf and shootin' cluckers
Said he was my only family
Shoot straight, and please don't jam me
Got in a fight at the club my gat started talkin'
Told me to shut the fuck up and let him do the talkin'
I woke up and it was sick to see the guts hang
I'm goin' nuts man
Shit was talkin' to me

Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind
Said I'm losin' my mind
Losin' my mind



I know my heart has lied before
but now it speaks with honesty
of an invisible bond of friendship
that was formed in secrecy
Coming from me this may seem hard
but 2 GOD I swear it's truth
We R friends for eternity
and Forever I will always love u

With All My Heart,
"Spirit"

P.S. Just so u don't forget that
I am here for u. U R a true
friend.



Straight motherfuckin ballin
Part two, still ballin
Kurupt up in this motherfucker
Westside!

Now ever since a nigga was a seed
Only thing promised to me was the penitentiary, still ballin
Ridin on these niggas cause they lame
In a six-one Chevy, still heavy in this game, can you feel me?
Blame it on my momma I'm a thug nigga
Up befo' the sun rise, quicker than the drug dealers
Tell me if it's on, nigga then we first to bomb
Bust on these bitch-made niggas hit 'em up, WESTSIDE
Ain't nobody love me as a broke nigga
Finger on the trigger Lord forgive me if I smoke niggas
I love my females strapped, no fuckin from the back
I get my currency in stacks, California's where I'm at - right?
Passed by while these niggas wonder why
I got shot but didn't die, let 'em see who's next to try
Did I cry, hell nah, nigga tear I shed
For all my homies in the pen, many peers dead
Niggas still ballin

Still ballin, 'til the day I die
You can bring your crew but we remain true motherfuckers
Still ballin, niggas wonder why
You can bring your crew but we remain true motherfuckers
Still ballin

This for all y'all motherfuckers
They done did it, let the dog out the cage
Got pumped up with the gauge
I done did it all, everywhere I go, I ball
Precisely my game tight, or for so I fall
I'm the invincible, and since the top principals
Lose like the Heat to them all, who got the heart to shoot?
I get stitches, play the game with BB britches
When I was young dreamin 'bout money, fame, and bitches
I like fat asses, fat money bags of cash, and masses
Slowly as time passes, I found nothing but money rules
Time and space, and in this where all my thoughts
"Where all the fucking murders take place?"
And I'm in it to win it; I'm out to get paid
Got all these bitches on my dick, from the money I made
It's a state I have brought, Growing up it's by naturally
I don't give a fuck
Still ballin!



Now everybody wanna see us dead
Two murdered on the front page, shot to death, bullets to the head
Niggas holla out my name and it's similar to rape
Motherfuckers know I'm comin, so they runnin to they graves, watch
Swoop down with my nigga from the Pound
Keep pumpin, ain't worried bout nuttin
Busters thought we was frontin, so reload and keep dumpin

I feel heat, everywhere a nigga see me up in the streets
I don't tweak, Keep a straight .38 under the seat
Mad. Mission Mode. My thoughts are cold
Bought some tans of skins, money bags of gold
Roll and collide Homicide vibes inside
Thug Life and Dogg Pound on this midnight ride
Every since we hit the world
We got stationed, with no hesitation
Make moves nigga, Mr. Too Smooth the elaborate
The slow like potion, focus on the money
Thats made sippin on this poisonous potion
Grandma got you got, Too much heat to hot
Get shanked, get shot indulging in this poisonous plot
Fame and fortune, fortune from game
Weed and zags, illicit amounts of cash
Jags its all the same
As long as there money to exchange
NIGGA!




When your hero falls from grace
all fairy tales R uncovered
myths exposed and pain magnified
the greatest pain discovered
u taught me 2 be strong
but I'm confused 2 c u so weak
u said never 2 give up
and it hurts 2 c u welcome defeat
when ure Hero falls so do the stars
and so does the perception of tomorrow
without my Hero there is only
me alone 2 deal with my sorrow.
your Heart ceases 2 work
and your soul is is not happy at all
what R u expected 2 do
when ure only Hero falls



Yeah... knockin niggas the fuck out
Y'all niggas know how we do
Yeah nigga, you know how we do when we ride up on your bitch ass

Tell me baby, what's your frequency
You see I'm makin proposals that's full of verbaly indecency when ya meetin me
Flash light I'm buzzed, wasn't right like drugs
Got 3 strikes, you got cause last night's for thugs
Holdin my position my competition is never ready
Ripped like a machete, my alias Makaveli
So what they tell me through the grapevine
Niggas ain't tryin to see me paid, they rather take mine
Retaliation takes time
Create rhymes, that so ferocious that the bass line
Went for my vocals everytime a nigga say it rhyme
Spendin and bustin you thought you was but you wasn't, prepared
Niggas is scared, I'm eternally thuggin
Like Kamikazes on a suicide mission I'm spittin
Multiple gunshots, burnin turnin rappers to victims
I kick em all day, and my motto make Biggie Smalls pay
I make it rough enough, you and puffy crawl away

First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Come be my enemy killa, when I see you eye to eye
First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Outlaw immortal my nigga, when I see you eye to eye

First to bomb, quick to unload
Expose, my foes, for being bitches
Keepin niggas suspicious, 2 Glocks
Is filled with ammo
My army fatigues ready for battle
Lyrical commando, let's get it on
Tell me nigga, how much you can handle
My intention specifically, thugged out, no sympathy
Pictures of closed caskets, soon as Daz get with me
I'm first to bomb, first is the calm, then the panic
Soon as my niggas break, we earthquake the whole planet
Adversaries can't understand it
The way my niggas strategize
Don't nobody die unless we planned it
Life long committed, I write songs and spit it
No matter how hard mothafuckas try they can't get it
It's Death Row, Westside, Outlaws til we die, Thug Life
Mothafuckas on the ride and we--




Still breathin', yeah, woo - wooo-WHEEE!

A picture of perfection, the object of a nigga affection
Partners in passionate sex, a place to put my erection
Fantasies of you in submission, freaky positions
Pushin', pullin' and twistin' I'm on a mission got me on the mash
Tried to dig, you was screamin' when I did
Steady yellin' out spots for me to hit, and "aw shit"
Soon as I seen her saw us playin' hide the weiner
Wanna "Freak Like Me", fuck Adina
Up and down is the object, side to side
Make you holla out my name when a thug nigga ride, "Can I cum inside?"
Say you don't feel it that's a lie
You just scared to get this Penitentiary dick
The trot caught your eye When I walked by
I said, "Hi"
But you was so shy, I can't lie, damn near stuttered when you walked by
You want me to lick it and even worse
Got your heart set on me goin' first, and that ain't no fair exchange

You do me
And if it's worth it baby, I'll return the favor
A fair exchange, on everythang
And Let me tell you that's the way it's gotta be
Open your eyes baby, recognize a player
A fair exchange, you know the game
We can do the damn thang, thang, thang

Open your legs
Got me marchin' like it’s a million, you tremble from the feelin'
Look up, cause I got mirrors on the ceilin'
And if you willin', then we can ride until the sun shine
And just for fun, I betchu I can make you cum 61 times
Close your eyes, let me heat it up
Cause when we fuck I refuse to bust a nut until I beat it up
Drop the top, time to fuck while the wind blow
Baby throw yo' legs out the window
Remember on the balcony, bend over baby bounce on me
And let me hit it where it counts and flee
Remember me? "I Get Around," and I'm haunted by my "Temptations"
Sexual participation, my motivation
Even though I like the way you work it
You don't deserve it cause you walk around actin' like you perfect
Took a while but I finally got it, and like a boss player
Bitch you ain't doin' me no favors, fair exchange

You do me
And if it's worth it baby, I'll return the favor
A fair exchange, on everythang
And Let me tell you that's the way it's gotta be
Open your eyes baby, recognize a player
A fair exchange, you know the game
We can do the damn thang, thang, thang

Now yo' attitude ain't realistic
Yeah it's true I'm gettin' pussy, but baby you gettin' dick!
And since you bein' laced with the penetration
It's only right to show a form of appreciation
Instead of fakin' like you can't hear the bed shakin'
In bed naked you so twisted think yo' legs breakin'
You said "take it" so I'm blind in my passion, how long will I last?
Doggy style steady pumpin' on that ass, until I blast
And then I laugh as we lay back
See I wait 'til you asleep and that's the payback
Cause you actin' like you did somethin', givin' me a piece
I had you mufflin' your screams in the sheets, fuckin' with me
A true digger that love triggers, a thug nigga
Hustlin' bitches like drug dealers
Before I say goodbye, put an end to all the games
Here's my number for another fair exchange

You do me
And if it's worth it baby, I'll return the favor
A fair exchange, on everythang
And Let me tell you that's the way it's gotta be
Open your eyes baby, recognize a player
A fair exchange, you know the game
We can do the damn
You do me
And if it's worth it baby, I'll return the favor
A fair exchange, on everythang
And Let me tell you that's the way it's gotta be
Open your eyes baby, recognize a player
A fair exchange, you know the game
We can do the damn thang, thang, thang



"I will give u Liberty, But First give me ure spirit,
This I must confiscate Because the evil Fear it."
I too would be afraid of passion governed by reason
An open mind 2 trying times when corruption is in season
The promise that they claim
2 be completely true
is hypocrisy at its finest
A trick 2 silence u
never will I Believe a promise
from the masters of the Art
Trickery does not succeed
with those with Honest Hearts








This poem is addressed 2 Mrs. Hawkins
who lost her son 2 a racist society
I'm not out 2 offend the positive souls
only the racist dogs who lied 2 me
An American culture plagued with nights
like the night Yusef was killed
if it were reversed it would be the work
of a savage but this white killer was just strong-willed
But Mrs. Hawkins as sure as I'm a Panther
with the blood of Malcolm in my veins
America will never rest
if Yusef dies in vain!



When I'm saying Thug, I mean not criminals; someone who beats you up and that
I mean the underdog, the person that nothing succeeds; he's a thug, because
He overcome all obstacles, it doesn't have anything to do with the dictionaries
Version of thug, for me thug is my pride, not being someone who goes against the law
Not being someone to take, but being someone who has nothing, and that he don't have nothing
And there's no home for him to go to, my head is up high, my chest is out, I walk tall, I talk loud

I'm being strong!


They should give money to the ghetto

I mean I think even gangs can be positive. It just has to be organized
It has to steer away from being self-destructive to being self-productive
I organized the OGs on the East and West Coasts in penitentiaries
To come up with codes of ethics for criminals
It's called the Code of Thug Life
It's a code, putting order to the violence on the streets
In Watts, Compton, Chicago, wherever
People all over the country say, "We go by this code
"We're against attacks on people not involved with the street gang, the drug trade or the illegal business at all."

"All that kidnapping and shooting drive-bys, we against that."
Thug Life ain't just a bunch of niggas going crazy
We wanna patrol our streets. So all we saying is
If every motherfucker out here right now gave up one dollar
To this Thug Life fund, the money don't go to me
It go to somebody from y'all neighborhood
And we do this shit every month. I'll bring new rappers
I'll bring Snoop, whoever y'all want
I'll go snatch them niggas. For that shit to happen, we can't have violence
And everybody gotta be down for that shit



Where there is a will
there is a way
2 Search and discover
a Better Day

Where a positive heart
is all u Need
2 Rise Beyond
and succeed

Where young mind grow
and respect each other
Based on their Deeds
and not their color

When times R dim
say as I say..
"Where there is a will
There is a way!"



First there was nothing
Not even the Faint echo of a song
Loneliness was daily 4 me
until u came along
There was a gleam of STARS in your eyes
I thought I'd  never feel this way again
But u were the one 2 reach into my heart
And find in me a Friend
I could not ignore the magnetism
that I felt when u were near
And any problems plaguing my mind
would suddenly disappear
It was the rebirth of my heart
The day u became my friend
Because I knew from the moment
I held u that I would find love again



Watch me
Ain't no question
I'm sufferin' a bad case of lyrical congestion
Not the one for testin'
Come mess with and end up with your chest split
No, not because of cardiac, but because how hard he act, Ha!
I'm recognized as the microphone destroyer
Competition minds up in the state of paranoia
I told him if you're scared, go get a dog So by tomorrow
You'll probably see 20 rappers walkin' with Rottweilers
Your gimmick is primitive, and impotent
You won't win with it, so limit it
Before I make your body start to hemorrhage
Just when you thought that you was burnin' me
You found yourself bleedin' internally
Now you heads is learnin', see
I stayin' there sincere
You commence prayer
Your heart begets fear, cause there ain't no wins here, Huh
Never kid, cause even with leverage
I can rock your domepiece worse than the wop ever did
WHAT?

Is you out your fuckin' mind?
Ask me to blast No need to ask, cause I'm mashin'
Peepin' the latest fashion, copy-cats in plastics, get me to flashin'
My adversaries shipped in caskets
Murdered them bastards
Witness the past, got boom-bastic
Now that they freed me, no one can see me
I completely eradicated my competition, father forgive me
Assemble the troops, prepare my loots for combustion
Rushin' them muthafuckas, the deadliest nigga bustin'
How can they touch me when they lost in thought?
On Death Row we lock shit down across the board
Now flash, and watch me get in that ass like a bikini
Lyrical legendary so niggas'll never see me
Completely defeat me, can never happen
Whether rappin' or scrappin'
Niggas get smashed on they muthafuckin' back
Hard to kill, and even harder to stop
Watch Kane and 'Pac drop the sho' shot!
Tell them muthafuckas

Here's how we'll do it
The meet us and the plan's to put the cash in the hand
So that I can spend a grand of benja-mans up in Japan
Now who's the man?
And therefore my Luchi, eatin' sushi
Checkin' out a subtitled movie featurin' Sho Kasugi

Tell me, Kane, when will niggas learn?
In this game, fuck with us, niggas gettin' burned
We takin' turns on you bitch-made nigg-ar-os
I hope it hurts, cause you're worse than these groupie hoes

One more time baby
I'll be forever, the gogetter of the chedder
Thinkin' ahead of my competitor, just too clever to sever
I got it together, to represent with my true nigg
The first syllables of our name together is 2 big
Think about that!




I was raised in this society so there's no way
You can expect me to be a perfect person cuz I'm a do what I'm a do
I am still thirsty
It has no place in our society.)
They gotta understand me
That's how I feel I'm a do whatever I like. I am not a role model




First to bomb, Quick to unload
Expose my foes for being bitches
Keeping niggas suspicious
2 Glocks is filled with ammo
My army fatigues is ready for battle
Tell me nigga how much can you handle?
Banging on wax
I turn the track into a roman candle
Booom!
My intention specifically
Thugged out no sympathy
Pictures of closed caskets
First is the calm then the panic
Soon as my niggas break
We earthquake the whole planet
Adversaries can't understand it
The way my niggas strategize
Don't anybody die unless we planted it
Live long committed, I write songs and then spit it
No matter how hard motherfuckers try
They can't get it
It's west coast
Westide, Outlawz till we die, Thug life motherfuckers on the first ride and we are the first to bomb

I got nothing to lose, paying dues
Nigga you wanna die?
I get high, Then my mission is a walk-by
You'd better jet when i hit your set
Cause i am coming, Start running
Yelling Evil-Mind as i am gunning
One in the chamber
For the anger that i build inside
For the mothers that cried
The beginning is an ending
Am i just a slave
So i got be brave
From the cradle to the grave

I never would've dreamed in a million years I'd see
So many mothafuckin' people, who feel like me
Who share the same views and the same exact beliefs
It's like a fucking army marching in back of me
So many lives I touched, so much anger aimed
In no particular direction, just sprays and sprays
And straight through your radio waves, it plays and plays
'til it stays stuck in your head, for days and days
Who would've thought, standing in this mirror bleaching my hair
With some peroxide, reaching for a t-shirt to wear
That I would catapult to the forefront of rap like this?
How could I predict my words would have an impact like this
I must've struck a chord with somebody up in the office
Cause Congress keep telling me, I ain't causing nothing but problems
And now they're saying I'm in trouble with the government, I'm loving it
I shoveled shit all my life, and now I'm dumping it


Tell me baby what's your frequency
You see I'm making proposals
Full of verbal indecency when ya meeting me
Flash light i am buzzed
What's right like drugs, got 3 strikes
You got cause last night for thugs
Holding my position
My competition is never ready
Ripped by a machete
My alias is Makaveli
So what they tell me through the grapevine
Niggas ain't ready to see me paid
They rather take mine
Retaliation takes time
Creating rhymes that so ferocious that the bass line
Went for my vocals
Every time a nigga says it rhyme
Spending and busting you thought it up
But you wasn't prepared
Niggas is scared, I am eternally thugging
Like Kamikazes on a suicide mission
I am spitting multiple gunshots
Burning turning rappers to victims
I kick em all day





Now I've got to ask, on a nigga's ass, tell me will they blast me?
I think of an alias in case these crooked bitches ask me
Now, it's gettin crazy after dark, these NARC's
Be like tryin to shut me down but I'm too smart
Now picture me scared of the penitentiary
I've been movin these things since the days of elementary
Now tell me what you need when you see me
I'm stackin G's, buyin all the things on TV, believe me
I got some killers on my payroll, and they know
When it's time to handle business, nigga lay low
Although I'm young, I'm still comin up
I'm gettin paid, pullin razors on niggas when they runnin up
The first to pull a strap when there's drama - busta you ain't heard?
I've been slicin motherfuckers since I lost my mama
There ain't a cop that can stop me
My posse is cocky, and they don't quit until they drop me
I'm loyal to the game

{"Prince of peace must hear our plea"}
{"Told life you'd be back"} {"There you were"}
{"Prince of peace must hear our plea"}
{"Everybody look around"} {"There is no hope"}
{"Prince of peace must hear our plea"}
{"Brothers we better get hip"}

My mama say I'm crazy cause I'm all about the hood
I can't get my shit together but I'm on leather and wood
And the hood is all I know, patrol and circle the block
Off the curb and niggas swerve, serve a smoker a rock
And I'm hot like fish grease and nigga so is my Caddy
And I'm steady catchin static, move the traffic to the alley
Out in Cali niggas rally others all for the soil
Mix the work with bakin soda and get the water to boil
OH NO can't no busters hang, I hope you feel me mayne
Cause snitches bitches and they ain't been loyal to the game
My niggas feel my pain, when sunshine turn to rain
You know these buster motherfuckers came to fuck the game
And it's a shame I see the mark in they eyes
When they yellin that he tellin get to me, no surprise, nigga


{"And come off this trip"}

Loyalty, undeservedly, never heard of me
I, be the exception, the epitome of adaption
The superficial surroundings, bullets fiends cockhounds and
I'm like Bruce Nolan, I'm rollin' until the diesel hit me
I'm battered and bruised, and madder havin to choose
'tween happiness and the blues, and who be fillin my shoes
When I done had it with crews, ecstatic to see me lose
But panic when I be smooth, I'm manic but I'm no fool
Y'all rappin I'm talkin cool, and Columbine is not new
In Compton they shoot up schools too, ridin by to see who's who
Cock the shotty they cruise through, rock the body blood ooze through
Tell his family that dude's blue, no comin back
From him scrappin when niggas was packin and he wasn't packin too
So if you feel me you know when they try to kill me they slow
I seen from 'round the corner with mirrors and creeped up on 'em


{"Thugs throw like wine down a nigga's throat
If this shit don't STOP STOP STOP STOP STOP!"}



Mr. If you a bad boy
Yo,  what's up
Fatal, Outlawz I wanna up out this motherfucker
Gon' pass it
Ain't get me up but fuck that
This Outlaw nigga

If you a bad boy then you die
Westside outlawz when we ride, get me high
They fucked up when they robbed me
Put another contract on Mobb Deep
If you a bad boy then you die
Westside outlawz when we ride, get me high
They fucked up when they robbed me
Put another contract on Mobb Deep

I focus my locus thought on the enemies
Sip off the Hennessy, it's necessary to finish me
I'm antisocial, immortal when it come to the vocal
Jersey them niggas down, they won't broke 'em 'til it's time to smoke 'em
Hussein the terrorist
Dig they think I'm crazy and creepy
And as we speak they tryin' to find me a therapist
Rapid fire I clap and hire 'til you die a liar
Strap in the city corners droppin' on to spin the tires
My man define ya 357 anaconda
This enough to bring your mama then turn around and hear the drama
Military comradery, oulaw 'til they body me
Havoc I gotta have it steady blastin' at Prodigy
Mobb 6 feet deep, you try to bust me 'til death
And I suppose you got the dopest moves like Chucky on fresh
You know the verdict, who what when why he died murdered
Get your physical diverted and your vision deserted

Now ever since momma got fucked and papa ducked out
Look at us, murderous thugs showin' less love in the drug house
Similar to savages, it's a wonder we manage
Bring chaos causin' damage on our quest for cabbage
They ask my style similar to cash we flaunt it
Most wanted by the population murdered you for it
Exploit your weakness revenge flow deep without release
Criminal orders across the waters bringin' the war to the streets
Why fear me, fear the shit I speak
Once this shit drop it's heard on every fuckin' street
Like the sound of police
Who run the streets really?
In every hood legends grow
From the hustlaz up at Harlem to shot callers in O'
And though, Congress, don't want us to progress, we stressed
My homie buried at an early age hustled to death
His last breath, a lesson I possess like jewels
Stay thugged out keep it movin'

Hey where that nigga

Halfway thugs don't budge when we stalk the streets
You speak the beef pussy draw down and drop it
Hit you with 6 shots lay the law down and throw the shells in my pocket
Gettin' mines with nine cocked extortin'
Blocks pop with 22's in my socks with the butt hangin' out the chocolate
You never seen time I travel across dream crime
My rolls like a million dollar bill, folded with green lines
With my foes erased drink my Henney straight no chasin'
Catch my body like Haitian 5 minutes from the station

Hit the hole like Allen Iverson with confidence
No finger prints don't mean no evidence or proof the I was present
At the scene of the crime around 10 niggas bleed
After they made this punk fag motherfucker bleed
Money was bloody as shit, y'all niggas shoulda seen it
Bust a cap and freak with, bowin' on your knees shit
The Glock to your head nigga, don't make no somethin' action
Hit innocent by-standers when he blasted, dump fuckin' backwards
Little homies puttin' work for stripes
But is it worth your life and g-rides runnin' red lights
I wish somebody would have told me then
Since I'm an outlaw like Napoleon ain't no cell they can hold me in
Or cage me in, crazy like Arabians
Hold this spot like them niggas on Fabian
When they want the product, nigga I got to smoke
Got this weed and the coke what you need what you want
What you workin' with?, I'm on some immortal shit
Outlawz we straight hurtin' shit, use artillery to murder with
Put on the block gangsta party and like 'Pac

I know the law hate me dearly, comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, they comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, they comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E

With my Glock, quick to let it pop, fuck the law
Carry steel cause I live on the nigga side of the law
Ridin' foes 'cause I can't let hoes catch me slippin'
Quick to blow and dispose if you block on hittin'
Ridin' high, blazin', kryptonite got a nigga dazin'
Burpin' and smurkin' got on enemies before I grave 'em
Ride 'em, look behind him, I see him, he slipped
Had to stop light in a slowly night, this motherfuckin' trick
Slide over so I can dump and put it in em
Damn, I guess this motherfucker know that I sent it
Hit the pedal now we high speedin'
With the metal tryin' to make these motherfuckers die speedin'
Up the way I seen him slow down
Shit!! I think I done bucked these hoes down
Caught them runnin' on e, it's kind of funny to me
They know they was fuckin' with me but they dumb to see

Open up fire watch 'em expire when my shells split 'em
Plus all them trick niggas basically can go to hell with 'em
Fuck 'em they phony claimin' they homies but they foes
Speakin' on thug niggas daily, while we nailin' they hoes
Explode boldly at my stage shows and formation
Words are known to spray blaze as I raise my thug nation
A crooked thought, cops get bought, no longer caught
Out on bail, raisin' hell, nigga fuck what you thought
Did you cry when my girl died?
Put out the hit, politic niggas worldwide, grabbin' my dick
I’ll never learn, take away the pain with sherm
Throwin' gas on my enemies watchin' 'em burn
Kamikaze, I’m shootin' up the casket take the body
Whip the corpse like a piñata and party
His last breath, a straight lesson I possess like jewels
Stay thugged out keep it movin'
Runnin' on E..
Stay thugged out keep it movin'
Runnin' on E

One time, one time for the niggas that stayed down for us
Runnin' on E
Smif-n-Wessun the Cocoa Brovaz, Buckshot, BDI, runnin' on E
The Bootcamp Click
What happened, that was it?



{*singing in other language*}

When your hero falls from grace, all fairy tales are uncovered
Myth exposed and pain magnified, the grace pays uncovered
He told me to be strong, but I confused to see you so weak
You say never to give up, and it hurts to see you welcome defeat
When your hero falls so league the stars, and so does the perception of tomorrow
Without my hero, there's only me alone, to deal with my sorrow
Your heart ceases to work, and your soul is not happy at all
What are you expected to do, when your only hero falls

As long as some suffer, the river flows forever
As long as there is pain, the river flows forever
As strong as a smile can be, the river will flow forever
And as long as you are with me, we'll ride the river together..
..And as long as you are with me, we'll ride the river together

We'll ride.. the river together, as long as.. you are with me
The river.. will flow forever, as long as.. you are with me
The river.. will flow forever, as long as.. you are with me



Nigga this is Death Row, Westside nigga fuck 'em all

Don't go to sleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

Westside nigga
Westside
You know how we do it
California, L.A's finest
Death Row don't fall asleep nigga
Don't fall asleep
Eyes open
Wide open
Quit starin' at me like an infrared nigga

Pictures of plenty, sippin' my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi-automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, 'cause I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die with open eyes
Scared to take a nap, it's a trap, a long maze
Dreamin' of gettin' stacks, makin' scratch the wrong way
What the song say, we murder motherfuckers daily
Blackout, blow the track out, my lyrics never fail me
I inhale strong weed, then release the stress
Deliver the bomb shit from the East to West
Like Yayo
Commence to poppin' motherfuckers copy me, it's fatal
Efficiently I delete and flee
The art of war livin' sucka free, get with me
Nigga just don't sleep

Don't go to sleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't fall asleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

Haha
Now in this life I'm leadin' I've tried succeedin' but I fail
I'm thinkin' I should've listened when the teacher was teachin'
I bounced
Through life with mostly knowledge, that a book can give me
But at school, I played the fooled I probably
Should've took it seriously
Now I'm in a position with a mission that's simple
Get some cash in this rap game, a hustle to get through Uh huh
Me and my dawgs, down like we own the force
Fightin' through the war, shoulder to shoulder, Outlawz
Yeah it's just six niggas tatted
At it like addicts, cabbage snatchers
Right on up until they catch us
Forever runnin' from them times that we was broke and
Three dollars for gas and befo' that, then we was walkin'
Haha but peep niggas walk the street
Niggas know the time, so we don't, fall asleep
Come on

Don't fall asleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
Don't fall asleep
But don't fall asleep

Sleep baby
Not sleep in the physical form but I mean sleepin' mentally
I mean when niggas close they eyes to the way the game go
You can't fall asleep my nigga
Not on Death Row

Mic check
One two, one two, one two
I flip a double deck and stress ya
Snap on this rap
And cut him from his neck to his rectum
Jersey Jigga another nigga from a drug stomach
Fiend for hundreds so if I want it, I'm a thug run it
Robbin' cradles and robbin' niggas for bitches
Robbin' bitches for their riches cause I'm straight pullin' switches
Fuck phonics
I cool by the school pumpin' 'notic's
At lunch sharin' a stunt, with a blunt fulla chronic
The Madman
I'm tryna let you know 'bout the badland
So now I'm in your town takin' 'em down to the caravan
Deep like them Jeep as niggas at the greet
So when I creep don't sleep
Or watch your floo' catch a slow leak

Don't fall asleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't fall asleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close their eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

Hahaha!!
Don't go to sleep nigga
Don't go to sleep
Outlawz nigga!
Outlawz!
Mutherfuckin' M.O.B
Money over bitches
Bullets to the tricks
You know what time it is nigga
Don't go to sleep
Bad Boy Killa
There's no one realer
Mobb Deep killa
Chino-X kill..
Hahahahaha
All you niggas die
In your motherfuckin' sleep
Go ahead close your eyes motherfucker
You sleepin' on us
Close your eyes nigga
You sleepin' on the Westside
Go head
Go Fall asleep
Close your eyes
Rock-a-bye-baby
On the tree top
When my Glocks loaded them nigga will drop
Hahahahahaha
Don't fall, asleep nigga
Everybody dies...



Would you ride for me?
Would you ride for me?
You lyin' if you want to ride for me
I mean all out, not just to fuck
I mean all that shit

Look, I need more than just romantic feelings
When shit is frantic need a bitch
That’s just as scandalous when fuckin' this killer
To be appealin', have a bachelor in cold feelings
Mind for numbers same to wonder with this drug dealin'
Thug feelings make me a villain to the PH imbalance of civilians
Don't let those hurt feelings turn this lesson into a killin'
Game spillin', my prophecy fulfillin'
To be involved with the killin' must be a immune to squealin'
Listen lady what does it take to get you hot and crazy
Pass you a loaded 38 and bust on fools who play me
This is how I plan a night
First we ride on the bustas then we dine
Eatin' dinner by candlelight
Be alert and put in works with a thugz passion
I'm a king, and you the queen up in thugz mansion
Me, I'm a never be a busta, I ride for keeps
I know you shy but please reply, would you ride for me?

Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Bust on them mother fuckers when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bang on them niggas when they lie to me?
Don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?

Come on baby, won't you ride for me?
Do the time for me just cock back the 9 and see
How many niggas put a gun in your hand
Tell you to take what you can while you runnin' with your man
On my order you shoot, straight countin' the loot
You disguised in my boots, slip and slide in the coupe..
Unorthodox trippin' catch him on missions
Styles twisted daily weak MC's trail me show me how tellin' me
Smoke me instead of jailin' me
You know it ain't no Fatal dog and "J" without felony at the telly they yellin' me
Play me I give you one try
And I'll let you live long enough to let you see your son die
This evilness and wizardry Thug Life specifically it can be
Found as deadly as them bullets that keep missin' me
So what I'm 'posed to do
All you have to do is ride for me

So Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?

It was a nice sunny day I was dippin' through the hood
Seen all my homies and it was all to the good
I'm Kurupt, the half-inch villian cold chillin'
From the floor to the ceilin' and illegal livin' civillians
So much cash is in the bundles
Been there and done done it everything you've done seen and ever wanted
I'm Kurupt, piece me up a piece of the pie
Many try but many die in attempts to ride
Who's the man with ten thousand plans got the grants and my my squad
We world wide homicidal clan
So many strech their arms out to touch my loot but fuck 'em dog
Beware of the owner cuz the owner will shoot
Meet the dog in the worst way and a nigga like me's tight on my worst day
I been rockin fuckin' mics since the first day my eyes opened wide
And finally realized tell me baby would you ride for me

So Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?

Open up my eyes, can't get up I'm feelin' weak
One too many nickies, take a quickie hit them streets
Pass the coke to me no weed, I'm already high
Don't need no Indo, crack the window
Bump the deck and let me ride
Niggas always fuckin' with me cause they don't know
Named me crazy when I was a baby, I'm not that ho
Heard I was a Brood Lord, struck a nerve
I'm swervin' off of Alizé so eat a word
This one in '96 for cruisin' off ?
Hard dick thriller still bitch killer
Fuckin' kibbles and bits
Niggas won't admit, got this industry on lock down
Ego trippin' I got tits
I got my crazed bitches and get my shouts out
Catch you with your pants down
Blow your fuckin' brains out
Steelo kind of sick, you know I be that bitch
And fuck Judge Ido cause he can eat a dick
It didn't have to be like this to see you made me trip
So pull a bullet out your ass fool, ego trip

So Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Tell me baby would you ride for me?
Would you bomb on niggas when they lie to me?
Now don't you ever tell a lie, just confide in me
Would you die for me?, Tell me baby would you ride for me?



There were 2 people with one wish
2 Live a Life filled with LOVE
2 GOD they would pray that 2gether they'd stay
under the stars above
But someone else made a wish
at the same time on the same breath
And although the wish 4 love was granted
So was this evil wish 4 Death
Now I make a wish
sealed with tears and laughter
It is my wish that these 2 loves
R reunited in the hereafter



Souljah



2 me your name alone is poetry
I barely know u and already
I can't explain this feeling I feel
4 APRIL

I want 2 c u from the moment
u leave my side till the moment u return
My nonchalant cold heart finally has eyes only
4 APRIL

So now I risk it all
Just 4 the feeling of joy u bring me
I accept the ridicule
in exchange for the words u share with me
All of this & much more I will do
4 APRIL



Eat a dick up

Still don't nothin' move but the money"]

Strugglin, jugglin, got it to the black man
Eatin the scams like I was motherfuckin Pac Man
Cops step off, you know the flavor
They fear the ruffneck niggas with the lunatic behavior
And now we gotta eat, gotta make ends meet
Stabbin for a fee, it gets hard on the fuckin streets
It's like a madness, fuck making gravy
I rhyme and do crimes, cause either way pays me
A little rough with a hardcore ... theme
Couldn't rough something rougher in your ... dreams
Mad rugged so you know we're gonna ... rip
With that roughneck nigga named 2Pacalypse
Representing YG'z yo
Flip Stretch Homicide and my nigga Gambino
Seek and Po can't forget Money Bags
Stickin up spots and jumpin in Jags
Gotta get ahead and always stay bumblin
And always keep a hand on the gat
Cause a niggas straight strugglin'


I'm used to being poor, but now I'm sick of strugglin
I thought about bumpin, but mother-fuck jugglin
I know it lasts longer, gets my pockets thicker
But I'd rather use my gun cause I get the money quicker, so bust it
Look as I cut the records hard to eject
A quick clip threw my body down uhh! it's another hit
I got energy to blast now you want the task here
Cuz of the light a motherfucker shot that ass up
But rugged and rough is how I'm steppin
Mac is the weapon, and it's always kept in
Eye on the Mac cause the dogg got it goin on
If you come up steppin you'll be lit like a hick
So you better chill, cause I got too much money to get
A street thug in the motherfuckin house, I'm strugglin
Get drunk but I don't think
I'm just in it for the money, don't be a punk snitch
When I yank up my gun, don't run don't bitch
Cause ya know if you do, you'll be layin in a ditch
You'll get your stupid ass blown out the frame
Cause I'm playing to win, and survive in the game
I'm strugglin'


Big up, big up, got him in the frame, bang
Ain't nothin changed set it off I let the brains hang
Guess who's back, to put niggas on they back
Till I call back, niggas running free better fall back
I'm fifty niggas deep beat sleep
With a Mossberg wrapped in my sheets
Three deep in my Jeep chief run with the Young Gunz
Strugglin and strivin, that's how the dough come
Now get gunned by the one with the gun for the low goal
Throw a bolo so low when I flow yo
Much too high to read the signs, I'm blind
Clickin on the nine, out to get mine
I go big up, big up, gotta make the room, boom
Blowin motherfuckers to the moon
Niggas need to feel me a real G, home from the bumblin
See me on the block, strugglin
And rollin with the roughnecks nuff checks cashed
I get in niggas ass, blast
Straight strugglin'




Latino hip hop music was once a small scene of street rappers
And a handful of hardcore followers
The new wave of artists are hitting the musical scene tonight...

When we come through with the takeover, we make the game over
I'm from the state of lowriders and street soldier
We drop like boulders 'cause we hittin' hard
Every single playa hater know just who we are
We the homies from the LayLow I-n-c
Per-petrating motherfuckers gon' remember me
I don't pretend to be, so don't hate on me
Snitchin' to the cops 'cause they want to get rid of me
Ta-ta-talking about you murder me
Homie, I know you heard of me
Creeping through the dark in the Oldsmobile
Drive-by shoot to kill, so watch your step
Big Stalks won't stop, I keep the pussy wet
1-8-7 on the motherfuckin' cops
Yeah, the streets are hard
If we want it, we get it
Homie, it's like that
If you got it, I'll take it
Homie, we ain't fake

Lay Low Inc. t-t takin' over, we takin' over
I see you trying hard, 'cause we do it better
But you better not try to play 'cause the game is over
We took it over

You can't break me, never make me busta soft the beats
This Outlaw style, got a brother off the streets
Miss Delores Tucker sue me, I won't stop
'Til we get justice for these crooked cops, on my block
Time Warner full of sissies
Tell 'em all to miss me
A bunch of hypocrites, whistling Dixie
Good riddance, 'cause you never should've touched me
You cowards knew you couldn't take the pressure, I'ma make you sorry
Trust me
Tryna sell 4 million copies
If I wasn't spitting, it'd be prison or death
This rap game all we got left
So try to comprehend where we coming from
Life as an Outlaw, ain't meant for everyone
So here we come
Recognize how we organize
Strategize now we unified brothers on the rise
And we don't stop

We, t-t takin' over, we takin' over
I see you trying hard, but we do it better
But you better not try to play 'cause the game is over
We took it over

Bigg Di-Dogg, push the big hid-ogg
You're hoppin' and poppin', how 'bout you hop up off my bid-alls
Got, dirt on my pid-aws, I, broke a few lid-aws
It, really don't matter 'cause I'm only here to spit on
And get on and shit on niggas
Do it to 'em D-O-double right on, nigga
I'm saggin' it, baggin' it, slangin' dubs
You motherfuckas think The Wash is all soap and suds?
What's up Cuz?
If you tryin' to get a dub sack, page me
The hoes say "Dee Loc, you so crazy"
Poppin' that shit, don't faze me
I need my chips and the dip, it's like gravy

Now back to the lecture at hand
Perfection is expected and I'm feelin' that demand
Los Ang', broad day gunnin'
That ain't no earthquake, it's just Dre comin'
If this shit ain't played, the party ain't bumpin'
If I don't show up, the hoes ain't fuckin'
Just don't stop at stop signs with bullet holes in it
All-Star League, you ridin' benches
I handles my bidness, fuck fake niggas
I sell game a quarter million a track
Snoop and the Good Doc back with a brand-new sack
Shit's wrong, money gone, I'll blast
Out of town, out of bounds, no pass
Runnin' up, talkin' shit, get smashed
Shoot first, ask questions last

Lay Low Inc. t-t takin' over, we takin' over
I see you trying hard, but we do it better
But you better not try to play 'cause the game is over
We took it over, took it over, we took it over, t-t-took it over



Power.. pow.. power...

Guess who's back? Hahaha, here we go
It's ninety-fo', what's next?

Power.. enter my world

I guess this year gonna be a motherfucker for real niggas
I swear these playa haters done got a taste of power
It ain't all good in the hood
Least not on my side, from where I stand
And the law? Man, fuck the law!
Niggas must outthink, outstep, and continuously outsmart
The motherfuckin' law, in every way
Key word in ninety-four is 'down low'
Gots to be struggling
I see how the rich got theirs
Nigga I'm legit, shit
Where do we go from here?
To my niggas run the streets, fuck peace) --] repeat in background
Heyyy niggas, where your heart at?
See motherfuckers killin' babies, killin' mommas
Killin' kids, puttin' this in they motherfuckin' mark
Now what type of mixed up trick would kill the future of our race
Before he would he look his enemy dead in the eye, and open fire?
These crazy motherfuckers got toys with guns
Jails for guns, but still, no god damn jobs
And they wonder why we loc'n up
Where do we go from here?
Where do we go?
*singers singing variations of 'Where do we go from here'*
All you niggas out there
The clouds shook, the world listened
We stood together in April of ninety-two
With duty, and a sense of honor
There is no limit to what WE can achieve
That's all on us... us...
Not my niggas, not the whites, not the enemies
Or none of them motherfuckers, US
What can WE do? Shit
I declare a death sentence to all child molesters
Fake-ass bitches, male and female
And all you punk-ass snitches
We can do without your asshole
Let no man break, what we set
Where do we go from here?

Rest in peace, to Kato, I miss you
All the other real G's that passed away in ninety-three
In ninety-four, and more
What do we do? For us?



Ay Trusty Trusty
What you want man?
Aw nigga let me get one of them cigarettes
Here!!, Shit!
Come on bastard, get the phone for a nigga
Use the phone
Aw nigga get the phone for me man
What's the number?
323-65-45, tell her it's 'Pac

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

I heard a snicker a laugh, I take a look at the evening news
And see a nigga gettin' cuffed by the boys in blue
Is it a, frame up, tryin' to keep me out the game, stuck
These motherfuckers tryin' to dirty up my name, but
I slip as quick as the wind, it's me or them, fuck friends
My foes be on a mission, tryin' to do me in
Fuck 'em I'm out to get out, they all thought
I blow up like a gauge, and in a rage, blow they balls off
Why are you niggas tryin' to test me trick?
And be the first ones to snitch to arrest me bitch
My Main thang with a nigga meal ticket only if you with the real
The nigga will kick it, I'll enforce it with the steel
Use the lessons that I learned in jail
Now I'm workin' with connects that I got in the pen
In no time I'll be clockin' again

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

Hey, still sittin' in my cell as I dwell on my past
Tryin' to figure how a nigga turned dreams into cash
Quick, call her collect, ain't no respect on the other side
My cellmate's suicidal cause his mother died
And my C.O. is a lady, and I'm thinkin' maybe
Me and her can hook up a scheme, to be Swayze
Cause she keep on callin' me baby, to a young
Motherfucker facin' eighty that's enough to make you crazy
Now how long will it take, to get a hook
Got her watchin' me liftin' weights, sneakin' looks
I devised a plan, I'm in the trunk while she drives the van
Ain't no disguise I'ma die as a man
If we make it then I'm takin' it to Hell
All them niggas that was frontin' while I sat up in a cell
Locked in jail, I couldn't touch her so I planned, in misery
The nigga you don't wanna see

When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me
When I get free, motherfuckers better watch they ass
Soon as I get released, I'ma clock some cash
Did some time locked down, but I'm back on the street
There'll be trouble when they see me

I'll be out this motherfucker in a few days
Punk ass bastards, long as my AK flexes
That's how we do this shit
Fuck that I'm out, C.O. turn the fuckin' lights out!



Take ones adversity
Learn from their misfortune
Learn from their pain
Believe in something
Believe in yourself
Turn adversity into ambition
Now blossom into wealth



With my eyes closed I can c
we have a chance 2 discover ecstasy
but the clouds of doubt have made u blind
but the clouds of doubt have made u blind
so u R afraid of the emotions that u may find
I know that u've been hurt before
but this is no excuse 4 u 2 ignore
the seed that cupid planted, in hopes that we would sow
This infant emotion deserves 2 breathe so why won't u let it grow
A neglected flower will wither and on its own it will surely die
But with honesty, passion, and mutual respect we can Soar Beyond The Sky
So please don't follow what u c follow the rhythm within your heart
Believe in me though u cannot c what lies within the Dark



We made love within a storm
in the midst of passion and chaos
somewhere, somehow our true bond
of friendship was lost

In the eye of the storm
The rain always falls harder
Those who prevail this trauma
will learn 2 bring their love farther

But now the storm has passed
and the seas of our friendship R calm
But as long as I live I will remember
the Love within the storm



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

The day, I met you
I saw strength
And I knew from, that point on
That you were pure, woman
Posessing a spirit that was strong
I want smiles to replace the sorrow
That you've encountered in the past
And since it was strength, that attracted me to you
It will take strength to make it last
My, negative side will attempt to, change you
But please fight that with your aura
It will be your strength, that keep us both standing
While others around us, fall
Black woman, black woman, black woman

Black woman, black woman, ohhhh black woman

I want smiles to replace the sorrow
That you have encountered in the past
And since it was strength, that attracted me to you
It will take strength...
To make it last
Myyyy, negative side will attempt to change you
But please...
Fight that with your aura
It will be your strength, that keep us both standing
While others around us, fall
Keep us standing, while things around us fall
It's your spirit, your strong beautiful spirit
That makes us both stand
Black woman, it is your beauty
It is your pureness, it is you, and all your love
That make us both stand
Black woman, you are pure, woman to me
Black woman, you are pure, love to me
Black woman, you are pure, joy to me



My tears they fall with passion
Like tears conceived from stars
Full of brightness & energy
Seen only from afar
Tonight these tears are
full of pain but also I can feel
relief from my heart
Because the stigma is revealed
unfaithful and unforgiven
I cannot bear 2 let this be
So I must be pure
2 only her for eternity



I pour my heart in2 this poem
and look 4 the meaning of Life
the rich and powerful always prevail
and the less fortunate strive through strife
MISTAKES R MADE 2 be 4given
we R 2 young 2 stress and suffer
The path of purity and positivity
has always ridden rougher
Your insatiable desire 2 find perfection
Has made your faults magnify
curiosity can take Blame
For the evil that makes u cry
It isn't a good feeling when u disobey your Heart
The nightmares haunt your Soul and your nerves R ripped apart




If I could recollect before my hood days
I'd sit, reminisce in bliss on the good days
I stop and stare at the younger
My heart goes to 'em
They tested, it was stressed that they under
We never really went through that
Because we was born B.C. - you and me before crack
And nowadays things changed
Everyone's ashamed to the youth cause the truth look strange
And for me it's reverse
We left them a world that's cursed and it hurts
Cause any day they'll push the button
And y'all condemned like Malcolm X and Bobby Hutton died for nothing
Don't 'em let me get teary
The world looks dreary
But when you wipe your eyes, see it clearly
There is no need for you to fear me
If you take the time to hear me
Maybe you can learn to cheer me
It ain't about black or white cause we're human
I hope we'll see the light before it's ruined
My Ghetto Gospel

It's ok, it's ok, it's ok
Yeah, my Ghetto Gospel
It's ok, it's ok, it's ok

Tell me, do you see that old lady? Ain't it sad?
Livin' out of bags but she's glad for the little things she has
And over there there's a lady, crack got her crazy, well guess she's givin' birth to a baby!
I don't trip to let 'em fade me
From outta the frying pan we jump into another form of slavery
And even now I get discouraged
I wonder if they take it all back will I still keep the courage?
I refuse to be a role model
I make mistakes but learn from everyone
And when it's said and done
I bet this brother will be a better one
If I upset you, don't stress and never forget that God isn't finished with me yet
I feel his hand on my brains when I write rhymes I go blind and let the Lord do his thing
But am I any less holy?
I choose to puff a blunt and drink a beer with my homies
My Ghetto Gospel


I remember grandma's hands used to hold me, mold me, I never forget the things she told me
Brothers' a butt and played the big shot, cause you know
Grannies are the only thing that little Ghetto kids got
Moms work and papa's buried
She dropped me over granny's house
Bless her heart cause she worry
And ghetto grannies are like books, we got so many crooks cause so many grannies gettin' shook
And gettin' dropped in the nursing home
And times is hard and even worst alone
And how could you be so cold
You'll get your turn as soon as you turn old
All they ask of every person
They try to figure out what's on the mind of a brother when he's cursing
9 out of 10 you'll find the problems, time to take a listen and see what you could do to solve them
Cause everybody needs a little help on the way to relying on oneself
So think about it... why 2Pac hit cha, hit cha with a little ghetto gospel
My Ghetto Gospel


I was a stone cold gangsta man
Until you gave me ghetto gospel, I thank you man
Used to roll in the back and do drugs a lot
Now I'm bangin' these tracks, slanging rhymes I got
In this world of greed tryin' to succeed on my beliefs
Now I lay me down to sleep
Lord can you hear me speak?
Can you forgive me for my sins?
If I had it all to do again, I'd still play to win
I hope the Lord can understand me
A man's gotta do what he can for his family
And pay the price of being hellbound
But I rather see hell later than see hell now
And the devil ain't got nothing on the president, cut back and keep us strapped in our residence and be like animals in cages
We can rant and rave about slavery for ages
Or we can start making positive and hit 'em with a little ghetto gospel
My Ghetto Gospel


It's ok, its ok, it's ok
It's ok, it's ok, it's ok
It's ok, it's ok, it's ok
It's ok, it's ok, it's ok



The next heavy weight champion of the world

I won't deny it I'm a straight rider
Ain't no stopping me
So why you suckers keep boxing me?
Wanna see me cuffed up and call the cops on me
On a mission to be champs since they let me free
I won't deny it I'm a straight ridah
Ain't no stopping me
So why you suckers keep boxing me?
Wanna see me cuffed up call the cops on me
On a mission to be champs they let me free

Prepare for combat my adversaries crumble
Face it I got a reputation for damage busters get ready to rumble
They lock me in a cell had me trapped in a livin' hell
Though not guilty I'm still in jail
Brother I serve my time like a soldier
Maintain composure
My shadow boxing I fight to the death bustin' boulders
Every boxer with a pair of gloves
Best give up love
Here's a man from the makings of a thug
A lethal weapon mind sharp
And in my heart there's a wish
To shake the world with the flurry of my black fist
Now once a high school drop out
Now I'm the million dollar champ who's the next to get knocked out
Straight out of Brooklyn I'm world wide y'all all know me
Droppin' all that come before me
No one can hold me
And uh

I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider
Ain't no stoppin' me
So why these suckers keep boxin' me
Wanna see me cuffed up and call the cops on me
On a mission to be champs since they let me free
I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider
Ain't no stoppin' me
So why you suckers keep boxin' me
Wanna see me cuffed up and call the cops on me
On a mission to be champ since they let me free
I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider
Ain't no stoppin' me
So why you suckers keep boxin' me
Wanna see me cuffed up and call the cops on me
On a mission to be champ since they let me free
I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider
I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider
I won't deny it
I'm a straight rider

Next heavy weight champion of the world
Mike Tyson
Go head nigga
Get back to the top of where you supposed to be at!
These suckers don't know how to throw them thangs boy
You a legend
You a legend!
Plus you be boxin' for us homie
You be boxin' for the homies
We ain't got nothin' but love for ya
Stay ridin' homie
Stay ridin'



Excuse me sweet heart, do you like?
Ha ha yeah
Tongue kissin'

Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's I've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'

Listen
I can tell by the pain in your eyes you've been through so much
Feel ya could shiver at, the slightest touch
It's like you scared, I might care
I'll never hurt you or desert you, I'll be right there
Let's come together, if you trust me then I can show you
Don't be shamed, it's the changes that people go through
Don't be scared of me, come close to me please
I can see upset your mine give you what you need
Can I proceed? who do you believe in?
Afraid to leave, but too scared that you need him
Set it free, I can take you to new places
Anticipated it's a parade of new faces
Gettin' hotter now, calm down, get a grip
Slow, baby, ain't no need for rushin' this
I touch your lips and give you kisses that you won't forget
Soft and wet, on your mark, get ready, set

Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's I've been missin'

I wanna take you home, hate to sleep alone
As I whisper in your ear, disappear to a different zone
Promise not to move to fast, I got time
Rather have some conversation, drop lines
Can ya hear me? Tell me if you move, in my groove
Would you do what I ask you to?
See I love to make you moan your erogenous zone
Any a brother in his right mind love to spend some time at home
Though your hurtin' I can feel your pain
Try to understand, we ain't all the same
Let me take you away, can you leave
Some place, to find true peace?
Let me be your lover, a positive figure
Take your mind off the times of fucking with the wrong nigga

Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'

I can't breathe, believe when times are low
It's like agony when I'm at home
Heart beatin' at a fast rate
Makin' moves in the nude
I imagine it's the moves that your ass make
Don't be shy, I can't lie
Pictures of me, inside you, want it so bad I could die
I've been possessed, so obsessed to undress you
No disrespect, but my aim is to sex you
After that live your life as my wife at times
You'll understand how I had to live my life of crimes
Come let me put my hands on your hips and move
What your head do? Bobbin' as we flip the mood
Give me good lovin', time to please
In and out, up and down as we grind and freeze
Put your back in the the motion and caress a figure
Make her ashamed for fucking with the wrong nigga

Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's I've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's I've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' me a good taste
Of the thang's I've been missin'
Tongue kissin' in the strangest positions
Givin' you a good taste
Of the thang's you've been missin'
Tongue kissin'
Uh, tongue kissin'
Tongue kissin'
Tongue kissin'



Throw them thangs

The quicker the nigga can go on
The faster the nigga can get his dough on
Then I can hit my flow and get my ho on
Them niggas don't know what goes on
They tryin' to fuck with all they clothes on
Then act up when all the hoes gone
Stop frontin' motherfucker let them thangs go
I'm quick to kill a nigga any nigga feel me nigga
You can't fade me I'm way to fuckin' real nigga
2Pacalypse Now still down with the Underground
Niggas get clowned when I come around
Boom boom motherfucker and it don't stop
Fuck a cop pass the Glock and it won't stop
Stop frontin' motherfucker let them thangs go
If ya wonderin' the thunder and the trouble
Is comin' from the rebel as I hit ya from the lower level
Hit me once fuckin' D M and two times
Poppin' like two nines hittin' 'em with new rhymes
I can make you love me
Best to chill with the nigga cause ya sure can't punch me
Cause ain't a nigga alive that can stop the hit

Hey, hold on young 'Pac
Motherfuckers ain't ridin' no hookers out here
Punk motherfuckers think the town
Ain't got handle bars on and shit
And ya lie to get slapped behind here
With a motherfuckin' motor, punk sissy

Tell them motherfuckin' square ass niggas
Check this out
Y'all finna come up off those motherfuckin' thangs
Cause I ain't finna be up in sweatin' for nothin'
Ya little punk square nigga

I'm quick to spit the shit get ya open
Straight outta Oakland
Fuck the law get ya jaw broken
Ba ba ba bang bang nigga it's a stick up dee
Turn the kick up I'm ready to rip the shit up G
They got me hype hype hyper, am I hype enough?
Pass the blunt motherfucker let me light shit up
And pump ya fist like this
Cause the cops can't flip on a whole damn clique
So suck dick
What they hittin' 'fo? Double up nigga it's on
The type of nigga that likes to bone with the lights on
Stop frontin' motherfucker let them thangs go
Yes some of you niggas are bitches too
Little square motherfuckers tryin' to get to who?
Pop pop never made it to ya punk ass clique
Talk shit now ya gotta get ya punk ass whipped
I'mma hustle and you punks can't hurt me nigga
Stop frontin' motherfucker let them thangs go
Uh, uh, yeah
Let them thangs go



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

Yo, it's just another day I wake up, it's more rock to break up
We take physical losses and y'all just take a pay cut
Plus, you take a mortgage loan to hold ya home
But our credit is pathetic they just let it be known
So they evict us, got some of my sisters livin' in shelters
It's the system, the difference you teach ya kids to know better
But you can go home, you know ya mom and pop there
Yeah, we can go home but our life is out there
Yeah, bills through the roof I'm makin' payments every week
Get my money off them books cuz ain't nobody hired me
People die in your community, life is a struggle
Kids dyin' every day cuz they be shootin' for the coke
Life through my blood shot eyes can be trouble sometimes
I smoke the pain away but still not high
I sip that Henny, say a prayer, after that then I'm good
Just bless the days for all my people that's raised in the hood
It's our life

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

And I done traveled the world, wish you could see what I see
I been through numerous hoods, they livin' just like we
I've seen the wars, seen the struggle, seen the violence in the street
Seen a hustler get fed up sometimes and pop back at police
Cuz he couldn' stand to see himself in penitentiary
Couldn't see those type of numbers so it's elementary
See the way I see it's gotta be Heaven for a G
Cuz it's hell tryin' to feed ya seed and leave a legacy
See wrong, see right depends on how you see in life
See justice, she's blind she won't let you see the light
Seen people doin' bad I ain't the only one that see
Seems like they wanna see us all in this poverty
See, I'm in the hood they buildin' condos every week
Shit, it hurts to live like this see it's nice across the street
But if you can focus in this life ain't ride
If you can vision what I printed you'll see life through my eyes
Let's go

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

I saw the raids in the hood, saw a dude take a trip with like
Ten of them thangs in my hood
Even saw a young baller slip, he got hit with a clip
And that dude that took that route he got hit with like ten
Saw the inside of a cell, just bums and fiends
Saw the laws of the jails, nigga B's and C's
Got Kings and GD's saw a life took for two G's
Saw the dope kill a fiend and that just brings you more cheese
I saw the block that was worst at its best
Seen a man play with a gun and shoot himself in his chest
I' tryin' to write so you can see what he saw
You know life through hs eyes, that be 2Pac Shakur
And let's go

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on

No fairy tales for this young black male
Some see me stranded in this land of hell, jail, and crack sales
Though life is hard we carry on
Livin' in the projects, broke with no lights on



I ran outside 2 feel the rain
and I stayed outside awhile
When the rain was done along came the sun
and this was Cupid's Smile!



Fuck all these motherfucker's talking all this old bullshit
Like niggas just gonna accept that old trash ass shit
We ain't having none of this old shit
These niggas about to come up straight short
Cause we about to get buck wild on you motherfucker's

Prepare for the wrath, a psychopath when this song play
Get iller than Johnny Gill, then rub you the wrong way
Fuck sensitivity I get cruel when you're doing me
Cause none of the rough stuff bitch stop pursuing me
So true to the game, it's a name you don't dare say
A lyrical lunatic when I kick it you're scared straight
Motherfucker's fall pray to the roster
You step any closer and get hit with a dose of
The iller-fied pimping-ass gang to bang to
And I ain't ashamed to, get wicked with slang too
Niggas know, when I flow, I can give you mo'
Get sicker than psycho, and won't let the Mic, go
'Til I hear the whole crowd on they two feet
As I go through new beats, I'm running through MC's
Nigga please you dizzy, you can't take me
You stumble through break beats but you'll never fade me
Scared straight cause you hate, when I motivate
You suffer a different fate, with music I mutilate
But some of the super suckers try to stop me
I'm gunning and running the stupid motherfuckers now they jock me
What if I should trip? Or chill and a give fair break
Fuck it they feel the wrath of a motherfucker scared straight

You scared motherfucker you scared?
Cause I can hear your heart beating, heavy breathing
I can see the sweat, trickling from your head
You scared motherfucker you scared?
Cause I can hear your heart beating, heavy breathing
I can see the sweat, trickling from your head

Feel the 'Fever In The Funk House' buster you'll get rolled on
No matter how much they bring, I duck and dodge and hold on
Best a watch the swing
Nigga the game is so strong, catch me by surprise
You won't realize your ho's gone
Nigga I'm on the creep
And if I know your address, girls as good as stuck
She eating my Mr. Badness
Pac don't give a fuck, I got too many enemies
Fucking with the ginger juice the booze of fucking Hennessy
The closer they can get
But still don't let them see me sweat, suckers ain't trying to step
They know they'll be breathing they last breath
Niggas ain't got no heart, but swear that they be rocking shit
'Til they get a load of the bold ass 2Pacalypse
Tell them to bring the noise, and look like they wanna rift
Brother this is ain't a game, a crook's what's you're fucking with
Hitting him with the flurry, I'll bury him if he steps to me
Suckers can't get next to me, tripping off some Ecstasy
Literal life insanity, even a form of suicide
This ain't BBD, try doing me you're do or die
Dropping them like a Mack, and smacking them like a weak bitch
Nigga don't even twitch
Cause them I'mma have to pull the switch
Victory to the switch, so fuck 'em if they, try to break
Freaking 'em with the funk left them drunk
Hella scared straight
Hell yeah
Scared straight


This 2Pacalypse in this motherfucker
And I'm scared straight
My motherfucker partners in the house



Hmmhmm
Outlaw Immortalz, biatch
Syke, Big muthafuckin' Syke
A.k.a. Mussolini
Yaki Kadafi up in this biatch
And 2Pac Makaveli
Outlaw Immortalz
You know how we do this shit nigga

Give me my money in stacks, and lace my bitches with dime figures
Real niggas fingers on nickel plated 9 triggers
Must see my enemies defeated, I catch 'em while they coked up and weeded
Open fire, now them niggas bleedin'
Give me my lyrics full of fury, and make every line shine like jewelry
Indicting niggas like the grand jury
Make 'em regret the day they met me, the playa hatin' niggas resent me
'Cause all they tricks is in a rush to sex me
But I've been heavy in this game since '71
The world ain't ready 4 my mom duke celebrity son
But now they ass out, my shits so lethal making jealous niggas pass out
To all my people who love the music on my last album
I must assure you this is better get ya cash out
Outlaw Immortal play the bitch and get your ass tossed
Run up in motherfuckas spots like I'm task force
Niggas is hoppin, but they ain't, jumpin' 'cause they petrified
You can hold my clip, set it up and best believe it will get you high
To all the playas on tha westside
We still be ballin' on these bitches when the rest die
Trying to maintain while these pussy niggas jockin' me
Attempt to copy me, they operatin' sloppily, there ain't no stoppin' me
I'm lost in the zone, suspicious 'cause the war's on
I gotta strategy, non cypher emphatically, my politics is bomb first
Go on cursed, tradin' war stories, seein' who went wrong first
Run with the brothers that love me, the ones that pull for me
Life has so many rewards nigga
Outlaw Immortalz!


Your whole town be shaky
Don't you know the coke got flaky
Heard about me lately
Ain't no jails can straight me

Eh yo my nines up
Got my startin' line up
Nigga just get your rhymes up
It's murderin' time up

Little cap kick back and relax
And ask who wanna fuck her?
Grab my pilla
Come down soon as a muthafucka busha

What the fuck, what you nervous?
The first time you heard us
Thinkin' of murderous verbs, that try to serve us
To all y'all niggas from the block
That Fatal and Fel is on some West coast shit with 'Pac
But you got that shit twisted, like I'm a twist your body
Half sippin' notty, then cock my shotty
These pellets hit, spittin' like cobra venom
Murderous game, I contain, I can off cold and fill him

Fatal and Felony will shine
Like diamonds and nickel nines
Corrupted cripplin' spines
When I creep up from behind
You silly barrel or get trampled nigga what
While these young thugs be leavin' shambles, in muthafuckas guts

Niggas know the cut he must of been peelin', crazy or just dest
To get on or hit up, In his muthafuckin' chest
When I come around creepin', through your itty bitty checks
In his eyes, and peep out the suspect
Outlaw Immortal

Check it, uh listen, come on
Off in this hustle, bustle, niggas be actin' tryin' to dust you
But fuck you, I ain't feelin' to be, laid, sprayed, and dead for days
Body partly decayed, a fuckin' dumpster as my grave
Can't find my body, so my casket had to be left empty
Don't even tempt me, had these niggas halved off in a fuckin' hefty
Still I done change, since I first to came
But now my folks say I'm corrupted
Youngin' and thuggin' and that don't change even as I get older
I just get a little bit colder, stay a soldier while these niggas fold 'em
Throw up on stage never, still ready for whatever
Enjoyin' these sins of pleasure, Outlaw for fuckin' ever
Nigga

Outlaw
No scapegoat, thug savage when my sweepers sweep
So rugged relentless, street royal relic
Crackin' hammers on domes, on bustas and rejects
Victors and violence, violations so vigorous
I know you real thugs feel this
An Ingle-Watts ledger, they ain't a legacy lost
You screamin' nation in my hood, got a Glock in my draws
This differ me from incarceration, in-fested with impurities
And at it with times, with police and activities
Cowards constantly cross a killers course
Corrupt to the core, confounded, no remorse
My territories in turmoil, my source full of terrorism
The terrain is insane, so for all my criticism
Engaged in the illest episode of evolution
Locked in a criminal institution
I'm a Outlaw Immortal



Sometimes when I'm alone
I cry because I'm on my own
All the tears I cry are bitter and warm
They flow with life, and take no form
Ah the world moves fast
And it would rather pass you on by
Than to stop and see what makes you cry
It's painful, so sad, sometimes I cry

But no one really cares..
To ask why, why, why

Well I cry because my heart is torn
I find it hard to carry on
And if I had an ear to confide in
I would cry amongst my treasured friends
A-but who do you know that stops that long
To help another carry on
Ah the world moves fast
And it would rather pass you on by
Than to stop and see what makes you cry
It's painful, so sad, sometimes I cry

And no one really cares..
To ask why, why, why

{*guitar playing until the end*}



Every word
cuts 2 the heart
conversations R ended
be4 they start
is this what u want?
is this what I want?
is this what
must be?

This is not a game
This is a love
one should be played
The other cherished
I feel 2 hearts breaking...

is this what u want?
is this what I want?
is this what must be?



'Cuz I'm a soldier
I just release 'em on a war path, not your average dealer
I'm a soldier
Westside Outlaw, Bad Boy killer

Started off with, runnin from copses duck and hide from helicopters
We open fire, who can stop us
Livin the life of trife juveniles, hopin for righteous
Gettin twenty-five to life, if the judge don't like us
In my clearest pictures, I see authorities itchin to get us
ATF state feds scandalous bitches
I wasn't promised to it, wasn't bitter or sweet
See if a, nigga don't hustle then the nigga don't eat
Only streets livin do or die circle complete
Repetitive motions and felons in the rush for cheese
Please understand my history a man of many acts
Livin Thug Life, comin equipped, with many gats
Maybe I was just a Lost Soul, trapped in time
Livin in between life, and the cracks were blind
Even though we had hope for dreams that never came
Yet and still we all feel pain


My brother Sean, first on my list, he stuck with
A three-five when he get out would I be dead or alive
He taught me the rules so much, but still In Thugs I Trust
When in danger never hesitate to keep my fuckin trap shut
My Mom Dukes got a little bit of Thug in her
The Devil loves sinners crackheads and drug dealer
Sometimes I feel like the streets are takin over
Never stayin sober, the brain over and over backtrack
My stack's fat, I used to take new


I was born twenty-two years ago, yesterday
But see I saw no reason for me to celebrate, let me demonstrate
Entered the world from out a poisonous womb
Heroin bein consumed already predicitin my doom, soon
To be one of the many misguided
Always the first one on the block to be done tried it and liked it
Lost before I had a chance to find my way
Now I travel through life, not knowin the time of day

Thug niggas screamin Westside, bustin double Glocks...
You gotta be soldiers alright!
Soldiers!










Perhaps I was addicted to the dark side
Somewhere inside my childhood witnessed my heart die
And even though we both came from the same places
The money and the fame made us all change places
How could it be? Through the misery that came to pass
The hard times make a true friend afraid to ask for currency
But you could run to me when you need and I'll never leave
Honestly, someone to believe in, as you can see
It's a small thang to a true, what could I do?
Real homies help you get through
And come to knew he'd do the same thang if he could
Cause in the hood true homies make you feel good
And half the times we be actin' up call the cops
Bringin' a cease to the peace that was on my block
It never stops, when my mama ask me 'will I change?'
I tell her yea, but it's clear I'll always be the same
Until the end of time

So take, these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly, 'til the end of time
Take, these broken wings...

Please Lord forgive me for my life of sin
My hard stare seem to scare all my sister's kids
So you know, I don't hang around the house much
This all night money makin' got me outta touch, shit
Ain't flashed a smile in a long while
An unexpected birth worst of the ghetto childs
My attitude got me walkin' solo, ride out alone in my lo-lo
Watchin' the whole world move in slow-mo
For quiet times, disappear, listen to the ocean
Smokin' 'Ports, think my thoughts, then it's back to coastin'
Who can I trust in this cold world?
My phony homie had a baby by my old girl
But I ain't trippin' I'm a player I ain't sweatin' him
I sexed his sister, had her mumble like a Mexican
His next of kin, no remorse it was meant to happen
Besides rappin' the only thing I did good was scrappin'
Until the end of time

Take, these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly, 'til the end of time
Take, these broken wings...

Take, these broken wings
You got to learn to fly, learn to live so free
So we can fly away, 'til the end of time
Take, these broken wings...

Now who's to say if I was right or wrong?
To live my life as an Outlaw all along
Remain strong in this planet full of player haters
They conversate but Death Row full of demonstrators
And in the end drinkin' Hennessy made all my enemies envy me
So cold when I flow eliminatin' easily
Falls to they knees, they plead for they right to breathe
When I conceive closer to achieve
In times of danger don't freeze, time to be a G
Follow my lead I'll supply everything you need
An ounce of game and the trainin' to make a G
Remember me, as an outcast Outlaw
Another album out, that's what I'm about, more
Gettin' raw 'til the day I see my casket
Buried as a G while the whole world remembers me
Until the end of time

Take, these broken wings
I need your hands to come and heal me once again
So I can fly, 'til the end of time

Take, these broken wings
You got to learn to fly, learn to live so free
So we can fly away, 'til the end of time
'til the end of..

I don't know what it is that got me actin' all crazy out here
Guess it's just my environment, how you people be treatin'
Shit, I'll be back in a while?
Ain't no mystery, you get what you give, feel me?
When it comes I'll be like, I can't tell you what?
Maybe it's the thug in me



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Whattup 'Pac?
This for my dog, 2Pac Shakur, 2Pac Shakur
Yeah

Today is filled with anger
Which no one wants to face, which no one wants to face
A chance to build anew
A chance to build anew
Today is filled with rage, violence fills the air
Children bred with foolishness, cause no one cares
Today I lay my head down, but the pressure never stops
Gnawin at my sanity, content when I am dropped
But tomorrow, I see change...


But tomorrow, I see change
A chance to build anew
Built on spirit, content of heart
And ideals based on truth
And tomorrow's the same way
I'm strong, because of my pride
To know I fought with all my heart
To keep my dreams alive

Tomorrow...
And tomorrow {*to fade*}



Today I wake & feel even lonelier
But I c positive potential
My heart shook much like the Quake
Then the pain was gone
The arctic breeze formed the fortress
Barricading my fragile Heart from PAIN

It is not that I don't love u
and it was because I did love u
that I must move on
as long as I breathe
I will remember
"WE AS 2"



When I was alone, and had nothing
I asked for a friend to help me bear the pain
No one came, except God
When I needed a breath to rise, from my sleep
No one could help me.. except God
When all I saw was sadness, and I needed answers
No one heard me, except God
So when I'm asked.. who I give my unconditional love to?
I look for no other name, except God



Two niggas about to have a fight, look, look, check it out
Throw yo mothafuckin' hands up nigga, throw yo hands up
That's right, we gone take it back
These mothafuckas goin' to start catchin' lefts and rights and uppercuts
I don't give a fuck
Put your guns down, lets have fun now
Throw your hands Up, that's right nigga
We goin' ol' school on these suckas

How many suckas wanna see me
Jealous, cause they peepin' me on TV
Mad, cause they bitches wanna G me
Now take it easy, it ain't my fault to see a hooker
You should've shook her, don't playahate me when I took her
Life of a crook, look at them thug niggas ballin' y'all
I gotcha hoochies full of liquor fuckin' all of y'all
And my, name!!, will be synonymous with spittin' game
Slangin' 'caine, it ain't the same, niggas better change
Them 3 strikes will have ya stretched fo' life
Get arrested twice The third time fo' life
And I, don't think you understand me G
That Penitentiary time just ain't the plan for me
I got a, new thang; getcha papers and do thangs
Niggas ain't followin' ya true game
Cause if they was, they wouldn't be runnin' for they trunk
Every time that it's time for funk
Mothafucka throw yo hands up

Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands up
Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on

Could it be, that controversy was my destiny
I let my anger get the best of me
Everywhere we hang its the same thang
In '95 you can die if ya gang bang
You could survive, gettin' high like a true G
Can't close my eyes cause these cowards wanna do me
And sue me I've been hustlin' since day one
Out on the block and never stop until my pay come
But now a days Its like bang, bang, duck quick
I guess you rookies tough shit, cause you bust clips
But suck dick, cause a kid got his cap pealed
The rap deal from the phonies who pack steel
And act ill, Everybody wanna act hard
I swear to god It's the season to pull a nigga card
You fuckin' frauds can't handle business like a soldier
I bet you too petrified to throw it from the shoulders
Nigga, now throw your hands up

Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands up
Leave the guns and the knives at home
Just throw ya hands up
Get 'em up

Last year motherfuckers tried to bury me deep
I had beef in every city, screamin' fuck the police
Couldn't sleep, I'm havin' thoughts about the baddest bitches
Picture me mobbin' in a rag with switches, punk snitch
I let a trick be a trick when he slippin', leave 'em sleepin'
In the middle of the streets while I'm pimpin'
You can throw a sign but I'm blind to that punk shit
Runnin' with some real motherfuckers and we run shit
Fuck the dumb shit, I ain't stoppin' it's a high speed
Rollin' on the 405 puffin' thai weed
I'm shiftin' gears, then I disappear
Listen here, If they take me alive I'm doin' years
But still no fear cause I don't think they can catch me
This 350 will put the bitches right in back of me
They won't jack me and just when I thought I passed
I fucked around and went low on gas
All I heard was "Throw Yo Hands Up"

Throw ya hands up
Leave ya guns and ya knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands up
Throw ya hands up
Get 'em up
Throw ya hands up

All y'all niggas out there thinkin' y'all really like you know
Tearin' shit up
But ya really ain't bro
You only sendin' the police to the blocks faster
Soon them niggas gone be comin' wit' army tanks and shit
Just mowin' niggas down
Plus half you mothafuckas can't shoot no one
Put the mothafuckin' guns down
Nigga lets take it from the shoulders
If you a real mothafuckin' soldier

Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands
Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands
Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands
Leave the guns and the knives at home
Don't be a punk ass nigga when the time is on
Throw ya hands

Oh, we don't need no gat
We don't have to go out like that
Just throw ya mothafuckin' hands in the air
We don't need no gat
We don't have to go out like that
Just throw ya mothafuckin' hands in the air
Come on!!
Throw ya hands in the air
Wave 'em like you just don't care
Oooooh yea..
And ain't no thang about to pump
Just throw ya hands in the air



Tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Now what's next
Tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Now what's next

Caught up in the middle
My life's a riddle
Don't let it get ya
I wanna be legal
But it's this hustle that get me richer
One love to my peoples makin' money
I can see you bubblin'
Avoid all trouble
Beware of devils continue strugglin'
Nothin's impossible if there's a will there's a way
So get your mind on official business
You can be great
And it's been this way from the cradle to the grave
So get paid
My niggas do this every fuckin' day
We parlay
Through politics and conversation
This information to my thug niggas in the congregation
Watch and bare witness to the pleasures of participation
Separation is self destruction
What's needed is unification
Cause the world ain't hardly scared
If not prepared
Be sure to be bummy and be no longer there
But no one cares it's there to share
All we get is stares
Because of fear we'll evaporate
Say your prayers
And what's next

Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next
Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next

Makaveli tried to warn us
But niggas ain't listen to Pac
Then you won't get it
Might as well measure 'em up
And have his ass fitted
Caught slippin' dog trippin' didn't soak game
Got his wig split like dem shutters on the airplane
Never will change niggas wit' no name no shame
Might open ya head foe mess broke change
Bounce wit me Cali body rock down in H-Town
We gon' put these artificial bustas in they place now
Time foe a change
Real niggas rollin' wit' me
Money makin' swift decision we controllin' the streets
Side track by the broads and the frauds
Ain't it strange
It's the reason so many niggas get scarred in the game
What's next

Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next
Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next

That money gotta make it
What I gotta do to make it
Do I really gotta take it
Put this mack up to you, face it
Doin' what we gotta do to survive
Just ask Kweli doin' what we do to get by
Some niggas stick to the crime
Pitchin' nickel and dimes
What the fuck we s'pose to do
Who gon' give us a job
So I tried and tried
Tried to get out the grind
But the block kept on callin' me back
Fiends kept on callin' for crack
So I supply 'em wit' that
Gave 'em a reasonable fee
Nigga don't blame it on me
Shit just look where I'm at
Niggas in gardens
LAPD is the target
Niggas is heartless hustle regardless
Look that dope spot use to be an apartment
But now it's just a place to hide the guns in the closet
Watch ya step shift the grams under the carpet
We just tryin' hard not to see that coffin
What's next

Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next
Hard livin' got me goin' insane
But I'm addicted to the hustle I'm trapped in the game
Whatz next
I'm goin' crazy
Tell me tell me what the fuck am I suppose to do
Whatz next



Born in the days of a Criminal
Born in the days of a Criminal

Born in the the days of a criminal
Runnin' from the cops and can't let 'em see me
So I'm hopin' out the Benz
It's time to let the vallet step
Gotta make my ends, so business on the undertip
All coppers will get dropped, so tell them not to fuck with me
If Oakland gets too hot, I'm headed for Marin City
Though hunted like a fugitive, those punks will never capture me
TEC-9 on my side, oh stay in back of me
I'm black from head to toe, I move and there's a silence
The smoothest criminal, a lunatic for violence
So I be taken no shorts, when the shit get scandalous
Rippin' of this vest see, so nigga we can handle this
Run up and get smacked up, packed up and smacked down
I'm a playa, there's more in the J town
Bitches wanna jock, and run they hands all in my hair
Ho give up the cock, or you can get up outta here
I'm livin' like a mack, the narcist will be minimal
Niggas gettin' jacked with they cap peeled back
In the days, of a criminal

Born in the days of a Criminal, Born in the days of a Criminal

I'm kickin' kilos but I start of with a quarter ounce
Servin' with weight cause, every little dollar counts
Makin' my grits and tryin' to get my mail on
So fuck a cop he get dropped if he steps wrong
I'm the bad guy, everybody points at me
But fuck 'em, all, as long as the tweakers happy
Makin' my cash flow, but how long will it last though
Pimpin' ain't easy but I still leavin' your ass broke
Pass the vapors as the papers will be comin' in
I give the cuts and give a fuck about being a friend
Bitch I'm a playa got no time to be bothered with
Havin' no babies in no long term relationships
Because a bitch will be a bitch no matter what you say
That's why I fuck 'em, bust a nut, and I'm on my way
Soon as I finish I'll be glad I even fucked a whore
Cause she'll be blowin' up my beeper before I shut the door
But fuck a bitch I keep my mind on my drink cause yo
That's how I'm livin' in the days, of a criminal

It's the menace of Marin
It's the menace of Marin
It's the menace of Marin

It's the menace of Marin, I kill, I kill again
Ain't nothing funny about the game the game I'm rollin' in
You got a problem with it, Mr. handle yours
I ain't no joke, I'll have you broke down to your draws
I'm trigga happy and I give less than a fuck
Love me or hate me I'mma show nough rip shit up
It's Mr. nothin', nice on the mic stand
Mic in the left and the zest in my right hand
I took a puff had enough now, hold up
If that was endo, niggas gettin' rolled up
You think not, get dropped we can handle this
Cause 2Pac brain locked on the cannabis
Days are dangerous, shoot 'em but you can't miss
I never trip off your bitch cause she scandalous
Now come and get a good look at the crook, who
Lives his life in the streets of the jungle
Some call me animal, tell me how you figure though
Put 'em in the nimp, in the days of a criminal




"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"

Nobody thought I'd make it, the world called me loser
Just a high school dropout, young drug abuser
Mama told me there'd be days like this, I never listened
Spent my childhood years in my neighborhood prison
The world don't give a fuck about the kids
I can see from the poverty and the evil shit they did
To my young nation
Participation, more hesitation could turn lethal
When ain't no love for a young nigga he turns evil
And burn people with no hope, there's no peace
To all my niggas start regulatin' on your streets
Bustin' the neighborhood scatters, another drug war
There ain't no truce or negotiatin' with thug lords
Tried conversatin' but he won't listen
He said the world is a livin' hell for God's children
Picture him still in a Pen', doin' life plus two
While I'm starin' at the world through my rearview

"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "

It's clearer now, 'cause I'm a noted individual
Plus I'm a Don, not just a small time criminal
Time's have changed, homies died, only lives remain
Massive amounts of narcotics help me hide the pain
Wishin' on Benz, came up on a Jag
Then got it out for the quiet times, reflect on the past
All my homeboys that didn't make it, for you I'll do it
'member back in the days as young truants
HUH! tellin' me to beware
Because you cared and helped me to be prepared
Cemetery full of homies no longer here
But what about the babies, lost in watchin' burglars
Too dumb to be a dealer, too young to be a murderer
I'm beggin' you God, don't make their lives too hard
They're already scarred, too doped up to see the stars
We're livin' to die, everybody is high, plus I'm high too
Starin' at the world through my rearview HUH!

"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"

Pictures are plenty, handlin' semi, sippin' Henny
I hustle for pennies, know my own feared by many
I watched and took notes as a child I strategized
Witnessin' crack dealings and drug killings have scattered lives
Niggas don't know me but they think
That we could be closer than homies
Nigga you're phoney so quit buyin' drinks
Mind on my money, you're funny, you're about my currency
Niggas don't wanna see me
Shootin', but they ain't worry me, livin' to tell
Prison is hell for a nigga, they're usin' my bail
Built bigger jails for a nigga
Father I'm feelin' tired, forgive me, 'cause I'm a sinner
Livin' life as a thug, while duckin' cops and the criminals
Homies is dead and buried, past time has gone
Don't ask why drink liquor 'cause my mind is gone
And if I die, then let me watch what we been through
Starin' at the world through my rearview HUH!

"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​They caught me starin' at the world through my rearview​​​
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "​
"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "​
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"

Starin' at the world through my motherfucking rearview
Peep what a nigga trying to say; recognize that a nigga done did it all
And seen it all and got shit to say to the motherfuckers
That ain't seen shit and did shit yet
Peep game, look you little young motherfuckers
Stop running your heads up against brick walls
These old niggas got something for you nigga you better listen
Gotta get your over the dump
You know, you got to get over the humps ha ha
Staring at the world through my motherfucking rearview
That's right baby, Thug life, West Side
Death Row, Outlawz, you what time it is
Staring at the world through my rearview HUH!
They got me staring at the world through my rearview
Alright

"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"Somebody in the house say YEAH!"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "
​​​"Tick tock ya don't stop"
"I grabbed the mic and try to say, 'yes, y'all' "​



You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me

Truly, you're a cutie
You know I ain't tryin' to act a fool
And be rude, they call me Kastro
And you; Oh! Storm sound like a cutie too
What's poppin'? with me and you
Just hit me with the seven
It'll be my pleasure to see what we can do
Oh! you ain't alone, got a man at home, answerin' the phone
But he ain't the one, cause if he is, than why you gone?
What you drinkin' on? - Hennessy with me
A glass of Thug Passion or just a plain Pepsi
Oh! you're cool? - sure that I assume
You ain't too much of a drinker today
You was alright, I think I want you right away
See, I'm only eighteen, these groupies they just want to sue me
Push my whoopty, act like they don't spend my dooky
And I could see it'd be
Twenty-two or so, older soldier on my team
I put you in my video, and give you plenty of dough
By my hotel room, Four fifty four, hope that you go
Baby, can you fade me?

You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me

See girl, I'm laced with game but it ain't similar
The shit that I'm talkin' get more deeper
Than callin' and comin' to visit ya, it's hard to feel ya
But I been playin' since I been born
And I moved up in a age strolled the page, turned it, now it's on
Can't ignore, the way you hit the club and play the floor
Hittin' up every position and that's for sure
But I think it's more, than situation that I'm facin'
Your Shorty was hesitation so I'ma replace her
Plus to get specific; it ain't no hoochie that's unlisted
That the homies that I roll with ain't twisted
And that what makes me diss it
I ran through cousins, through aunties on down to triplets
For droppin' the highest level of game and got no digits
Now can you dig it? - but you ain't in no composition
Cause most conversations you be kickin' you sure to get it
Now, baby can you fade me?

You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me

Oh! Mo, you're a little player Napoleon but uhh
I'ma show you how the big dogs do it nigga
This is how you get her up
You don't know how to rule no bitch nigga
Look how you stutter and shit nigga, watch out
Get to the side, which one?
Pick all out, pick out nigga, which one?
That one? - peep this shit

Hold up baby, would you get off, thinkin' you can fade me?
Evadin' my niggas like radius and then attempt to play me
Oh! yeah, you're crazy thinkin', you can just be Swazy
Cause my conversation; gettin' you hot enough for love makin'
Participation is needed, yeah, I'm drunk and gettin' weeded
In the back of my Jaguar, the life of a rap star
Completely freaki-able
I get weak, when I sit and think of shit that we can do
Let me introduce Mr. Makaveli is who you're speakin' to
Who, Black, Mexican, Puerto Rican too
Long as it's ghetto you can bet I'm gettin' deep in you
Believe it boo, I got my eyes concentrated on the size of your thighs
Though I ain't tradin' baby, but won't you let me ride?
Cause a nigga want the booty cat
This Thug Passion so your man can't have it back
And that's a fact, so, how you want to act?
Baby, can you feel me? - like Run D.M.C. 'It's Like That'
Tell me, can you fade me?

You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me, you can't fade me
You can't fade me

That's how you mack to a bitch you little young niggas
Come on baby, we finna go to my little hotel and shit
Ha ha, to see if you can fade me, feel me?
Hey, don't trip of the 'B' word
That's just how motherfuckers talk on my block
Ha ha, What's up though boo? where you want to go?
No we can go get a little drama and shit
Don P., Crystal, Fat ass steak, some lobster and shit
Go back to the telly
Bump some of that Dramacydal Outlaw Immortal shit
That's the type of shit that gets me in the mood
Ha ha, Come and tell you now and uhh
After a few glasses of this Thug Passion baby
Huh, it's goin' be like Adam and Eve, feel me?
Everything stops, Puff puff, and you don't stop
So tell me baby boo, can you fade us?
Hey one love to that nigga D'Angelo
Nigga, this beat's bad than a motherfucker
You know, ain't no disrespect big player
But a motherfucker loves this beat so much
Huh, we have this bitch too, So uhh
We're sendin' this one out to you
OUTLAW!! WEST SIDE!! DEATH ROW!! THUG LIFE!!
OUTLAW!! WEST SIDE!! DEATH ROW!! THUG LIFE!!
OUTLAW!! WEST SIDE!! DEATH ROW!! THUG LIFE!!
Baby, can you fade me?
WEST SIDE!! THUG LIFE!! WEST SIDE!! THUG LIFE!!
WEST SIDE!! THUG LIFE!! WEST SIDE!! THUG LIFE!!
WEST SIDE!! THUG LIFE!! OUTLAW!!



I think of u in my arms
And what it would be like 2 Make Love
I think of u raising my SEED
And what they'd be made of
I think of how alone I was
Before u came 2 be
I think of the joy I felt
when u said u thought of me
I'm proud to be the heart u
choose 2 make a friend
Hours pass by and Cupid cries
until we meet again



This goes out to all the young killers on the frontline
We ain't forgot about you, homie

Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone
Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone
Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone

I done been locked and jocked for the shit I've been claimin'
All that killin' and the drug dealin', shit them niggas gamin'
I dumped for real, Hoop Town gettin' ill
Force me to chill cause they got shot and squeal
Punk ass niggas know the half on the ave
Through your town, and Downtown, Nork, I mash

We call it thuggin', I ain't never go all of a sudden
L like I ain't wantin' nothing then I just be frontin', buggin'
All my homies and my family, I put that on mother vein
Play by the summers it's goin' to be insanity
It ain't easy, to hold it in
When everybody around me is gettin' rich
Wonderin' where I been

Burned out and broke
Got me dead runnin' for two packs of boges
My whole life I've been choked
Since we graduated bet you thought your boy hadn't made it
But it seem the dream that I was chasin'
Damn here is the thing that left me faded
Can't complain, shit, at least I'm still livin'
Although trippin' of all the fun that I was missin'
While I was boy is in prison.. that's where I been

The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are

I reminisce on dangerous summers
We're just a thug nigga workin' for drug dealers of neighborhoods
Run up by the age of 13
We was gunnin' and it was fun to see the police runnin'
Niggas disappear when we comin'
Little, nappy head shorty head addicted to drinkin' 40's
My niggas is naughty and y'all niggas is fuckin' corny
But you left me in the summer of '89, a very good year
Crack cocaine sales rose in every hood here
'Til you got knocked
Then locked down, bag of rocks & fat knot
You shot down, what they tell me is you livin' well
Stuck in your cell
Don't get another slip, ticket, drinkin' liquor in jail
Just as well, hell nigga, I bail, whenever needed
There's weed inside of the cereal box so don't eat it
Where you been nigga? My homies wanna know

A lot of things have changed since you've been gone
Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone

The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are

Hey.., to them niggas in jail cell
To my homies in the livin' hell
To the niggas haven't stayed down
To all the bustas that are comin' around
To all the love ones that's gone
To my niggas better stay strong
To all the hogs that's puttin' in work
To all young riders doin' dirt haha

Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone
Damn, you been away from the hood too long
A lot of things have changed since you've been gone

The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are
The homies wanna know where you are

To all the young adolescent gettin' high stressin'
Can't act dumb don't ask questions
To all the other motherfuckers who runnin' blocks with they Glocks
And runnin' from the cops and blowin' up the very spot
To the hooriders that's on the streets
Lookin' for the police you out there creep
The real gang bangers slangin' thangs from the curb
My nigga love to earn gettin' ill...



You can be touched
You can be touched
You can be touched

Oh God, forgive me, mother, please say a prayer for me
Needed a father, but he was never there for me
Believin' everything they feed me, I'm seein' demons
I wake up screamin', who'd believe me or was I dreamin'?
Five fingers on the 45 chrome
Dead aim at my brain, infrared with no lights on
I ain't afraid to die, want to see what's after this
I'm livin' blind writin' rhymes 'til they capture this
If I die let the world understand why
Soldier my eyes, hate to see a black man cry
They picture me inside a casket that's how they see us
Oh God, forgive us ghetto bastards, we human beings
Seein' us inside this hell-hole
Just waitin' to fail, so they tell us that's what jail is for
Adolescent young dream's turned violent
Explodin' in a world turned silent
'Cause you could be touched

My young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile still livin' a child life
Thinkin' he can make his pay
Too in a rush, niggas better slow down
'Cause you can be touched
Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile livin' a child life
Thinkin' he can make his pay
Too in a rush, niggas better slow down
'Cause you can be touched

Imagine us up in this game, you's a veteran
Bouncin' up in yo' plush spot watchin' David Letterman
Chillin', clearly made it and it's clearly stated
By that 30 yard pool the 5 car's the women and the jewels
Richness, oozes out yo' paw's
But only you and God knows the evil you did to get yours
Crossed ever nigga that ever trusted you
Just a scared nigga afraid one day they might bust at you
Look at you done came so far but did to much
And got to a point in the game where ya ass is stuck
Touched you because the Don gave the word too
He was gonna ran unprepared and got laced on and got murdered

Now I was born in the city that never sleeps
Schooled by the realest of the real niggas that ever breathed
Initiated as an Outlaw back in '94
Snuck in the jaw and ever since I wanted more
Older niggas givin' me the game
Nobody's has touch me on everybody's game
I put my cards on the table
And look through them carefully patiently
While everybody's racin', stay aware 'cause everyday there's another nigga dead
And this should tell you somethin'
I know that I could be got but should they shoot me I'm shot
Touched me, trust me my nuts mean a lot
You can be touched

My young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile still livin' a child life
Thinkin' he can make his pay
Too in a rush, niggas better slow down
'Cause you can be touched
Young niggas in the wild life
Criminal mind of a juvenile still livin' a child life
Thinkin' he can make his pay
Too in a rush, niggas better slow down
'Cause you can be touched

How you gonna live a life when you can't see in front of you?
I know and still know shorty hard, I'm one of you
Thinkin' that it just can't happen this quick
'Cause you run in the town and put that shit on a brick
Now don't nobody know you but the cops and robbers
Leavin' school with problem's, tryna blame it on our father
But his place that you livin' in shit
Straight knowin' that's the place you gonna die
Probably why you ain't givin' a shit

While addicted
Livin' my life lost and wicked
Nigga forget it
'Cause all that clownin' won't prevent this gat from blowin'
Me and my Outlawz we roam
Should have thought before you crossed now my big homies knowin'
And that's the wrongest of wrong
With the strength of the strong
Fuck around with Napo' should have moved out ya' home
'Cause nigga I'm knowin'
Who you fuckin' where you goin'
And the way you make your money now your weakness is showin'
Brother drowned in this world give a damn who she loved
That her father won't be here long enough to see how ya' grown
He got touched

God made the world in seven days
How in the hell can niggas be so amazin'
Situations that muthafuckas have to face
You can be touched
You can be touched



Te quiero
Te quiero cojer, te quiero cojer
I'll let your ass have it, te quiero cojer
Te quiero cojer, oh real?
Te quiero cojer

Now you've been actin' like you want it for a long time
All up in a nigga face, givin' me them strong vibes
Look in my eyes and you'll find peace
A Gemini, so you really blow my mind freak
Come on, I got my clothes off, hard as a nigga in jail
Skinny niggas throw the dick well
Everybody get their condoms, brother cause it's time to fuck
Hurry up and put it on nigga, time is up
What's next?, got my mind on some group sex
Where you goin', baby?, I ain't even through yet
Do it like a true vet, love it how I threw it to ya
Even now make it good to ya, remember me?
I love fuckin' slow with the lights low
Black, Puerto Rican, even White hoes
Bellisimo, que linda, dame un beso, come to Papi
Fuck until the shit is sloppy
If you really want it

If you really want it
Get'cha ass up; you know it, if you really want it
If you really want it
If you really want it, if you really want it
I'm really want it..
Let her have it

Alright all my real niggas and my real bitches
Let me see you do it like this, c'mon

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body

Do you, you remember the time
When you absolutely, said never let it inside
Feel it's my duty, from Gemini, to Gemini
See I would love to go and take a ride
Have total leeway up and down your freeway, nothing to hide
If I was committed to suicide
I'd fuck around meet you now put it down, I'd testify
Ain't nobody here to understand the reason why
It's you and I, so everything is rectified
I know you tried, you even made a nigga cry
But love is blind, now can you stand the test of time?
Redefine, what it means to be an open mind
Feel the climax..
I bust a round for you, painted the perfect picture
I'm down for you, can't wait to get wit'cha

Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body

Damn
If you really want it
You like that? Yeah
If you really want it

Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body

Don't hold back.. I wanna do that
Yeah, yeah, I feel you

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body

See, it all started simple, turned into me lickin' yo' nipples
Fuckin' you doggie style to this instrumental
Hands up, all up inside ya
Hell I can stand ya
Eyes open I don't plan, to bust
Just hold on baby let me zone in
What do you mean?, can you scream let it go biotch
How does it feel?, got a nigga like steel in ya
To keep goin' now I'm fuckin' like I'm killin' ya
Let's go another round baby is you down really
Two shots of ecstasy Lick a nigga down silly
Your body next to me
I could touch you inside, and you'll cry
So good when a nigga leave, you'll die
My mama told me baby be a man put it on her
Hittin' bitches like, switches comin' around the corner
I wanna let me get my ride on
It's yo' dick baby but it's my song
If you really want it

Gots to send this one out to the freaky bitches
Definitely all the Scorpios, and the Geminis, and the Virgos
You know I know the truth about you Scorpios and you Virgos
No doubt gotta give it to the Capricorns
They some freaks too on the down down
The Libras, they like it even but they still like fuckin'
No doubt, Aquariuses, Libras, I said those
They always wanna run shit in bed
I'm a zodiac fucker I'll do you all one at a time
And all day long, let's get busy

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body..



This one is all about love!
Red Rat will always love you, always!
Cho!

Me no have nothing if me no have you
Me pray the day that you say you want me too
I would do anything for make you my baby boo
Remember that I still love you!

Me no have nothing if me no have you
Me pray the day that you say you want me too
I want you be my baby boo
And this one is just for you, just for you!

I would drop all my girls for you
Walk barefoot 'round the world for you
Fly around like the birds for you
Thats why I wrote these words for you..

I don't have everything...

Of course, YEAH!

Me no think you know
How you make me glow
Give me a chance fi show, and I'll show
Can we stick to the red cross?
YO!..

I would drop all my girls for you
Walk barefoot 'round the world for you
Fly around like the birds for you
Thats why I wrote these words for you..

I wish you know how much I cared
Even if you change your mind
And said our love was through

Yo bena or not molest me of you
Prepare to die or say you want me too
I would do anything to make you my baby boo
If it don't work - I still love you


It's for our love, no matter what



In the midst of passion 2 figures stand
emerged in ecstasy joined hand and hand
words R unnecessary feelings R heart
the body takes control deaf 2 words
It is at this stage that I think of u
in gratitude 4 this joy u have exposed me 2
Each Day is Bright with you as the Dawn
with the collapse of each night a strong bond is born
In the midst of passion I remember your kiss
I reminisce about your touch and suddenly miss
the scent u wear and the tone of your voice
Only u can be my choice
In the midst of passion
I c u & me
Lost in constant ecstasy!!



As soon as I leave the house you wanna page me
See you got me trapped I'm going crazy this is slavery
You act like it's outrageous give me space it won't get better
And maybe we will argue and be through with all these sorry letters
Soon as I come home it's like I get the third degree
Where ya been and who you with I get no room to breathe
It makes me wanna leave
I'm sick of these tricks up your sleeve
Your suspicious I deceive give me grief without belief but to me
If you really trust me then it's pitiful
Question me about my whereabouts that's so trivial
Let me live my life and you can live yours
Just be there to help me and support that's what your here for
Not to give me stress and add to pressure
Home is where I go the rest I go to pass the test
I'm sorry if I left you all alone
But I couldn't make it home so we argue on the phone
Don't you trust me?

I grew up a fuckin screw up
Got introduced to the game, got a ounce and fuckin blew up
Choppin rocks overnight
The nigga Biggie Smalls tryin ta turn into the black Frank White
We had to grow dreads to change our description
Two cops is on the milk box missin
Show they toes you know they got stepped on
A fist full of bullets a chest full of Teflon
Run from the police picture that, nigga I'm too fat
I fuck around and catch a asthma attack
When he drop, take his Glock, and I'm Swayze
Celebrate my escape, sold the Glock, bought some weight
Lay back, I got some money to make, motherfucker

Now everythings good in my hood
And its on and pop and Eazy-Muthaphukkin-E
From East Side South Compton
Str8 givin' up the real
On how a nigga feel talk that shit
Muthaphukkaz caps get peeled
Layin' low in the cut
Gettin how than a muthaphuka niggas knows whats up
I'm that gangsta, gangsta is that what there still yellin'
Nigga G to a T saggin' and bailin'
Live by the gun you know what I'm sayin' Ren
"Yea"
So I guess I'll die by that muthaphukka then
So when I die niggas bury me
Make sure my shit reads Eazy-Muthaphukkin-E
He Put Compton On That Map
And thats how a nigga feel
When I'm givin' up Tha Muthaphukkin Real



I lay awake tonight, because I wanna be with you
If you were beside me, I'd playfully kiss you
Each time I see ya, the feelin gets stronger
You sit a bit closer, we stare a lot longer
Huh - reach for my drink and for a second we touch
Words are muttered I stutter, cause I want you that much
The situation is a no-win, cause he's my best friend
But now I'm guilty, of fallin for his girlfriend
I know it's wrong but my heart is filled with purity
I offer passion but he offers security
Its like a trap that I'm sinkin into
I wake up sweaty when I'm sleepin cause I'm thinkin of you
Then we make eye contact, and I can't hold back
I try to shake it but the feelin comes right back
What have I gotten into, I feel posessed by you
I have these thoughts at night, of undressin you
Its kinda obvious blind men might see it
But he doesn't, so he keeps on trustin me
Leaves me alone wit you, while he's on vacation
Well how could he leave me, with this temptation?
Now I'm confused, cause I'm no Casanova
But you keep callin - you're sayin to come over
What do I do? Go or stay and play it smart
Its gettin rougher cause I suffer from a burnin heart..
My burnin heart..

Girl, you are my one and only
You are my angel, and now ya wanna leave me lonely
What did I do? Baby did I treat you bad?
My heart is broken, and now ya make me sad
I remember, when this love affair first started
We was so in love, and now we are departed
Girl, I'll buy ya anything ya heart desires
I have to let ya know, baby you're my fire
Warm and wet, each kiss is prolonged
It's your sweet caress that makes Rock T strong
Just bein with you, and seein the two of us
Walkin along the beach, cause girl you are my peach
So sweet and tender, my love I surrender
No need to pretend, that you'll want it to end
I'll never let you go, you're forever my girl
Ya know why? Cause girl, you are my world
My burnin' heart..

Totally tounge tied, every three seconds I keep watchin you
He's my best friend, but I can't help clockin you
How could this be? How could we both love you
Now I'm trapped in this position and don't know what to do
I could forget about you, pretend that we never met
But when I'm here without you, I start to heavily sweat
You give me looks that reinforce the bond that's already there
So many times I find eyes locked up and just passionately stare
Play the role like you don't matter, he swears that we hate each other
But in reality we can't wait to taste each other
You're my addiction casue I fiend for your desperately
I stand here fantasizin, because you're next to me
What can I do, with this passion I feel
It's too hard to conceal, so I know it's for real
Watched you so many times, I know where every curve is
I think you reads my mind, and so I'm feelin nervous
I wana tell you how I feel, but that wouldn't help
It would only cause problems so I keep to myself
Even though, it drives me crazy, to see you sittin with him
A tear rolls down my cheek, because I see you kiss him
I know the words you're sayin before they can be said
Hear the thoughts that you thinkin before they come in your head
Wouldn't hurt the brother, for anything in this world
But damn I fell in love with his girl - my burnin heart, heart, heart..

My heart is burnin, ya know it's yearin, for ya sweet caress
I lay in ecstacy, as you kiss and rub my chest
You know ya love me, why must you deny yourself
What I can offer you, yet you want somebody else?
It's not that - well then girl, what could it be?
I hope I'm good for you, cause baby you're so good for me
Many nights I cried and tried to make this work
Then act the fool and cool and cruel like the church
Well I'm sorry baby, I have to let you know
You are my life my strength I refuse to let you go
You are so beautiful, baby you light up my life
I close my eyes and dream of that you'll become my wife
Day in and day out, it's you I pray about
Don't lock the door to your heart and make me stay out
I love you cause honey, you're like a work of art
You got me on fire - my burnin heart..

I lay awake tonight, because I wanna be with you
If you were beside me, I'd playfully kiss you
Each time I see ya, the feelin gets stronger
You sit a bit closer, we stare a lot longer
Huh - reach for my drink and for a second we touch
Words are muttered I stutter, cause I want you that much
The situation is a no-win, cause he's my best friend
But now I'm guilty, of fallin for his girlfriend
I know it's wrong but my heart is filled with purity
I offer passion but he offers security
Its like a trap that I'm sinkin into
I wake up sweaty when I'm sleepin cause I'm thinkin of you
Then we make eye contact, and I can't hold back
I try to shake it but the feelin comes right back
What have I gotten into, I feel posessed by you
I have these thoughts at night, of undressin you
Its kinda obvious blind men might see it
But he doesn't, so he keeps on trustin me
Leaves me alone wit you, while he's on vacation
Well how could he leave me, with this temptation?
Now I'm confused, cause I'm no Casanova
But you keep callin - you're sayin to come over
What do I do? Go or stay and play it smart
Its gettin rougher cause I suffer from a burnin heart..
My burnin heart..
My burnin heart.. my burnin heart.. my burnin heart..



Starry night.. an unknown creation
Written by, and from the archives of 2Pac Shakur
Dedicated to the memory of Vincent Van Gogh

A creative heart obsessed with satisfying
This dorment and uncaring society
You have given them the stars at night
And you have given them bountiful bouquets of sunflowers
But for you there's only contempt
Though you pour yourself into that frame and present it so proudly
This world could not accept your masterpieces, from the heart
So on that starry night, you gave to us and you took away from us
The one thing we never acknowledged, your life..

Yeah, game laid down by Q, you know what I'm saying?
And flows by the M-A-C y'all, Mr. M-A-C Mall

Starry night, your life
You gave to us, and took away from us
Starry night, your life
You gave to us, and took away from us

Uhh, uhh.. watch me live my art; writing words from my soul in blood
And speak the truth on every thing I love
I'll probably sacrifice my life.. to send my message through mics
It's like a war drum calling soldiers at night
It's bigger than music I spit it straight from the heart
So it's cold and dark and deep like the universe, but nah don't start
It's for your entertainment but it's my life y'all
And I can't rewind, fast forward, or press pause
But when you give your all, it's like the fans demand more
And after the tour I sit alone like before
When your name is hot it's all love, the world is yours
But when you fall off, you get ignored

CHORUS

You on the cover of the magazine, flossing on the TV screen
Toasting with your champagne, playin life like a game
Loaded in the limousine, love to hear the fans scream
Swimming with the sharks now, ain't no love - money king
People got they hands out but ain't nobody lending hands
Can you really blame them for trying to get what they can?
Late night, bright lights, lust and lies
And anything goes under the Hollywood sign
Well you might lose your soul and who knows what you'll find
But go ahead man we all want to shine...
But go ahead man we all want to shine...

CHORUS

There you have it..
You know, when I was younger I prayed, to get in this game
You know to hold this microphone in my hand
I asked the man upstairs, to let me rock a crowd one day
You know let people out there feel the way I feel through my music
Like my homeboy 2Pac did for sure
And he gave that to me
But he didn't, he didn't, he didn't let me know
About all the shady shit that's in, in between
You and your dream, you know?
See it's more than the music, I spit it from the heart
So sometime it's cold and it's dark, but it's raw
And that's how I'mma bring it to you every time, you know?




Sometimes I wonder about this race
Because we must be blind as Hell
2 think we live in equality
while Nelson Mandela rots in a jail cell
Where the shores of Howard Beach
are full of Afrikan corpses
And those that do live 2 be 18
Bumrush 2 join the Armed Forces
This so called "Home of the Brave"
why isn't anybody Backing us up!
When they c these crooked ass Redneck cops
constantly Jacking us up
Now I bet some punk will say I'm racist
I can tell by the way you smile at me
then I remember George Jackson, Huey Newton
and Geronimo 2 hell with Lady Liberty



Gangsta party
Up out of there
Hahaha
Up out of there
Up out of there
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party
Eh, light that up Snoop, why you actin' like that?
Let me hit that
Haha
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Nuttin but a gangsta party

Picture perfect, I paint a perfect picture
Bomb the, suckaz with precision my intention's to get richer
With the S-N double-O-P, to all my closest homies
Did this cold, we dispose our foes

Sho'nuff
I keep my hand on my gun, 'cause they got me on the run
Now I'm back in the courtroom waitin on the outcome
Free 2Pac, it seems to be on my mind
But at the same time it seem they tryin' to take mine
So I'm a get smart, and get defensive with this
And put together a million march, for some gangsta twist, twist, twist

So now they got us laced
Bustaz get ready for the throwdown, the hit's about to go down
Uhh, me and Snoop about to clown
I'm losin' my religion, I'm vicious on these stool pigeons
You might be deep in this game, but you got the rules missin'
Suckaz be actin' like they savage, I'm out to get the cabbage
I got, nothin' but love, for my homies livin' lavish

I got a pit named P, she niggarino
I got a house out in the hills right next to Chino
And I, think I got a black Beamer
But my dream is to own a fly casino
And get scooped up, by the little homie in the Regal
Mmm, it feel good to you baby bubba
Ya see, this is for the G's and the keys young hustla

Now follow as we riiiiide
You can check the rest, two of the best from the West side
And I can make you famous
Brothaz been dyin' for years, so how can they blame us
I live in fear of a felony
I never stop bailin' these, West Coast G's, West Coast G's
If ya got it better flaunt it, another warrant
2 of Amerikaz Most Wanted

Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Nuttin but a gangsta party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party

Now give me fifty feet
Defeat is not my destiny, release me to the streets
And keep whatever's left of me
Jealousy is envious, suffering is greed
Better be prepared when you cowards bust at me
I bust and flea, you suckaz must be crazy what??
Ain't no mercy jealous bustaz who can fade the Thugs
Bow down in the presence of a boss player

It's like Cuz/Blood, gangbangin'
Everybody in the party doin' dope slangin'
You got to have papers in this world
You might get your first snatch, before your eyes swirl
Ya doing ya job, every day
And then you work so hard 'til ya hair turn grey
Let me tell you about life, and bout the way it is
You see we live by the gun, so we die by the gun's kids

They tell me not to roll with my Glock
So now I gotta throw it away
Floatin' in the black Benz, tryin' to do a show a day
They wonder how I live, with five shots
Brothaz is hard to kill, on my block
Fiends for currency and dough related
Affiliated with the hustlers, and so we made it
No answers to questions, I'm tryin' to get up on it
My brotha Dogg with me, eternally the most wanted, wanted, wanted

Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party
Ain't nuttin but a gangsta party, party, party

Death Row, Death Row,Death Row, Death Row



I remember when u were LOST
and your soul was in the wind
It was at this awkward moment
that u and I became friends
But then your soul was found
and u discovered celibacy
But with this u forgot about me
and our bond was a memory
And now I c u felt it
the bond we made before
I pray 2 God it stands
and severs never more




Word is bond, bond is life
I give my life before my word shall fail
A soldier's oath, freedom of death
And I won't stop if I fail

If I fail get back, can't be soft got to be tough
If I fall get back, can't be soft got to be tough
If I fail get back, can't be soft got to be tough
If I fall get back, can't be soft got to be tough

Failure, it's not an option
Real recognize real let's get it poppin'
With mathematics you can solve any problem
That's how we make it from the top to the bottom
Keep ya head up homie and stay confident
It's negativity around but I'm positive
Cuz I'm givin' everything that I got to give
Stayin' true to myself, that's how I keep it real


If I fail then I'll rise
Like a phoenix before yo eyes
Out the ashes and from the dirt
Report for duty and put in work
Eternal life, an iron will
Man sharpens man, steel sharpens steel
The hate you gave, we turn to love
Rest in peace, one thug one love

We can't be stopped if we don't give up
Even though they hold us back we still find ways to come up
A lot of people make promises with no plans to keep 'em
But me, no matter what I'm ridin' 'til I get my freedom
If I fail, then it's only a challenge to go harder
Don't want to be no martyr so I adapt to things smarter
It's death before dishonor
And I put that on my son and my momma
And don't take it as a threat, that's a promise


If in my quest to achieve my goals
I stumble or crumble or even lose my soul
Those that knew me would easily co-sign
That there was never a life as hard as mine
No father, no money, no chance, no guide
I only follow my voice inside
If it guides me wrong and I do not win
I'll learn from mistakes and try to achieve again

Dedicated to the youth, the truth is the seed
The stronger the root, the stronger the tree
If we eat from the fruit, the stronger we be
If we do it today, tomorrow we free


Yeah, y'all put ya twos up for 2Pac
Dead Prez collaboration
It's only two choices man, ball or fall
Rose that grew from concrete
And we still growin'



u saw innocence at its best
I wanted u more than I wanted me
I remember my last thought at night was of u
and my first thought in the morning was of u
It has been a long time since I've actually
sat and adored u but every once in awhile
your beautiful smile guides me through a day
I hear u R with another and u R expecting
I wish u good luck he is lucky 2 be able
2 wake up 2 u each morning
c u in heaven!



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

It's said that every revolutionary act is a act of love
And this is an act of love
All power to the people

I said the P is for power, the A for action
The N-T because now is the time to get it done
See the H is for heart, and the E for effect
The R hold it down at the end for respect
Who am I? A panther
Who am I? A panther
What I got I got SOUL, what I got I got LOVE
What I got I got PRIDE, what I wanna be FREE
Raise your hands in the air if you feel like me

Who am I? A panther
Who am I? A panther
What I got I got SOUL, what I got I got LOVE
What I got I got PRIDE, what I wanna be FREE
Raise your hands in the air if you feel like me

Can you see the pride of the panther
As he glows in splendor and grace?
Topling obstacles placed
In the way of the progression of his race
Can you see the pride in the panther
As she nurtures her young, all alone?
The seed must grow, regardless
Of the fact that it's planted, in stone
Can't you see the pride of the panthers
As they unify, as one?
The flower blooms, with brilliance
And outshines the rays of the sun
Outshines, like the sun
Shines out, like the sun
Shines bright, like the sun
Brings light, like the sun

P is for power, the A for action
The N-T because now is the time to get it done
See the H is for heart, and the E for effect
The R hold it down at the end for respect
Who am I? A panther
Who am I? A panther
What I got I got SOUL, what I got I got LOVE
What I got I got PRIDE, what I wanna be FREE
Raise your hands in the air if you feel like me
Who am I? A panther
Who am I? A panther
What I got I got SOUL, what I got I got LOVE
What I got I got PRIDE, what I wanna be FREE
Raise your hands in the air if you feel like me

This song is dedicated to all those who live and die for the struggle
Panthers, children of the Panthers, or all those, who strive for
Free minds, free souls, free bodies.. for freedom
And love.. love.. love is the engine to the revolution



Death Row, that's where motherfuckers is endin' up

Dear mama, I'm caught up in this sickness
I robbed my adversaries, but slipped and left a witness
Wonder if they'll catch me, or will this nigga snitch
Should I shoot his bitch, or make the nigga rich?
Don't wanna commit murder, but damn they got me trapped
Hawkin while I'm walkin, and talkin behind my back
I'm kind of schizophrenic, I'm in this shit to win it
Cause life's a Wheel of, Fortune here's my chance to spin it
Got no time for cops, who trip and try to catch me
Too fuckin trigger happy, to let them suckers snatch me
Whip out the nine, now pull that dime out your ass
Peter picked a pepper, but I can pick a punk
Snatched him like a bitch, and threw him in the trunk
The punk thought I was bluffin, but swear I'm nothin nice
Before I take your life, first wrestle with these, mics
I listen to him scream, Tray Deee went insane
I guess the little, mites had finally found his brain
New Rovers pull me over, I'm sentenced to the pen
Remember that little, bird, he snitched and told a, friend
It's trouble on my mind, I'm with the old timers
And fuck five-oh, blaow blaow. turn em into forty-niners

Bye bye, I was never meant to live
Can't be positive, when the ghetto's where you live
Bye bye, I was never meant to be
Livin like a thief, runnin through the streets
Bye bye, and I got no place to go...
Where they find me? 16 on Death Row

Dear mama, these cops don't understand me
I turned to a life of crime, cause I came from a broken family
My uncle used to touch me, I never told you that
Scared what you might do, I couldn't hold you back
I kept it deep inside, I done let it fuel my anger
I'm down for all my homies, no mercy for a stranger
The brother in my cell, is 16 as well
It's hard to adapt, when you're black and you're trapped in a livin Hell
I shouldn'ta let him catch me
Instead of livin sad in jail I coulda died free and happy
And my cellmate's raped on the norm
And passed around the dorm, you can hear his asshole gettin torn
They made me an animal
Can't sleep, instead of countin sheep, niggas countin cannibals
And that's how it is in the pen
Turn old and cold, and your soul is your best friend
My mama prayed for me
Cause when they come for me they find a struggler
To the death I take the breath from your jugular
The trick is to never lose hope
I found my buddy hangin dead from a rope, 16 on Death Row

They think they're crazy, but they ain't crazy, let's face it
Shit, basically they're just playing sick
They ain't shit, they ain't saying shit, spray 'em 50
A to the K, get in the way I'll bring Dre and them with me
And turn this day into fucking mayhem, you staying with me?
Don't let me lose you, I'm not trying to confuse you
When I let loose with this Uzi and just shoot through your Isuzu
You get the message? Am I getting through to you?
You know what's coming, you motherfuckers don't even know, do you?
Take some Big and some Pac and you mix em up in a pot
Sprinkle a little Big L on top, what the fuck do you got?
You got the realest and illest killers tied up in a knot
The juggernauts of this rap shit, like it or not
It's like a fight to the top just to see who'd die for the spot
You put ya life in this, nothing like surviving a shot
Y'all know what time it is, soon as 50 signs on this doc
Shit what you know about death threats, cause I get a lot
Shady Records was eighty seconds away from the towers
Some cowards fucked with the wrong building, they meant to hit ours
Better evacuate all children, it's nuclear showers
There's nothing spookier



This going out to all the females that be having
To beat them motherfuckers in they head to get them
Off of them, Haha

Another shady mission, tricks, like watchin' pictures in hazy vision
Tonight is love makin', take you any place you wish
Today we're satisfied, yesterday we've stolen kisses
Blind insanity, perfect pictures of me and my family
Not understanding the destiny, had they planned for me?
If I have kids, will I live to see them grow?
Though I don't know, I live the life of a thug nigga
Until the day I go, no broken promises
A sacred bond broken, I know I die alone
But yet and still I'm hopin'
Visions of prisons, maybe I'll be forgiven
I know it's better in heaven cause bein' here ain't livin'
Close my eyes and see nothing but pain, the world is crazy, still
Lookin' for a queen to plant seeds and have babies
Maybe I'll be the one or just maybe I'm lost
You'll never know being cautious, if you play your cards right

Play your cards right baby, haha, play your cards right
Play your cards right girl, take ya time
Take your time baby, be patient
Just be patient baby, don't rush
Don't you rush it girl

Uh huh, Luda
You ain't gotta do that baby
It's not the hand that you're dealt but how you playin' your cards
You got a brother feelin' mellow like a Cuban cigar
You truly a star, we'll take the days one at a time
I think we make the perfect pair, cause you my one of a kind
I say we make a full house, live out the family dreams
No jokers, no jacks, just kings and queens
And we should leave the clubs alone and take trips to islands
Give you all of my heart and flood your hands with diamonds
No more livin' like a playa, stop chasin' the hoes
I never put you in a shuffle, use my ace in the hole
I live a life full of riches we got places to go
So no bluffin', no rushin', just takin' it slow
Let your man do the hustling while you lay in the shade
I'll throw a deuce to the haters, call a spade a spade
And let you know I'll never hurt you, baby girl
You made me hurry up and wait and I know patience is a virtue
Haha, play your cards right baby

Play your cards right baby, haha, play your cards right
Play your cards right girl, take ya time
Take your time baby, be patient
Just be patient baby, don't rush
Don't you rush it girl

You're the one, the only one heaven sent for me
Baby, I'm hopin' that you understand, that you still believe
That I got the special times, on my mind, just hopin' that you see
Baby that the thug in me is lovin' you, that this is meant to be
Girl I'll never leave you alone
You're the one, the only one heaven sent for me
Baby, I'm hopin' that you understand, that you still believe
That I got the special times, on my mind, just hopin' that you see
Baby that the thug in me is lovin' you, that this is meant to be
Girl I'll never leave you alone

Play your cards right baby
Play your cards right girl, just play your cards
Take your time baby, play your cards right
Just be patient baby, take your time, girl
Don't you rush it girl
Rush it girl, hahaha
Play your cards right baby, be patient
Play your cards right girl, play your cards right
Take your time baby, yeah
Just be patient baby
Don't you rush it girl

Hahah
You know
I know how it is sometimes
I know exactly what you talking about
Mothafuckers be havin' a one track mind. That liquor be makin' a mothafucker just straight up stone cold thuggin
It's ok, we don't know no better sometimes, haha
You gotta slow down homie
We learn that
Playa cardz right
Yeah hahaha
Especially them niggas like Kastro. Kastro is a straight gorilla pimp
My homeboy I-20 is just like that man
And that nigga fuckin' uh, Yaki Kadafi, straight gorilla pimp
Lil' Fate the same way
Niggas just be takin' it, they don't give a fuck. Big what?
Exactly
Them niggas is just gorilla pimps
Haha, that's Jayo for ya
E.D.I. Mean
Hahaha, Haaaaa
That nigga done slow down huh
Please slow it down
He used to be a super gorilla pimp
Dolla Boy, Haha. Disturbin tha Peace, baby. We can take it slow sometimes man
Yeah, yeah
Woooo, play your cards right
Play your cards right



NOV-22-88

Dear Beethoven,


4 ETERNITY
TUPAC SHAKUR

P.S. my # is 332-4725





Yeah, BK Brooklyn went massive on the track ya'll
Uh, Makavelli rest in peace, huh Oulawz whaddup

Just holla my name and witness game official
Niggas is so ashamed they stand stiff like scared bitches
While I remain inside a paradox called my block
Though gunshots is promised to me, when will I stop?
I hit the weed and hope to God I can fly high
Witness my enemies die when I ride by, they shouldn'ta tried me
I send they bodies to they parents up North
With they faces they wrists and they nuts cut off
Fuck 'em all what I scream as I dream in tongues
Fuck a trick, get me rich and the bitches'll come
Bust my gun, make 'em all scatter
Bullets to my nuts only made my balls better, eat a dick BEYOTCH!
Mercy, never that, you say you comin' back?
Bring it on, forever strapped
Introduce you to the pleasure and the pain, you can go so far

I wish nothing but the best for my enemies
I know they wanna see me descended n even when im dead
They don't wanna see me in peace
They'd rather see me suffer a lifetime of trice
When I'm gone jealousy is the same old song
I wish nothing but the best for my enemies
I'mma warrior born to survive the struggle
Its a game of tug of war you gotta hustle

You see the road that I quarrel is long and hard
Physical and mental scars
Wishin' for paradise in a place where I'm against the odds
Rough nights then gun fights had me on the edge of death
But some how some way god chose to spare my breath
When my enemies succeed in my assassination
Thoughts of death is it the future of my imagination
Before they put me in the dirt I'm squeezin' first
Hate to see my mama cry following behind my hearse
Nothin' worse I can't picture myself sayin they shot me
Cause even when I think I'm alone, god got me
Throughout life I learned a lot of valuable lessons
Invest in the future you can't take a fortune in heaven
Friends changed so I walk on my weapons
So let me come for ME
I'm patiently waitin' to put em under me
A ghetto star just trynna live my life comfortably
Bein' harassed and attacked so whatchu want from me


Check yourself you gotta snatch some collars
And let them motherfuckers know you gonna take them OUT
Anytime YOU feel like it
You gotta get the ground beneath your feet partner
And get the wind behind your back and go out and blaze if you got to
You gotta be ready to throw down, stand up and die for that
Otherwise you ain't shit, you might as well be dead your damn self

Talkin' to my homies that was worried
See my enemies wanna see me dead I ain't worried forgive me
Please give me shelter, guard my friends
Lift up my head from my hands that are warm with tears
I see bodies gettin' splashed with acid
2 shots ring from the plastic Glock wrapped in plastic
Buried n basted time to notify
His fam wishin', ain't nothin' left to be identified
Evacuate the crime seen fast, Why
Heard the feds that are wanted for my ass, Why
I won't touch down till I see do you wanna
Sell out shops, sellin' em crooked counts marijuana
Label me a success
I made a switch, retired from the life that never gave me shit
Went from cash that I couldn't spend, countless cars
An addict for a wife, live my life as a ghetto star

Yeah man, GF Records man, fire whaddup
Haha my nigga empho lookin for this one ya'll
Gorilla gang man, 2Pac rest in peace man
We got this man, 2004 shit man
This shit from the heart ya'll
Huh, I wish the best for my enemies
Brrrrrraaaaaaaahhhhh



To my unborn child
This goes out to my unborn child
In case I don't make it
Just remember daddy love y'all
Did everything I could do to make a way for me and you
You know daddy loves you

Now ever since my birth, I've been cursed since I'm born too wild
In case I never get to holler at my unborn child
Many things learned in prison, blessed and still livin'
Tryna earn every penny that I'm gettin', and reminiscin'
To the beginnin' of my mission
When I was conceived and came to be in this position
My momma was a Panther loud, single parent but she proud
When she witnessed baby boy rip a crowd
Went to school, but I dropped out and left the house
'Cause my mama say I'm good for nothing, so I'm out
Since I only got one life to live, God forgive me for my sins
Let me make it and I'll never steal again, or deal again
My only friend is my misery
Wantin' revenge for the agony they did to me
See my life ain't promised but it's sure gettin' better
Hope you understand my love letter to my unborn child

To my unborn child
To my unborn child

So complicated to escape fate
And you can never understand 'til we trade places
Tell the world I plead guilty for being anxious
Ain't no way in hell that I could ever be a rapist
It's hard to face this, cold world on a good day
When will they let the little kids in the hood play?
I got shot 5 times but I'm still breathin'
Livin' proof there's a God, if you need a reason
Can I believe in my own fate?
Will I raise my kids in the right or the wrong way?
Dear mama, I'm a man now
I wanna make it on my own, not a handout
Make way for a whirlwind prophesized
I wanna go in peace when I gotta die
On these cold streets, ain't no love, no mercy and no friends
In case you never see my face again
To my unborn child

To my unborn child

Dear Lord, can you hear me? Tell me what to say
To my unborn seed in case I pass away
Will my child get to feel love?
Or are we all just cursed to be street thugs? 'Cause being black hurts
And even worse if you speak first
Livin' my life as an Outlaw what could be worse?
'Cause maybe if I tried to change
Who I'm I kiddin'? I'm a thug 'til I die. I'm a rider, mane
Touch bases, eat lunch in plush places
Regular criminal oasis awaits us
If there's a ghetto for true thugs, I'll see you there
And I'm sorry for not being there
Just know your daddy was a soldier, me against the world
Bless the boys and all my little girls
To the Lord I'm eternal, restin' in peace
Please take care of all my seeds, to my unborn child


This letter goes out to
Any seeds that I might not get to see
'Cause of this lifestyle that a nigga live
Just know what; your daddy loves you
Got nothin' but love for you
And all I wanted was for you to have a better life than I had
So I was out here on a 24 hour, 365 grind
When you get to be my age, you'll understand
Just know I got love for you
And I'll see you if there's a ghetto from heaven
There's a ghetto heaven, I'll be there waiting
Take care, run wild, but be smart
Follow the rules of the game
I know sometimes it's confusin'
The rules of the game is gon' get you through it
All day, every day
Watch out for these snakes and fakes
Friends come a dime a dozen
Be an individual
Work hard
Study
Get your mind sharp
Trust nobody
Money Over Bitches
Don't let these niggas run you out
Don't let no man put his hands on you
Don't let no woman use you
Don't be a trick
Don't be a player hater
And don't be a wife beater
Go get your money
With all my heart
Your Pops
2Pac



Hahahahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Hahahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!
Once again! Hahaha!




I ain't got no friends
Yeah, I'ma do this track
Westside!
MOB, Bad Boy Killa!
Hahahaha, hey fat boy...

First off, touched your chick and the clique you claim
Westside when we ride, come equipped with game
You claim to be a playa, but I bust your wife
We bust on Bad Boys, brothers touch for life
Plus Puffy tryin' to see me weak, hearts I rip
Biggie Smalls and Junior Mafia is some mark ass tricks
We keep on comin', while we gunnin' for ya' jewels
Steady rushin' while we bustin' at cha fools, you know the rules
Little Ceasar go ask you homie how I'll leave ya
Cut your trick ass up, leave you in pieces, now be deceased
Little Kim, don't conversate with real G's
Quick to snatch your ugly ass off the streets, you need a weave
I'll let them suckers know it's on for life
Bad Boy murdered on Wax and killed
Mess with me and get your caps peeled
You know, See

Grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, Uhh
Who shot me, but your punks didn't finish
Now, you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Sucker, I hit 'em up

Yeah, straight out on the Bad Boy camp
You know how we do it
All my real homeboys in New York keep thuggin'
All the rest of you bustas die slow!

Get out the way yo, Hussein Fatal
You know Biggie Smalls just got dropped
Little Mu' pass the MAC and let me hit 'em in his back
Frank White need to get spanked right for settin' traps
Little accident murderer, and I ain't never heard of ya
Poise less gats attack when I'm servin' ya
Shanke you, spank ya, your whole style when I gank
Guard your rank, cause I'ma slam your ass in a pang
Puffy weaker than a block that I'm runnin' through
And I'm smokin Junior Mafia in front of you
With the ready power, tucked in my guess under my Eddie Bower
Your clout petty sour I push packages ever hour
We hit 'em up

Grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac
Who shot me, but your punks didn't finish
Now, you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Busta, I hit 'em up

Peep how we do it, keep it real, it's penintentiary steel
This ain't no freestyle battle, all you suckers gettin' killed, with your mouths open
Tryin' to come up off of me when the clouds hopin'
Smokin' dope, it's like a Sherm high, brothers think they learned to fly
Like they burn little suckers, you deserve to die
Talkin' about you gettin' money, but it's funny to me
All you suckers livin' bummy, while you messin' with me
I'm a self made millionaire
Thug livin', out of prison, pistols in the air
Biggie remember when I use to let you sleep on the couch
And beg the trick to let you sleep in the house
Now it's all about versace, you copied my style
Five shots couldn't drop me, I took it and smiled
Now I'm back to set the record straight
With my A-K, I'm still the thug that you love to hate
Little busta I'll hit 'em up

I'm from N-E-W Jerz where plenty of murder occurs
No points, no commas we bring drama to all you herds
Now go check the scenerio
Little Cease, I'll bring my enemies, to they knees, coppin' pleas a degenario
Big Mama is ya coked up or doped up
Get your little Junior whopper clique smoked up
Please tell me is you stupid?
I take money, crash and mash, through Brooklyn
With my clique lootin', shootin' and pollutin' your block
With fifteen shot, cocked Glock to your knot
Outlaw Mafia clique movin' up another notch
And your Pop stars boxed and get mobbed and dropped
And all your fake ass east coast props brainstormed and locked

You's a B-writer a 'Pac style taker
I'll tell you to face, you ain't nothin' but a faker
Softer than Alizé with a chaser
'bout to get murdered for the paper
EDI Amin approach the scene of the caper
Like a loc, with Prodigy in a choke, huh totin' smoke
Outlawz we ain't no joke, Thug Life cowards better be known
We approachin' in the wide open, gun smokin'
No need for hopin', it's a battle lost
I got 'em crossed as soon as the funk is boppin' off
HAHA, I hit 'em up

Empty clips, set trip
You know what time it is
Westside, Outlaw, Thug Life 'til we die
California love, california thug
You know what time it is
Bad Boy Killa
Mobb Deep Killa
Chino XL Killa
Much love to Smiff N Wesson, Freddie Foxxx, Bunchy The Fat Bastard, Naughty
By Nature and all the real thugs out there
Keep it comin'!
Westsiiide!
You know what time it is
All my real homeboys in Jersey, get up!
Outlaw! Thug Life! to die
Westside, Outlaw



Yeah niggas, you can't fuck with us
Tell 'em to come the fuck on
Scared bitch motherfuckas, Yeah

Dave Duke sure look cute in that black suit Oooohhh
But even cuter behind the barrel of my six shooter Oh
You look worried cause I ain't burried
Punks leave in a hurry cause I throw flurries making mothafuckas, scurry
Come feel the flavor from my single
And brain cell's tingle I'm feeling stronger than a fuckin mad Dingo
And uh How's that for black history?
I stay strapped, and love to jack those that slang that crack misery Ha
Cause being a nigga means you love niggas
But how could you love niggas if you trying drug niggas?
You motherfuckas need your caps peeled
Cause when blacks kill blacks we stay trapped and thats, real
And we don't need no more statistic's
It's time to get more realistic for the young the black and the gifted
And uh
Until my people get uplifted
There's no popping shit, just popping clips instead of marching we gon' rip
Shit

Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas
Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas

How should I plead? Forever thuggin' on a quest to get G's
Runnin' from enemies ever since the days of a seed
I'm under pressure, the stress will have me drinkin'
Thinkin' niggas after me, much too paranoid to blink
Wonder why the police don't wanna see me stackin' G's
They after a playa, but I won't let 'em capture me
I gotta thank the Lord for the weed and the nicotine
I can't sleep, close my eyes, I see wicked things
I keep my pistol by my bedside, one in the chamber
Preoccupied with homicide, my life's in danger
Rollin' down the 405, beware of stangers
Hand on my 4-5; that's what the fame does
I'm probably wrong, but I'll never know it till I'm gone
From out the gutter where the jealous motherfuckers roam
Pass the weed let that Hennessey get to me
Before the penitentiary, let's get it on!

Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas
Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas

Fuck them skinhead ass niggas
Fuck the police, and the clan, here's what we do to the motherfuckin' Clan, Let's move

They got me mobbin like I'm Loc'ed
And ready to get my slug on
I load my clip and slip my motherfuckin' gloves on
I ain't scared to blast on these suckas if they test me
Trust, I got my Glock cocked playa if they press me
Bust on motherfuckers with a - paaassion
Better duck cause I ain't lookin when I'm - b-blaaastin
I'm a nut and drinkin Hennessey and gettin' high
On the lookout for my enemies, don't wanna die
Tell me why? 'Cause this stress is gettin' major
A buck-fifty across the face with my razor
What can I do but be a thug until I'm dead and gone
Keep my brain on the game and stay head strong
These sorry bastards want to kill me in my sleep
But will they can I see
And everyday it just a struggle
Steady thuggin' in the streets
And I'll be ballin' loc
Don't let 'em make you worry
Keep swingin' at these suckas till you buried
I was born to raise hell, a nigga from the gutta
Word to Mutha I'm touched
I'm kickin dust up
Ready to bust
I'm on the scene steady muggin' mean
Until they kill me
I'll be livin this life
I know you feel me
There's so much pain

Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas
Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man, but nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas



Before u came the triangle never broke
we were bonded and melded as one
But as the 2 pushed u away
The one got weak and embraced u
and now u R ripping us Apart

The worst feeling of helplessness
The greatest pain has rested in my heart
The vision of heaven fades
and the nightmare of loneliness has started

My Hero has been defeated by you
and now what can I do
watch as u Destroy us
and our love is finally Through

I know the worst is Here
I feel it in my Heart
u got into the circle
now you're tearing us apart !!!!!!!!!!!!!!



Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now
Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now

There's, never a good day
Cause in my hood they
Let they AK's pump strays where the kids play
My homies dyin' 'fore they get to see they birthdays
These is the worst days
Sometimes it hurts to pray
And every Halloween
Check out the murder scene
Can't help but duplicate the violence seen on the screen
And even God turned his back on the ghetto youth
I know that ain't the truth
Sometimes I look for proof
I wonder if heaven got a ghetto
And if it does
Does it matter if you blood or you cuz
Remember how it was
And facin me now, what do I do?
These thangs that a Thug goes through
And still I rise
So keep ya head up
And even though I had
Pain in my heart, I was hopeless from the start
So keep ya head up
And make ya mind strong
It's a struggle every day...
Dear Lord can you hear me!!

Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now
Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now

A place to spend my quiet nights, time to unwind
So much pressure in this life of mine
I cry at times, I once contemplated suicide
And would've tried, but when I held that 9
All I could see was my mama's eyes
Picture me inside the misery of poverty
No man alive has ever witnessed struggles I survived
No one knows my struggle, they only see the trouble
Not knowin' it's hard to carry on when no one loves you
Prayin' hard for better days, promise to hold on
Me and my dawgs ain't have a choice but to roll on
We found a family spot to kick it
Where we can drink liquor and no one bickers over trick shit
A spot where we can smoke in peace
And even though we G's
We still visualize places that we can roll in peace
And in my mind's eye I see this place, the players go in fast
I got a spot for us all so we can ball, at thug's mansion


Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now
Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now


And it seems like yesterday, it was just a dream
But those days are gone, they're just memories
And it seems like yesterday, it was just a dream
But those days are gone

Let's pretend Marshall Mathers never picked up a pen
Let's pretend things would've been no different
Pretend he procrastinated, had no motivation
Pretend he just made excuses that were so paper thin
They could blow away with the wind
"Marshall you're never gonna make it
Makes no sense to play the game
There ain't no way that you'll win"
Pretend he just stayed outside all day
And played with his friends
Pretend he even had a friend to say was his friend
And it wasn't time to move
And schools weren't changin' again
He wasn't socially awkward and just strange as a kid
He had a father and his mother wasn't crazy as shit
And he never dreamed he could rip stadiums
And just lazy as shit
Fuck a talent show in the gymnasium, bitch
"You won't amount to shit, quit daydreamin', kid!
You need to get your cranium checked
You're thinking like an alien, it just ain't realistic"
Now pretend they ain't just make him angry with this shit
And there was no one he could even aim when he's pissed at
And his alarm went off to wake him
But he didn't make it to the Rap Olympics
Slept through his plane and he missed it
He's gon' have a hard time explaining to Hailie and Lainey
These food stamps and this WIC shit
‘Cause he never risked shit, he hoped and he wished it
But it didn't fall in his lap
So he ain't even here, he pretends that…


Airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars....
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now
Can we pretend that airplanes in the night sky are like shooting stars?
I could really use a wish right now
Wish right now, wish right now



Yeah
West side
See ya
Hahahahaha
Wooo!
Real niggas in the building
Hahah
Pac, what up baby?
How you feelin', nigga?

Now take a look inside my mind
That pen' time made me wise but still I rise
'Cause my ambitions as a ridah like landmines
Lyrics turn niggas into smithereens
Music so lethal, turn coliseums to murder scenes
I'm Makaveli the Don is what they tell me, I'm armed
I'm droppin' niggas like bombs
Get in that ass like a thong
Picture a felon in ya presence
Takin' bustas back to the essence
Tellin' my people peep my lethal message
Visions of me gettin' money got me in mash mode
Murderous motive for niggas stoppin' my cash flow
You can't fight it nigga, let go
Witness the sound, made ya bitch ass bow down to Death Row
Mama, these niggas got me fightin' these 3 Strikes
Showin' up in court, fuck what you thought it's three nights
I put the game down first put my niggas up on it
Now we America's Most Wanted
Feel me

Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas got exposed to the game
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas got exposed to the game
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Initiated as an Outlaw

Take a look inside my block where we beef with the peep cop
Bop when the beat drop
Cock when the streets hot
Shell-shocked we out to tote lead
Remember the teachers when we and 'Pac broke bread
He said One Nation is what this nation most fear
Now I swear most these rappers ain't ready for warfare
We Outlaw since birth, that's why the lost fear
Now betcha all every verse gon' have a mall scared

It's hella mean the don, you find it in the Quran
You catch me in the trap gettin' my grind on
I produce from the line where the hustlers made
Seein' visions on my money yeah my name was Krazed
And this way I'd carry from state to state
This here is the man that my mama made
You can read Montana, see that a it's ya boy
Raised in the game, initiated as an Outlaw

Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas, got exposed to the game
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas got exposed to the game
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Initiated as an Outlaw

Take a look inside my brain!
Dippin' through the rain and into range bumpin' Dr. Strange
My Glock aim is impeccable
What scared to do or sketch to do
A couple of body bags to catch hella flu
Cold with the fortune oh I'm scortchin'
Got that FEDS lookin' at me like "that boy toastin'"
No, but I be on the road to Boston
Hustle man like Martin and I'm Tracy Morgan
So I get that money right, get the paper can right I
The only one to pay to connect mic
B me rst believe that vest be
So postin' my chest
I can't breathe in the city of thieves, I rest please
Can't tell me nothin', my gun bustin' with ease
No prob, so far I gotta crowbar, rough pic
Froze and now I'm initiated as a Outlaw

Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Initiated as an Outlaw hahahha

Never forget baby
Since E.D.I. what up
Kadafi, what up uha
We riiide, riide
Greene millennium now baby yeah
Pass that henny
Unless to give right

Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas got exposed to the game
Muthafuckas actin' crazy bustin' me in the jaw
Bitches is wild, niggas is lame
I hung around with real niggas got exposed to the game..



Ahhh shit hahaha
When I enter the first zone Worst known mic holder
My Hummer roll up, evacuating strapped soldiers
Inside strategy
Manifestin' military styles Casually try da g
When niggas battle me
My Prophecized prediction, switch and move positions
Separated from his gun and bitch, and watch 'em start snitchin'
I keep spittin', still stupid niggas fail to listen
I personify this thug livin'; Hell or prison
My ammunition varies, my voice carries
Watch me invite the whole world me and the mob gettin' married
It seems horrifying screams pierce the dark
Just as suspected, a trick bitch where is your heart
You mark, watch niggas fall when I call they name
We outlaws hold your head niggas all the same
Except some who want more out of life than stress
We still thuggin' 'til it's none left
Don't sleep

We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind
Don't sleep
We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind

Dumpin' on motherfuckers at random, rapidly
Wit' accuracy, they shouldn't talk, bad to me
It had to be a motherfuckin' murder, I'm glad to be
A nigga that did the murder, so sad to see
Another motherfucker floatin' In plastic reef
Rapid release, keep the police coastin'
Yolk the nigga off the asphalt
Drove off to the hills, positioned him on his knees and blew the back off
Death with the Lex Ruger, death to ya
Niggas cry when the bullets fly, kill and execute 'em

I blast first 'til they body me
Like my guns in variety
Runnin' wit' the real big willies you silly punks try to be
But front
Doin' my walk by's rollin' a blunt
Hands on my nuts in a getaway car full of stunts
Addicted to my nine, movin' like crime through time
Poppin' niggas like pimples nigga, nothin' simple 'bout mine
Etch-a-sketchin'
Dumpin' on all you punks at intersections
Day in and day out, ain't no easy way outs for easy exits
Don't sleep

We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind
Don't sleep
We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind

G's up
A-Town
When I hit the street, all I can see is the grind
Blood sweat and tear, when I bust my rhyme
Yeah I un- for my folk like I load my nine
And when I let loose, then no crew standin' but mine
I gives a damn 'bout lame nigga actin' schiesty
Same one knew I was in jail and didn't write me
Wanna fight me then come find me
What ever you do shawty you better think wisely
I use my thoughts and pen similar to a saran wrap
A lil' lame nigga I'll never be
Yeah I'ma keep it g I'm from the Three and Scrap will never sleep

We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind
Don't sleep
We gon' ride, keep my pistol on my side
Don't sleep
Blowin' pine, always hustlin' on the grind
Don't sleep
Don't sleep
Don't sleep



Strength is overcome by weakness
Joy is overcome by Pain
The night is overcome by Brightness
and Love - it remains the same



Yeah
Turn up that motherfucking base
Aight

Yo One Nation nigga
Thought you heard nigga
One Nation

Fucking bullshit nigga
We got to get this motherfucking paper
Boot Camp Clik
Aight you know what I'm saying
Mad niggas want to talk about that East - West bullshit
But you know it's all bullshit

Smith and Wesson in this motherfucker, right now
Greg Nice in this motherfucker, right now
L.S. In this motherfucking, right now
Baby Jesus And The All Star's, right now
2Pac and The Outlawz
Got The Luniz in this Bitch

We got to put a lock on niggas jaws, so we gonna do it like this, check it out

Like lamp shades
Now they rant and rave
I'm raw
Plus I got more plants to blaze
Fiends came back with thieves
With files Long as Stant. Isle and back to Queens
We strap black Mac's with beam's
I'm tight fear
I'm that nightmare that killed that dream
My gat steam crazy buzz
I slit wit wigs, plus some bid for your baby love
I'll play the role till I'm grey and old
Haha
With your pop's on the bed roll
No doubt
I'm caught out with your daughter
South of the border
Colt made them Outlawz

Check it out
Is it, money and women?
The funny beginnings tragic ending's
I can make a million and still not get enough of spending
And since my life is based on sinning, I'm hell bound
Rather be buried than be worried, living held down
My game plan to be trained in
Military mind of a thug lord sitting in a cemetery cryin'
I've been lost since my adolescence calling for Jesus
Balling as a youngster wondering if he see's us
Young black males
Crack sales got me three strikes
Living in jail this is hell enemies die
Wonder when we all pass, is anybody listening
Got my hands on my semi shoddy, everybody's snitching
Please god can you understand me
Bless my family
Guide us all before we fall into insanity
I'm making a point to make my beat bumping raw life
Drop some shit to make these stupid bitches jaws tight

Go, Niggas want to get it on let's fight
I got some niggas in my click
That make them motherfuckers jaws tight
Go, Niggas want to get it on let's fight
I got some niggas in my click
That make them motherfuckers jaws tight

Chi-Chi bong water bong
'Nough weed for everyone
Enter the class now we kill you with sound
See bad boy with gun, who buss jus' fi' fun
Or black youth them move about a three ton
Soldier from jungle never take back free shot's

As I get up in it
Construction no limit
Pin it like a cat in a dog fight
We gone get it on tonight
For all y'all who put up the wall to stall
But didn't realize that the weak would fall
The best pick out of the crop of MCs got rocked by the fact of realness
But all I see

Let's, go, Niggas want to get it on let's fight
I got some niggas in my click
That make them motherfuckers jaws tight
Go, Niggas want to get it on let's fight
I got some niggas in my click
That make them motherfuckers jaws tight

Up to bring them dukes up
Fuck niggas up 'till they puke up
Shoot up the party if they don't let me in
Get my whole click to let me in
Outlawz

I told 'em
I told 'em
I told 'em
Shut the fuck up
Your voice is hurting working my last nerve
Yo that's my word I'm about to take off
Break off a chunk of this trick ass chump
Who's knowing deep in his heart
He ain't wanting to see no funk
When he drunk
Yeah that nigga done go to him
Ran through him got him thinking he can ruin
Now he thinking I'm pursuing
Who's in, the motherfucking house
'97 we put some paw's on these motherfuckers jaws

I see the same old shit blame it on the jabber jaw's who blabber all nigga's business
Shut your mouth before I shit in it
I got the strength to make their jaw's tight don't forget ho's I got the game to make their draw's right
Don't go Hollywood
That's what they tell me
They bought my fucking tape but I can see that they ain't felt me
Heard what I said they started churpin' like birdies
Drunk off rum bumpin' gum's like girlies
Puttin' they lip's all on my Henn' bottle
Nigga slow down put on the brakes on all that chin gobble
Squabble squabble nigga this is Oakland Beirut
Stop opening up your jaw's thinking that this whole shit it's cute

But it's this I'm hearing
That young Napoleon is disappearin'
But I cancel that shit for I reverse on this clip
And leave you fucked left right something evil
All my life I've been trapped down by my own people

I'm on some shit to make your tummy's turn
Full clip's ready to pull quick
Fuck all that bullshit I ain't concerned
It's evident
I need dead president's the city slicker
Jersey jigger
Feel my residence from we turn

Talk about times is hard
Come take a trip down my boulevard
At your own risk
Got niggas that's homeless
But'll leave you scared

Trapped in these bar's of crime
Droppin' picture my nine hittin' cowards up from there feet to there spine
In this game all rules apply
With no exception's all niggas die living high
With no easy exits

Leave your body over chocking when this gat get to smoking
All you pussies from here to Hoboken
Leave niggas jaws tight




From first glance I know exactly what would Be
u and I have perfect hearts destined one day 2 Be
The circumstances don't even matter because my heart never lies
And if u don't admit 2 this it is u who will be surprised



They could never understand
what u set out 2 do
instead they chose 2
ridicule u
when u got weak
They loved the sight
of your dimming
and flickering starlight
How could they understand what was so intricate
2 be loved by so many, so intimate
they wanted 2 c your lifeless corpse
This way u could not alter the course
of ignorance that they have set
2 make my people forget
what they have done for much 2 long
2 just forget and carry on
I had loved u forever because of who u R
And now I mourn our fallen star



Secrets of war
Get your pen and pads out, you lil' young ass muthafuckas
Alright now, Fatal-n-Felony, you know what time it is
Kingpin Kurupt, with 'Pac
Put your hands on ya, hands ya
Get y'all niggas up
Roll with the secrets now
Secrets of war
Put your hands on ya, hands on ya
Time to roll with the secrets now
Secrets of war
Put your hands on ya, hands on ya
Peep it
Check it

My melody is music that's corrupt as a felony
Lethal weapon rebelling, so dope that niggas inhaling me, uh!
Like Sun Tzu or Machiavelli
The secrets of war, the art of combat, bustin' will never fail me
Constitute while he's asleep and make the game deeper
Now get some infra-red beams and waste them niggas too
You jealous bastards make caskets out ya comfy beds
I got surveillance on muthafuckas beware of my forty-four
Letchu look me inside my eyes say ya good-byees
He was a coward from day one, and died like a bitch, see BIIATCH
Hahahahahaha

We bust if we must, plus, we handle business if you jealous niggas fuck with us, you know what time it is
Secrets of war, we bust if we must, plus, we handle business if you jealous niggas fuck with us
Put your hands on ya, hands on ya
Secrets of war

I diffuse troops with interviews and they metabolism
Sure mad and I'm snappin on rappers actin' they stacks is wit' 'em
Expose you like spades, who the fuck out they heart
I pull your projects apart and find more ism than narcs
We play parks and side streets, keepin' it 9 to 5 B
Last week plan is jump to 21 jump street
Poisonous led, spread ya legs on the rake
Or I'm gettin' mine feel about 29 that's sittin' on the ledge
This ain't the place to creep, so don't be practicin'
How to get my niggas on the block, when you think we sleep
No I don't think ya know our styles, you ain't got shit I wreck
Mechanic will have 'em empty like them 7th ave projects
You half way crooks, ya guys are scared to step foot and look fast
On the strength they can get hit up quick or their shit took fast
I smile, and I'll commitin' murder, money live
Pager 325, on some shit you never fuckin' heard of

Here we go, secrets of war
We bust if we must, plus, we handle business
If you jealous niggas fuck with us
We bust if we must, plus, we handle business
If you jealous niggas fuck with us
Put your hands on ya, hands on ya

Nowadays
With all these fast cash tendencies
Yo straight up, they got me lookin' eye to eye, with all my enemies
Spottin' almost plottin', claimin' to be a fuckin' friend of me
Triple connections, Two Teks sittin' shot gun up in the Lexus
Ready to release some ripples in a nigga mid-section
With bullets that's hollow, rules to follow
Crews get swallowed, down wit' the clowns
Get drowned like deuce deuce bottles
We clique gettin' major, clappin' glasses, spittin' razors
It's insane how I live, it's unexplained
Across the neighbors
Streets of war

We bust if we must, plus, we handle business
If you jealous niggas fuck with us
We bust if we must, plus, we handle business
If you jealous niggas fuck with us
Hands on ya, hands on ya

I've seen it over, and over, no win sit-yay-tions
Engages the death toll to spread like malaria
What I can cock and stop thoughts from circulatin' through ya head
I break, batter and bruise neck, arms and legs
Gettin' ready to drop the bomb like the B-1
Ya 145 pound rhymes and mines a 3 ton
Concoctions, mystic can spot the gator
Before ya get a dosage of the greatest rhyme creator in this existence
Relax and explore the scene, I get this shit pumped the fuck up like morphine
And uh, and uh, and uh

Hahahahehehehe, be-itch
Secrets of muthafuckin' war
Y'all don't even understand it
Secrets of war
And all you lil' young ass souljahs
You play this shit back about 50 times
Teach these bitches a lil' somethin', you know what I mean?
Secrets of muthafuckin' war, live on Death Row, BITCH!
Hahahahahehehehehe
You niggas crazy
Well that was Kurupt
Fatal, Felony
And 'Pac
That nigga Johnny J on the beat so
You know it's thug life




By age thirteen I was buckwild, good at my knuckle game
Made it through a tough childhood never be the same
Walked in my daddy's shoes
No time to be a peaceful man had to shatter fools
That's 'til I put my eyes on you
God damn, sweetheart you got some thighs on you
Now I can't wait to get you home, get you all alone
In my bedroom, baby can we bone, and get it on
Tell me lady how you like me
And if you want it harder baby, come and bite me
But do it lightly; cause that excites me to let it pop
And if you lick me right, I'll do it all night
Only got fucked by a drug dealer
Though I like the way you scream when you lovin' me
I'm goin' deep, it's the thug in me
So whatchu sayin' girl?

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you

Moan baby when we bone it's on
It's so strong niggas in the next room'll cum
I got ya head swingin'
Give me space, as I lick ya face, stick the place
Synchronize so I drive when they kick the bass
Love fuckin' in tha mo'nin'
I get ya wet and bust a sweat, then I'm gone
Left you on yo' own girl
Tell me what you feel like
Blindfolded, I'm cold do it real nice - that's if it feel right
Maybe it's the thug in me
I pull ya hair while we fuckin' in the chair, when ya lovin' me
Up against the wall, you can have it all; just try
Bet my kiss, to get you high, don't pass by
Grab me by my nuts when I'm lovin' you
Now open up and let me put the thug in you

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you

Say baby what's your phone number?
Be warned, I'm like a storm with my own thunder
I make the room rumble, in and out long stroke
Hold ya breath now, close your eyes deep throat
Did you like it?.. Oooh I'm excited!
Cause it's a party in my bedroom, you're invited
C'mon now, let me see ya shake your rump
Tell me, how long will it take to cum
Havin' fun, do it one on one and we can all get involved
First y'all do me, then I'll fuck y'all
When you call me the next day
To get sexed by a nigga in the best way
Yeah baby it's a price to pay
Only play in the fast lane
When you a hustler, motherfuck a cash came
I gotcha goin' wild, cause I'm lovin' you
Drugged out with this motherfuckin' thug in you

A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
That I wanna put in you and you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
I got a lot of thug in me
A thug nigga like me, I need a thug lady like you
That I wanna give to you girl

A little bit of thug in me, a little bit of thug in ya
A little bit of thug in me
I hold a lot of thug in me, you hold a lot of thug in ya
I hold a lot of thug in me
I hold a lot of thug in me, I hold a lot of thug in ya
I hold a lot of thug in me
Now c'mon, I hold a lot of thug in me
Hold a lot of thug in you, hold a lot of thug in me
C'mon, hold a lot of thug in me
Gotta be some thug in ya, gotta be some thug in me
C'mon, hold a lot of thug in me
I gotta be some thug in ya
Can you feel it?
I hold a lot of thug in me, I gotta be some thug in ya
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Do you want it?
I hold a lot of thug in me, feel like some thug in ya

I don't wanna talk, I don't want no explanations
I don't got no motherfuckin' explanations, y'knahmsayin?
It's the thug in me
Don't be askin' why I'm pullin' your hair
And why I fuck so motherfuckin' thuggish
That thug passion, y'knahmean?
Bitch, no mercy
What you scared of? Didn't you come over here to get fucked?
You ain't come over here for me to be
Strokin', and all that bullshit
You came over here to get fucked
Shit, if I ain't fuck you thug style
Bitch you'd leave my house talkin' bout, "2Pac can't serve me"
Won't have me crossed up in that bullshit, hahaha
Turn over! maybe it's the thug in me! ..









Uh, Yeah

Straight from the Terrordome
Where my niggas packin' chrome an extra clip when it's on
Never will I go left, I'm comes right, all night nigga
With Ron G blessin' me with the hype nigga
I punch 'em up, never gave a fuck, holdin' it down
Straight catch it for you goodies then I slides up town
You know the flave, you know I love to misbehave
This ain't a maze, we'll leave you niggas dead in a daze

Follow me, tell me if you feel me, I think niggas is tryna kill me
Picturin' pistols, spittin' hollow points 'til they drill me
Keepin' it real, and even if I do conceal
My criminal thoughts, preoccupied with keepin' steel
See niggas is false, sittin' in court, turned snitches
That used to be real, but now they're petrified bitches
I'm tryna be strong, they sendin' armies out to bomb me
Listen to Ron, the only DJ that can calm me
Constantly armed, my firepower keep me warm
I'm trapped in the storm, and fuck the world 'til I'm gone
Bitches be warned, word is bond you'll get torn
I'm bustin' on Guiliani, he rubbin' my niggas wrong
And then it's on, before I leave picture me
I'm spittin' at punk bitches and hustlin' to be free
Watch me set it, niggas don't want it, you can get it
Bet it make these jealous niggas mad I said it
This Thug Life, nigga we don't cater to you hoes
Fuck with me, have a hundred motherfuckers at ya door with .44s

Hahahahaha, yeah nigga
Thug Life, the waterbed, deadly combination boy
Get up outta here before you get your fuckin' head shot off
Or your ass peeled back, This how we do it out here on this underground
Real shit nigga
Watch out nigga this is '95, niggas barely stayin' alive
You know what I'm sayin' outta court, Fuck what you thought
Better stop thinkin' these niggas is fan
Ron G ain't no mother motherfuckin' joke
It's the heat nigga, now rewind this motherfucker, you know you can't help it

Keith Murray is comin' from the North Side, leavin' everything left as it's guessed
With every breath past proceed the word to death
This is a Keith Murray type of D-Day, so melee
Cause I got more skills than a sen-say
Searchin' for the bottom my flow, you're vanished
My style is still the flyest most transparent
On this motherfuckin' planet
I wish a nigga would try to take it for granted
I'm mad as fuck and my lifestyle is shady
So hey yo Big Lyte, best of three 80's
You see me, you see the L.O.D
Purposely psycho, so magically
M.V.P. of the M.I.C. Rap industry
And shit is still real, here put this shit up against your grill
Niggas know my style, niggas know I'm ill
Moet in the palm, flip then I stay real calm
For niggas tryna false alarm uh
Feel the steel in ya face as I raise the base
And the pace, in ya face
Punk ass bitches know what time it is with N.Y.C
Niggas go purely crazy
Bitch ass niggas get blasted, one, blah, catch it son
Motherfuckers know directly where I'm from
I'm dead serious from Long Island, represent the East Coast
Nigga you get burnt like toast
Cause I don't give a fuck, who don't give a fuck?
We don't give a fuck, you don't give a fuck
So go buck buck buck buck
And duck like a chicken when I'm comin' through, bakin' you
Motherfuckers know my time and they know my name
And my crew, L.O.D, strictly whilin', for D
U.S.A., you see
Keith Murray, comin' through in the fly shit
Fuck around kid, you get your wig split
I don't have it, Ron G don't have it
Big Lyte don't have it, when you see it don't try to grab it
Cause it glitters and it's real gold
Fuck what you heard, and listen to what you been told

Yeah put that shit on hold
Once said piece to the L.O
Death squad
Waterbed
My boy 2Pac, you know what I'm sayin'?
Eric Skinner up in this beast
Niggas got slayed on the edge you know what I'm sayin'?
Eric Sermon and the death squad, y'all word up
New York in this motherfucker
East coast, west coast
From the north south to the

Hard times but hard rhymes
Then we picked up nines
And after that I had gotten into a life of crime
Gettin' mine stickin' laws killin' niggas in the mix
To stay up with my set game, bangin' when I have to
Never ever fail and always down to bust the caps too
At you, and that's how it went to pay the rent
And up in Cali motherfuckers know I'm gettin' paper
And now it's gettin' harder one times is on my tail
I Judge in New York cause I don't wanna go to jail
I'm lightin' up with my nigga Ron G
It's the Waterbed mad, nigga can't you see?
Nothing but the motherfuckin' bass in your face
No more crime I'm doin' rhyme, and gettin' mine up in the place
Bitches on my dick motherfucker can't survive
And nigga recognize motherfucker It's Alive!



Tell me about these fake ass bitches

Look here little nigga
Most of these niggas be bitches too
But you'll never hear that side of the story
So uhh, we finna do this shit like this

It's like I tell my niggas, keep your eyes on these bitches
They love to G a nigga young dumb and gettin riches
What the fuck you think a trick is nigga
Nigga done stick and wet his dick
And then get tricked out all his riches by a -- BITCH!
I'm here to school you to the rules of the game, it'll cost ya
Think you alla that just cause she let a nigga toss her
It's like a motherfuckin priveledge
So don't give up your conversation, give that bitch your 7 digits
When she call ya, ask that tramp whassup
And if she hesitate, nigga hang up, worrrd up
And let that bitch meditate to the dial tone
And call me when you're ready to bone, and it's on
A motherfucking mack tonight
Stay that stay strapped cause my raps is tight
You fuckin punks, I hate you snitches
Went against the grain and the game to be fake ass bitches

And expect them to accept it; girl your heard me it gets skanless
But we gonna kick this shit like this here)


I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin ass niggas and you punk ass snitches

Time to show these bustas who's boss
Run up on a real motherfucker and get tossed
The game is deep, and thicker than a motherfuckin jimmy
Broke hoes runnin round yellin "Gimme!"
I can't stand it, hoes talkin bout they got a man
Shit all I wanted her to do is suck my DICK
So how about hittin a motherfucker on my pager
Busy now bitch but you can give me the pussy later
Fly how I fade her, played her like a game of Sega
Fuckin with the player that done made her, huh
And I ain't sleepin caught you creepin for my money
So get the bozack, knockin hoes back, keep my dough stacked
So where the motherfuckin hoes at?
Punk niggas can't fade the mack, livin fat
Gettin paid to rap, it's like that, you motherfuckin bitches

Oh you too nigga, don't think we ain't talkin bout your punk ass
You old fake ass nigga
Standin there wearin all them Pendletons and khakis and all that
You soft as a motherfuckin grape
Ain't this a motherfuckin bitch
I can see right through your flower ass
Some of these niggas is bitches too, man I tell ya
It's gonna be harder and harder to be a Thug in ninety-fo'
But we gonna do this shit
Y'all take this shit and you play this shit for every single
Fake ass bitch out there
And there's plenty of em
You probably got one sittin next to you right now
Bobbin his fake ass head to this, dope ass shit that he listenin to
Fake ass motherfuckin bitch, die in ninety-four



Watch me
Wipe em scared
Why is it that we gotta be
Contactin niggas in the cemetery
Funeral homes
Buried
Seein' all my homiez burried
Moms all worried and shit
Why is so many black brothaz dyin
One day we can all be together smokin weed gettin high
Maybe in our dreams over sheds is reality
Wheres your family at?
Niggas say one love
Fuck one Love nigga
One Nation

Now it's time for
Retaliation, perpetrating get you punished, how could you
Cross the nigga that put food inside your stomach?
Watch me
Point the pussy out the crowd time to pay for
Past discretions, never learned your lessons in this deadly war
Let's explore the possibilities, them niggas killing me
Head all busted
Over this trick nigga I trusted, now it's
Hard to figure knew this nigga for eternity
And, never in my deepest thoughts figured he could turn on me

So many to choose from
I use to think that's how it should be
I keep stepping with my weapon on queue
Before my crew, remember how you do
Now you want to pursue
Motherfucker)

Every man has a right to decide his, own destiny
In the end it's
And in this judgment there is, no partiality
Overcome all the troubles
What you gonna do?

Now if my memory serves me justly
I showed you love but you the same one that tried to fuck me
And now I got this pistol pointed at your mouth, ready to squeeze
You see, snitching is an epidemic killing disease
Exit
Throw your gun away, take your time, free your mind
Forget about the crime, and it will all go away in time
My information strictly based on niggas faces
Past cases with the law, plus a life of living raw
Brothaz at arms

Every man has a right to decide his, own destiny
In the end it's
And in this judgment there is, no partiality
And that's the only way to
Overcome all the troubles
Let's get it on now
Let's get it on now
Let's get it on now
Let's get it on now

My fight is your fight, we could do this all day and all night
So I tell you what, One Nation, we gon' set up this plantation
This foundation, and we gon' take it to the real enemy
The one who ain't a friend of me
The one, the war continues, the struggle continues
All solider's be friends of me



Chorus
We better 
Tell me what youre gonna do
If we ride or die?
. take one step out of time
. were gonna party all night
. by my side
I love you how youre loving me
Were gonna make steps one two three four
You will be on my mind all the time
Ride or die
Is what I adore
If I got you
And you got me
I promise were gonna be the ones
The ones
 no fun
Were gonna run
Run run run
Were gonna run
Run run run
Chorus



Backed into a corner
alone and very confused
Tired of running away
My manhood has been abused
Not my choice 2 be so blunt
But u must fight fire with flame
I allowed myself 2 run once
and was haunted by the shame
if I must kill I will and if I must do it again
I would but the situation is a no-win



Eternally thug nigga Hilfiger, made by Tommy
So when I speak hope to reach my Boricua mammies
Oh come to poppy, I love it when it's wet and sloppy
In and out the mouth piece, until I cum no one can stop me
My bump 'n' grind ll do ya every time
Come get a blast of this thug passion, it'll blow ya mind
Hey!! Throw up your legs, wrap them shits around my back
It's a West Side thing fuckin' hoes around the map
Walkin' down 125 while I'm peepin' out hotties
And they, seduce my Jimmie, I'll be screamin' give me body
Make 'em all scream my name out, give me my props
And don't ya, love how this thug nigga beat up the cop
I'm at the Rican parade, I'm watching caramel bitches play
Get with real niggas, bullshit ll never get you paid
This is the dream of a young black team
I fiend for hoes cross country like a greedy crack fiend
Now c'mon

I can tell that you want it
By the way your dancing on the floor
By the look in your eyes
I can tell you want some more
Don't worry bout it just keep doing what you do
Girl tonight you can be
International

Ok, look, check it out
Nipsey when I pull up to the club
On them chrome things
I'm crispy
Shining from my wrist to my gold chain
Everywhere I go I keep the hood I never change
If it ain't up on my lap
Got it stashed in the Range
Bang, bang
I'm getting bread on the proper
Private jet anywhere I tell him he go fly to
My respect had these girls saying Daddy I do
Anything you ask get it cracking when I slide through
As God as my witness, right hand on the bible
In Tokyo honey turned it up
Hottie got ?? stroked for show
Now up in Atlanta in the strip club
She thick Cuz took me to the stop, where the crib was
Went full throttle got cracking I ain't bashed yet
From the kitchen to the counter top, in the bathroom
Flips mo', trips mo' stamps on my passport
Told her drop me off at Heartsville
I'm international

LT Hutton, Nipsey)

It's Mr. Hoodnational
Rider with the passport
Just landed from Paris homie pick me up
I'm at the airport
With two bottle's of Moet and a bottle of Port
Can we, get something popping
Cause tomorrow got court
So of course I'm ready to get it
Feel it going down right now
Hopped in the whip
Popped the bottle in a blood right now
Get it out of it about 50 seconds later
The party right now
We celebrating Makaveli - 2Pacalypse NOW's
Escape through the front though they
?Chewed? up on tippy toes
Cruising up to get the door
If you lose a chick then let her go
She done chose it's over bro
Look around it's Harleyville
Dimes in high heels came from Japan
To New York to Cali to chill
They choosing for real with no grill in my dental
Peep, my swagger tremendous make moves monumental
It was me, three mammies, E-40 and 'Pac
? rounds after party it just don't stop

I can tell that you want it
By the way your dancing on the floor
By the look in your eyes
I can tell you want some more
Don't worry bout it just keep doing what you do
Girl tonight you can be...International



WHEN WILL THERE BE PEACE ON EARTH?



Let me show you, the rhyme..
Excuse me - but, Lady Liberty needs glasses
And so does Mrs. Justice by her side
Both the broads are blind as bats, stumblin through - the system
Justice bumped into M'Tulu, trippin on Geronimo Pratt
But stepped right over Oliver and his crooked partner Ronnie
Justice stubbed her big toe on Mandela
And Liberty was misquoted by the Indians
Slavery was just a learning phase, forgotten without a verdict
While Justice is on a rampage
For endangered survivin black males
I mean really; if anyone REALLY valued life
And cared about the masses
They'd take 'em both to Pen Optical
And get TWO pairs of glasses

Excuse me - but, Lady Liberty needs glasses
I'm kickin asses up and down New York City
It's a pity
Brothers wanna be grimy and gritty to each other
What would your mother think, smotherin your brother?
I see you sink, into another level
Dancin with the devil
Turn up the bass, cause I'm player; also a rhyme sayer
Kind of fly, layer after layer
Why.. cause I'm blessed
Cause I've progressed
I've learned my lessons
Class has always been in session, so you better take notes
And stop chokin on negativity



He's braggin about his new Jordan's
The baby just ran out of milk
He's buyin gold every two weeks
The baby just ran out of Pampers
He's buyin clothes for his new girl
And the baby just ran out of medicine
You ask for money for the baby?
The daddy just ran out the door

GIRL! I can't believe him



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Turn me up, turn me up, turn me up, what

Pack your cannons we outlandishly brandish the weapons
Meet Jamaican like you god {U-god?} and 'em handing you lessons
We learn a lot from the 60's like glaring 13 necks
Mainly the niggas get shot for flaring out their larynx
And get to speakin' on a conditions of black people
That's illegal they enforce it with the force that's lethal
Make you wanna grab a gun and throw the all black gear on
Head to congress exercising your constitutional right to bear arms
Leather jackets and glasses and you can tell it's us
The FBI probably bust a nut if we self destruct
Call it militant but ain't nobody killing Barry {Goldwater}
You can't be militant if you ain't got no military
But it's still a very powerful word
Picture some niggas with guns, got 'em very disturbed, word
Now-a-days you could get shot for a cheap necklace
Back then my people bust shots for the free breakfast

Now before you see God, or stand before Allah
You could learn from the stars that fall outta the sky
Everybody act hard, like they got no regard
So we mourn falling stars, they still living all hard

This is for Medgar Evers, Martin, and my brother Malcom
Sometimes we be sittin and wishing for another outcome
My head be spinning, it be full of why's and the how come's
The value of life is so cheap if your skin ain't talcum
We need leaders, we looking at entertainers
It's about the cash, so we respect the biggest gainers
Niggas get paid then they run away from the community
That ain't gangsta nigga, you the opposite of Huey P
Don't be confusing me with haters, player
Blessed by the creator so give money nigga
Just don't bring a plate of food around a hungry nigga
Out on these streets the police is killing
Disrespect and I'm a give you a bar to save your life
Because we don't need no more fallen stars


Stalk the stage with the pride of the panther
Hands off Asada and the blood of a dance floor
Word, rock on, throw the 2Pac on
He's not gone, you hear his influence in pop songs
Shine brighter than those Vegas lights
Illuminating that Vegas night to the party after the fight
'til the gunshots disturb the peace like Luda
Too bad he ain't a white chick in Aruba
They'd have a whole department dedicated to finding the killer
You'd see Afeni Shakur on Larry King, and motherfucking Dennis Miller
Word, Bill O'Reilly would be flapping his gums
How much respect do they have for my people?
Actually none
You either do the nigga packing a gun who hate niggas
Even though every time he pass a mirror he staring at one
My man stressed cause of lack of funds
This the type of shit that make you wanna drown your liver
And blacken your lungs


Now of course this was inspired by 2Pac Shakur
I'm from Brooklyn, you know what I'm saying
Brooklyn know a lot about tragedy
We lost our Big Poppa and our baby girl
This is for our fallen stars
Inspired by the poets, revolutionaries, and activists
From the generation before us
Come and do our thing on this microphone
When else in the history of this country
Can a black man get on the microphone
And say whatever the hell he wanna say?
It's a lot of responsibility
But we standing on the shoulders of our ancestors
So I bear that burden, throw it on my back



Love the way you activate your hips and push your ass out
Got a nigga wanting it so bad, I'm about to pass out
Wanna dig you, and I can't even lie about it
Baby just alleviate your clothes, time to fly up out it
Catch you at a club, oh shit you got me feening
Body talking shit to me but I can't comprehend the meaning
Now, if you wanna roll with me, then here's your chance
Doin' eighty on the freeway, police catch me if you can
Forgive me I'm a rider, still I'm just a simple man
All I want is money, fuck the fame I'm a simple man
Mr. International, player with the passport
Just like Aladdin bitch, get you anything you ask for
It's either him or me - Champagne, Hennessy
A favorite of my homies when we floss on our enemies
Witness as we creep to a low speed, peep what a ho need
Puff some mo' weed, funk, ya don't need
Approachin' hoochies with a passion, been a long day
But I've been driven by attraction in a strong way
Your body is banging baby I love it when you flaunt it
Time to give it to daddy, nigga, now tell me how you want it

How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real
How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real

Allow me to introduce to ya, I'm Fatalveli The Don
Tattooed all on my back, neck, belly and arms
Give it to me, bet you love that nigga whip it out and put it in your mouth now
Grindin' rawdy, holdin' nine inches in ya shorty
Even your baby mama if she keep it poppin' for me
Her brains is bangin', shorty I love the way you want it
Time to give it to Dizza, Baby now tell me how ya want It

How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real
How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real

Whenever Big seth rolled with 'Pac
He controlled the block
Hoodboogers on every set when I hold or cock
They love when they see me thugging with my drug men
Lubricate they miss section, keep 'em bubbling
Mama that walk is mean, my hawkish lean
One to 9 hit the loop and off to them things
I gotta about 9 inches that's brown and bold
So shorty come on my block and these on down the road
Once I bust this release some slushes
You can watch the hammer but you still can't touch this
Till the next time, I'll get up
Back at the club with DJ Qualls looking for the wildest sluts
How do ya want it

How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real
How do you want it?
How does it feel?
Coming up as a nigga in the cash game
Living in the fast lane
I'm for real



I hope it can work out tonight wasssup
I know we been seein' each other for a long time
Yeah, that's right

Another shady mission, had enough of shady tricks
You're so suspicous like watching pictures in hazy vision
Tonight is love making, take you any place you wish
Today we're satisfied, yesterday we've stolen kisses
Blind insanity, perfect pictures of me and my family
Not understanding the destiny, had they planned for me?
If I have kids, will I live to see them grow?
Though I don't know
I live the life of a thug nigga until the day I go
No broken promises, a sacred bond broken
I know I'll die alone, but yet and still I'm hopin'
Visions of prisons, maybe I'll be forgiven
I know it's better in Heaven, ‘cause being here ain't livin'
Close my eyes and see nothing but pain, the world is crazy
Still, looking for a queen to plant seeds and have babies
Maybe I'll be the one, or just maybe I'm lost
You'll never know being cautious, if you play your cards right

If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night
If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night

I'm always in the mix
Life is full of tricks
I guess, tryin' my best
Nothing less, before I lay to rest
My quest and future I'm mourn like a new born baby
Intense and seldom to the world I'm so crazy
My daddy raised me to be a man, do the best I can
He said you won't succeed in life without a plan
It's hard to take my people trade me
With Indian hate, can't wait better change before it's too late

They got me at the bottom of a deck, searching for my Ace
I can't take too many chances, ain't much love in my place
Full of torment and soul, and it's written all in my face
Hollow inside, a crooked smile is the only trace
A mission slightly incomplete
Misconceptions of success and defeat
I roam these dark streets alone
Searching for yo homie, smokin' til I'm gone
When I need someone to kind of lay my burdens on

If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night
If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night

December 30 in nineteen-ninety feen yeah
My reincarnation steps in, born into a world that don't love itself, but the love is wealth
My little nigga listen closely, if you don't remember nothing else
Just remember that life ain't nothing but a game
A gamble, and how you play yo hand will sho' explain
For what's ever
In times you gone journey into a crossroad, get lost tho'
Keep on bailin' and let 'em see you up in floss mode

Mysteriously it seems
Through my deepest thoughts and dreams
It's all wrong,  Pop too long gone
And now way it seems I'm stranded on my own
Abandoned here in a zone
Protect my throne
Pow like king Al Capone style
Fake no jacks on this grind
Coked up with crack I get mine
Living life as a Don, Guess Gortex, Louis Vuitton
With my future behind me, livin' with these snakes
Sent here to blind me, one day I know my future's gonna find me
Am I crying?

If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night
If you play your cards right, everything will be alright
If you play your cards right, tonight will be the night

Would you be patient, and you take your time
And you finess it, 9 times out of 10
Homeboy you gon' wake up with your breakfast in bed
But if you rush and you just be manhandlin'
You can and yo ass can go home tonight Haha
Play your cards right



Sept. 25, 1995

Peace Chuck

Eternal
2PAC
Da Struggle Continuez!

Reach out 4 me soldier!

And if & when u need me
Call me
I'm there!



Uh oh, uh oh
Oh, oh
They ain't ready for this
Uh huh
LT Hutton, Snoog Dogg, T.I
It's that new Pac yall
Uh oh, let's get it, Oh!


Started with five shots, niggas plottin' to kill em'
Never figured that, that same nigga'd sell five million
Hit the charts like a madman nothin' but hits
Court cases got a nigga facin' multiple digits
Dodgin cop cars look at how we come so far
Picture high school dropout rollin' the double R
House full of happiness weed and drink
Way out sortin' trouble tryna find me king
Never pictured livin' longer than my twenty-first
Thought I'd be locked down, cracked out or in the dirt
And though it hurt's to see the change
It comes with the fame
Why we gossip in the silly games
To all the motherfuckers speakin down on me -
This is the night, Why is everybody caught up in Pac's Life
To all ya'll niggas, conversatin' on my life
Mind your motherfuckin' business!


When we first hung out together, I met you with the homie
We had no intentions of becoming homies
But at no time at all, you became my dog
You showed me how to roll blunts, we used to bounce and ball
I was living on Wilshire in the penthouse suites
Had my lil' cousin Daz hook you up with some beats
It was Outlaw, Dogg Pound, Death Row Records, man we tore up the town
Snoop Dogg and Dr. Dre and now we got Pac, it felt like a drizzeam
Remember when I told Suge to put you on the tizzeam
And you know that I was true
Cause I took the focus off of me to put 'All Eyez On you'
And we became the most hunted together, '2 of Amerikaz Most Wanted'
And our relationship was genuwine
Wanna know how I know about Pac's Life? Cause was a friend of mine


Ey, what's happenin Pac' yeah I know we never got to meet
But we know all the same people so we got the speed
You taught me first -- fate nigga can't stop a G
And all that shit you went through meant alot to me
Watchin you lockin up with him, was a shame to see
You know crack in the business did the same thing to me
I get along with real niggas, it's a lane to be
Talkin' loud outta pocket tryna bang wit' me
Well so I'm pullin' out my pocket, let it rain ya' see
Now they all in the court room, blamin' me
See we lived the same life and represent the same struggle
Power to the real nigga and death to the sucker
Money over bitches get to know em' before you love em'
Death before dishonor never talk to army trouble
Live by the same rules, so my wrist's tattooed
With the same sorta' dude, with the same short fuse




The choice is no stranger 2 poverty
your soul or Government Assistance
I'm 18 in a country with no path
4 a young unaddicted Black youth with a Dream
Instead I am giving the Ultimatum



Staring at the world through my rear-view
Go on baby scream to God he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast because it is time to die
Getting high watching time fly
Why will we?

Staring at the world through my rear-view
Go on baby scream to God he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast because it is time to die
Getting high watching time fly, you know?
Staring at the world through my review
Go on baby scream to God he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast because it is time to die
Getting high watching time fly

And all my motherfuckers
Staring through my rear-view
Go on baby scream to God he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beatin' fast because it is time to die
Getting high watching time fly

Come on baby follow me lead

Multiple gunshots fill the block, the fun stops
Niggas is calling cops, people shot, nobody stops
I wonder when the world stopped caring
Last night two kids shot while the whole block staring
I will never understand this society
First they try to murder me then they lie to me
Product of a dying breed
All my homies trying weed
Now the little baby's crazed raised off Hennessy
Tell me, will my enemies flee when they see me?
Even thugs gotta learn to take it easy
Listen, through the intermissions search your heart for a plan
And we turning bad boys to grown men, it's on again
I give a holla to my niggas in the darkest corners
Roll a perfect blunt, and let me spark it for ya
One love from a thug nigga
Rollin' with a posse full of paranoid drug dealers
To the end, my friend
I'm seeing nothin' but my dreams coming true
While I'm staring at the world through my rearview
See, I'm seeing nothin' but my dreams coming true
While I'm staring at the world through my rearview


Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
And all my motherfuckers
Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
And all my motherfuckers

Now I was raised as a young black male
In order to get paid, forced to make crack sales
Caught a nigga so they send me to these overpacked jails
In the cell, counting days in this living black hell
Do you feel me? Keys to ignition, use at your discretion
Roll with a 12 gauge pump for protection
Niggas hate me in the section from years of chin-checking
Turn to Smith & Wesson war weapons
Heavenly Father, I'm a soldier
I'm getting hotter cause the world's getting colder
Baby, let me hold ya
Talk to my guns like they fly bitches
All you bustas best to run, look at my bitches!

Now I know the answers to the question
“Do dreams come true?”
Still staring at the world through my rearview
I said now I know the answers, “Do dreams come true?”
Staring at the world through my rearview

Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
And all my motherfuckers
Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
And all my motherfuckers
Staring at the world through my rearview
Go on, baby, scream to God, he can't hear you
I can feel your heart beating fast cause it's time to die
Getting high, watching time fly
And all my motherfuckers



Can you see the pride in the Panther
As he grows in splendor and grace
Toppling obstacles placed in the way,
of the progression of his race.

Can you see the pride in the Panther
as she nurtures her young all alone
The seed must grow regardless
of the fact that it is planted in stone.

Can you see the pride in the Panther
as they unify as one.
The flower blooms with brilliance,
and outshines the rays of the sun.



You know how we do it
HaHaHaHa

Shit half the times we fought and caused trouble
My closest road dog it was cool 'cause I love you
Fuck what they talkin' bout
Let me take you back in time, rewind to eighty-nine
Introduced me to this life of crime, but we was blind
Little nappy-haired juveniles, livin' wild
No smiles on our faces, thirteen catchin' cases
Indeed, it was misery
Driven by my own demons, 'cause they was killin' me
How can I be sure I'll be saved soon?
Catch me dip into the light, of a stray moon
It's gettin' deeper now, let me get yo' mind right
Fuck yo' enemies, nigga grip yo' nine tight, tonight's the night
Murder murder Mr. Lucifer
Pictures of the devil DUCK when he shoot at cha, it's all political
Runnin' from the future, escapin' in the fog
Live yo' life like a hog nigga, me and my closest roaddogz

All my enemies scatter
It don't matter
They can't see me
These niggas wanna see me dead
Bullets in my head
They can't see my closest road dogz!
Just me and my closest road dogz
You know how we mash these motherfuckers
They can feel it!

Me and my closest road dog!
Mussolini, Makaveli, true to the belly, fuck em all!
Me and my closest roaddogz
Untouchable motherfuckin' worldwide mob figures
Death Row, westside, when we ride our enemies die
You know what time is
Mussolini!

Hold my Glock
My mind's in jeopardy, my thoughts in pass
I know I'll die soon, so there's no need to ask
How will my homeboys remember me
Bury me a G, casket full of Hennessy
We Thug Life niggas
Watch for the second comin'
'Cause I can see the sun
Automatic gunfire makin' all them niggas run
Run from the future, escapin' from the fog
Livin' life like a hog nigga, me and my closest roaddog

Fuses in dark
Since little locs in the park
We kept it tight
Searchin' for light
But none in sight
I know God see a nigga in this turmoil suspense
Trapped in this gutter residence
I convinced
We commence to mash, get the cash is all we wanted
With the desire expired, 'cause every hood is haunted
By killers and jackers, tryin' to make it as a street hog
Bustin' out a coupe in the smog, just me and my road dog
Nigga just me and my road dog
Just me and my road dog
Just me and my road dog

Everything we did as kids was for the turf
Tryin' to make it work, and my women is gettin' her feelings hurt
See that's my road dog, and you my road pup baby
Not likin' him and sweatin' me is makin' shit crazy
Hazy days with penitentiary ways, don't make me choose
Military days escalates, so you know you lose
I'm crews and do chaos, drivin' through county
Disappear off the earth, only my road dog could find me
Always on the side of me, and danger parleyin' on better days
Took off the hope to stay down forever to our dyin' dayz
I pray to y'all way every night to leave this white across
Whoever go first, don't let the other get lost
Playa Boss, is what we call ourselves
Soon as we got a taste of wealth
Now we sound like niggas with a bigger arsenal on our shelf
Train this group of G's, Death Before Dishonor
Shakin' fleas, fuck with these you a goner
My age partner, on my side do we ride
We synchronize information, makin' hits, pullin' licks
Buildin' our reputation
In the hood, from a tiny to a G hog
Nothing comes close nigga, then me and my road dog
Just me and road dog  livin on the mutherfuckin' edge
Just me and road dog
Nigga, just me and my road dog
Just me and my road dog



Alright, alright {*people applauding*}

I know my heart has lied before
But now it speaks, with honesty
Of an invisible bond of friendship, that was formed, in secrecy
Coming from me this may seem hard but, but to God I swear - it's truth
We are friends for eternity and for-ever I will always love.. you..

What of a love unspoken?
Is it weaker without a name?
Does love exist without a title
Because I do not share it's name?

All my life I've dreamed of
Of meeting one with immense beauty and
And once I found her I would charm her and
I found her and, indeed she is all that I, wished for and more but she
Then I think to myself what.. can I offer her
The tears warm my eyes and blur my, vision I
Stick to my stance of bravado and give her
The same uninterested look that she, gave, me
But what.. can I offer her?

You say that you'll love me forever but
But what about today?
As the dusks become the dawns and the years pass on will you
If so let us rejoice and bathe in this constant pleasure
If not spare my heart today and I shall recover before, forever
And if my doubts and questions upset you
I just wanted to know if you'd love me forever before today

What of a love unspoken?
What of a love unspoken?

{*applause and shouting*}



Tat Chat Chat Ooooooooooh
4th Avenue Jones'
Ha Ha Oh yeah, lemme tell ya now, oh yeah

Wedding bands rock the heaviest metal
And I'm the center hip hop
So either we rhyme or design the beat to flip with
Don't stick with music 'cuz I hand lose it
It seranades me while I land cruise it
If I'm stressed or soothing
Something I can make the fans move with
Said I be singing til I saw you was like "Man, who dis?"
While JD Mingle be gettin at you with a brand new twist
Switchin my linger, wishin I could be the one you cling to
I ask you for you number maybe I can ring you
Six months later when I'm sick my baby bringin me food
Hang with the fellas I said "Mainly, I'll be hangin wit you"
Since you finally did it, now we together mind, body, spirit

4 Life
My Wife 4 Life
You say, "Yes"
Yes you will be my wife
My wife my wife

I bet you be strapped at point little pubs
Said she never give her number out to dudes in the clubs
That's the boogees and exceptions cuz she's showing me love
Body bangin like the county but I avoid the rub
Prolly to use to dudes jockin, all I asked was a hug
So she slid me the digits, mashed out in a Bug
A couple months pass, and we the item 'round town
But I'm feelin like the worm, like she just want me for the rebound
She fresh outta - relationships that only got her - heartache and pain
Frustrated because of drama
I'm lookin' at your face picturing kids and I can see em
Til death do us part we got the match and mazzaliam
On poppa's DM, I'll put you in the chrome BM
You different from the rest you love God and MCing
50 karat, you my wife 4 life, we got our backs and it's apparent

4 Life
My Wife 4 Life
You say, "Yes"
Yes you will be my wife
My wife my wife

So ya heard
When I asked
That night you'd be my wife
Not for this year or next
To accept me when I'm seein
And to understand
Not to make this dim in the rain
Which comes as hard as any
I'm not the best of men
My fault has come scarse tonight
But my heart has always - been to give to my wife

Tena Jones, been picky 'bout men, don't want some common fella
Contaminatin' me like salmanila
Workin undercover like my rhyme umbrella
Keepin it shady, I'm not going for it though, not even maybe
Showin' proof to you the difference from a rag and from a lady
I can do for myself, makin my bacon living gravy
And thankin' the Lord, 'cuz more importantly He saved me
I shot for the moon - lookin for comets like I'm Haley
I found me a star companionship is what it gave me
I'm beautiful too, and not because my hair is wavy, that's my baby
I said

4 Life
Your Wife 4 Life
I say, "Yes"
Yes, I will be your wife
Your wife your wife

4 Life
My Wife 4 Life
You say, "Yes"
Yes you will be my wife
My wife my wife



I never had a father figure
I was raised by the thugs and the drug dealers
- That's why I love niggas !
Until they place me in my casket, guess I'll be a hopeless bastard
Gettin' high in the back, plastered
Can't nobody make a way for me - times is hard
On a nigga, mama pray for me
I'm smokin' weed for the stress and drinkin' for the pain
From the strain on the young brothers brain
Ain't a motherfucking thing to do, but hang and stay true
Thugs get lonely too..
I'm drinking 22's of brew, till I'm tipsy
And I ain't going out throwing up my middle finger, miss me ?
Tryna get my hands on the cash
How long will it last, will it last a little longer if I blast ?
And trust me, I'll probably be the last to preach
Cause ain't no hope for the future if they asking me
And what my poppa never told me -
You see I learned from the kindness of strangers and homies
So now I can't turn back, time to make it through
They wanna ban me, while tryna feed my family
And muthafuck Hollywood !
For tryna shut a real nigga down, stayin' true to the game
Fuck the fame, I still won't change
R U Still Down ?

R U Still Down?

Now up and at em it's on, I was raised to be strong
And mama told me be a thug since the day I was born
I came up out the gutter never changed my style
Got for real about my papers, cause the game was wild
And the fame was a plot to try to change me-ee
And what's strange is nobody knew my name 'fore it came
Now the whole world is calling me a killer
And all I ever did - was try to reach the kids with the real
All the time I was ballin', never heard my friends callin'
Couldn't stop myself from fallin', I'm all in
Shit's gettin' sleazy, believe me
Best to take what ya need, but don't be greedy
Cause in my mind I see sunshine, I thought
Take your time to feel my record, and if you did
Chill a second, my blind method, will still wreck it
My young homies stay strong
I wonder if they'll listen to a nigga when he gone ?
R U Still Down ?


I'm gettin' high, so a nigga think he touch the sky
Turn tough inside, in the rush to die
Livin' life as a thug time to face the truth
What's goin' on with the wasted youth ?
Please God, come and.. save me
Had to work with what ya gave me
They got a nigga goin' crazy
I can't read the signs.. i'm blind
But a nigga know he need his nine, cause times
They ain't what they used to be
Ain't a penitentiary built..
Big enough for me and my niggas on the streets
Man listen ! cause these ain't the old days
Ain't no way I'mma bustin my ass and gettin no pay
It seems I can't find my focus, and homey I ain't paranoid
I seen the future and it's hopeless
Lord knows, its hard on a young scrub
It seems I had less problems when I slung drugs
But since I'm lacin young brothers with the game
Wanna see me locked in chains and tryin' to dirty up my name
And them same motherfuckers that was callin' me
Will be the first to turn their backs, when I'm fallin', see ?
I should have seen it from the jump, but now it's clear
One nigga got the town in fear
R U Still Down ?

All I want to know - R U Still Down ?
Tell Me - R U Still Down ?

*multiple times*
Tell Me - R U Still Down?
R U Still Down ?



This go out to C. Delores Tucker
Bob dole
And everybody else who feels like uh
They stronger than the constitution
Freedom of speech big baby
Freedom of speech
Outlawz!
Outlawz

You can't break me never made me, busta soft ass beats
This Outlaw style got a brother off the streets
Miss Delores Tucker sue me I won't stop
'Til we get justice for these crooked cops on my block
Time Warner full of sissies, tell 'em all to miss me
A bunch of hypocrites whistlin' Dixie
Good riddance cause you never should of touched me
You cowards knew you couldn't take the pressure I'ma make you sorry
Trust me
If I wasn't spittin' it'd be prison or death
This rap game all we got left
So try to comprehend where we comin' from
Life as an Outlaw, ain't meant for everyone
So here we come
Recognize how we organize
Strategize now we unified brothers on the rise
And we can't stop

Don't you stop
Nooooo

Don't you stop
Nooooo
Don't you stop
Nooooo

You don't really wanna stop - stop
The only thing that we got
I bang knott's, so how much you plot
On these youngsters, millions of 'em that's lovin' everything we say
Cause at this every single day yeah
But in turn busta's slippin' on it
So get up on it, don't be an opponent
Cause this is feedin' my family, take it away
And see me in every single place you plan to be
Don't stop

I got 58 ways to get out of the game
But only one way's gonna fit my name; Hussein
Ride by, with the block, I can't stop
Not even for the cop's will, I close down shop
Yo, I broke nights to get big, gettin' rope spot's hold it tight
Runnin' with fat blunts niggas ain't rollin' right
Temp this
Senseless, relentless in every sentence but above that
Brain driller, fuckin' Fatal's a walkin' pain killer
Insane iller than caine, Uzi cops, then watch 'em fear ya
Who's next?
I'm ready to check a neck in a second
Gripin' the TEC and slap' ya head because I snap under pressure
Cuttin' circulation
Stranded on the plant the earth's chasin'
Scared of probation now I'm facin' death tryna hurt a nation
Burn like acid
Fart, blunts and Jurassic, Park
My bastard ass click we got the strip mashin'

Don't you stop
Nooooo
Don't you stop
Nooooo

You don't really gonna stop, hayy
You don't really gonna stop, haha
You don't really gonna stop, hayy
You don't really gonna stop, haha

Mhm!, I won't stop the music, I won't stop the music
Don't you stop
Nooooo
Don't you stop
Stop the music



Nooooo, nooooooo...

Picture of perfection, the object of a nigga affection
Partners in passionate sex, a place to put my erection
Fantasies of you in submission, freaky positions
Pushin', pullin' and twistin' I'm on a mission got me on the mash
Tried to dig, you was screamin' when I did
Steady yellin' out spots for me to hit, and "aw shit"
Soon as I seen her saw us playin' hide the weiner
Wanna "Freak Like Me", fuck Adina
Up and down is the object, side to side
Make you holla out my name when a thug nigga ride, "Can I cum inside?"
Say you don't feel it that's a lie, you just scared to get this
Penitentiary dick, the trot caught your eye
When I walked by, I said, "Hi"
But you was so shy, I can't lie, damn near stuttered when you walked by
You want me to lick it and even worse
Got your heart set on me goin' first, and that ain't no fair exchange

Only one thing that you, can do, for me
Baby you can treat me right, we can do it all the night
Nothin' more than our fair exchange
Hit my G-spot and make, me scream, your name
You can do whatever you want, I got what I want and gone
Nothin' more than our fair exchange

Open your legs
Got me marchin' like it's a million, you tremble from the feelin'
Look up, cause I got mirrors on the ceilin'
And if you willin', then we can ride until the sun shine
And just for fun, I betchu I can make you cum 61 times
Close your eyes, let me heat it up
Cause when we fuck I refuse to bust a nut until I beat it up
Drop the top, time to fuck while the wind blow
Baby throw yo' legs out the window
Remember on the balcony, bend over baby bounce on me
And let me hit it where it counts and flee
Remember me? "I Get Around," and I'm haunted by my "Temptations"
Sexual participation, my motivation
Even though I like the way you work it
You don't deserve it cause you walk around actin' like you perfect
Took a while but I finally got it, and like a boss player
Bitch you ain't doin' me no favors
Fair exchange

Only one thing that you, can do, for me
Baby you can treat me right, we can do it all the night
Nothin' more than our fair exchange
Hit my G-spot and make, me scream, your name
You can get whatever you want, I got what I want and gone
Nothin' more than our fair exchange

Now yo' attitude ain't realistic
Yeah it's true I'm gettin' pussy, but baby you gettin' dick!
And since you bein' laced with the penetration
It's only right to show a form of appreciation
Instead of fakin' like you can't hear the bed shakin'
In bed naked you so twisted think yo' legs breakin'
You said take it so I'm blind in my passion, how long will I last?
Doggy style steady pumpin' on that ass, until I blast
And then I laugh as we lay back
See I wait 'til you asleep and that's the payback
Cause you actin' like you did somethin', givin' me a piece
I had you mufflin' your screams in the sheets, fuckin' with me
A true digger that love triggers, a thug nigga
Hustlin' bitches like drug dealers
Before I say goodbye, put an end to all the games
Here's my number for another fair exchange

Baby you can treat me right, we can do it all the night
Nothin' more than our fair exchange
You can get whatever you want, I got what I want and gone
Nothin' more than our fair exchange
Nothin' more than our fair exchange
Hit my G-spot and make, me scream, your name
You can get whatever you want, I got what I want and gone
Nothin' more than our fair exchange

Fair exchange
No one, gives me lovin'



Old jealous ass motherfuckers
Yo 'Pac, baby what's up?
What's up my nigga? Greg motherfuckin' Nice
That new?, yeah
You're countin' there baby 'Pac?)
We gotta get our cash man, to do it
We got the West side and the East side
Oh man, this is how we do it
East West, west east to south, that's how do it
They can feel it, We're the fuckin' realest, let's do it

How we; Our own styles
How we; Our own styles
How we; Our own styles
Our own styles
How we; Our own styles
How we; Our own styles
How we; Our own styles
Our own styles

Don't you love it? 2Pac free shit, that reach the public
Still I, believe my speech so deep that all my real niggas dub it
Ass naked rhymes in these cash makin' times
Got me losin' my mind inside the lines of these wicked rhymes
Label me a ghetto star, comin' up quick
Shit!, fuck what you heard, we be runnin' this shit
It's plain to see, my whole damn clique shine bright
Always knew the real niggas would end the shit when the time is right
Now East to West is irrelevant, we're doin' it worldwide
Ha ha, similar to bitches, like girls they hide
They die slow, when I ride low, bumpin' this beat
I bury, all bitch made niggas, comin' for me
I rock them to sleep, then evade the cops
I'll never go alive, 45 Blazin' shots
Still gettin' mine, livin' blind, search for salvation
Still got my guns, but I visualize One Nation
My work is done when my niggas get their cash in stacks
Get your ass on the cash checks, mash in packs
Forever ballin', the alcohol callin' me
And I still, bust on them all till they crawl to me
To all my Hip Hop junkies and my niggas in jail

HUH! HUH!
Peep out how we freak our own styles
Peep out how we freak our own styles
Peep out how we freak our own styles
Peep out how we freak our own styles
Peep out how we freak our own styles
Peep out how we freak our own styles

Enter; make yourself welcome! 'Cause E.D.I. is hostin'
Rollin' with niggas on the mash, coast to coastin'
We don't be boastin', no high postin' is allowed
Makaveli hit us a lick and we set to make 20 thou'
But it's all gravy, baby who does this daily?
It ain't amazin', real niggas trail blazin'
Man, stays in constant flow 'cause we gots to get it y'all
Always had a passion for cash so now it's gettin' critical
Digital, display relays that on this day
The East Coast/West Coast war is now history
Feel me? then picture me rollin' with niggas from Hoboken to Oakland
Puttin' it down more potent than that shit you're smokin'
One Nation!

Young Noble, I'm calm and casual
Bomb like the Arabs do, the end be tragical
Televised, I'm nasty new, the revolution comin'
What you gonna be shootin' or runnin'?
My crew was trained for gunnin', soldier state your name and number
We're racin' Hummers, tryin' to catch the sunset
We lace state runners, a handful of death threats
So what's next? A war plan and a strategy
Battle me to the death, there's none left to hell with casualties
We made niggas under trainin', trained triggers for the aimin'
Jersey claimin'; ain't a damn thing changin', One Nation!

Peep out how we freak our own styles

Said what? - said what?

I been rockin' mics since Sergio Valenti
Down for my people just like Kunta Kinte
Got more Boricua mommies than Tito Puente
My man 2Pac picked me up in the Bentley
You come from the East, come to speak peace
Come from the West, bring the Buddha bless
Come from the East, come to speak peace
Come from the West, bring the Buddha bless
It ain't no motherfuckin' hair off my chest
Time is hard, I rock a bullet proof vest
Met so many yes men, so many yes
They try to gas my head like Hess
The heavenly father put me to the test
Divide and conquer what I do best
Ain't nothin' to it but alleviate stress


Ha ha ha ha shit, was it ever a war?
Today we sign the treaty EAST SIDE / WEST SIDE
Nobody tryin' to be clashin' and shit
Motherfuckers tryin' to get their cash
So I'ma just ride out on this motherfucker
Let my Oakland peeps let you bitch made niggas know how we roll



See it ain't easy being me
Life as a celebrity is less than heavenly
I got these fakes and these backstabbers chasing me around
And it's always drama, whenever I wanna get around
Momma told me, long before I ever came up
Gotta be true, to what you do and keep the game up
Cause thangs change, and jealousy becomes a factor
Best friends at your wife's house, tryin to mack her
I'm on tour, but still they keep on knockin at my door
And I got no time to worry, I'm steady wanting more
Every day is a test yes, I try hard
But I'm strugglin with every breath, I pray to God
That the woman that I left at home, all alone
There ain't nothing like trying to bone, over the phone
In my mind I can see her naked, I can't take it
Got me shaking at the thought that we can make it
I thought you


Been in the streets all day, Rogue Doggin it
Hey then punani comes my way, straight callin it
Get me some 151, pineapple juice and Malibu Rum
That mixture got me thinking of raw doggin it
Jim'd on, cause them angels be hotter than brimstone
That's why the Nina keeping the Jims on, and then bone
Red-light room heated got the red bone seated
On me, repeat it now she's looking like she can't believe it
I'm having fantasies tossin under the canopy
Causing calamity sexual insanity
With your firm breasts, chocolatey over my body
Now it's on just, let me eat you like manicotti
Hold the garlic, cause I'm ready to start it
Touchin me thinking of my women til I'm retarded
I'm thinking Sharon, Kim, Honey J, Shanna Kell, Horny Fay
And how I made them all bust, baby it's all lust
A killa medley
I love it cause you women make me abuse one of the seven deadlies
We two, Tech and 2Pac will see you
In our room with your Victoria's Secret see-through
I thought you knew


I sit alone in my room drinking, without a care
Talking out loud to you, like you're there
Take your picture out my back pocket, man it's on
You're the first face I wanna see, when I get home
Wanna love you til the sun rise, buckwild
Touchin every wall in the house, thug style
Put your hands on the headboard, think of me
Drippin sweat on top of you, sink and see
This in yo head that I'm makin love, so turn the lights down
Reminisce and relax, cause baby right now
I feel it in the middle of my stomach
You whisper in my ear and baby tell me how you really want it
Hold on tightly, watch the ceilin
Scratch my back's how you react, let me know you feel me
Cause everything I'm givin to you, is so true
And thugs get lonely too, you know


Yeah, Thug Life Baby
Steady thuggin
Ay so you remember that next time you sweatin me when I'm on the road baby
Thugs get lonely too, we ain't gotta go through all this bullshittin ass problems
If you wanna be real with me, be real with me
If you wanna be fake, move on to the next one, that ain't me
You know



It would be like a panther
asking a panther hunter
4 some meat, all
High school dropouts R not DUMB
All unemployed aren't lazy
and there R many days I hunger
But I would go hungry and homeless
Before the American Government gets my soul



Act like
Don't call me bitch, punk niggas and all fakers
Weak muthafuckas ain't nothin' but playa haters
Traitors, and all you ever did was hold me down
Slow me down, but everybody knows me now
So what you do is sit and think of a plot
How the hell can we make money off a nigga like 2Pac
This shit dropped and it got me hot
Niggas smiled like a bitch, while I gave you props
I should've saw it as a tip off
But you was riding my dick, a little bit and wouldn't get off
So I couldn't see the real mission
'Cause you smile in my face, and when I leave straight dissin'
What my partner told me
"Yo Pac watch yo back everybody ain't ya homie"
Should a saw you as a front and fake
An envious snake ready to take my fuckin' plate
Some is like a never have a friend like this
I clench my fist and let it end like this
And we can handle it the way we must
But it dust for a nigga that betrays my trust
Don't call me bitch

Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch

Don't call me bitch
You claim to be lady like
You wear your clothes so tight
That you excite the shady type
And at night girl you're the type to get freaky
When I see you in the daytime you're squeaky
Clean, what I mean is ya can't be a fiend for the green
And expect to get treated like a queen
'Cause the brothers on the blocks not havin' it
Let your fat ass pass little scandalous bitch
Now ya fucked around and that ass got fucked)
I came equipped with some shit to get ya tipsy
'Cause a bitch is a bitch
She will use any trick to get me
And last year I used to be a saint
Runnin' around sayin' trust a bitch but now I can't
In '92 I'm living heartless
Tryin' to make a million out of 14 tracks so don't start shit
Niggas need to mind they dome
'Cause the time is on for them to find they own
Jock a nigga 'cause he did a major flick
Now you're mad 'cause I won't let you page me bitch
Don't call me bitch

Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch

I was got paid, but I remain true to my trade
I worked hard like a slave, to fin to rap to the grave
It's like a rope, I hung it 'cause I knew I was dope
While others giggled and joked
I watched and took notes
Never surrender, that was my motto as I keep strong
Second best for too long, critics I will prove wrong
Or dissin', no one would listen, they was dissin'
My record wouldn't sell they said somethin' was missin'
Claiming I was radical, 'cause I was true to the streets
But did the streets been true to me?
How the fuck would I look if I changed?
Actin' strange 'cause I got a little fame
Ain't that a bitch, I was born in a beat down shack
Ain't no turnin' back and now I'm makin' stacks
And ever since the movie
Hoes want to pop that coochie
Every time it suits me
And still I'm the same
I haven't changed my name
Still pledge allegiance to the game
Pledge my life to the ghetto ways
Do whatever it takes to get paid a day
Refuse to lose, never smoke crack
A mack is a nigga wit' the biggest sack
So baby pick a winner, don't die and swear
As long as that's your hair I'll take you there
But don't call me bitch

Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch

Dedicated to the scandalous hoes out there
Don't call me bitch
I be seeing you at the clubs you know tryin to sue a nigga
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
But I call you big Pac, nigga you playin' me like one so
Yo don't call me bitch
Yeah, and for them muthafuckas that tryin' to get me to sell out, fuck is on they muthafuckin' mind, shit
Don't call me bitch
Yeah, I told you dont call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Yeah, don't call me bitch
This one goes out to my partners in the live squad, ey see y'all?, Black Mafia
Y'all alright you know what I'm sayin'
5 niggas in this motherfucker, you know what I'm sayin'
Digital Underground, ron keys and the whole motherfuckin' stank
Any of ya know what I mean
Big john motherfuckin' singleton in the house, heartless records in the motherfuckin' house
Watch for a nigga on the big screen and you know what I mean
Don't call me bitch
Watch muthafuckas trip off of this song
But last year he was singing brendas got a baby this year hes sayin' don't call me bitch
Yeah, call me bitch
Some of you niggas are bitches too
Some of you niggas are bitches too
Some of you niggas are bitches too
Yeah, don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch
Don't call me bitch



I mean what?
People going crazy over this?

It don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'

Now I been called crazy, to fade me it's not possible
I give a fuck, what you thought, or who you brought witchu?
A Bad Boy killer, Biggie annihilator
They wonderin' why he breathin', but bitches is dyin' later
Better laugh now, then cry when I come to get you
I hit you with two Glocks, and leave you with scar tissue
On some loco shit, my pistol smoke yo' shit
Let's go for dolo bitch, and watch me flow yo' shit
Mr., Makaveli movin' pieces like telekinesis
It's like a chess game, let's play wit' real pieces
Shots rang and niggas brains was spilled
Another Bad Boy affiliator nigga was killed
I hit the funeral and bust at his folks
And leave the scene like a shadow in a blaze of smoke
It don't stop, keep goin'

Don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'

Shit, still grindin for the chips
I come from the clear but you can find him in the bricks
Me, I was the diamond in the sticks
And him, he hatin' and still whinin' 'cuz I'm grindin' with his bitch
Out shinin' with the sixth, I'ma blind him with the fifth
He still sellin' nicks, what he tryin' to throw a disc?
I promise you'll be lyin' on your strip
'Cuz copyin' my style, whippin' any 9 you can get
No crime on the strip, just dimes of the pit
No gimmicks to my music, you be lyin' when you spit
Outta line you get gripped, I'ma find you a ditch
Right next to your OG, do your time with a snitch
And I tell 'em all the time you a bitch
A real life pussy, hit the strip, go and find you a dick
Man this nigga outta line who is this?
I'm tempted to put his mind on his kicks
Let the 9 do the trick, yeah

Don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Why must you be unfaithful?  For women..
Men, you shouldn't listen to your selfish heart
It doesn't really have a brain
Besides keepin you alive, it's existence is in vain
And how could I be so mean, and say your heart has no place?
Because mortal men fall in love again
As fast as they change their face
I may be cruel, but think awhile about the hearts that you have broken
And match that, with the empty vows and broken promises you've spoken
Now I'm not saying females are perfect
Cause we know, it's not true
But why must you be unfaithful
If her heart is true to you?





You have now tuned in to your girlfriend's favorite DJ, DJ Creep
Subscribe to get the latest hot mixers

Want to know how I did this shit, want to know how real my shit is, nigga go read the motherfucking newspaper you trick-ass nigga

Murderous mind state, can't keep my nine straight
Sipping on this Hennessey, waiting for the time to break
Show up and motherfuckers bow down, recognize
Westside, Death Row, Outlaw riders
Untouchable mob of pistol packers
Well known felons, labeled for drug selling, merciless jackers
Forever buzzed roll with thugs and dons
Commence to letting off rounds, then escape in the fog
Who wanna see me solo? Catch Makaveli while he sleeping
My mini-fourteen murdering niggas while they creeping
Duck or you ass out, drink till you pass out
Ain't scared to die, drunk driving in my glasshouse
Niggas is under me, they bitches come to me
They heard the stories nigga, now they want to really see
Bomb first my motto is fully guaranteed
Niggas is player haters, label them my enemies, I'm dumpin'


Untouchable riders, murdering niggas
Ha! Scared to die


The country bud got me chokin'
I'm on a mission to the point that motherfuckers think I'm smokin'
Yeah that sick nigga Biggie wit the 8 shot fifth
Wit the extra clip for that extra shit
Don't you know that killing is thrilling
All the blood spilling, is all a part of drug dealing
A born gangster my daddy was a thug
Had a .38 with the hollow point slug
So when he licked shots
Niggas dropped quicker than a bootlegger sells his liquor
A little nigga tried to squeeze .22's in my Reebok shoes
Payin' dues, while kids was on their one's and two's for me
Now I'm much older, colder, fuck a holster
Got the Mac .11's swingin' from my shoulder
It's a damn shame I got to put my momma through the strain
I'm livin' in a house of pain


My niggas crooked though it seems
My every single thought is caught up in collecting cream
A made nigga; picture me dying in a blaze of gun fire
Will not retire til I'm paid, turn the base up higher
When we ride, we fly by, bitches blow me kisses
Niggas from Compton to Brooklyn come on get your riches
From Crenshaw to 125, and Do or Die
Rolling with niggas from Long Beach to Long Isl'
I hardly smile cause my heart froze
Once I; commence my show rip apart foes
And now I, got One Nation it's a crooked compilation
Just to end the bullshit, let's get back to money making
Tell them busters that I rolled on controlling the house
My shit is so wicked when I flip, niggas closing their mouth
The Cocoa Brovaz, Buckshot the BDI Thug
Greg Nice, L.S., Asu, so show a nigga love, Outlaw!





California love!

California, knows how to party
California, knows how to party
In the city of L.A
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rocking! We keep it rocking!
Now let me welcome everybody to the wild, wild west
A state that's untouchable like Elliot Ness
The track hits ya eardrum like a slug to ya chest
Pack a vest for your Jimmy in the city of sex
We in that sunshine state with a bomb ass hemp beat
The state where ya never find a dance floor empty
And pimps be on a mission for them greens
Lean mean money-making-machines serving fiends
I been in the game for ten years making rap tunes
Ever since honeys was wearing Sassoon
Now it's '95 and they clock me and watch me
Diamonds shining looking like I robbed Liberace
It's all good, from Diego to the Bay
Your city is the bomb if your city making pay
Throw up a finger if ya feel the same way
Dre putting it down for Californ-I-A


California, knows how to party
California, knows how to party
Shake it shake it baby, shake, shake it shake it baby
Shake it shake it mama, shake it Cali
Shake, shake it baby
Shake, shake it shake, shake it, shake it Cali
Out on bail fresh outta jail, California dreaming
Soon as I stepped on the scene, I'm hearing hoochies screaming
Fiending for money and alcohol
The life of a west side player where cowards die and the strong ball
Only in Cali where we riot not rally to live and die
Dressed in Locs and khaki suits and ride is what we do
Flossing but have caution we collide with other crews
Famous cause we program
Worldwide et 'em recognize from Long Beach to Rosecrans
Bumping and grinding like a slow jam, it's west side
So you know the row won't bow down to no man
Say what you say, but give me that bomb beat from Dre
Let me serenade the streets of L.A
From Oakland to Sacktown
The Bay Area and back down
Cali is where they put they mack down give me love!

California, knows how to party
In the city, the city of Compton
Shake it shake it baby, shake, shake it shake it baby
Shake it shake it mama, shake it Cali
Shake, shake it baby
Shake, shake it shake, shake it mama, shake it Cali
Uh, yeah, uh, long beach in the house, uh yeah
Oaktown, Oakland definitely in the house
Frisco, Frisco
Hey, you know LA is up in this
Pasadena, where you at
Yeah, Inglewood, Inglewood always up to no good
Even Hollywood trying to get a piece baby
Sacramento, Sacramento where ya at? yeah
Throw it up y'all, throw it up, throw it up! I can't see ya
California love
Let's show these fools how we do it on this on that west side
'Cause you and I know it's the best side
Yea that's right, west coast we coast
Uh California love, California love
California, knows how to party
We keep 'em rocking, we keep 'em rocking!
Just c'mon just shake it baby baby baby shake it mama shake it mama sha' Cali'
Rector scale talking about a earthquake on the rector scale-la'
City of Compton, city of Compton where the girls shake their booty's
Shake it mama, shake it baby, shake shake it baby, shake shake it
Computer-puter-puter-puter-puter-puter-puter, Joe



What you wanna do
I'm right infront of you
If it's a problem just let me know
I never front on you
But what you gonna do?
Nothing! You 'bout to get your ass whipped bitch
I'ma roll like I'm fucking 'posed to
You a lame you ain't coming close to
What I got now, quit the fronting dude
Before I'm stomping you
If you a thug fucking tell me what you wanna do
What chu 'gon do

First off, fuck your bitch and the clique you claim
Westside when we ride, come equipped with game
You claim to be a player, but I fucked your wife
We bust on Bad Boys, niggas fucked for life
Plus Puffy trying to see me, weak hearts I rip
Biggie Smalls and Junior M.A.F.I.A. some mark-ass bitches
We keep on coming while we running for your jewels
Steady gunning, keep on busting at them fools
You know the rules
Lil' Caesar go ask your homie how I'll leave you
Cut your young ass up, leave you in pieces, now be deceased
Little Kim, don't fuck around with real G's
Quick to snatch your ugly ass off the streets
So fuck peace! I'll let them niggas know it's on for life
Don't let the Westside ride the night haha
Bad Boy murdered on wax and killed
Fuck with me and get your caps peeled
You know

See, grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, oh
Who shot me, but your punks didn't finish
Now you about to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga, I hit 'em up


There they go, packin' stadiums as Shady spits his flow
Nuts they go; Macadamian, they go so ballistic, whoa
He can make them look like bozos
He's wondering if he should spit this slow
Fuck no! Go for broke, his cup just runneth over, oh no
He ain't had him a buzz like this
Since the last time that he overdosed
They been waiting patiently for Pinocchio to poke his nose
Back into the game and they know
Rap will never be same as befo'
Bashing in the brains of these hoes
And establishing the name as he goes
The passion in the flame is ignited
You can't put it out once we light it
This shit is exactly what the fuck
That I'm talking about when we riot
You dealing with a few true villains
Who stand inside of a booth, truth spillin'
And spit true feelings until our tooth fillings
Come flying up outta of our mouths
Now rewind it – pay back, motherfucker
For the way that you got at me, how's it taste?
When I slap the taste outta your mouth
With the bass so loud that it shakes the place
I'm Hannibal Lecter
So just in case you're thinking of saving face
You ain't gonna have no face to save


We be
The best of CG
Greedy
Abduct the PD
See me?
Nigga, not in 3D
Be me?
Hah, it's not easy
I'm breezy
And off the heezy
Me and my woman's like George & Wheezy
Movin' on up, niggas use to tease me
See me on top
It makes you queasy
Sick with it
Bitch, I'm Bruce Lee
Seduce me
You're nice and juicy
In the parking lot, I gots to get mine
Why the fuck we goin' in when there's bitches in line?
I spend my time watchin' bitches' behinds
Thinkin' bad shit in the back of my mind
I bump and grind with nothing less than a dime
Making movie money, you still investin' in rhymes




Yeah, its another classic cassette, Goin Way Back Show, exclusive you know what it is
What you won't do... do for Love...
Hey yo let me rock this, let me rock this, let me rock this, check it out, check it out
Let me tell you a story about my homie and his girl, you know what I'm sayin'
Some Love triangle type shit, we goin' rock this shit right here
So dope beat to you know what I'm sayin'
We about to run through this
So yo check it out
Smooth you drop the vocals, and I'll smoke his ass

I lay awake tonight because I want to be with you
If you were beside me I'd playfully kiss you
Each time I see her, the feeling gets stronger
We sit a bit closer and stare a lot longer, huh
Reach for my drink and for a second we touch
Went to mutter I stuttered cause I want you that much
The situation is a no win
Cause he's my best friend
But now I'm guilty, I'm fallin' for his girlfriend
It's like a trap that I'm sinkin' in to
I wake up sweaty when I'm sleepin' cause I'm thinkin' of you
Then we make eye contact and I can't hold back
Tryin' to shake it but the feelin' comes right back
Now I'm confused, cause I'm no Casanova
But you keep callin' me sayin' to come over
What do I do, you make it hard for me to cheat
What I won't do for Love

Yeah yeah yeah
What you won't do
Ah yeah
2Pac in the house

Scars, tears on your pillow and you still stay
As you sit, and pray hopin' the beatings will go away
It wasn't always a hit, and run relationship
It used to be Love happiness, and companionship
Way back when he treated you good
Moved you up to the hills out the ill's of the ghetto hood
You felt as though you owed him your life
It felt right so you said yes now your really his wife
He got you pregnant but the baby just wouldn't live
Something she couldn't give so things got negative
But that's when a stranger came through
And he's pesterin' you about the things you couldn't do
You say your happy at home, right?
But that's just a lie, as you cry through a long night
Until I came to rescue you, makin' you chose
What you won't do for Love

And you don't stop, and you don't stop, in the house, what you won't do for Love
And you don't stop, and you don't stop, what you won't do
Yo Smooth, kick and laugh while we givin' shout outs to my homes' you know what I'm sayin' noow
Shock-G is in the house, yeah
Schmoovy-Schmoov is in the house, yeah
Kush is in the house, yeah
Ryan-G is in the house, yeah
Clark Gable in the house, yeah
Rick Rocks in the house, yeah
Fuze is in the house
And Money-B, you know he's in the house
Pee Wee is in the house
The Underground, is in the house
And the Jaketown is in the house, yeah, in the house
Oaktown, is in the house, Richtown, is in the house, yeah

What you won't do

What you won't do

Do for Love



You can run the streets with your thugs
I been waitin' for you
Until you get through
I'll be waitin'
Until you get through
I'll be waitin'

Now that I reminisce on my reflection
Close to perfection, as a nigga can get, without protection
You never tripped, and even though we had our fights
Dinner every night
I'm cussin' and fussin' like it's impossible, to get it right
Time alone, away from home, 'cause I can do, bad on my own
Lookin' for more than just another bone
Will I be happy now I'm grown
It seems we have a problem with jealously
'cause you interruptin' while I'm on the phone
I got some bidness to handle so baby understand
Can't spend my whole life up under you, I'm a grown man
Could you respect me if I wasn't driven
All up in prison or even worse just barely livin'
So sympathize 'cause my motto was baby pimp or die
Still strivin' for thuggin' 'til I die, so simplify
I need some time to get my head straight trust in me
When I finally be you'll be my queen
Just let me run the streets

I'll be waitin'

I'd rather run the streets to make some mail
And put the game down tight
For these gamin' bitches could get it right
It might be a plan that I'm choosin'
Don't get in confusion
Because I'm known for showin' examples, how I do it
Thinkin' I'm new to this, because I'm younger
Where I'll only leave you suspicious and to wonder
And at the end I make a come up
Nigga, was raised up
Off of M.O.B
Fadin' me over somethin'
That's tellin' me don't run the streets

So tell me am I wrong?
For tryin' to communicate through a song
I'm up early in the morning, by sunrise I'll be gone
All my homies is waitin' for me
Plottin' on plans that we made, and all the fun that it's gonna be
So meet me at 3', and don't be late nigga
We hangin' out all night, while drinkin' straight liquor
I heard it's poppin' at a club
But they say I can't get in, 'cause I'm dressed like a thug
Until I die, I'll be game related
Got me strivin' for a million, stayin' motivated
Now that we made it
It's a battle, just for the big money
I'm livin' wild, no smiles, 'cause ain't a thing funny
I came up hungry just a little nigga, tryna make it
I only got one chance, so I gotta take it
Ya never know when it's all gonna happen the rappin' or the drugs
But until then Give me love
And let me run the streets

Until you get through
You can run the streets with your thugs
I'll be waitin' for you
Until you get through
I'll be waitin'
You can run the streets with your thugs...



Well goddamn let's give these niggas
The secrets and the rules since these muthafuckaz, are fuckin'
Outlawz in this muthafuckin'
Mojo no go
Hm, uhgagaga
Secretz of war

Alright now
Put your hands on ya, hands on ya
Outlawz in this muthafucka
Fatal

There go my enemies, my heart beat, pump with ease
So I bust instead of waiting for you punks to squeeze
Give you all of my 3 pound rounds, so you can fall
Bit the fact that Outlawz just kicked down your door
Bitch niggas be fouling out, hacking me with them wack rhymes
Grabbing ya .9, shooting scared, tryin' to take mine
I'm putting pressure on you niggas when I mobb
Deep bringing the heat to your dirty ass squad
You can ride, point blank range, peep game
Bitch nigga I'm caught at project steps with the Tec
Murder next, and rob any nigga any set
Hussein, the type of muthafucka dying with trey pounds
Ghetto types we drown, hollow points from the waist down

We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business if them jealous niggas fuck with us
We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us

Now, as I approach the scene, from smoking green, got my eyes closed
Niggas I call 'em my foes, I make 'em die froze
Watch me make 'em bleed, makin' G's, Lord help me with it
Got me painting pictures of a meal ticket, help me get it
See me and pray for oxygen, but the pressure's non stop
Niggas get to pistol poppin', then watch the body drop
I'm a lethal threat, watch me hit yo set, flash on
Blast on them bitch made niggas with my mask on
Do it for profit, plus I'm, lookin' for punks to bust on
If you ain't screamin' WestSide, you can get the fuck on
I'm seeing demons hittin' weed, got me hearing screams
Scared to go to sleep, I watch the scene like a dope fiend
Probably be punished for it, although you can't ignore it
I live the life of a thug nigga, and die for it
Niggas past the clip and watch me bring 'em to the floor
I got some shit that they ain't ready for, I got the secrets of war

We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business if them jealous niggas fuck with us
We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us

Kadafi, we do this thug life shit like 4 5 6 dick 'em
Down with no rounds left up in the pound when it sounds
Squeeze the lead off!, I blow his motherfuckin' head off!
Signal all the other Outlawz, as soon as shit set off
Yaki Kadafi, it ain’t a cop here to stop me
These streets is black Hockey, your MOB? weak and sloppy
Put a pamper on your silly ass pre-style grammar
Locked in the slammer while I’m layed cocked cocked back like a hammer
Y'all newly wed’s throwing honeymoons, well times about up
Dummys I Leave no trace found with you face down stuck
Your biggest cannons couldn’t come close to touch or even hit me
Doin' my dirt puttin' in work on your block tipsy

We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business if them jealous niggas fuck with us
We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us

Check the murder rate percentage, niggas is finished
Getting blood checks from clinics, this thug shit is in us
Flowing through my system, you a victim, blunts.. I twist them
Fuck the whole world it’s us against them
You got the heat? Pull it out, and cock the hammer if you with it
Don’t make no difference here, with a 25-to-Life sentence
We already doing life on the street, like Al G
Niggas be heated when they walking the beat
This shit is Flakey, making fags shaky, Niggas hate me
Scared to face me, knowing that the Outlawz raised me!
Put me up on game, put me up on a hustle
Once I flex my money muscle, all the cheese got doubled
Moving shit like a dolly, beating niggas like Rodney

We go to war we bust if we must, plus
Handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us
We go to war bust if we must, plus
Handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us
We go to war, bust if we must, plus handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us
Outlawz
Outlawz
Outlawz
E more
Makaveli
E more
They ain't ready for us
Fuck with us
They ain't ready for us
Outlaw
Outlaw
E more

Secretz of war
And all you lil' young ass souljahs
You play this shit back about fifty times
You'll have enough game to roll up in a club or somethin'
Teach these bitches a lil' somethin', you know what I mean?
Hahahahahahaha
You niggas crazy
We go to war, bust if we must, plus handle our business when them jealous niggas fuck with us)
Young Noble
Fatal, Felony
Secrets of war
When we ride
Always have a good time
You know it's Thug Life
Jealous niggas fuck with us
Handle our business
Aiite



If my enemies love their kids
Only if my enemies love their kids
If my enemies love their kids
If my enemies love their kids
Only if my enemies love their kids

Hey, why have drama
Nigga, your baby mama stay right around the corner
I could touch her if I fuckin' wanna
So why you wanna insist to diss
I got your name at the top of fuckin' dead bitch list
Meet Mr. Makaveli's terror
Mack of the year, thug of the era
Death Row and Outlawz, nobody does this shit better
My lyrics explode on contact
Best prepare for combat
Ain't no stoppin' so bomb back
It's the last days, niggas is dyin' for bullshit
MAC-11 is heavy yet I'm ready to pull quick
Niggas ain't ready for a brother that's livin' major
Bear witness to a sick motherfucker that's spittin' razors
When I cut 'em they cut, when I stick 'em they stuck
My ambitions to bust, 'cause I ain't givin' a fuck
We tore the neighborhood up, look at all the shit that we did
Murder's a life long bitch
If my enemies love they kids

You don't wanna die
And I don't wanna kill ya
Keep my name out ya mouth
'fore a nigga have to drill ya
All my enemies buggin' for all the shit that they did
Don't make me murder you nigga
If my enemy's love their kids

Body's is wrapped in plastic
Look at this, it's drastic
Just takes a nigga with the right automatic to cause static
Like a Mossberg dumpin', and muthafucker do jumpin'
Make 'em role of a bitch
Like Michael Jackson, " Wanna Be Startin' Somethin' "
Holla at my crew and they perish you through the cherish
Got that ass in my sight
Tonight I'm bussin' off the terrace with multiple gun shots
Niggas is droppin' rapidly, bussin' clip to cops
Them bitches is runnin' after me, tellin' I'm high
When they ask why I'm trippin'
Out top of my drop, 'cause you know why, keep dippin'
On my block they sell rocks and box with frail cops
And then we buss shots from Glocks, fuck cops
My only fear of death, can you hear me, it's comin' back
Had enough of this bullshit world so none of that
I felt no remorse for all the shit that we did
Niggas dyin' in, hear the sirens
If my enemy's love their kids

You don't wanna die
And I don't wanna kill ya
Keep my name out ya mouth
'fore a nigga have to drill ya
All my enemies buggin' for all the shit that they did
Don't make me murder you nigga
If my enemy's love their kids

Muthafuckin' right
You niggas better wise up
It’s a real muthafuckin' war nigga
You wanna get with me
How the fuck you gon' get with me
If you got kids muthafucker
If my enemies love they kids
I’ma let my lil' homeboys ride on you busta muthafuckers
'Cause y’all don't feel me
Eh yo Mu, K, Malc
Ride on these bitch ass mothafuckers
Ride on 'em!

I don't even wanna talk no more
Losin' your life, what for?
Facin' a young muthafucker who puts it down for the dough
Get killed in front of your kids
God forbid if it happens
Cuz the shit I'm on now 'til you pass on us Rabbit
Gotta survive by myself
But at the same time they rappin’
Won't put my gun on the shelf
It keeps me livin' like heaven
But when the shit jumps I'm ready
'Cause I already knew
You better get this muthafucker before we come get you
Deep in my heart I think this shits bout to pop any moment
Tryna do me like my parents but I'm a tougher opponent

This nigga scared
Must investigate all I'm prepared
For all the drama, you said
For all them niggas you feared
You fuckin' busta, busta
Let the evil or the money trap you and thats life at you
Every second we comin' at you
And you the last one
When L-rock is tryin' cast on ya
Cuz a Young Rida who would die
Pump up and blast on the thug past you
Blastin' on enemies passin'
Gigglin' when they should have been figurin' who would be the last one, laughin' while I switch your wig
I gotta ask ya’ll somethin'
Don’t you muthafuckers got kids



Yo, I can see, that you obviously, don't know me
Or my homies We O-U-T Lawz, fuck the phonies
A wise hustler once told me
"It's on you", though in his dreams when he first told me
Now it's true, I got love for you
Only to a certain extinct, niggas ain't worth shit
Cops and ride dick permits
I heard this and heard that about them O-U-T Lawz
Some of them soldiers got shot, some of them soldiers fell off
Fuck y'all now everybody tied to us
Hollerin' out a nigga name, but never said what up
That shit critical, despicable, unforgivable
Thuggin' but we still spiritual, clear lyrical
I'm like the fuckin Deff Squad, my ears ain't hearin' y'all
Pump fearin' y'all, but damn I ain't even wantin' to scare y'all
Listen to what I tell y'all, fuck the world
Your baby moms, and your baby girl
You muthafuckas so fake, yo they made me wanna earl
Blake, hate snakes thug hatin' the degree
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
Thug niggas

We, will never, fall
Through it all, we'll always stand tall
Cause in the end we'll be remembered as some young muthafucka soldiers
And if you believe in that shit that you heard
Y'all don't know us, y'all don't know us

Now I've been trapped down, and fucked from day one
This indestructible style of mine, ain't no fun
Where I'm from, you sure to see about 10 niggas in a bedroom
Eatin' off the same spoon, sweepin' with the same broom
It's hazard, if you don't want yo life, well give me grab it
I was born inside a love zone, with a Glock-nine young marriage
It's critical
Then one of them sat down livin' so mystical
And influenced with a heart full of anger it's so ridiculous
So give me some with 21-gun soldier salute
With a 19-inch black handle snake knife in my boots
Straight from the strong, thug to your life
Right into yo' wrong, I'll put the good to yo' evil
I'm the shells to your chrome, you dig that?
I'm life, I'll bring the moon to your night
I'll put the dick to your wife
And I'm the Jesuz of your Christ
You dig that? respect this
I'll bring the end to your claw
I'll bring the loc to your heart, and I'll put the snoop on yo dogs
You hear me?
We follow, this little bullet so hollow
I can promise that estacy ain't promised tomorrow
With this two man mades, me and my soul death astrayed
I watch my parents get blowed away
Now look what it made
I'm something to face
This ludacy then with me, then with chemistry
Got my eyes on you, the first time you cross me
I'll be fryin' you, cause y'all don't know me

We will never fall
Cause in the end we'll be remembered as some young muthafucka soldiers

When we was kids, the lovin' felt good
But of course have the respect, though it's even better
Now for this chedder, niggas is layin' deader
Then Malcom and Martin, put together
Oh Lord only knows, where we'll end up
Remember
But we wasn't listenin', too busy trippin off his shine
Now one time for my muthafuckin' Outlawz
Napoleon, Noble, and Kastro, may we all roll
And if you don't know, we got the rap game petro
Scared cause we 'bout to release, like heavy metal
Nationwide, underground, we runnin' the ghettos
Stealin' all of ya fan base, like we kleptos
Bitch I can't let go
I been strugglin' too long, thuggin' too long
And niggas is stealin' my shit, and bustin' it wrong
Hot shots holla back, when you get 'em
Outlawz'll sic 'em, bustin' back at the system
Military wisdom, preparin' myself for armageddon
Breakin' my balls at this game, knowin' it's a dead end
And my only weapon is my believe that I'm superior
Yeah, we the muthafuckas you niggas is liery off
Controlin' my steam, knowin' my team, to serve more
Fuck the reframe, stick to the game and earn more
Holdin' my head, rollin' the head with focus
Laughin' inside, cause deep inside, y'all don't know us

We will never fall
Cause in the end we'll be remembered as some young muthafucka soldiers
And if you believe in that shit that you heard
Y'all don't know us, y'all don't know us
Through it all, we'll always stand tall
Cause in the end we'll be remembered as some young muthafucka soldiers
And if you believe in that shit that you heard
Y'all don't know us, y'all don't know us

Ain't never know niggas like us boy
They don't make niggas like us no more
See ya soon.. uhh



The sun.. and the moon

{*begins to speak in another language*}

Ah uno enah a toha
Agitri gete ah lihi
Adola tee; Talhi; a Dalahi
Ah yeneaha; Anokya talahi
Adohawe niti; Nihi adoukahali
Kanati kalahati talha
Tihanuetah; He tel ha
Be nah ha tak ha
Oosof nehee

Your ways are similar, to the rays of the sun
Warm to many, but too strong for some
The more you are needed, the brighter you shine
Watch them for too long, your brilliance will blind
The eyes of mortal men, threaten you with doom
They regret to see you, set, but it is time, for the moon



Back in elementary, I thrived on misery
Left me alone I grew up amongst a dyin breed
Inside my mind couldn't find a place to rest
Until I got that Thug Life tatted on my chest
Tell me can you feel me? I'm not livin in the past, you wanna last?
Be the first to blast, remember Kato
No longer with us he's deceased
Call on the sirens, seen him murdered in the streets
Now rest in peace
Is there heaven for a G? Remember me
So many homies in the cemetery, shed so many tears

Ahh, I suffered through the years, and shed so many tears..
Lord, I lost so many peers, and shed so many tears

Why would a guy kill for cash?
But when a nigga's desperate make way for the pump blast
On the news prime time, because its black on black crime
So I'll never stay in your mind
I just dash gotta get the cash all day
Went from struggling straight to bubbling
Now I pray that a nigga remains calm
Oh god will I bust?
Will I fall off or will I still keep kicking dust
Trust, I get down from the ground
Plus I pack a pound
Perpetrators getting shot down
We suffered through the years, shed so many tears
Pouring out respect for the homies when we crack beers
My fears faded
A drug related death will make a nigga have to take a deep breath
And bust a left down memory lane
Where my nigga caught a teflon slug to the brain
And yo, shed so many tears

Now that I'm strugglin in this business, by any means
Label me greedy gettin green, but seldom seen
And fuck the world cause I'm cursed, I'm havin visions
Of leavin here in a hearse, God can you feel me?
Take me away from all the pressure, and all the pain
Show me some happiness again, I'm goin blind
I spend my time in this cell, ain't livin well
I know my destiny is Hell, where did I fail?
My life is in denial, and when I die
Baptized in eternal fire, shed so many tears

Lord, I suffered through the years, and shed so many tears..
Lord, I lost so many peers, and shed so many tears

Now I'm lost and I'm weary, so many tears
I'm suicidal, so don't stand near me
My every move is a calculated step, to bring me closer
To embrace an early death, now there's nothin left
There was no mercy on the streets, I couldn't rest
I'm barely standin, 'bout to go to pieces, screamin peace
And though my soul was deleted, I couldn't see it
I had my mind full of demons tryin to break free
They planted seeds and they hatched, sparkin the flame
Inside my brain like a match, such a dirty game
No memories, just a misery
Paintin a picture of my enemies killin me, in my sleep
Will I survive till the mo'nin, to see the sun
Please Lord forgive me for my sins, cause here I come...

God, I lost so many peers, and shed so many tears

Lord knows I.. tried, been a witness to homicide
Seen drivebys takin lives, little kids die
Wonder why as I walk by
Broken-hearted as I glance at the chalk line, gettin high
This ain't the life for me, I wanna change
But ain't no future right for me, I'm stuck in the game
I'm trapped inside a maze
See this Tanqueray influenced me to gettin crazy
Disillusioned lately, I've been really wantin babies
So I could see a part of me that wasn't always shady
Don't trust my lady, cause she's a product of this poison
I'm hearin noises, think she fuckin all my boys, can't take no more
I'm fallin to the floor; beggin for the Lord to let me in
To Heaven's door -- shed so many tears

Lord, I've lost so many years, and shed so many tears..
I lost so many peers, and shed so many tears
Lord, I suffered through the years, and shed so many tears..
God, I lost so many peers, and shed so many tears



Bitches be paranoid looking at a nigga all crazy
I'm just looking, SHIT!
I'm just looking baby, ha ha ha


To me it's hard to tell what you really want
Quit acting mean to me, you're teasing me the way you flaunt
But you ain't hearing me, sincerely, I'm so attracted
Pictures of target practice making love on my mattress
Visions getting graphic
So realistic you could grab it, it's a proven fact
Baby gotta have it, my love making quite magic
Tricks is for kids bunny rabbit, let a man have it
Bet you'd be satisfied if you tried my habit
High performance is hard to handle
Naked in the bubble bath while I'm burning candles
Sex me like a slow song
If fucking you was bad baby then I'm so wrong
My feeling's so strong
I keep staring like you can't see me
I never planned to scam, my thoughts ran freely
There is no need to be paranoid, ain't nothing popping
I ain't worried about your man baby girl cause I'm just watching


You know what? - You know what?
I'm taking trips to Cabo, with my Death Row family
We're out on the road, we're sporting Diamonds and Gold
We're pushing Yachts and Jet Skis, smoking on hell of weed
We're trying to have millions man, y'all can have them Gs
Bitches flocking up eying nothing, all about them papers
We're standing away from the player-haters and the impersonators
But we're sporting Gators and we don't cater to no hoe
From San Diego to Vallejo and all the way down to Idaho
You know, you wonder why this game don't change
They say you gotta have a way from the very start
So when I step into a club like Magic Cities
They be greedy with passion and the whole Atlantic city
And pull up to a seed that had never sparked
And post up, just like the Double R
Don't get mad; cause a nigga ain't spent shit
I'm just watching it and besides I'm a pimp, bitch!



Now tell me how you feel about me, the whole world know about me
Don't doubt me, you got me hardship, your pussy all on my dick
I sleep with Dubs down your drawers
Take it from my dogs, where your ass be at, bitches all their ass
Shaking asses and titties but you they say don't touch
I wanna fuck, that's all I wanna do to suck
Watching and clocking, ain't no stopping when the music popping
Death Row got the party off the hook

As soon as my eyes open, the first thing hits
Me and the homies on the strip, fuck around with some Swiss
As soon as I hit the corner I'm on ya, eyes on scope
I'm about to soothe on my way to see Daz, 'Pac and Snoop
There's something cute about five foot six
And no sweat, I'm on set for the triple double twist
That's why I trip, I got to clear my mind
Take a couple hits of this bomb
Nate Dogg hit the switch to say fuck you bitch
Cause if I spent I'm taking two pussy, I just wanna fuck
Even though deep down I know she got some bomb ass pussy
So what would you do? roll, pass and just stop
Or coast up on the corner like a dog and just watch





Right there, star three



























Guess who's back, and ready to knock off a cop or two
Cause me and the crew could still get our rocks off
The Penetentiary don't stop a nigga cause he's in jail
Hell I'm makin' more money on the street from here in a cell
I'm livin' proper, the coppers is havin' fits
I just made the profit, you punks ain't stoppin' shit
I still remember my momma told me
Find the cop who killed your brother
Send him to Hell lookin' homely
Cause a real nigga love the law
What's raw is a nigga that's above the law
Keep pressin' your luck and get fucked, huh
Think a nigga don't know whassup 'cause he's locked up
But in the meantime, it's get swole get clean time
Concentrate on gettin' green time
And as the years go by, they forgot
About the small time soldier from the block, huh
To kill the crook they threw the book at me
Don't worry be nappy, don't even look happy
Put me in the hole, gave me cold cuts
Did push-ups until I swole up
And then they offer me a furlough
But what they don't know as soon as I get free I'm killin' five mo'
They asked me if I changed much
I told em 'Yeah' even though I'm still the same nut
They started askin' me questions about my brother
And makin' remarks about my mother, hmm
Wait a minute, hold up
Makin' jokes about my folks'll get yours blown up
They sent me back to the hole for what I told em
I guess he didn't believe me, so I showed him
He went home to find a tragedy
Nigga, that's what you get for tryin' to badger me
And anybody else that wanna sweat me
I'm already in jail so you punks can't get me
You better pray they never see me
Cause if they let me free, prepare for trouble on the streets

When I get free, huh
When I get free, huh
When I get free

When I get free, huh
When I get free, huh
When I get free

When I get free



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

When your heart turns cold
I say, when your heart turns cold
It causes your soul to freeze
It spreads, throughout yo' spirit
Like a, ruthless, feeling disease
The walls, the walls that once were down
Now stand firm and tall, safe from hate love pain joy
Until you feel nothing at all
When, your heart turns cold
I say, when your heart turns cold
A baby's cry, means nothing
A dead corpse is trivial
Mother's neglecting children is daily
Loneliness, becomes your routine friend
Death death death seems like tranquility
Sleeping is never pleasant
If you even sleep at all all all
You forget ideals and, turn off the reason
To make sure the product gets sold
You don't UNDERSTAND how I behave, just wait
I say just WAIT WAIT WAIT til your heart
I say til your hearts turns COLD!
HA HA! Cold! Cold, cold, cold.. collllld..



And uh, I started out dumb, sprung of a hood rat
Listening to the radio, wishing that I could rap
But nothing changed, I was stuck in the game
'Cause everybody in the industry was fucking me, man
Listen; I've got a scheme, break away, do my own thing
Drop some conversation, sit back and let the phone ring
Niggas ain't wanna see me rise
97 watch me cut these motherfuckers down to size
And if I catch another case, Lord knows how they hate me
Got a player in the court room, please don't let 'em frame me
I've been dealt a lot of bad cards living as a thug
Count my blessings and throw my stressings in this land with no love
Maybe they see me rolling, look at all this green I'm holding
I get this why they envious and get their eyes swollen
Hoping the heavenly father love a hustler
Meet the hardest nigga on the Earth to ever bust a nut
My homies tell me, "Have a heart" — fuck their feelings
I've been trying to make a million since we started, we cold hearted
Niggas in masks that'll blast at the task force
Empty out my clip, time to mash, they asked for it
Me, Makaveli, I'm a motherfucker
We break bread, now we thug brothers
Niggas talk a lot of non-shit I choose to ignore it
A war they ain't ready for it

Now what'cha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
Now what'cha gonna do, when my niggas come for you
Tell me now what'cha gonna do, When my niggas
Come for you?
Now what'cha gonna do, when my niggas come for you

Watch me clown, give me loving when I'm high
I'm an outlaw baby, I'll be thugging 'til I die
In my drop-top double-R, life as a rap star
Hustle like a crack fiend 'til they catch me
Go ask somebody to your show
Watch them niggas out the sight of my night scope
Cooking white dope got my nigga 25-to-life stretched out
Trying to have all the better things in life
Well Makaveli — a born leader, 10 millimeter
Change a nigga's future like a schizophrenic palm reader
Heed, from out the bible I read
See the meek shall inherit the Earth
And the strong will lead
Hittin' weed like it's alright
I'm in the studio making music all night
My enemies cry whenever I rise, they hated 'til the death
Trying to beat me out my last breath
Whatcha gonna do?

Now what'cha gonna do?, when my niggas come for you
Tell me now what'cha gonna do, When my niggas
Come for you?
Tell me now what'cha gonna do?, When my niggas
Come for you?
What'cha gonna do, When my niggas come for you?

Who's to blame for my mind frames
This poverty does money game
Got me fiendin' for riches wantin' to kill for a taste of fame
Recurrin' dreams of illest ears, front page magazines
Livin' life like a thug queen
But instead, I'm having nightmares
They call 'em Outlaw premonitions of premeditated missions
Livin' conditions suspicious, so they got me on they hit-list
Wishin' that I was slip like a wet bitch
But it's the timin' nigga
And I've been waiting for years, I put my grind in nigga
I see you smoking, 'cause I got what you wanna flaunt
My every calculated move is a nail through your coffin
Now what you don't know is I got 16 point holler
Thugged out female war shot-caller
Now what you gonna do?
Where's yo buster ass crew?
When my niggas come for you

Now whatcha gonna do when my niggas come for you?
Now, nigga now, now whatcha gonna do when my niggas come for you?
Now whatcha gonna do when my niggas come for you
Now whatcha gonna do when my niggas for you
Hahaha
Shhh
When they come for you



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Right now, it is it is almost.. it is almost uhh
IMPOSSIBLE for you not to see how strong rap has gotten
Y'knowhatI'msayin, it's it's like umm..
Our our brothers and sisters, our youths, and some of our adults
Their ear is PINNED to rap music right now
And if you really wanna get our message out
And really wanna start teaching, we need to start doing that
We we really need to start using, our methods
Y'knowhatI'msayin?
The Last Poets did it with poetry
And uhh, and and.. even in our history
From a ancient Afl- African civilization
Poets went from village to village
And that's how, stories and messages and lessons were taught
Y'knowhatI'mssayin, and so like you say, history repeats itself
And so.. it it was, it was.. at it was, y'know obvious
It was, pick it up, y'know?
Bein the race that we are, bein the strong race that we are
We picked it up, we picked up those positive, those positive vibes
And we started rappin and so
I think it is, it's a very good medium too



My letter to the President
Tell me what to do, these niggas actin' up
In the hood Send mo' troops
Dear President
Tell me what to do, these niggas actin' up
In the hood Send mo' troops

Why should I lie, when I can dramatize?
Niggas fell victim to my lyrics, now traumatized
Simply by spittin' I’ve been blessed given riches, enemies suspicious
'Cause I’m seldom in the company of bitches
Plus the concepts I depict, so visual, that you can kiss
Each and every trick or bitch, inside the shit I kick
My heaviest verse’ll move a mountain
Casualties in mass amounts, brothers keep countin'
Fuck the friendships, I ride alone
Destination Death Row, finally found a home
Plus all my homies wanna die, call it euthanasia
Dear Lord, look how sick this ghetto made us, sincerely
Yours I’m a thug, the product of a broken home
Everybody’s doped up, nigga what you smokin' on?
Figure if we high they can train us
But then America fucked up and blamed us
I guess it’s 'cause we black that we targets
My only fear is God, I spit that hard shit
In case you don’t know, I let my pump go
Get ride for Mutulu like I ride for Geronimo
Down to die, for everything I represent
Meant every word, in my letter to the President

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo’ troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo’ troops

Oh you's a baller in the White House
I hope you comfortable 'cause yo' I spend my nights out, with the lights out
Under the safety of darkness
Amongst the crazed and the heartless
And young soul bros
And a Mr. cobra contest
With all these problems my world
Spendin' this drama on earl
My President never seen senate with pleasure like
Whatever momma tell me she hit it
No not the lottery shit
Meanin' she do what I ain't do
Break her off before I did
Slip deep into the mind of a loner
My foes say fuck him, he’s a goner
But it ain't no shorts up on these corners
On a mission
Listen, let’s ease my guard with precision
Personally my decision
When I realized this ain't livin'
How you really ain't know
How this ghetto life go
For me and all my homies, when our enemies bone
You got the C.I.A
And we got our A.K
For protection, in our section
In the felony days

Mr. President I represent the ghetto
Tell your wife hello, I got to go
I be brief with this pedigree
Niggas is locked and said blocks on Penitentiary life
More niggas in jail than baptized
For centuries minority families how you stay lackin'
Homeless shelters over-crowded and you still taxin'
Homies dyin' out who got the clout, not me
You get more time for five grams, than a half a key
Black poppin' rocks, and whites on the potty rhyme
And why don’t test mine, rather die than let you see me cry
Across the border ask the lord to put somebody in your seat that cares
How can we stay in this world we supposed to share
Democrats, Republicans scum me to the concrete
No education inflation's covered by white sheets
Try to ball legally conspiracy surrounds me
So I’m a outlaw from now until eternity
Forever Mussolini

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo' troops
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
These niggas, actin' up

Heavenly Father may I holla at you briefly
I wanna meet the President, but will he meet me?
He’s scared to look inside the eyes of a Thug Nigga
We tired of bein' scapegoats for this capitalistic drug dealin'
How hypocritical is Liberty?
That blind bitch ain’t never did shit for me
My history, full of casket and scars
My own black nation at war, whole family behind bars
And they wonder why we scarred, thirteen lookin' hard
Sister had a baby as an adolescent, where was God?
Somewhere in the middle of my mind
Is a nigga on the tightrope, screamin' let him die
Can’t lie I’m a thug, drownin' in my own blood
Lookin for the reason that my momma’s strung out on drugs
Down to die, for everything I represent
Meant every word, in my letter to the President

Blacks is broke, think it’s a joke that we livin' low?
Y’all sniffin' blow and postin' what they hittin' fo’?
Tell the secretary it’s necessary we get paid
Look what you made, little kids gettin' sprayed
Day after day, and night after night
Battles and wars to the daylight
We might change and rearrange if you do somethin'
'Til then we gonna keep it comin', Mr. President
And I meant every word in my letter to the President

Hehe
Word motherfuckin' life
Fuck this nigga think?
Cuttin' taxes, takin' off welfare
We 'sposed to just sit here, go broke and die, starvin'?
Motherfuckers crazier than a motherfuckin' scout
Nigga this Thug Life, Westside Outlaw Immortalz nigga
We fin' to hustle 'til we come up

Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do
Dear Mr. President, tell me what to do

Dear Mr. President is here
Dear Mr. President
Dear Mr. President
Dear Mr. President
Dear Mr. President
Niggas actin' up in the hood, send mo’ troops

Dear Mr. Clinton… it's gettin' harder and harder for a motherfucker to make a dollar in these here streets
I mean shit, I hear you screamin' peace
But we can't find peace
'Til my little niggas on these streets get a piece
I know you fear me 'cause you too near me not to hear me
So why don't you help a nigga out?
Sayin' you cuttin' welfare
That got us niggas on the street, thinkin' who in the hell care?
Shit, y'all want us to put down our Glocks and our rocks
But y'all ain't ready to give us no motherfuckin' dollars
What happened to our 40 acres and a mule fool?
We ain't stupid, think you got us lookin' to lose
Tryin' to turn all us young niggas into troops
You want us to fight your war, what the fuck I'm fightin' for?
Shit, I ain't got no love here
I ain't had a check all year, taxin' all the blacks
Police beatin' me in the streets… fuck peace!



Shit, I'm a changed man
Ay, turn the lights out
Me and Big motherfucking Syke
Big baller 2Pac up in this bitch
Y'know how we swing this shit, look

By age sixteen I sold to dope fiends
Not yet a drug dealer, but I watched 'em closely
Until they noticed me I got the feds wonderin' who broke the law
Far too inhibited for gun smoke, I broke his jaw
Words harder than a fuckin' diamond
Mobile phone call to Simon, niggas trippin' homey, when we ridin'?
Fuck them slowly like Jodeci
And stick a needle in my eye if I don't live and die for M.O.B
And fuck your homeboys nigga we can drop the guns
I hit your block and we can box for fun
Nigga one on one, last to fall is a balling cat
It's Death Row, why the fuck you think we call it that?
So if you knew me in my past life
Don't act like we homeboys, ain't no love in the fast life
I switch gears on them jealous bitches, who do you fear?
The game plan of a changed man, so what I'm sayin' is


Million dollar plots
Birds and flocks is how I wanna live
It's hard to change after living so negative
What I give back is Mac's and packs and facts
And ever lasting game watch your back and stacks
Young macks stay the loc'est and keep the focus
Don't get ground to bow down nigga soak this, game
From a criminal element stay wide open
Bud smoking nigga trip, get to gat smoking
But keep hoping and praying, laying the foundation
Watch thieves, fake G's and perpetration
Imitation is lethal, stay true to the one's you love
Put slug's in these wanna be thugs
In these drugs, bud and alcohol
You make emergency call, to a down fall
After all they got Pen's for us, and our future kids
All the things I did, where's my cig's?


A nigga so cold when I flow, bow down to Death Row
Three wheel motion, comin' through coastin'
Who's that nigga in the G-ride screamin' out
M.O.B.! Nigga we ride
I hit the charts like a stick-up kid
#1 in the nation
I fucked the world, the Judge gave me probation
Faced with incarceration
Move tapes like it's big weight, slangin' to the whole nation
GIMME MINE, or I'm blastin' on every song
Murder my enemies, I'm mashin' until I'm gone
One love to my thug niggas
And fuck a bitch, cause a true sister love niggas
Throw yo' hands in the air, close your eyes and hope
Never come against the mass of smoke, on Death Row
My adversaries BLEED
But fuck 'em all 'til the talk cease, fuckin' with a changed man


Everybody think they understand me
Shit, you niggas don't know me
Y'all know that nigga on the rap song
Y'all know that nigga in the movies
You don't know this nigga in 3-D
Real live right up against you in front of yo' face
Shit, nigga you fuckin' with a changed man
This fuckin' shit on Deathrow
Westside, Outlaw Immortalz, hehehe
Nigga you fuckin with a changed man
Hahaha..Nate Dogg up in this biatch you know that nigga ain't no muthafuckin joke
You know what time it is
Hahaha.. I ain't the same, you fuckin' with a changed man
We ain't the same, you fuckin' with a changed man
Kurupt in this biatch
Bad azz and Snoop dog
Aiite



Yo 'Pac yo, I heard you got beat up by the police
Got a big fat lawsuit and everything
Niggas just wanna know
If you still gon' be on some crooked-ass sheeeit

Please tell me what's a nigga to do, and it's true
Ain't nuttin new, so I do, what I can to get through
Now first they had me trapped and now I'm pissed
A loaded AK-47 lay under my head so I don't trip
One motherfucker from the Underground
And Big Stretch buckin niggas if they fuck around
Yo why I got beef with police?
Ain't that a bitch that motherfuckers got a beef with me
They make it hard for me to sleep
I wake up at the slightest peep, and my sheets are 3 feet deep
I guess it's hard for you to see
But now I'm pointin the finger at police
Instead of them motherfuckers blamin me
I got the right to bear a pistol
And when the punk motherfuckers get to trippin I got shit too
But until then, I gotta do what I do
And stay a crooked nigga too

I've got to do, what I'm gon' do
I'm gon' say what I'm gon' say
I'm gon' live how I live - how else you want a nigga to live?
I'm gon' do, what I do
I'm gon' say, what I say
I'm gon' live how I live - how do you want a nigga to live?

Y'know you really can't say that ya blame niggas
Fuck bein tame, set aflame, time to aim triggers
2Pac'll spark a revolution, fuck the Constitution
I want my bucks for restitution
This time you got a bigger problem
Time to face the niggas from South Central, Oakland, Brooklyn and Harlem
And we ain't shootin at each other
That's my motherfuckin brother, so Dave Duke, run for cover
And all the bitches from the Klan
Come feel the wrath of a black man that doesn't smoke crack and
Genuine Draft, ganja ganja, and my fuckin tec-9
They know they scared to see us sober
Stop drinkin King Cobra, and niggas'll take the world over
Blame the Korean, blame the jew, or be a crooked nigga too


Aiyyo! Why me? Play like Jasmine Guy and try me
I'll be damned if I die, come look at the rage in my eyes G
They got my homies in a jail cell
And it's the Rebel and the Devil, and one of us is goin to Hell
I got the whole place covered, with loc'd out brothers
And nuttin but love for each other
So motherfucker make a motion
I give a fuck, slice you up, and throw your ass in the ocean
Temperatures drop; see it's cool to shoot a nigga
But they hate it when we pop the cops
That's when they gettin petrol
You better watch your step or you'll be left on death row
But I learn to look ahead of me
Stay strapped watch your back keep your eyes on the enemy
We blowin up precincts and OOOH
You can't fuck with the crew, of crooked nigga too


It's the coldest town from here to Georgia
It's the coldest town from here to Georgia
It's the coldest town from here to Georgia
It's the coldest town from here to Georgia
Y'all gon' stop fuckin with me




You find an MC like me who's strong
Leavin motherfuckers aborted, with no verbal support
And when I command the microphone I get deadly as Khan though
With a bear and a snake and a panda, I'm on those
Who can withstand, the more power I gain
And make it possible for me to drop a few to wreck ya brain
Imagine and keep on wishin upon a star
Finally realizing who the fuck we are
When I penetrate, it's been withstandin, faded
Would it be the greatest MC of all time
When I created rhyme for the simple fact
When I attack I crush your pride
My intention to ride, every time all night
I'm faced with the scars beyond this one bar
For me to put down my guard, I'm faced with it, I'm a ride
Breakin in gas with the six-eight all day
In and out with my pay
I'm soon to count the bodies

So mandatory my elevation my lyrics like orientation
So you can be more familiar with tha nigga you facing
We must be based on nothin better than communication
Known to damage and highly flamable like gas stations
Sorry I left that ass waitin
No more procrastination give up to fate, and get that ass shakin
I'm bustin and makin motherfuckers panic
Don't take ya life for granted put that ass in the dirt
You swear the bitch was planted
My lyrics motivate the planet
It's similar to Rhythm Nation
But thugged out, forgive me Janet
Who's in control I'm acvtivatin yo souls
You know, the way the games get controlled
Yo, two years ago, a friend of mine
Told me Alize and Cristal blows your mind
Bear witness to the dopest fuckin rhyme I wrote
Takin off my coat, clearing my throat

I got my mind made up, come on...
Get in get in too
Let it ride... tonight's tha night

Well I comes through with two packs
Of the bomb prophalaks for protection
So my fuckin sac won't collapse
Cause nowaday's, shit's evading the x-rays
Sending young motherfuckers to an early grave
I wonder, if my terrifying tactics of torturing MC's
Shows my heart's as cold as the tundra
Electryfing like thunder, I'm just too much
Rough and raw with that motherfuckin poisonous touch
I'm an MC with lyrics that's tha fuckin bom-bay
Ya got dissed, that's before it's ingest like balmay
My rhymes, I leave a mark on ya mind
As the deadly vibes spread through ya head like sand pine
There's no escape, nah I ain't blastin
I use my mental to assassinate assassin's for those askin
Opposed to laughin, raw maniacal villian
Laughter enhances the chances of tha killin
Why is that?  Cuz smilin faces decieve
You best believe, to MC's I'm the deadliest disease
My thoughts rip ya throat and make it hard to breathe
Ya whole camp's under seige, and I'm Jason Vorhees
In the heat of the night is when I defeat and ignite mikes
My verbal snipe, your vocab on site
I'm out tha cut, uncut and raw with no clause for all
So all my rhymes hit and split tha bricks on the wall
Ya already have an idea about tha superior sphere
The greater rhyme creator on both sides of tha equator
I rock from here to there, to Philly and back
To LA on the spot where I rock and bust like straps
As your views get overshadowed when you come in contact
Beware, set and prepare to enter verbal combat

Fuck you losers, while you fake jacks I makes maneuvers
Like Hitler, stickin up *Jews* wit German *lugers*
The Mr. Meth-Tical from Staten Isle
Will be back after this mess-age don't touch tha dial
Rarely do you see an MC out for justice
Got my gun powder and my musket -- blaooow!!
Melons get swellings, I paint mental pictures like Magellen
Half of my Clan's three deep felons
Niggas best protect they joints for Nine-Nickel
Man I stay on point like icicles
Now who wanna test Tical then touch Tical
All up in your motherfuckin mouth
Head banger boogie
Catch me on tour with Al Doogie
Method Man roll too tight, you can pull me
Better take one and pass or that's that ass
Your vital statistics are low and fallin fast
Johnny Blaze out to get loot like Johnny Cash
Play a game of Russian Roulette and have a blast

Aiyyo, lyrical gas spittin tha criminal tactics
Non-believers get my dick and genitals backwards
Let's face it, there's no replacement
Taste this, mad underground basement, shit I'm laced with
Avalanche on ya whole camp when I'm splifted
Funk Doctor who? Spock bitch don't get it twisted
I got connects like Federal Express
To get the fresh package of bless, tha dogs can't fetch
Got the clear spot from tha rear block
To bust til every nigga here drop, men I fear not
Hold ya nose and blow out til ya ears pop
Since ya crew suit you to shift now you claim that you get's lot
With, this underground cannabis
I'm dangerous like John the bomb analyst
Then proceeds like keys
My degrees freeze consecutively like EPMD LP's
Lick off a shot and hit ya fam by mistake
So I erase the whole front row at the wake
I planned my escape in case jake or a snake bust it
I'm the one pushin the hearse in the first place
Confidence for you shaky ass folks
Pump for Rockafella for the day he got smoked
Choke, off this anecdote got you ope
Get roast, by my lyrics Billy Dee .45 Colt
And I'm out for nine nickel

I set the mic in flames, my name's INS the Rebel
Murder one style, smash piles straight to pebbles
Mental terrorist, specialist at this
Menacing lyricst, leave crews defenseless
Can't design landmines, lick off like nines
To paralyze everything, ears ring like doorknobs
Heads start to turn like police who pass
Hear the blast, my crew bust through like tear gas
Fuck a mask, we laced in place like the marshall
Sparkle, like live but harder than tarvue
Wreck this rhyme, start relentless, roughest
And fuck up the party for you paying motherfuckers
Once I commence for you ladies and gents
I kick rhymes, sharper than barbwire fence
The live and direct, from Killah Hill Project
Staten Island, New York, you can't help but to hawk
Lay it on your dental, that's if you want it hostile
Sounds so underground I write my rhymes on fossil
Dudes like this, force me to get you open
Lyrically wet you open, until you soaking



Because we all spring from different trees
Does not mean we are not created equally
Is the true beauty in the tree
Or in the vast forest in which it breathes?

I find greatness in the tree, that grows against all odds
It blossoms in darkness, and gives birth to promising pods
I was that tree that grew from the weeds and wasn't meant to be
Ashamed I'm not, in fact I am proud, of my thriving - family - tree

The rose that grew from concrete, yeah
The tree that wasn't meant to be
Though I.. struggle in my life, I never give up
And you.. know that I, will always be by your side
My family tree.. yeah a family tree
Yeah, my family tree.. my fam-i-ly tree

I find, greatness in the tree that grows against all odds
It blossoms in.. darkness, and gives birth to a promising pod
You'll never see me give up

I will press on.. never hold my head alone
Never no.. my family tree.. my family tree yeahhh
My family treeeee.. family treeeee..

Because we all spring from different trees
Does not mean we are not created equally
Is the true beauty in the tree
Or in the vast forest in which it breathes?

The tree must fight to breathe
Among the evils of the weeds

I find greatness in the tree, that grows against all odds
Ashamed I'm not, in fact I am proud, of my thriving - family - tree



Raise up off these nuts, a little bit
Just a little bit
Raise up off these nuts, a little bit

I'm smokin these niggas like they endo
Breakin em like they windows
And still they rip till they get a whiff
Of this shit that I kick
And if they ever had a notion to stop me
Treat your best shot and get dropped
With your posse, nigga I got the ?mott?
I'm takin em out, a lot I got
More than you could pop
I'm rockin the spot, so now they jock
Dump em and get dropped
2Pac ain't tryin to hear it, Ox
Screamin at your box
I'm swearin at ya not so uh
Static is the last thing you need when you see me
Better have a bat or a gat to defeat me
Nigga, I'm a whole posse rolled into one shot
Takin on your gat while your girl gets hot and rocks the spot
Fear funky flavor with the gift that only God gave
Hold it to my grave
I'd rather die than be a slave
Slaves come as dope dealers
Some come as addicts
Some come to run while the others cause static


I'm comin up outta the cut
Sendin slugs to the guts
I'm bustin up outta the page cuz they got me locked up
I'm tryin to survive but there's too many playa hatin haters
Always want static, like boom holla at ya later
Homie this ain't no love in this town that I come from
Niggas be wantin funkin then I stomp em, they don't want none
Girls be on my jock and they playin me for that
But fool I can't help it cuz I was raised up like a mack
Jealous because I'm black, Jack wanna jack me
And Jill wants to marry me and watch the Klan bury me
Got to pack the steel for the personal protection
AK, 45's, assault rifles, Smith & Wesson
I'm no longer stressin
Learnin, gotta live long
Get a bag a spliffs for the homies, blaze up all of these
But if you wanna flex, get in my Kool Aid punks, raise up offa
These


Just back the fuck up of me, cuz you can't get none a these
It's that OG female comin straight up out the PP's
So step to the side then raise the fuck up off me, brah
Cuz if I take it to that level I'ma light this motherfucker up
Now it's on you, you better try to lose your shit
Cuz if you don't, trust me I got you trick
You better try to choose it and lose it
Stay outta mine 'fore this shit get way stupid
These niggas I fuck with believe in passin gats
Can't leave hoe, without my strap
Not givin a fuck about nothin
Slidin through the spot with my face mask muggin
Lookin motherfuckers up and down
It ain't a future in your frontin
Why these fat niggas floatin around?
What happened to them real motherfuckin G's?
Fake motherfuckers need to raise up offa these




Thug Life! Comin' straight out the West Coast
Real Boy Killaz!
2Pac with the Assassin, and we ridin' for the West Side!

Bad Boy, Bad Boy, whatcha gonna do?
Whatcha gonna do, watch out, we commin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, whatcha gonna do?
Whatcha gonna do, we're comin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, whatcha gonna do?
Whatcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, whatcha gonna do?
Whatcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you

I got these bustas on my block and they after me
Runnin' 'round tellin' these niggas, how they gon' capture me
It's gettin' crazy, it's hard to make my mind up
Now should I, buck 'em down, or put my nine up?
You see, I ain't a bad boy, just a boy who had it bad
I graduated from 22's to 3-57 mags
Runnin' on these marks 'fore they stashin'
I ain't askin', give it up, or get to blastin'
The penitentiary don't scare me
A straight thug nigga, the whole set'll take care of me
And tell me, who the fuck you gon' find
Rough enough to tear these bitch-niggas, this is mine
Now busta, meet my nine, 24 on the grind
I'm sick about mine, and uh, ain't nothin' wrong with gettin' high
A hustlin'-ass nigga from the projects, I'm makin' loot
And screamin' Thug Life, nigga, when I shoot

Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, West Side when we ride, one time!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, we gotsta keep on thuggin'!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, West Side when we ride, one time!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, we gotsta keep on thuggin'!

Fuck Bad Boy!

I'm screamin' West Side ridah when we ride in a hoo ride
Suicide 'til the day we die, gettin' high!
From the Bay to LA, drinkin' Tanqueray and da Alize
When we stay on the blocks, slangin' rocks, runnin' from cops
When we runnin', we hummin', now gunnin' and you get done and
In the city wit' no pity, down wit' Thug Life, we doin' it live!
Every time we side on you trick made bitches
Packin' a .45, recognize the game in yo' set
Betta jet when I get you wet, wit' intention a' do or die
Homicide, genocide to the other side
When we glide wit' my nigga Pac we bustin' 'em niggas
On the block wit' Gangsta-D back up me you real OG
Comin' up outta the 7 Trees strick, .9 to the LHD
We claimin' to bring, we make 'em fiend
For the fact we havin' 'em stack on the map
For the city of Sac all the way to the ho' when we stroll
Poppin the mos, outta killa California, straight loc' West Coast!

Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, West Side when we ride, one time!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, we gotsta keep on thuggin'!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, West Side when we ride, one time!
Bad Boys can't stop Thug Life, we gotsta keep on thuggin'!

Hahahaha!



One love to my homeboys, death to my enemies
Bad boy killaz, outlaw muthafuckin' immortals
You know what time it is
Thug niggas 'til the day we die

Tell me baby, what's your frequency
You see I'm makin' proposals that's full of verbal indecency when ya meetin' me
Flash light I'm buzzed, what's right like drugs
Got 3 strikes, you got 'cause last nights for thugs
Holdin' my position, my competition is never ready
Ripped like a machete, my alias Makaveli
So what they tell me through the grapevine
Niggas ain't tryin' to see me paid, they rather take mine
Retaliation takes time
Create rhymes that so ferocious that the bass line
Went for my vocals every time a nigga say his rhyme
Spendin' and bustin' you thought it up, but you wasn't, prepared
Niggas get scared, I'm eternally thuggin'
Like kamikazes on a suicide mission
I'm spittin' multiple gunshots
Burnin' turnin' rappers to victims
I kick 'em all day
And my motto, make biggie smalls pay
I make it ruff enough
You and puffy crawl away

First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Outlaw immortal my nigga, when I see you eye to eye
First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Outlaw immortal my nigga, when I see you eye to eye

First to bomb, quick to unload
Expose my foes for being bitches
Keepin' niggas suspicious
2 Glocks is full of ammo
My army fatigues ready for battle, lyrical commando
Lets get it on
Tell me nigga, how much you can handle
My intention's specifically, thugged out no sympathy
Pictures of closed caskets, so those bastards get wit me
I'm first to bomb, first there's the calm then the panic
Soon as my niggas break, we earthquake the whole planet
Adversaries can't understand it
The way my niggas strategize
Don't nobody die unless we planned it
Life long committed
I write songs to spit it
No matter how hard muthafuckaz try, they can't get it
It's Death Row, westside, outlaws til we die, thug life
Muthafuckaz on the ride and we

First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Call me my enemy killer, when I see you eye to eye
First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Outlaw immortal my nigga, when I see you eye to eye

Nigga, I've been straight feudin' for years
Ain't nuthin' nice right here
I get the poundin' from the drum, that's how I overcome fear
Give me your soul out ya life, hand it to me like I'm Christ
I look at death to be nice, I wanna try it some nights
And I swear to God, I get medieval on your bastard catch wreck
Mama told you to knock me out, but you ain't knock shit yet
You wanna bet, I make the bitch come straight outta you
Claimin' you mobbin' deep, with your pity ass crew
Don't let me tell you what some real ass niggas would do
If you a soldier, ask ya homie could it be me and you
Head up first, I'll kill your work
I got you lost so you hurt
A flurry combination then I leave your dick in tha dirt

Nigga, I leave you shell shocked
From project streets to cell blocks
Glock 45 with the tail cocked
Makin' jacks by no means
Pocket full of crack and money stacks in my jeans
I want it all, fuck the talk
I, ask some questions after I open fire on your sector
On the fuckin' walk by

Now how many niggas really think they can oppose
The immortal Outlawz
You niggas is hoes but already seen it though Malc
Alias Amin comma E.D.I
Drama is needy
So you gettin' stoled on by, a hungry pointin' wantin' B.G
Dumpin', but takin' it out first at every function
Nigga, we funkin' at the stow we
Blows is hittin' yo jaw
And now you hittin' the flo'
Obvious you didn't know what we known fo'
Nigga we

First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Call me my enemy killer, when I see you eye to eye
First to bomb, right out the gate nigga fuck your size
Outlaw immortal my nigga, when I see you eye to eye



Tell me I will be there
Tell me I will be there
Tell me I will be there
Yeah....

If there be pain
All you have to do is call on me
All you have to do is call on me
And before you hang up the phone
You will no longer be alone
Together we can never fall
Because our love will conquer all


If there be pain
Reach out for a helping hand
If there be pain
And I shall hold you wherever I am
Every breath I breathe will be into you
For without you here my joy is through
My life was lived through falling rain
So call on me if there be pain

If there be pain
Every breath I breathe will be into you
For without you here my joy is through
My life was lived through falling rain
So call on me if there be pain

If you need me
If you need me
Ooohh ooooh



Raised by thugs, schooled by killers
I learned mathematics from big time dealers
So now them busters love to see a nigga falling
Cock the Glock, suckers plotting on a player cause he's ballin'
Up early in the morning, four deep
Creeping in my Jeep nigga, real thugs don't sleep
You'll never kill a real G feel me
How many cops gotta drop 'for they kill me?
Murder in the motherfucking worst way
Turned to a killer on my twenty-first birthday
"Boom, boom" on a crooked cop, draw back
Living like a thug till the niggas get the block back
Oh shit, deep in motion, until we get a grip
My motherfucker's won't quit
Living that Thug Life, tryna make a million off that drug life
I got a Glock named Cop Killer
So read the papers, another Cop caught the vapors
Might spend a little time with a bitch let her know thought
Married to the dope, I live the Thug Life

*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*
I live the Thug Life
*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*
Thug Life
*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*
Thug Life
*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*

The rules of the street I'm living by
It ain't no rules so niggas got to die
Should I change or rearrange it keeps coming
My Tek-9 will never stop gunning
Motherfucker's down homies they keep trippin'
Fuck with me and yo' ass'll come up missing
I'm just a young nigga starving
I need a fucking vest for the bullets I've been dodging
I'm living on the edge, blast the lead
Wanted by the feds, they gotta take me dead
But I got to get paid first, before they roll me off in the motherfucking hearse
Cause I'm living the Thug Life fool
Staying strapped and letting that Evil Mind rule
Cause I'm more like a killer nigga
Put the pressure down and leave your ass disfigured
Got a Tek-9 pointed at your dome, so you know it's on punk as bitch
Better grab the chrome
I refuse to be broke, have to keep trying
So who gives a fuck about dying nigga
If you feel you want to take then take me
I be a dead motherfucker 'for you break me
From the present to the grave you'se a ghost
Spraying cops down as I kick in the fucking door
And lay your wife down, lay your kids down and slice they neck
Then I get respect
Even thought I might pay the price
I'm living the Thug Life, yeah

*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*
Thug Life
*Labelled as a cop killer*
Thug Life
*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*
Thug Life
*Born in the ghetto as a street thug*
*Labelled as a cop killer*

I drink Gin, hit Chronic, run with a wild bunch
Thinking of the dead niggas that I knew that die young
Is there a heaven for a nigga up to no good?
Or is it just another fucking hood?
I'm having talks with my nigga Little G from down the street
And the nigga been dead for three weeks
I'm going crazy, damn is a nigga loc'd
Finger on the trigger, trying not to get smoked
Rolling through the hood with my closest
Niggas keep my finger on the trigger cause I'm hopeless
What's wrong with a motherfucker coming up
Making mo' bucks that's why them hoe's fuck
Had enough of these punks, thug for life
Can't stand bitches now fuck a wife
Money bring bitches, bitches bring lies, hoe's get horny and motherfucker's die
Never turn your back on the game
I'll be letting off shot's till this shit change, I live the Thug Life

Yeah watch them blood-clot Police boy
Them love to fire at young black man with gun shot
Me not afraid of none of them
Bust my blood-clot gun
In a second its kill or be killed that's not gangsta
All I trying to do is put food on table for my family
So Police boy come fuck with me
?? for drugs
Me no sell drugs, make music song
Chill
Me bust gun at the whole of them
That boy make me feel like me wanna kill the whole of them still
















WAR TIME!
Worldwide, Nationwide, Citywide, Real Niggas Do Real Thingz
Exit - 2PAC
Enter - MAKAVELI

Painting by Ron "Riskie" Brent
KC and JoJo of Jodeci appear courtesy of MCA Records
COPYRIGHT / DISTRIBUTION



Where there is a will there is a way
Search and discover a better day
Where a positive heart is all you need
To rise from beyond and succeed
And young minds grow and respect each other based on their deeds
And not their color
Look and them and say as I say
Where there is a will there is a way

I don't know why the caged bird sings
But as long as Thug Life in my veins I be doin' my thing
These blocks raised me to hustle for change
I learned the hard way without pain there is no gain
My life experience is trapped on page
My thoughts in my brain release when I be rappin' on stage
I'm like a prophet of rage with a Glock and a guage
I bang for my gang, won't hesitate to cock it and blaze
Some years in this game can teach ya some things
I've seen many try and fail but the strong remain
My uncle Boo been locked away since I signed my name
And I opened to family and friends for fortune and fame
I'm dedicatin' every song that I sing
In appreciation of loved ones from here to the grave
And I know this shit ain't easy but ya help me to maintain
Struggle continues, where there is a will there is a way

He said
Where there is a will there is a way
To search and discover, find a better day
Where a positive heart is all you need
To rise beyond and succeed

I let my heart in the pen speak
I just guide the words and let 'em touch who they reach
They even fall upon the ears of the deaf
But you can read it in Braile or come to me in the flush
I'm authentic, I fire back if I'm fired on
But I'm human I bleed if my skin gets torn
And I was born within a Gemini astrology
I'm in the hood and boys see the two sides of me
That's why he said where there's a will there's a way
Ya have to think about tomorrow if ya livin' today
No one's worthless the girl with no father
Lookin' for love from any man that will bother
She takes the money and she whispers his name
Like the paper and the tears gon' wash away all that pain
Yeah, it's sad but that's how it goes down
So keep ya head up and smile for me now


Just get ya click together and ya chips together
When y'all sit together and ya shit together, never
Let no man show ya no hand and no plan
That didn't show his home card, no fam
Where there's a will there's a way
And the jungle is a maze
When they rumble it's the strays that be duckin' like hey
I ain't tryin' to go to bed in the same night
Ricochet shots cover my head in the same sights
All I see so, all be is doin' this, pursuin'
The same dream to make cream
And the same fiends I pass by I ask why
Get the answer smoke cancer and slide
I look up in the sky give praise for everyday
That I'm sure to get paid like the sun give rays
Listen, it's hard enough to get a job but
It's harder to help us, hype, hustle, and tight the squad






Dish it out!

















Niggas need a spot where we can kick it
A spot where we belong, that's just for us
Niggas ain't gotta get all dressed up and be Hollywood
Y'knahmean? Where do niggas go when we die?
Ain't no heaven for a thug nigga
That's why we go to thug mansion
That's the only place where thugs get in free
And you gotta be a G


Was it the liquor, that makes me act blind, times that I'm with her
Anonymous pictures of other niggas tryin' to kiss her
Will I love her or shall I diss her?
I'm sick of this scandalous shit I deal wit', tryin' to paint a perfect picture
My memories of jealousy no longer carefree
Cause so much bullshit your girlfriends keep tellin' me
I'm on tour, but now my bedroom's an open door
So it got me thinkin', what am I tryin' for?
When I was young I was so very dumb, eager to please
A lil', trick on a mission tryin' to get in my P
Me and my niggas is thug niggas, former known drug dealers
We don't love bitches and believe, they don't love niggas
I gotta blame my attraction
But you became a distraction, a threat to my paper stackin'
I thought you changed but now I know
Can't turn a hoe into a housewife, baby, and there you go

Can't stop, gotta eat
Stepping on, my feet
Spread love, think it's sweet
Uh, uh, uh all you catz don't know

If this is to end in fire, then we should all burn together
Watch the flames climb high into the night
Calling out father oh, stand by and we will
Watch the flames burn auburn on the mountain side

And if we should die tonight, we should all die together
Raise a glass of wine for the last time
Calling out father oh, prepare as we will
Watch the flames burn auburn on the mountain side
Desolation comes upon the sky

Now I see fire, inside the mountain
I see fire, burning the trees
And I see fire, hollowing souls
I see fire, blood in the breeze
And I hope that you remember me


A nigga never been as broke as me – I like that
When I was young I had two pair of Lees, besides that
The pin stripes and the gray
The one I wore on Mondays and Wednesdays
While niggas flirt I'm sewing tigers on my shirts, and alligators
You want to see the inside, I see you later
Here comes the drama, oh
That's that nigga with the fake, blaow
Why you punch me in my face? Stay in your place
Play your position, here come my intuition
Go in this nigga pocket, rob him while his friends watchin'
And hoes clockin', here comes respect
His crew's your crew or they might be next
Look at they man eye, big man, they never try
So we rolled with them, stole with them
I mean loyalty, niggas bought me milks at lunch
The milks was chocolate, the cookies, butter crunch

Oh, should my people fall then surely I'll do the same
Confined in mountain halls, we got too close to the flame
Calling out father oh, hold fast and we will
Watch the flames burn auburn on the mountain side
Desolation comes upon the sky

Now I see fire, inside the mountain
I see fire, burning the trees
And I see fire, hollowing souls
I see fire, blood in the breeze
And I hope that you remember me

Can't stop, gotta eat
Stepping on, my feet
Spread love, think it's sweet
Uh, uh, uh all you catz don't know
Can't stop, gotta eat
Stepping on, my feet
Spread love, think it's sweet
Uh, uh, uh all you catz don't know
Can't stop, gotta eat
Stepping on, my feet
Spread love, think it's sweet
Uh, uh, uh all you catz don't know
Can't stop, gotta eat
Stepping on, my feet
Spread love, think it's sweet
Uh, uh, uh all you catz don't know

Now I see fire, inside the mountain
I see fire, burning the trees
And I see fire, hollowing souls
I see fire, blood in the breeze
And I hope that you remember me



Damn son, Niggas stay doing it to us son
You gone son, Niggas think its a coincidence
Niggas be stopping us before we even get started
This is under attack baby, we going to ride though, watch us son

Some say the Government will watch me
But they can't stop me
I'm droppin' evil with the people as my posse


Yo uh yea, see the lying in my eyes when I'm coming for the get back
Big mac, cock gunfire, hot tires they burning, they got us all dying and burning
They lying to destroy our earth, little birth diseases
30 millionth church for Jesus
And still our young eating out cans
Chiefing grams and weapons, I sold my first swam at seven
A smidget after first grade, shirt sprayed with talents
You made us hurt making the balance
Instead of preaching violence and fear
Silenced shares we moving, The evil go ahead a movement
Or share me the spiritual form, hear us form rebellion
We gathered up the strong and felons
The youth and all the poverty strain and were all the poverty dwelling
The story that the pottery telling
You find all in potter's field or the government files



Dave Duke sure look cute in that black suit Oooohhh
But even cuter behind the barrel of my six shooter ooh
You look worried cause I ain't buried
Punks leave in a hurry cause I throw flurries making mothafuckas, scurry
Come feel the flavor from my single
And brain cell's tingle I'm feeling stronger than a fuckin mad Dingo
And uh How's that for black history?
I stay strapped, and love to jack those that slang that crack misery Ha
Cause being a nigga means you love niggas
But how could you love niggas if you trying drug niggas?
You motherfuckas need your caps peeled
Cause when blacks kill blacks we stay trapped and thats, real
And we don't need no more statistic's
It's time to get more realistic for the young the black and the gifted
And uh
Until my people get uplifted
There's no popping shit, just popping clips instead of marching we gon' rip
Shit


Yo whoever shot 2Pac amaru shakur
Will forever be a dead man laying on the floor
Revolutionary thug shit dieing for every young poor black mother in the middle of the ghetto
We never had a chance to appreciate life
The government got a plan to eliminate the life
Of every black soul on the slavery land
And oppositions we abolishing a slavery plan, pay attention every serious political band
Got a division full of killers imperial scams
They wanna kill us all off and incarcerate the family of anyone opposing the war
They want us all to appreciate death and believe up in the white god praying to the heavens above
Ima never let a devil come separate the adamic covenant, The potter's field criminals coming for the government



Kill, kill, kill
Kill, kill, kill

Raised by thugs schooled by killers
I learned mathematics from big time dealers
So how the fuck these niggas see a nigga fallin'
Pop the Glock, suckas plottin' on a playa 'cause he's ballin'
Up early in the mornin' four deep
Creepin' in my Jeep, nigga real thugs don't sleep
You'll never kill a real g, feel me
How many cops gotta drop 'fore they kill me
Murder in the mutha fuckin worst way
Turned to a killa on my 21st birthday
Boom, boom, on a crooked cop, drop that
Livin' like a thug 'til them niggas get the block back
Oh shit, deep in motion
'Til we get a grip, my mutha fuckaz won't quit
Livin' that Thug Life!
Tryin' to make a million of that drug life
I got a Glock named cop killa
So read the papers, another cop caught the vapors
I'm married to the jungle, I live the Thug Life

Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
I live the Thug Life
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Thug Life
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Thug Life
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Thug Life
Thug Life
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Thug Life
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa

I hear they dream to hit chronic
Run with a wild bunch
Thinkin' of dead niggas that I knew that died young
Is there a heaven for a nigga up to no good
Or is it another fuckin' hood
I'm havin' talks with my nigga little g from down the street
And the nigga been dead for three weeks
I'm goin' crazy
Damn is a nigga loc'd
Finger on the trigger, tryin' not to get smoked
Niggas keep my finger on the trigger 'cause I'm hopeless
What's wrong with a nigga comin' up
Makin' mo bucks that's why them hoes fuck
Had enough of these punks, thug for life
Can't stand bitches now fuck the right
I told you once you can't trust her
Don't go out like a busta, fucka!
Money bring bitches, bitches bring lies
Hoes get horny and mutha fuckaz die
Never turn your back on the game
I'll be lettin' off shots 'til the shit change
I live the Thug Life!

Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa
Born in the ghetto as a street thug, labeled as a cop killa




One two..
Dedicated, dedicated..
Yo I remember, it musta been about, ninety-one, ninety-two
Somethin like that..
We had did a show, in San Fran', and 'Pac ran up on stage with us
We was doin "Check the Rhime"
And after he got up with us, went to the back
And he asked me if I saw "Juice" - figure it just came out
I remember givin him love
We always had that respect for each other heh, y'knahmsayin?
I guess uh.. we was enjoined kinda on the same path of truth
Or whatever whatever
But he still here though
I know uhm ahh ahh ahh ahh ahh I know it, y'knahmsayin?
I feel him right here
Yeah, I just feel him right here
Hah, hmm, I just feel him right here
Huh, I'ma take my time, I'ma do this joint
Ha ha ha, ha ha

The fear, in the heart, of a man
Dedicated to my heart, my ha-ha-heart
The fear, in the heart, of a man
Dedicated to my heart..

Against an attacker, I will boldly take my stand
Because my heart will show, fear for no man
Before a broken heart, I run with fright
Scared to be blind in the vulnerable night
Uhh, I believe this fear is in every man
Some will acknowledge it, others will fail to understand
Uhh uhh uhh uhh, there's no fear in a shallow heart
Because the shallow heart is faint and don't fall apart
Because the shallow heart is faint don't fall apart
But feeling hearts that truly care
Are fragile to the flow of air
And if I am to be true then I must give.. my fragile heart
My fragile heart
I may re-ceive-great-joy
Or you may re-turn it, say it again
I may re-ceive-great-joy-or you may re-turn it, ripped apart, hah
Ripped apart.. ripped apart..
Ripped apart nothing left.. ripped apart
Yeah, 2Pac Shakur
2Pac Shakur
2Pac 2Pac 2Pac
2Pac Shakur
We miss you
And we love you
And we love you
2Pac Shakur
And we miss you
And we love you
2Pac Shakur, such a beautiful man, such a beautiful man
2Pac Shakur, I said we love you mon, I said we love you mon
2Pac Shakur, mmmm yeah



Code Of THUG LIFE






















































Can u c the pride in the pantha
as he glows in splendor and grace
Toppling OBSTACLES placed in the way
of the progression of his race

Can u c the pride in the Pantha
as she nurtures her young all alone
The seed must grow regardless
of the fact that it's planted in stone

CAN'T u c the Pride in the panthas
as they unify as one
The flower blooms with brilliance
and outshines the ray of the Sun



Live back at 'cha Westside baaaaby
Aight fuck it, we gone flip some new shit now
You heard "All Eyez on Me," niggas know what time it is
Rhymin' and stealin', sellin' five million
Fresh out on bail, niggas still can't see me
That's how it is
Now we got a new motherfuckin' plan, and a new mission
Some competition, so they say, these niggas is gay if you ask me
Blast me? It could never happen
At least not while I'm walkin' and rappin'
Heard of some niggas on the other side of town who wanna ride wit' me
They can't hide, listen to the rough shit, my clique bring

I done said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears; now
Said many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears

Now, Rock-a-bye baby, I'm thugged out and so crazy
Don't want to hurt a soul nigga, so don't make me
I got a dream to see my whole team in Lexus Coupes
My enemies dead and buried, now the stress is through
But that's a dream, though it seems like reality; there'll
Never be peace long as there's fiends on these Cali streets
Even on the other side brothers die, but ride
Niggas get high off a slow form of suicide
Hide the closest thoughts, the war is fought as casualties
I live my life in fuck 'em mode, exposin' tragically
How can we find some peace and niggas still ain't get a piece
I know I'm probably hell bound, but we got to eat
I'm seeing Satan infiltratin', my military mind
Make me hustle all the time, grind for cash makin'
Forgive my adversaries they don't understand what we go through
To become a man, we sheddin' tattoo tears

Said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears

Thugged out baby!
Yeah blazed out shedding tattooed tears
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears)
This for my nigga Young Noble
Explode on these bitch made niggas

Criminal ways of thinkin', I'm gettin' paid wit' Lincolns
Niggas turn made victims, get my rage from a gauge hittin'
Hittin' ya back, you ain't kickin' no facts
Fakin' jacks, you and ya bitch clique could get this AK
Hold a pound four, you catch a flame from my torch
The game was taught, I want my name in the source
Little nigga, from jumpin' GZA, Now thanks to Pizzah
I'ma tote the pistol, And slang the white coke crystal
The papers stack up, young niggas back up
Give me the beat and ill rip the track up
Just in case you wanna act up

Nigga it's like this
I been thuggin' just for the cause of it
Out to get all of it, but I'll never loose my balls and shit
And it's all for the pressure
That'll make me cock my shit up off the dresser
Made nigga mafia of course my niggas gonna test ya
Answers to the questions, bullets to my Smith N' Wesson
Still stucked up in a fuck session, Jersey where the niggas flexin'
Po-po's guessin' if the stolen car about to do a drive-by
Wet 'em up from his shoulders, leave him bye-bye
For the things he did, but I turn my pleasure into sin
Blazed out sheddin' tattoo tears

I said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears
I said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears

Shit.. ain't no unity in my community it's do or die
Seein' my opportunities through these bars of hell while gettin' high
As life replays like time; underhanded schemes
To get that cream and thangs while livin' this life of crime
My enemies want me squeezed
They get dumped like 3's, with 57 ways to hit they knees
Please beware we thugs revolution size
Criminals to every last mineral we institutionalized
Locked down, got me shell shocked, now
Holdin' down fort like I'm stuck in court cell block style

Yo I been losin' sleep, stayin' up way past late
With no hesitation K will lace 'em, now how the game tastin'
Awful good to me, let me see who would thought that
This shorty'll be a thug nigga, unsupported, never shorted
Winner, pleasurable sinner plus a rebel and, thuggin' and lovin' it enough to hug it like my next to kin
Bust it like a gang of Mexicans
They won't rush him on a solo
Watch me flexin' on 'em and stolen guns, bustin'
You should fuck the world before you fuck wit' me
Young nigga sheddin' TEC tears through these next years
Homie, tatted down and I think I'm addict now
For holding it down all around these immortal grounds

Said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears
And I said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me hahha
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears
I said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears
I said it many times busters still can't see
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
I been, handlin' stress in this shit for years
Blazed out sheddin' tattooed tears

Outlawz, westside, when we riiide!
Follow me, these muthafuckin' cops ain't smart enough to do it like that baby
We Outlawz, Kurupt drop the beat we drop the sheeit
Now the world's fiends you know what I mean
Westsiiide Bad Boy killa Mobb Deep killa



Born to wreck shit, poppin' bubble gum
Others call me Yum, but momma call me troublesome
Learned to shoot a gun, before I learned to read or write
Never touched a pipe, made my money every night
Bitch talked to every snitch, they jeopardized me gettin' rich
Only fifteen at a spot full of rock teens
And we was fat like Trump
Every nigga packed a pump, so time to be poppin' trunks
I stood at the top of the organization
Now I'm makin' all the others run
Cause here it comes, look out for brother troublesome

Yeah y'all, hehe
A nigga named Troublesome

I learned from my mistakes I'm twenty-one now
I gotta pack of jackers out for me they hold a gun battle
Ain't old enough to save but I behave just like a true vet
That's cause for all the dirt I did and dirt I didn't do yet
Tryin' to pop my pistol for a profit
And I don't give a fuck about it
So why not take all of me
Cause I just love to be the nigga that nobody else has the balls to be
These suckers always searchin' for me, with funk
And once I let my gun pop
Another motherfucker drops
I smoke a gang of buddha better yet some indo
Crack through your window, nigga where the fuck the ya-yo?
You tried to hesitate I couldn't wait to rush him
I didn't trust him, he sneezed and I had to bust him
I'm criminal I'm workin' doin' wicked shit
So catch a Christmas cause I'm murderin' your witnesses, I'm troublesome

Yeah!
Yeah, a nigga named Troublesome

Now I'm on top got plenty dope in
I ain't no fuckin' joke so you can label me King of Oakland, huh
As I sit back and rake my, dough in
I let my money grown in just got rich off what they owin', huh
And pimpin' hoes, there's no open
A psychopath when provoked then
All you see is smoke I pull a pistol from my, coat
Give up the dough, reached for his coat, started grabbin' it
Bang bang! Was the sound as I jetted
A bullet in the head so the sucker don't forget it
But I knew that I'd be dead soon
Crime in my head, makin' decisions in my bedroom
But I ain't goin' alive, so what the fuck these niggas come fo'
I put this AK to your chest it'll take your entire breath
Threw a grenade in the front yard
Six cops lunged then got crunched, here they come God
The other cops are closin' in
I'd rather take my life than have these suckers clown me
When they found me, they call me troublesome

Niggas ain't tapin', not a live
Troublesome, word up
Uptown, they got a Troublesome
In Crooklyn, they got a Troublesome
In the Bronx, they got a Troublesome
In Oaktown, they got a Troublesome
South Central, they got a Troublesome
The jungle, they got a Troublesome
As long as there ain't money there's gonna be troublesome
My nigga named Troublesome, troublesome, troublesome. troublesome..



"Start from the intro"
I can't though, it's gonna be too painful
To speak of all the evil obstacles my people came through
"Equality?"
Is not true, I rush to beat the curfew
I guess nobody told us that the people gotta eat too
"The system?"
I laugh, cause I don't see no truth left
Addicted to that crack or raised too high to fight for Yusef
Can't blame 'em, they slumber, come here ya Casanova
Just because Mandela is free don't mean the freedom fight is over
The beaches, Howard, Virginia and the others
Ya let 'em lynch the brothers and no one will love the mothers
"Confused?"
You shouldn't be, my facts are stated clearly
But my raps contain no "wild thing" so I guess no one will hear me
"They're killin' us?"
But what's new, cause nobody will yell out
They're all too busy livin' lavish lives of a sellout
"The police?"
A big joke, the only time their gun smokes
Is when they murder brothers after every bone has been broke
"Huey?"
A hero, although he never tried to be
Died and since his death he's still a victim of society
"Well, what's next?"
Unity, respect and love your sisters
We joke and call 'em bitches so the crackers try to diss her
"We'll kill them?"
That's not the way, it's time to use intelligence
"Turn the other cheek?"
Never again, it's time for self-defense
"How come you're so angry?"
Cause I'm tired of bein' kept down
Now it's time to wipe away the tears of a clown


"Why ya cryin'?"
I told ya, I'm tired of livin' life low
The rich can beat the lotto, while the poor stay in the ghetto
"The president?"
Elected, but I don't know how it happened
Better qualified for rappin', with his gift for senseless yakkin'
A day for Martin Luther King, now his soul is put to rest
Turnin' over in the grave next to him is Malcolm X
Forgotten too quickly, it makes me want to hate them
Forgot about his wisdom, he's the latest fashion statement
"Red or Blue, what set ya claim?"
Does it make a difference?
One day we're gonna work it out and overcome the ignorance
"Education?"
Propaganda, taught to me in class
How can we control our future if we're kept from our past?
We better live a better way or we won't see another day
You can heed the words I say or don't and kiss your life away
Not tryin' to preach or teach, it is my wish to only explain
So many died before me, can I let their lives be in vain?
So now we've come to this point, it's time to make decision
Do we live in self-destruction or escape the realism?
They ask me why I'm angry, cause I'm tired of bein' kept down
My people, let's unite and wipe away the tears of a clown


"What ills the children"
The future, for them, I see such sorrow
The least that we can do is let them live to see tomorrow
Too many have been killed, it's time to stand up for our rights
How can the people "Fight The Power", if they can't fight for their life?
Instead, they fight their wife, beat up if she's not silent
Time to fight for principles, the brothers get nonviolent
The government is so crooked and liberties a hypocrite
"The Star Spangled Banner?"
Just some patriotic bullshit
Destruction of the Panthers another sneak attack plan
Couldn't stand to see the strength and peace within the Blackman
"Where are all the heroes who we thought were so untouchable?"
I see 'em pushin' dope and rollin' 'round in BMW
How can it not trouble you to see a dyin' species?
The world must find peace or find itself ripped up in pieces
Afflicted with the teaching's, that make ya feel inferior
Some say the government invents it all, that they just scarier
Polly want a cracker, but cracker want a sister
How come they could see her beauty, but brothers persist to diss her?
Revolutionary generation on an uprise
Never will they see another tear from this clown's eye


Livin' the life I live, I have to be positive
Hell's my reality, I chose not to ride in it
I did want to live fast, I just wanted much cash
But punks were persistent, they hunted with gauge blastSo I wasn't the violent type, I had to protect my life
Lovin' my brother, but if he steps, I'mma shoot him twice


Psychotic society
It's hard to find love with those who treat us like enemy
They call me a lunatic, I say realistic
Beware of their politics, it's sick as the sick get
The son of a Panther, see pain in my mama's eyes
Cause nobody thanked her for givin' them better lives
"Assata Shakur?"
Another auntie, I miss her though
Please thank Mr. Castro for keepin' her safe bro
How many more of us die before we can see the light
It's time brothers work it out, unite for a bigger fight
We're still in the same hole and now it's the 90's
Seems everyone's livin' large, but I ain't got mine G
But I got a bill for all the ill ya gave me
Society slavery, who's gonna pay me?
"Has anybody here seen Yusef Hawkins?"
I thought I seen him talkin' with Malcolm walkin'
"Where, over the rainbow"?
Naw, over the track
Another murdered brother, now where's the payback
Tears of a clown




Turn it up loud
Hahaha, ahahaha, hey man
You a little sucker for love, right?
Word up, hahahahaha

I shoulda seen
You was trouble right from the starrrrt, taught me so many lessons
How not to mess with broken hearts, so many questions
When this began we was the perfect match, perhaps
We had some problems but we workin at it, and now
The arguments are gettin loud, I wanna say
But I can't help from walkin out just a little way
Just take my hand and understand, if you could see
I never planned to be a man it just wasn't me
But now I'm searchin for commitment, in other arms
I wanna shelter you from harm, don't be alarmed
Your attitude was the cause, you got me stressin
Soon as I open up the door with your jealous questions
Like where can I be you're killin me with your jealousy
Now my ambition's to be free
I can't breathe, cause soon as I leave, it's like a trap
I hear you callin me to come back, I'm a sucka for love

I'm never gonna dance again, hahahaha thats right
Guilty feet have got no rhythm sucka for love
Though it's easy to pretend
I know you're not a fool, a sucka for love

Should've known better than to cheat a friend
And waste the chance that I've been given, a sucka for love
So I'm never gonna dance again
The way I danced with you

Just when I thought I broke away and I'm fellin happy
You try to trap me say you pregnant and guess who the daddy
Don't wanna fall for it, but in this case what could I do? So now I'm back
To makin promises to you, tryin to keep it true
What if I'm wrong, a trick to keep me on and on
Tryin to be strong and in the process, keep you goin
I'm bout to lose my composure, I'm gettin close
To packin up and leavin notes, and gettin ghost
Tell me who knows, a peaceful place where I can go
To clear my head I'm feelin low, losin control
My heart is sayin leave, oh what a tangle web we weave
When we conspire to conceive, and now
You gettin calls at the house, guess you cheatin
That's all I need to hear cause I'm leavin, I'm out the do'
Never no more will you see me, this is the end
Cause now I know you've been cheatin, I'm a sucka for love

I'm never gonna dance again, hahahaha thats right
Guilty feet have got no rhythm, sucka for love
Though it's easy to pretend
I know you're not a fool, a sucka for love

Should've known better than to cheat a friend
And waste the chance that I've been given, a sucka for love
So I'm never gonna dance again
The way I danced with you

As you sit and pray, hoping the beatings'll go away
It wasn't always a hit and run relationship
It use to be love, happieness and companionship
Remember when I treated you good
I moved you up to hills, out the ills of the ghetto hood
Me and you a happy home, when it was on
I had a love to call my own
I shoulda seen you was trouble but I was lost, trapped in your eyes
Preoccupied with gettin tossed, no need to lie
You had a man and I knew it, you told me
Don't worry bout it we can do it now I'm under pressure
Make a decision cause I'm waitin, when I'm alone
I'm on the phone havin secret conversations, huh
I wanna take your misery, replace it with happiness
But I need your faith in me, I'm a sucka for love
Hahahha thats right sucka for love
A sucka for love, a sucka for love




Jay Z, come out to play
Hey yo Assassin, gimme one of them tracks I can just ride on motherfuckers
With
Mobb deep.
Niggas talkin' bout we can't rap? Niggas must nota' never heard no motherfuckin'
Track off a death row nigga
DEATH ROW, WESTSIDE
Let's get it on, daylight or fuckin' nightbreak
Go into these niggas, to the motherfuckin' death

Come hell or high water
Down to slaughter opposes
Just another lost soul stuck callin' Jehovah
Outlaw til it's over
Brandish my strap. black like a cobra
I stay drunk. cause I'm a MADMAN. whenever sober
On a one man mission
My ambitions to hold up the rap game
While I pluck holes in niggas like donuts
And still, down to die for all my souljas
Like hillbillies, they don't feel me, so we FEUD. bringin' war to the city
With each breath, death before dishonor
Never let you swallow me, no apologies. your honor
A general in war, I'm the first to bomb
With a squad of trusted killers quick to move shit. heavily armed
I'm similar to Saddam sometimes I question "who's sane"
Like fiends frantic for that last vein, stuck in the game!
I hit the scene like sandstorm
Then transform. WATCH ME!
I take the figue of thirty niggas who all got me
While bitches wonderin' who shot me
No love. keep a grudge. shootin' slugs like my Muammar Quadaffi
Murder my friends, built a new posse
We takin' shots at paparazzi
Gonna fly now. nigga like Rocky
You got a lotta nerve to play me
Another gay rapper
Bustin' caps at Jay Z. and still avoid capture
While y'all caught up in' the rapture
Still after me I'm in Jamaica sippin' daiquiris
No doubt
We used to havin' nothin'
Then grabbin' somethin' and bustin'
Wanted to be the thug nigga. that my old man wasn't
I came to a fear of catchin' cases
Litigation. niggas playa hatin'. got me crooked in all fifty states
I'm screamin DEATH ROW. throwin' westside. ain't no thing
We was raised off driveby's. brought up to bang
We claim mob. MOB. if you be specific
We control. ALL cash from the Atlantic, Pacific
And get this. I'm hard to kill
While I build with this live spot
Father. how the hell did I SURVIVE. these five shots?!
Live it up or give it up
And like DEMONS. late night. hear 'em screamin'
WE GOIN' ALL OUT!

With money clutchin', bail, come murder man, po's rushin'
Cap tilted to the side, on the lean out the ride bustin'
Outlaws enforce the secrets of war, but won't abuse it
Burnt, bury my burners with my dead buddies when I use it
Give a fuck about later. shots warm through the equator
Death to you traitors, shots bitin' through your bones like alligator
Payin' my dues. lookin' for miscellaneous infamous crews
Old ladies sing the blues. leave them smokin' from they shoes

Now with my every wakin' moment
I'm on a quest to be better, yeah
Position myself to prosper state, prepared for whatever
But at times, I slip slightly, shit I ain't afraid to admit it
To gone, off that Novocaine, like in too hard to live it
And I'm just a smidgen past my teenage years. into adulthood
Now I ride with G's finally, knowin' myself good
And it felt good, when I was young but playtime's over
EDI here take this gun nigga it's over

I piss cold blood, shit hot liquor out my liver
Smoke like a tail pipe, and write when I'm bitter
All my life I been considered a downright, dirty nigga
From when daddy knocked mama' s twat popped the last drop from the litter
Tell me give the world hell
But in hell I give 'em mo'
And I bail outta jail
Screamin' fuck the Po' Po'
When I run to take that enough, from a simple fuck
To multimillion dollar luck

Plus I think it's time to grab all pistols, wave them shits in the air
Celebrate Outlaw livin' nigga, I wouldn't be here
To you death is losin', and to me this shit's a family reunion
And to hell wit a peace treaty, never call it, cause it wouldn't feed me
My wallet. be as empty as the day I got started
Twelve shots in my pocket, left my niggas departed
It's a shame that these snake vultures niggas coldhearted
In a dirty world where only God know yo death and can call it

We thugged out, low cut, Outlawz rush and royal flush
Bomb first kickin' dust. out in Cali, but I ain't in it so much
Make 'em pay state to state, NJ to CA
Them cowards felt the weight, and turned feminine like Michel'le
Niggas change they whole style when the outlawz comin'
A million miles and thuggin'
Young Noble.I keep 'em buzzin'
While the rapture. capture this fuckin' style that I master
Bringin' terminal disaster. HIT YOU UP when I pass nigga

US, THE FIRST TO BUST, WHO DO WE TRUST? OUT FOR MOBB DEEP AND JAY Z, DEAD IN
THE DUST
I TOLD YOU PUNKS THAT I WAS AFTER BIGGIE YOU GOT INVOLVED, NOW WE BOUT TO
BUST ON ALL Y'ALL, GOIN' ALL OUT
US, THE FIRST TO BUST, WHO DO WE TRUST? OUT FOR MOBB DEEP AND JAY Z, DEAD IN
THE DUST
I TOLD YOU PUNKS THAT I WAS AFTER BIGGIE, YOU GOT INVOLVED, NOW WE BOUT TO
BUST ON ALL Y'ALL, GOIN' ALL OUT
US, THE FIRST TO BUST, WHO DO WE TRUST? OUT FOR MOBB DEEP AND JAY Z, DEAD IN
THE DUST
I TOLD YOU PUNKS THAT I WAS AFTER PIGGIE YOU GOT INVOLVED, NOW WE BOUT TO
BUST ON ALL Y'ALL, WESTSIDE, GOIN' ALL OUT

Jay Z, haha boy you at yo funeral, punk motherfucker
WESTSIDE, OUTLAW, DEATHROW, MAKAVELI THA DON OUTLAWZ THE CRIMINAL
DESPERADO'S, WESTSIDE THUG LIVIN'
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE, DIE SLOW
DIE, DIE, DIE SLOW
Mmh, DIE, DIE SLOW
MY LABEL, THE NOTORIOUS, UNTOUCHABLE, DEATH ROW



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Hey, ooh ah ooh oh oh

When your hero falls from grace
All your fairy tales are uncovered

Myths exposed and pain magnified
The greatest pain discovered

You told me to be strong but I'm confused to see you so weak
You said to never to give up and it hurts to see you welcoming me

When your hero falls so do the stars
When your hero falls so do the stars
And so does the perception of tomorrow

Without my hero there is only me alone
To deal with my sorrow, to deal with my sorrow

Your insistance to work and your soul is not happy at all
What do you expect it to do when your hero falls
So do the stars

See I know you're wondering how do I carry on
You want to give up you feel there's nobody to love
But if you look around there's so many people have been what you been
Through
You gotta let go you gotta be strong oh

Sing it again one more time


When your only hero falls



"2Pac, 2Pac go ahead"
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
"2Pac go ahead and rock, 2Pac, 2Pac"
"2Pac go ahead, 2Pac"
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me

I'm smokin' these niggas like they indo
Breakin' em' like they windows, and still they with
Until they get a whiff of this shit that I kick
And if they ever had a notion to stop me
Shoot cha' best shot and get dropped with ya posse
Nigga I got the Motts
I thinkin' the amount, a lot I got
More than you can hot
I'm rockin' the spot so now they jock
Come, come and get dropped
2Pac ain't trying to hear it
I can swing it at cha' rock
I'm swearin' that cha' not so hot
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
Better have a bat or a gat to defeat me
Nigga, I'm a whole posse rolled into one shot
Takin' all ya got, while ya girl gets hot and rocks the spot
Pure, funky flavor with the gift that only God gave
All the way to my grave, I'd rather die than be a slave
Slaves come as dope dealers, some come as addicts
Some come to run while the other cause static



I'm smokin' these niggas like they indo
Breakin' em' like they windows, and still they with
Until they get a whiff of this shit that I kick
And if they ever had a notion to stop me
Shoot cha' best shot and get dropped with ya posse
Nigga I got the Motts
I thinkin' the amount, a lot I got
More than you can hot
I'm rockin' the spot so now they jock
Come, come and get dropped
2Pac ain't trying to hear it
I can swing it at cha' rock
I'm swearin' that cha' not so hot
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
Better have a bat or a gat to defeat me
Nigga, I'm a whole posse rolled into one shot
Takin' all ya got, while ya girl gets hot and rocks the spot
Pure, funky flavor with the gift that only God gave
All the way to my grave, I'd rather die than be a slave
Slaves come as dope dealers, some come as addicts
Some come to run while the other cause static




Let knowledge drop
Why should I be forced to play dumb?
I know where I came from so I'm going to claim some
But rocking to the top where the cream of the crop
Suckers calling the cops but they can come and get dropped
Stop think of the past the brothers that die for
Sucker to try for never to cry more
Tricks to hold his back but we'll see at the end
He's a fake not a friend
So he's thinking of when he can backstab grab or go your hole
Yo he's a trick so he sold his soul for gold
Now I know the reason we must excel
Cause if we don't we'll end up in the cell
Move on be strong with unity
Cause that's the only way to build communities
Lies are told but yo lives must move on
And never stop open your mind to this rhyme and let it drop

Let knowledge drop

Yo I'm running so I refuse to stop
Get sweated by them sell out cops
And I wink cause I pin the opposition
I'm on a mission to preach and teach to reach
So listen up to the flavor I gave you now dropping it
We folks know ballers know no stopping it
Dropping knowledge like the ay bomb dilly as napalm
I got you scared and nervous you tried to stay calm
For the simple fact that I'm black and educated
Proud of who am I and you hated
So all I have tried for this many have die for this
You see it and you hear it and you loving it
Now you buying this always keep your head look to the mountain top
Aiyyo rock and let knowledge drop

Let knowledge drop

Suckers suffocate when I hype this because you can write this
You constantly bite this
Thought that you could get me but you sweating me too close
Caught with the dope dose
Now suckers get toast wondering who you tossed
Cause you building a boom force
Like what you hearing so your checking with the source
2Pac brother with the rhymes to rock on
Dizzy gets busy by putting beats to drop on
Amateurs get damaged if you try to attack me
Suckers get jealous cause the girls get at me
I'm not conceited but defeated I won't be
As long as there's dope beats I'll never be lonely stop
And let me breathe a minute
Aiyyo Dizzy what's up put the base back in it


By any means neccessary it's kind of scary
Knowledge of the hands of adversaries
Makes them the larger leader kind of guerilla control
I was waiting for a present GOD gave me a goal
I refuse to be busting like a sucker for I'm fighting like a titan
And run you down like a truck
I'll take a chance I vote for rock can see
Not mediocrity thinking security you got deal with me
Knowledge appealed to me
Pay back's a mutha if you steal from me
The bass pumps as the speakers pop the house jump
And knowledge drops

Let knowledge drop



What goes on in the mind of a bad boy? Nothin' but payback
Better watch your back
Since he's makin' that comeback
The 1-87 will stop 'em
The hollow point, will drop ya
Go on, here's a scene for your soul
So take heed when you meet face-to-face, here comes the grim reaper
You best to profit from the depths of hell
He's a real McCoy
But ain't no stoppin' this girl is bad boy
He ain't no joke
Muthafucka grab your throat
Before you find yourself cut with a blade
As your bloody body lays on top of cement
In front of your president
It was a murder for hire
Hit an innocent child in the crossfire
Now he's confined to a jail
Got shot six times, in his spine
But his mind is still down at the grind
He's willin' to destroy
That's what he lives for, to be a bad boy

Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we commin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, we're comin' after you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you

I got these bustas on my block and they after me
Runnin' 'round tellin' these niggas, how they gon' capture me
It's gettin' crazy, it's hard to make my mind up
Now should I, buck 'em down, or put my nine up?
You see, I ain't a bad boy, just a boy who had it bad
I graduated from 22's to 3-57 mags
Runnin' on these marks 'fore they stashin'
I ain't askin', give it up, or get to blastin'
The penitentiary don't scare me
A straight thug nigga, the whole set'll take care of me
And tell me, who the fuck you gon' find
Rough enough to tear these bitch-niggas, this is mine
Now busta, meet my nine, 24 on the grind
I'm sick about mine, and uh, ain't nothin' wrong with gettin' high
A hustlin'-ass nigga from the projects, I'm makin' loot
And screamin' Thug Life, nigga, when I shoot
They made me

Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we commin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, we're comin' after you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we comin' at you

Now how many bad boys in the house
So hurry boys got the bigger nuts
What the fuck, I gave 'em the blunts
Havin' a grudge against the whole fuckin' world
A 16 shot-block-Glock, that'll stop 'em
They're sure to hit the ground
Nothin', bustin' a cap on no more every round
A bad boy is the big, shot on the block
He got knots, bigger rocks for the cops
Before he gets props
So you petty boys, you can't fuck with em'
You can eat the biggies' good friend
Or become a victim of a dead man
It's sad to see, when you end up six-feet deep
So rest in peace, muthafucka, join the pow
He got nothin' but the realest style
Flavors when on the mic
And packin' the meal like life
Savers, sweep up on you at night
His grip on tight, and make you take a bite
That's all she wrote, barrel went down your throat
Killin' off these niggas for fun
Murder one, and throw away your gun
He's livin' his life like a soldier
That's what he lives for, to be a Bad Boy

Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we commin' at you
Bad Boy, Bad Boy, watcha gonna do?
Watcha gonna do, watch out, we're comin' after you




They stole the mic I grip
I'm feelin' tired and sick
My microphone was gone
I put the cops on the case
Without a clue or a trace
So as sure as smokin' cigarettes is bad for your health
If I want my microphone back I'll find it myself
Let's get busy!
Before I told Dizzy what I wanted to do
He was over at my house with the TMS crew
Now that its gone, its not long 'til you're beat)
I got a battle at six
Without my microphone
I'm guaranteed to get whipped
Ya might think it's unbelievable
But word to the strength
When it comes to rockin' rhymes
I'm a musical nymph
They gave me other mics
But yo, it wasn't no use
But I couldn't get loose
I said forget it
With microphone or not, I gotta do it
It'd be the first time I lost
But if I beat 'em, it'd finally prove that I'm the boss
I grabbed my leather jacket
Walked through the streets
Was hopin' and prayin'
Strictly Dope won't get beat
I begin to get hyped; I was ready to fight
Yo, I was confident that I went
To hell with the mic!
I hop on to the stage
Dizzy started the beat
The sucka' shivered
Because he tasted defeat
Then I signaled to Dizzy and
Bust a rhyme with my head
And then he was dead
I was happy as hell
Cause I was lucky that night
Put my hand in my pocket
And there was my mic
Haha



Next to the first
Let's bring it to these niggas with some love
Let's show niggas we understand what they goin' through
We know that it's hell 4 a hustla out here
With 3 strikes and jail and penitentiaries and police
And task force, and snitches and bitches and niggas
And playa haters, sit the fuck down
Naw mean
We got to build on this shit
I got some real shit
To hit your ass
Let's spread love nigga
Death Row done made a few fuckin' changes
This is how we do this shit
It's hell 4 a hustla
Makaveli the Don with the Outlawz

Throw your muthafuckin' guns in the air
If you're truly livin' this criminal lifestyle
All my Outlawz, to all you bitch made niggas
Get on your knees nigga, aiite, get on your knees and pray

Oh Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler
Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler

If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
I'm makin' money moves mandatory
Picture niggas we rushin' and still bustin'
But now legitly
Why plant seeds in a dirty bitch, waitin' to trick me
Not the life for me
Livin' carefree, 'til I'm buried - and if they dare me
I'm clearly a man of military means to my artillery
Watchin' over me through every murder scene
From adolescence, to my early teens, thought we was gonna die
Sellin' dope to all the fiends, at times I wanna cry
And still, we try to change the past, in vain
Never knowin' if this game'll last, feelin' the shame
Got tired of small time livin', niggas tellin' me no
I got mine!, fuck them other sucker!, that's the mentality
Jealous-ass bustaz, make it hell for a hustler

Oh Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
Never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler
Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler

If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
I wonder
How do these cowards be conceived
They born into this world, allowed to breathe
While so many real G's they die secret
But Outlawz, we ride so righteously
Control the destiny, we mobbin' with a sight
To see, all together, never separately

It's it a criminal hobby
That got me here thinkin' robbery
Call Oz up the ave uptown back in Cabust
And not a lot of poverty, whether you white like dark
Or brown like Bobby, while dime bitches give me body 'til
They open

Now that's the good of all evil, so tell me what's the worse
Me deep in my hearse, stuck in crime like time fly over here
First, waitin' for credit, contemplatin' my fate
And is the Lord comin', to take me on Judgement Day

They got the fiends usin' up beans with dirty blood on a needle
Stranded, blunted in his van, don't give a damn if you see 'em
Get him branded
Most likely I'm a real nigga, so while the 2 Loc
Five shots will leave y'all to live or die

Well I been hustlin' off the same block since a little shorty wap
Taped up notts so my sock, duckin' the muthafuckin' cops
Watch me shop up, and locked up, come back and blow the block up
Preoccupied with gettin' my cheese and fuck the process

Oh Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler
Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler

If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
Censor me and bar your kids from the lessons I learned
And in turn I'm hostile guess you can recall me anti-social
Niggas shakin' like they caught the holy ghost when I approach em'
Try to politic, before I smoke em, like Sun Tzu
Niggas do unto these snitches, before it's done to you
And if the cops come arrest me in the evenin'
Best believe they runnin' for my dogs in the mornin'
And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
High, watch me murder the bird, before he testify
Strikes, walkin' close to my third, I live a troubled life
And if you dream be a part of my team
From Long Beach to Queens, drug dealers to ex-fiends
Keep yo' eyes on the prize, nigga watch for bustaz'
Either heaven or jail, it's still hell 4 a hustler

Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler
Lord, help me change my ways
Show a little mercy on judgement day
It ain't me, I was raised this way
I never let 'em play me for a busta
Makin' hell for a hustler

If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on then it's on
We break beat breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate
To the shit I don't got, be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate

This is how we ride
Not knowin' if we'll live or die
Catch me rollin' with my motherfuckin' guns on the side
In case of drama, I'm the first to break wild
Do we all die
This is how we ride
Not knowin' if we'll live or die
Catch me rollin' with my motherfuckin' guns on the side
In case of drama, I'm the first to break wild
Until they all die, Outlaw, baby

Yes, yes yes
The Black Jesuz guide us through this
Weary weary weary weary, aiite
Only God can save us
Nuttin but boss players
Outlawz and thugs
No time for the drugs
Now the rap game, similar to the crack game
Hahaha
My enemies plantin' seeds
My few friendz til the end
Outlaw, rough rugged and raw
Jay Z Gay Z die slow
Mobb Deep you sleep, die slow
Biggie, piggie, Puffy nuttin, die slow
Hahaha
We ain't quitin'
Nigga ain't stoppin'
War, it's war nigga
Yea, yea
Like the niggas in Iran and Iraq, it don't stop
Sure my name is 2Pac
Makaveli with Thuglife across my belly
All my niggas with they name on they neck
Give us respect or die get chin check
WESTSIDDDDDDDDDDDDE, Death Row
Outlaw
Word up




Engineered by Dave Aron

Featuring Snoop Doggy Dogg, Nate Dogg, Fatal and Yaki Kadafi
Published by Songs of Universal




When I enter the first zone
Worst known mic holder
My Hummer roll up
Evacuating strapped soldiers
Inside strategy
Manifestin' military styles
Casually try da g
When niggas battle me
My prophesied prediction
Switch and move positions
Separated from his gun and bitch
And watch 'em start snitchin'
I keep spittin' still stupid niggas fail to listen
I personify this thug livin'
Hell or prison
My ammunition varies
My voice carries
Watch me invite the whole world
Me and the mob gettin' married
It seems all the fine screams pierce the dark
This is expected
A trick bitch where is your heart
You're marked
Watch niggas fall when I call they name
We outlaws hold your head niggas all the same
Except some who want more out of life than stress
We still thuggin' 'til its none left

"Thug Nigga" Keeping it blood my people is bugged
Heat you with slugs hundred deep in the club
"Big Poppa" ? Pun
We're warriors from goriest and the most notorious slums
"Corleone" Thugs in the heart we bug from the start
Rugged and smart anyone who want it fuck it lets mob
"When the punisher ready" Just rest
Learnt from TS from god flesh

Frank White the Desperado
Used to rock the all-black Movado
The all-black El Dorado
All that and a bottle of Dom P
Niggas can't harm me
I keep the army
Is Brooklyn in the house
Without a doubt
I'm the rapper with clout everybody yap about
Check it out
Guns, I bust em
Problems with my wife
Don't discuss em
Coupes and Learjets
I lust them
Finger prints
I dust them
Recent address
Stuck you for your stash in your pissy mattress
Your Mom's an actress
Didn't wanna show me the safe
It's okay, she was old anyway
I display, Hot 97 rhyme-ready
Cocked Mac-11, line steady
Like Tevin Campbell
I'm Ready
To do what I do
Continuously to get money

"Thug Nigga" Keeping it blood my people is bugged
Heat you with slugs hundred deep in the club
"Big Poppa" ? Pun
We're warriors from goriest and the most notorious slums
"Corleone" Thugs in the heart we bug from the start
Rugged and smart anyone who want it fuck it lets mob
"When the punisher ready" Just rest
Learnt from TS from god flesh

When I cruise through the ghetto I drive slow
I'm quick to buck a duck and I don't give a fuck about 5-0
A hard core life I toast to ex flaw
Therefore I live raw and went to war wit the law
My only picture was a mug shot slugs were thugs got pot
Get swellin hops from sellin tops to the drugs spot
G's was clocked fat knots was in the socks
And cops who tried to stop shop got knocked when I popped the Glock
Shit was ran right by me and my man Mike
Cause I choose to use a gun don't mean that I can't fight
Cause we put the guns down and go one round
Wit the hands but man I ain't the one, you'll get done clown
I can inverse my style, cause I'm versatile
Quick to burst a child I'm livin worse than foul
I pack two techs in case ya crew flex
I wet up the set in a second yell whos next
To feel the wrath of a psychopath shoots it up like Shaft
Turn ya staff into a blood bath to laugh
You'll get smashed like a deli snack, you softer than jelly jack
I attack in black wit a gat and a skully hat

"Thug Nigga" Keeping it blood my people is bugged
Heat you with slugs hundred deep in the club
"Big Poppa" ? Pun
We're warriors from goriest and the most notorious slums
"Corleone" Thugs in the heart we bug from the start
Rugged and smart anyone who want it fuck it lets mob
"When the punisher ready" Just rest
Learnt from TS from god flesh

No doubt I'm from the X and I seen it all
Shorties wit dreams of playin ball for Seton Hall turnin fiends a full
From Meda ward to Sacuon the same sad song
Is bein sung, its like gimmie a gun and I'm back on
Joey Crack, Pun, TS, Bronx regulators
Stomp little niggas to death for tryin to imitate us
Yall could neva see us, be us, TS, kill da bs
Cause Pun got more guns and funds than Undeas
Un be us, I'm from the BX so I have to roll
Blast the 4 crash ya door smash ya ho
Hack off ya skull, I'm stackin heads like totem poles
Blow a hole in ya colon throw you from here to Fordan road
Blow for blow, I toe to toe with the toughest
Brung the ruckas to the roughest muthafucka its nothin but luckstress
My crews are cussin to bustin ass crushin glass
In niggas faces leavin traces of red out this bloody bath

"Thug Nigga" Keeping it blood my people is bugged
Heat you with slugs hundred deep in the club
"Big Poppa" ? Pun
We're warriors from goriest and the most notorious slums
"Corleone" Thugs in the heart we bug from the start
Rugged and smart anyone who want it fuck it lets mob
"When the punisher ready" Just rest
Learnt from TS from god flesh



He's braggin about his new Jordan's
The baby just ran out of milk
He's buyin gold every two weeks
The baby just ran out of Pampers
He's buyin clothes for his new girl
And the baby just ran out of medicine
You ask for money for the baby?
The daddy just ran out the door



You probably crooked as the last chick
Want to laugh about how I got myself caught up with this bad trick
Thinkin' I had her but she had me in the long run
It's just my luck I'm stuck with messin' with the wrong one huh
Wise decisions, based on lies we livin'
Scandalous times, this game's like my religion
You could be rollin' with a thug
Instead you with this weak scrub, lookin' for some love
In every club
I see you starin' like you want it
Well baby, if you got it better flaunt it
Let the liquor help you get up on it
I'm still tipsy from last night
Bumpin' the walls as I pause
Addicted to the fast life
I try to holla but you tell me you taken
Sayin' you ain't impressed, with the money I'm makin'
Guess it's true what they tellin' me
Fresh out of jail, life's hell for a black celebrity
Well that's the reason why I call, and maybe you with it
Fantasies of us kissing , can I get it? hahahah
Addicted to the things you do, but still true, what I'm sayin', boo
'Cause this is all about you

No matter where I go, I see the same ho

Look
I make a promise if you go with me
Just let me know, I'll have you hollerin' my name out before I leave
Nobody loves me I'm a thug
I only hung out with the criminal to sold drugs
And show love , 'cause we comin' from the same place
Witness me holla at a woman, see how quick the game takes
How can I tell her I'm a playa and I don't even care
Creep low, weed smoke's in the air
Now everybody go, it's all about the groupie hoes
Waitin' for brothers at the end of every show
Now I can seen you in my friend's video
Look here, I never put a girl before my friends,  here we go
Just Follow the leader and peep the drama that I'm goin' through
See here, It's all about you, and you and you and you and you, and you
It's all about you

No matter where I go, I see the same ho

I see you struttin' in your miniskirt
A crooked smile with a heart that did plenty dirt
Will it work with your ass as you pass me by?
Sayin' "hey," I've been looking at you smile all day, let's parlay
Drinkin' liquor, kissin' to help you know me quicker
While I keep workin' on your zipper, my tongue kissin'
In your position I'm fortified to do the mission
Move your hips and groove to this
Too many cooks in the kitchen, nobody take the time to listen
They probably think we still dissin'
Wit' your permission, I can make you scream my name
I'm a real man, guide you through the sleazy game
Follow me, let me take you to the ecstasy
You'll have the time of your life when you next to me you'll see
Ain't no way they can stop me
When I know a true thug woman got me
Come on

No matter where I go, I see the same ho
Every other city we go, every other vi-de-o
No matter where I go, I see the same ho

Youknowhatimsayin'?
I'm sittin' back, watchin' Montell Jordan video
I see the same bitch, who was in my homeboy Nate Dogg video
Then I flip the channel
I'm checkin' out my homeboy 2Pac video
I see the same bitch that was in my video, yaknahmsayin'?
And then, yaknahmsayin', what make that even mo' fucked up
I'm watchin' a Million Man March
And I see the same bitch, on the Million Man March
That was in the homeboy Warren G video
I mean - damn - everywhere I look, everywhere I go
I see the same ho
Don't get mad, I'm only bein' real
Yeah



Against all odds, I'm still here nigga
O.P.D. -- what??!
Aiyyy, I got to get my props for 2Pacalypse
When this album come out, niggas can kiss my ass
Did you think I'd fall?
You think you could stop a motherfucker like me?
Introducing you to my criminal crew
Treach, A.D., Apache, Essential
Above the Law, Lench Mob, the Underground Railroad, Digital Underground gets around and we down in this bitch
You got to deal with me on a whole new level motherfucker
Cause I'm gettin' paid
And the more you try to keep niggas away from me
The more I unite with mo' niggas and mo' niggas and mo' niggas
Extra special thanks to my nigga Big John Major
And there's a ghetto in every city and a nigga in every ghetto
Motherfucker we are unstoppable
I owe him, thanks to my man Mike Cooley and the rest of our fathers
And uhh, I'm not goin' alive!



You can get ya cash on
You can get ya cash on
Don't fall asleep

You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep

Pictures of penny, sippin' my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi—automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, 'cause I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die wit' open eyes
Scare to take a nap, it's a trap, a long maze
Dreamin' of gettin' stacks, makin' scratch the wrong way
What the song say, we murder motherfuckers daily
Black out blow the crack out, my lyrics never fail me
I inhale strong weed, then release the stress
Deliver the bomb shit from the east to west
Like yay-yo
Niggas pull out when I say so
Commence to poppin' motherfuckers copy me, it’s fatal
Efficiently I delete then flee
The art of war, livin' sucka free, get wit' me
Motherfucker don't sleep

Don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep

Pictures of penny, sippin' my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi—automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, 'cause I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die wit' open eyes

You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep

Learnin'
Duckin' stray shots, bullets be hot, they burnin'
Inhalin' smoke, visualize the flames
Will I be smothered by my own pain?
Strange whispers, cowards conversate, so quick to diss us
Takin' pictures for the feds in desperate hopes they'd get us
Hit us off, give us plenty centuries
Forgive my sins, many penitentiaries
The best revenge is somebody save me, lost and crazy
Scared to drop a seed hopin' I ain't cursed my babies
Maybe now feel me now, picture my pain
Embrace my words, make the world change

You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get ya cash on nigga if ya peep
Other niggas close they eyes
Seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep




It's 3, The hard way
Black Lambo, No passengers
Black Ski mask, Chain Saw Massacre
Kill fast with the Ak-four 7
Loaded clips, Lock 'em in
Got a black four five
Call it Pac's revenge
I'm a mutha fuckin animal
Lil Jon be canibal
Every nigga in Atlanta Know
I'm psycho insane about my cash, they should re-open alcatraz
And sentance with a life without rehabillitaion
Fuck Governor Schwarzenegger
It's my statment
Dear Mr. President Barack Obama, Righ after you catch Osama, Tell Mr. Waso
Please let oprah know that I won't ever stop sayin bitch and hoe



Sick, Thicker than most of these tricks
I got my mind on makin money but you stuck on these fake bitches
I stay blunted, And never fronted and I doubt if I do
Cause if I do, Then I get beat up by my fuckin crew
A real nigga, Since you figure that you ready to box
You catchin knots from my nigga Freddie Fox
And I, You really don't want none from Pac
Cause I'll be strapped wit a Glock
And throw thangs like I'm born to box
I'll hit this motherfuckin gin then I'll be all in
Hell yeah, Young niggas straight ballin
And everybody wants to see if I'm a g weighin' 165





Postal border was makin' me mad
So I get up in my cruiser, broke out of the pad
Rolled to the West Side to check out my boys
Twenty brothers in the park, all bringin' the noise
Stepped out the car, Levi's saggin'
Gold around my neck with my limb-walk laggin'
Walked up on my boys with the old E chillin'
The box with the big beats and my boys started illin'
A hoop game started so I jump in
Had the hoods' toughest team so I just had to win
Diz to the outside, 2Pac up the center
A ten minute game and we were the winners
The boys started smackin', talkin' that slack and
Till he see my posse and the suckers started backin'
Tried to say we cheat, because he got beat
Another lightweight sucker that can't handle defeat
People wonder why I choose to live the hype
It's not to understand, it's just a day in the life
Kick it - it's just a day in the life

Finally I'm on vacation and school is through
So here I am, on Monday mornin' with nothin' to do
Tried to get outta my bed, but I can't move
Ya see I'm stuck to my matress like crazy glue
So there I lay, for half the day just thinkin'
Got up to brush my teeth cause my breath started stinkin'
But I was all alone so it wasn't no thing
Got up to take a shower and heard the phone ring
Picked it up, the salutations, little bit frustrations
Who could be disturbin' me on my vacation?
Speakin' on the phone in an aggravatin' tone
Now I know what Michael meant by leave me alone
So I'm askin' who is it? and the answer shocks me
It was the voice of my homeboy Roc-T
Him and Dizzy had been waitin' for me
Had a show at three and now I'm late as can be
Said I have to take a shower, I'll go ahead and take it
If I leave within the hour, I still might make it
I'm rollin' in a sweatsuit, wasn't tryin' to get cute
I started rappin', girls started clappin'
Couldn't wait to finish so I could start mackin'
Jumped off stage, picked up the girl for the night
Huh, that's how I'm livin', a day in the life, come on
A day in the life

Stretch white limo hits the colessium
Who is in the limo, who are they talkin' about?
Strictly Dope in the house, here to turn the party out
We get out the car and can barely stand
Cause everywhere I look are screamin' fans
Girls on my tip but I really don't sweat 'em
They'll tear my new clothes if your bodyguards'll let 'em
Hit backstage with two minutes to spare
Just enough time to grip a breath of fresh air
We hear the introduction, the audience is loud
I stepped out on the stage and then I moved the crowd
Winners all over, we tried to leave the scene
But there's a whole crowd of people at the limousine
Pen and paper in my face, I couldn't be mean
So I was signin' autographs at the age of seventeen
People wonder why I choose to live the hype
It's not hard to understand, it's just a day in the life
Kick it - it's a day in the life

Kick it, kick it, kick it

Coolin' with my posse at the neighborhood disco
Talkin' to a cutie as I'm sippin' on my cisco
Askin' me to dance but I keep on sayin' "No"
Hate to dance fast, I only like to do it slow
Dizzy's on the dance floor, funky, funky motion
Girl keeps on sweatin' me with sexual kind of totions
Roc is signin' autographs makin' girlies dizzy
Crowd sweatin' Strictly Dope cause we're gettin' busy
Suckers wanna battle us, we move in silence
Strictly Dope is positive, we're tryin' to stop the violence
Started feel tipsy, I'm lookin' for the door
The Cisco had me dizzy, I stumbled to the floor
And more I try to sit up, the less I seem to get up
My stomach starts to turn and my head feels wit' up
The room begins to spin, I pass out for the night
Just another way of livin' a day in the life, kick it

Knew I was a genius, soon as you seen this
Avoid ho's value, don't have to redeem this
Teenage terror, no room for error
A girl start dissin', and I SCARE HER!!
Risin' like inflation on your favorite station
Rap is my forte and my recreation
Girls wanna kiss me, suckers wanna diss me
My mother didn't want me to be, but I'ma emcee
The ladies desire, emcees admire
That's why many hate me and call me liar
Hoods of the hype-tip, girls on the ill-trip
I'm through rockin' this whack, so that's it
I am the high type, my style is so right
It's not hard to understand, it's just a day in the life



Yeah
Who'll be the last motherfucker breathin'?
Who'll be the last motherfucker breathin'?

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason, to be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin', my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin', now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'
Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason, to be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin', my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin', now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Woke up with fifty enemies plottin' my death
All fifty seein' visions of me shot in the chest
Couldn't rest, nah nigga I was stressed
Had me creepin' 'round corners, homie sleepin' in my vest
Shit, I'm like a hostage on this troubled block, call the cops
A thug nigga screamin' "West Side", bustin' double Glocks
Hittin' corners in my Chevy Suburban
Liquor got me drivin' up on the curb, hand on the steerin' wheel swervin'
Bless me Father I'ma sinner, I'm livin' in hell
Just let me live on the streets, cause ain't no peace for me in jail
Gettin' world-wide exposure
With a bunch of niggas that don't give a FUCK, ridin' as my soldiers
I just release 'em on a war path, not your average dealer
Westside Outlaw; Bad Boy killer, huh
Complete my mission my competition no longer beefin'
I murdered all them bustas now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason, to be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin', my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin', now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'


Stressed, but busta free
Enemies give me reason, to be the last motherfucker breathin'
Bustin', my automatic rounds
Catch 'em while they sleepin', now I'm the last motherfucker breathin'

Hoppin' out my four door Chevy, in this game, I'm still heavy
Rather be your N.I.G.G.A. if you still let me
Promise not to cum quick
You fuckin' around with the Don bitch, I run shit, with one clip Mr. Makaveli quick to mack, go back to the telli
I fuck a bitch like I'm psychotic, I think that's what they tell me
Fuck around I don't fight fair
A world wide mob figga, local nightmare, just call 'em right there
Open fire, 'cause my desire is to ride
Got every nigga signed to Bad Boy, prayin' that I die
Some have prophesized, homicide, some have tried
They couldn't see the coward in they eyes, 'til they died
They wonder why, they targets
Defenseless, when my squad hits, hard niggas




This song is dedicated
To the mothers and the children of the revolution
From 2Pac, to Afeni Shakur
And many many more
This is for you
One love, one life

Can you see.. the pride of the panther
As she nurtures.. her young all alone
It's the seed.. that must grow regardless
Of the fact that, it's been planted in stone
Can you see.. the pride of the panther
In the concrete jungle, alone with her cub
It's the seed.. that must come to harvest
It's the tree.. that must grow out of love

Can you see the pride in the panther
As he glows in splendor and grace?
Topling obstacles placed
In the way of the progression of his race?
Can you see the pride in the panther
As she nurtures her young, all alone?
The seed must grow regardless
Of the fact that it's planted in stone
Can't you see the pride of the panthers
As they unify, as one?
The flower blooms with brilliance and
Outshines all the rays of the sun
Keeps bright like the rays of the sun
Carries out like the rays of the sun
Keeps bright like the rays of the sun
Shines bright like a new day begun

Can you see the pride in the panther
As he glows in splendor and grace?
Topling the obstacles placed
In the way of the progression of his race
Can you see the pride in the panther
As she nurtures her young all alone?
The seed must grow, regardless
Of the fact that it's been planted in stone
Can't you see the pride of the panthers
As they unify as one?
The flower blooms, with brilliance
And outshines all the rays of the sun
It outshines all the rays of the sun
And keeps high like a new day begun

Shines bright like the rays of the SUN!
Keeps high like a new day begun
Carry out like the rays of the sun
Keep on like a new day begun, say
Shine bright like the rays of the SUN!
Keep high like a new day begun, say
Keep high like a new day begun, say
Shine bright like the rays of the SUN!
Keep high like a new day begun, yes
Keep it high like the new day begin say
Carry out like a new day begun
A new day begun, a new day begun
A new day begun begun begun begun
Begun begun begun.. hoo!
Love is the people's power

Every revolutionary act is a act of love
And love is the engine of the revolution
I love y'all, like 'Pac loved y'all
Like Afeni loved 'Pac, like we love Afeni
Like we love love.. one love



I'd roll for you, I'd die for you, it's all for you

I'd ride for you, I'd roll for you, I'd die for you, it's all for you
You are ripping us apart
Shit's, dedicated to crack, I dedicate it to that
Uh, Uh...before you came...Never...Never

Before you came, the triangle never broke
But as the two pushed you away {But as the two pushed you away}
The one got weak and embraced you {One got weak and embraced you}


The worst feeling, {The worst feeling of helplessness}
The greatest pain, has rested in my heart {has rested in my heart}
My hero has been defeated by you {My hero has been defeated by you}

The circle, can never, be broken, NoOooo

{Echo}
I know the worst is here {I know the worst is here}
I feel it in my heart {I feel it in my heart}
U got in the circle {U got in the circle}
Now you're tearing Us apart!!! {Now you're tearin Us Apart!!}

Dedicated to who
Dedicated to Pac
Opposite of crack, fight back



Feat. 50 Cent


There's gon' be some stuff you gon' see
That's gon' make it hard to smile in the future

Yeah nigga! Ha ha
Let's go nigga, this is what it is
2Pac cut his head bald
2Pac wear a bandana
You wan' wear a bandana
2Pac put a cross on his back
You wanna put crosses on yo' back
Nigga you ain't 2Pac - THIS 2Pac!

Is it, money or women to funny beginnings, tragic endings
I can make a million and STILL not get enough of spending
And since my life is based on sinnin, I'm hellbound
Rather be buried than be worried, livin held down
My game plan to be trained and, military
Mind of a Thug Lord, sittin in the cemetary
Caught, I've been lost since my adolescence, callin to Jesus
Ballin as a youngster, wonderin if he sees us
Young black male, crack sales got me three strikes
Livin in jail, this is hell, enemies die
Wonder when we all pass is anybody listenin?
Got my, hands on my semi shotty, everybody's bitchin
Please God can you understand me, bless my family
Guide us all, before we fall into insanity
I make it a point, to make my peep bumpin warlike
Drop some shit, to any stupid bitches don't fight

'Til Makaveli returns, it's +All Eyez On Me+
And you can hate it or love it, but that's what it's gon' be
{oooooooooohhhh}
You shoulda listened, I told you not to fuck with me
Now can you take the pressure, that's what we gon' see

Now since you're cryin for mercy I promise
My success'll be the death of you
Lo and behold you sold your soul
Nigga there's nuttin left of you
Look in the mirror, ask yourself who are you?
If you don't know who you are, how could your dreams come true?
Motherfucker, I sat back and watched
You pretended to be 'Pac, you pretended to be hot
You can't take the pressure, you pussy
I warned you not to push me
You see me and chills run up your spine
Hardly even in the same war, but your heart ain't like mine
Press, they look at me like I'm a menace
I was playin with guns
While your momma had your punk ass playin tennis
I'm a nightmare, you see me when you dream
Wake up, turn on your TV and see my ass again
You cowardly hearted, you couldn't make it on your own
Fuck THE SOURCE, I'm on cover of Rolling Stone

G-G-G-G-Unit!




Young black male, I barely made my way out
I couldn't hack the jail, that's why I plan to stay out
I'm getting fat mail, 'cause that would never play out
And making rap sales, I gotta another way out
Jacking motherfuckers for a livin'
I know too many famous people, to be hungry on Thanksgiving
Hear me, nervous and ya fear me
See me at my shows, don't pose, nigga cheer me
Ain't the type to sweat cha, doubt if I'll forget cha
If you diss me wear a vest 'cause sucker I'll get ya
In a hurry, throw a flurry and you're buried
Punk tried to jack, I peeled his cap, now I be happy don't worry
I ain't that average motherfucka on the mic
Say what I feel, stayin' real, give a fuck what you like
I write the type of shit that get the crowd hype
And if you diss me, don't whisper, I'm the loud type
Bump your fist for a nigga named 2Pacalypse
Straight from the underground, nigga, we be droppin' shit
I get some drank and hit the naked then I'm loc'd out
Hey, provoke me if you wanna, I'm a nut
You wanna know what's up?
Ain't nothin' changed, still don't give a fuck

Man I don't seen 'em motherfucker
Man I don't seen 'em motherfucker

I give a shout out to my East Coast street folks
All you other motherfuckers get ya teeth broke
Tryna talk about the town like we country
But you jealous 'cause the next nigga's phoney
If the bullshit you speakin' never reach me
You best to reachin' for your pistol when you see me
Why? I'm from the Bronx, motherfucka, I was born to box
We can shoot it from here or we can pop the Glocks
It's on you, so nigga, what you wanna do?
We go 1 on 1 and call on your crew
Gotta crew so true that they lie for a nigga
That they keep their eye on a nigga 'cause they die for a nigga
It's so real, motherfucka, can you feel it?
And it's cool to hit the drink, but don't kill it
And my Poppa told me killers never brag a lot
I slip my Glock in my pants and let it sag a lot
I ain't gangbanging killer or crack slinger
Just a Oaktown nigga turned rap singer
'Cause it ain't where you from, it's how you come
And a real nigga know another one when he see one
Here's a word for hoes at the shows
Keep on your clothes and niggas wouldn't call you hoes
'Cause how you gon' fuck the crew
Then get mad when them niggas get pissed to diss ya
Game ain't free, but I'ma warn ya, ya gotta be stronger
And make 'em wait a little longer
But I can't wait, so let me hit 'em
Hit 'em, hit 'em, hit 'em, hit 'em, quit 'em
'Cause baby gotta pay for the nuts
These hoes wanna know what's up
I still don't give a fuck

Man I don't seen 'em motherfucker
Still dropping more shit than a bitch

I heard nigga say "he hate the way I curse"
Now that hurts so um.. so this verse I'ma curse worse
Jump like a toe when you want some
Stick ya like bubblegum with the code name troublesome
They tried to ban my music 'cause the niggas is locin' up
Locin' up 'cause the niggas is broke as fuck
There's no love for the inner city streets
So you never find peace 'til we get a piece
Now that's deep, don't sleep, from ya dog's cheatin'
But how the hell you gon' help me from across the street
They forget about the brothers once they make it
Then get a mad at a nigga when we take it
Well you lookin' kinda cute in your three piece suit
But to people like Duke, you a nigga too
Get smart, how the hell we gon' be livin' cool
When the other niggas didn't get a part
Shit, look inside yo heart

Still don't give a fuck
Uh huh still don't give a fuck, still don't give a fuck
This for them punk ass niggas that don't know
Tryna and come out here talking that shit mad
Your ass gon' get caps hehuhu
Can't beat this shit it's a motherfucking phase representing nigga
All presenting
RPB is around don't fuck with them motherfucking niggas in this town
We popping 'em and dropping 'em with the mouth
Remember the next time that pull motherfuckin' on 'em
'Cause it might be...
Dang dang
Dang dang



































Nigga fuck that gin & juice, I'm fuckin with Hennessy
Just pour me a glass of that dark shit
That's right


Now I was born in the gutter facin life or death
I was a thug ever since my mama gave me breath
These motherfuckers wanna see me die, so who am I
To try to warn 'em, I buck and bomb 'em, them niggas fry
Hey, remember me? Down that Hennessy
The nigga you don't wanna see, let me procede
My definition of some thug shit, y'all don't hear me
Now that it's poppin ain't no love bitch
I maintain in the game in the gutter's where I still kick it
I'm tryin to hustle up a meal ticket
I'm still wicked in my ways, a hustler 'til my dyin days
Ain't nuttin wrong with gettin paid, so nigga blaze
Cause we some motherfuckin fools
Walkin through the streets wearin jewels, breakin niggas makin moves
Even the cops can't stop us, my enemies flip
When they see me drink a fifth of that Hennessy


Yeah
The Henn got me feelin right, I'm tryin to keep from swervin
She's so fine and she love Henn too
After a couple of shots she said, "I could do what I wanna do"
'til the break of dawn, gettin it on, Hennessy

For the people partyin, 'til the mornin light




We keep on sippin, and sippin, and sippin




Mouse Man and The Wycked!
Yo, check this out
I need a verse from each of y'all and I'mma do a verse

So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on

Mama raised me crazy
Critics should've killed me as a baby
Cause now I'm 21, you can't fade me
Yeah, I'm gettin' major paid, check my pager
Poppin' mo' game than a Sega
Sharp as a razor
Rollin' Cherokee and not a Blazer
Fuck the 5-0, watch for lasers
Infrared beam boomin' at ya dome cause it's on
One shot from the Glock and he's gone
That's colder than a dope fiend's titty
Testin' 1, 2 , testin' 1, 2
Get a grip, bitch, come and get a whiff of this ol' slick shit
You think ya movin', but ya dreamin'
Nigga, "Oaktown, Oaktown" is what they screamin'
Uh, I'm doin' flicks, gettin' rich, fuck the Grammys
Hand on my jammy, word to granny
What goes on

So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on

What's the point of a nigga steppin' to the front
If ya plan is on 'fessing?
And I guess that some niggas don't know
Frontin' like a bitch have ya size double-cut low
I know a bro who stuck like Chuck in the middle of some shit
Always over grip
Scratchin' and make a nigga kill his momma
Pimp his son, step to his boy with a gun and a stun
Need to think that I could be a goner
Victim of an old school OC from the corner
I remember the days you used to meet me by the school
Playin' flies up
But, now, my niggas beggin' wit' a cup
So, when I got paid, I hit 'em off well
My old school G will lie for me or go to jail
But when it came time to show a true color
He was ghost and I was lyin' in the gutter
Ayo, now what's goin' on

So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on

The funk is on, all day and all night long, poppin' cops
'Til they drop, sideways to the next spot
Got my UZ hang, extra clip
In case some punk bitch wanna rip, he can get some of this
I duck and dodge longer than fifty niggas deeps in Jeeps
Smokin' marijuana, rather die than be dishonored
Bustin' left at the precinct and leach down low
Peelin' caps, so they know who's in control
I'm gonna see 'em on the door
Ra-ta-tat-ta-tat goes my TEC-9
Can't barely miss with dip, it's payin' back time
Harder for every jail than some police and these hypocrites
Equipped to kick a nigga's ass, hit the drop, move a hat quick
Shoot a cop for every blow, wish Rodney had a fo-fo
Smokin' cops like indo
So, then, maybe their friends know
Straight outta Oakland, pruck 'em, smoke 'em, make no tuck wit' 'em
Jackin' 'til the break of dawn
That's what really goes on

So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on
So what really goes on
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than a dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than a dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than a dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than a dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
That's colder than dope fiend's titty, tell me
What goes on in the city?
Colder than a dope fiend's titty
Can you tell me?



They try to ban me, cause the brothas makin' noise a lot
I tear that asses and the boys
Bout to poison the block
They got me jocked
But now I'm strapped and gettin' hotter
Runnin' from the cop, as I try to cock my Glock
The war won't stop
That's why they wanna ban the music
You ever notice how the cops can't stand the music
See a black man coolin' with a mexican
We can all have peace on the sets again
Give a shout-out to my homies in the Pen', they try to keep us down 'fore we clown everytime we hit the Top-10
Brothas talk a lot of shit, but that'a after you gone
Cause they fear you in a physical form
Outlaw in his own Words, they just get served
Stuck out on a block out when the drama occurs
Brothas talk a lot of shit, but that'a after you gone
Cause they fear you in a physical form
Outlaw in his own Words, they just get served
Stuck out on a block out when the drama occurs

Once again it's yo friend out of Oakland
Hopin' they keep the hip-hops clubs open
We can have peace and so we control them
Ain't nobody gettin' paid, it's a damn shame
Why gangbang brothas in the same gang take security to blame
Cause they lettin' it off, brothas come to have fun
But they settin' it off
One time make it worst when they sweat us
Send a army of pigs to come get us

Brothas talk a lot of shit, but that'a after you gone
Cause they fear you in a physical form
Outlaw in his own words, they just get served
Stuck out on a block out when the drama occurs
Brothas talk a lot of shit, but that'a after you gone
Cause they fear you in a physical form
Outlaw in his own words, they just get served
Stuck out on a block out when the drama occurs


you know what I mean going through tryna come up
And then get pulled up back 5 steps then you move make 8 steps and pull you back 18 steps so
and my choices have already been made even if I wanna change it


What!, Outlaw in his own words
What!
What!)

Outlaw




I'll be on North side
Keepin' my peace back in my piece
Smokin' sense
To deal with this inner city stress
I know I'm blessed
But these demons are out to curse me
Do anything that they can
To try and hurt me
Good Lord whatever happened
To compassion and brotherly love
Cause now there's hate in every action
I try to maintain
Be a player in this game
But I seem to keep losin'
Maybe it's the strategy I'm usin'
Or maybe it's the friends that I'm choosin'
Jealous associates
Guarantee to cause confusion
Is it your goal to hide truth?
It's an illusion, develop my trust
Then leave me stranded in the bust
I feel like pullin' out my gun
And bustin' on these fakers
Two bit punks, perpetrators
And player haters
But I gots to keep my eyes
On the prize
Watch me bubble like champagne niggas
Watch me Rise
Beyond haters

I try to escape but everywhere I go to try and keep my focus
But a world without hatred, is like the projects without roses
No matter how high I get I can't escape the sense of it
And all you hatred ass haters always making me sick
I'm trying to find a place where I can go where hatred ain't allowed
To show everybody about money, and they all try and blow
I'm trying to find a place, where ain't no hating allowed
But I'mm always seeing them faces and hearing them haters screaming out loud
It's an average night and I got my windows rolled up tight
Blowing Mo out the sunroof and not a hater in sight
But I'mma keep my third eye open cause I know them haters gonna be waiting
To catch me at the light with hopes that they can leave me open
Preposition be the past but I know caskets still blast
So I'mma lean back in my seat so I can't be seen through the glass
It ain't nuttin' to hold me dawg but I got to watch out for
And I know so I'm careful on who I run with
I ain't got no time to be combined in no scandalous ass shit
But everywhere I go I'm hearing what sounds like shot from a 44
Blasting on drivers side door
My niggas who sniff too much snow
And me I'm just trying to flow
Separate my friends with my foes
So everywhere I go I try to stay completely separated from those with Hearts full of hatred for anybody that makes it



It's alright
It's alright
It's It's
It's alright

They'll never take me alive, I'm getting high with my four-five
Cocked on these suckers, time to die
Even as a youngster causing ruckus on the back of the bus
I was a fool all through high school kicking up dust
But now I'm labelled as a trouble maker who can you blame?
Smoking weed helped me take away the pain
So I'm hopeless rolling down the freeway swerving, don't worry
I'm about to crash up on the curb cause my visions blurry
Maybe if they tried to understand me, what should I do?
I had to feed my fucking family, what else could I do
But be a thug, out slanging with the homies
Fuck hanging with them phonies in the club
Got my mind on danger, never been a stranger to homicide
My city's full of gang bangers and drive bys
Why do we die at an early age
He was so young but still a victim of the 12 gauge
My memories of a corpse, mind full of sick thoughts
And I ain't going back to court
So fuck what you thought, I'm drinking Hennessey
Running from my enemies will I live to be 23
There's so much pain

It's alright, it feels like years since it's been here
It's alright, it's been a long cold lonely winter
It's alright, it feels like years since it's been here
It's alright, it's been a long cold lonely winter
It's alright

When I die, fuck it, I wanna go to hell
Cause I'm a piece of shit, it ain't hard to fucking tell
It don't make sense, going to heaven with the goodie-goodies
Dressed in white, I like black Timbs and black hoodies
God'll prolly have me on some real strict shit
No sleeping all day, no getting my dick licked
Hanging with the goodie-goodies lounging in paradise
Fuck that shit, I wanna tote guns and shoot dice
All my life I been considered as the worst
Lying to my mother, even stealing out her purse
Crime after crime, from drugs to extortion
I know my mother wished she got a fucking abortion
She don't even love me like she did when I was younger
Sucking on her chest just to stop my fucking hunger
I wonder if I died, would tears come to her eyes
Forgive me for my disrespect, forgive me for my lies


They got me mobbin like I'm
Loc'ed and ready to get my slug on
I load my clip and slip my motherfuckin' gloves on
I ain't scared to blast on these suckas if they test me
Trust, I got my Glock cocked playa if they press me
Bust on motherfuckers with a - paaassion
Better duck cause I ain't lookin when I'm - b-b-blaaastin
I'm a nut an' drinkin Hennessey and gettin' high
On the lookout for my enemies, don't wanna die
Tell me why cause this stress is gettin' major
A buck-fifty across the face with my razor
What can I do but be a thug until I'm dead and gone
Keep my brain on the game and stay head strong
These sorry bastards
Want to kill me in my sleep, I'm real they cannot see
And everyday is just a struggle
Steady thuggin' on the streets
And I'll be ballin' loc
Don't let 'em make you worry
Keep swingin' at these suckas till you buried
I was born to raise hell, a nigga from the gutta
Word to mother I'm trapped
I'm kickin dust up
Ready to bust
I'm on the scene steady muggin' mean
Until they kill me
I'll be livin this life
I know you feel me
There's so much pain

Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes


It's alright
It's alright
It's alright



My seductive introduction be specific, still elusive
But exclusive's what I give you when I kick it, and I'm still lifted
Niggas can't get with Mr. Wicked
Picture me flipping my adversaries, gettin the dick swiftly
Niggas are swinging wild, but they styles miss me
You can bring that bitch but you whole click'll still get treated shitty
Business never personal I'm up before the sun come up on thai
Just a ghetto star, a dropped up double-R is what I'm riding
Nigga, if you was half the man your bitch was, bring you artillery
When you come for me, cause we sick thugs
No hesitation when I pull and blast, cause Syke was busting
Plus, bow had 'em ducking, screaming, "Get they cash!"
So now I got the law on me, my phone's tapped
So I had to send word through my little homies
Tell them niggas this the year when they pull the trigger
Shit, this is what you get, for fucking, with the wrong nigga
This is what you get, when you fucking with the wrong nigga
Hehehehe, yeah nigga, peep it

Before I lay me down to sleep I, pray and thank the Lord
For giving me another fruitful, day
I wanna be a peaceful man but still when niggas come for me
All I can see is getting 'em, killed
For real it's how I feel, reflect my thoughts, flowing on these reels
Make my enemies deal with my steel, they caps peeled
We still cool but you played yourself
Give him the mac and make him spray hisself, hey
Falling legends clutching chrome three-five-seven
Puttin two bullets to they dome, wanted to die in heaven
Why call in shots nobody really as clear as me
Ain't trying to help the feds get a case for conspiracy
Murder my foes get disposed of
We all homies to the death, so my true niggas show me love
God forgive me for my lifestyle, a negative figure
But why they fucking with the wrong nigga, you know?
It's like..
Why you fucking with the wrong nigga..

I was raised by thugs, schooled by killers
Learned my mathematics skills from real drug dealers
Tried to rise but they tried me
I guess they all had to die cause we tried peace
I die in these streets, blast 'til they recognize
Still do or die, all my niggas gettin high watching time fly
Best strategize on the way to profit
Best organize how you ride so they can't stop it
Then keep it poppin lot of busters wanna see me fall
I fucked your bitch and now this new shit gonna' fade 'em all
My niggas ball made a call for some backup
For little' homies and my dogs in the black truck
Buck buck was the sound as they gats burst
No need for ambulance, baby bring the black hearse
Should've never fucked around buster, how you figure?
Ma kin moves on the wrong nigga, is what it sounds like
Ding ding ding.. when you fuck with the wrong nigga..
Niggas gettin hit, when they fuck, with the wrong nigga..
Fucking with the wrong nigga..



Flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex

Slippin' through my shit wonderin' what hits it get
Even before the flicks I was always hit to flip the script
Let's play a game, call catch a bitch, how you play?
Well diss me nigga and catch a fist, you playin'?
Ooo, I know you didn't expect a nigga to catch wreck
'Cause it's been a long day
And I get with Johnny Q when niggas rub me the wrong way
Twenty four tracks is fat and all that
Pack smack, jaw crack, after that, can I get my balls back?
Nigga don't front, just pass the blunt
I freak the funk for the trunks, pop the pump on the chumps
I make ya jump
Dum diddy dump, love to thump
Leavin' niggas with Plumps, smokin' blunts and skunks
So here it comes, let's have a gun
Or get done by the worst of our trumps for fun
Pump pump!

Flex, flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex

OH! duck, prepare to throw nigga, get that ass dropped
Give us mad props and get packed I'm mad hot
So get that 'caine step to the wrong fuckin' man
The crew too, fifty niggas in the wrong clan
You fuckin' bitch you better take you snitch ass home
Boom boom boom niggas better duck or get bucked
Fuck stuck in the damn gut
I tryna tell ya but niggas ain't feel me
The fuck with dollar wouldn't that, never hail g
Born for boner, raise up in the stack
Schoolin', I'm ready to feel pain bet you ass
Will be fillin on the
Foul type, then you say hi when I pass by
A nigga tryna act fly god bless the nice try
Straight serve, what a herb, kicked to the curb
Slammin' dust, he got some motherfuckin' nerve
So back fuckin' and get jacked , dont test
So get wrecked and it will be a mess
If they wanna be a

Flex, flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex
Flex, flex flex

Hey yo, nothin' gets buck quick
When he fuck with, and Thoro Headz stuck
Bet you can't budge with the rough niggas
See, it's fifty niggas with me, is hundred head raw
Not to mention a countless, I'm not ya ammo
So why would you wanna play a test
You can't fade the best, since you get laid to rest
Yeah, still wreck, you testin' your mic full of check tack it
Rep with
Niggas wanna flex it
They call me Big Mac, you put the fuckin bitch
And I'm outie
Five dodge and you will never doubt me
I'm gettin' flammy on this 2Pac jammy
Yo, sittin' and pissin' on a bitch ass panty
Yeah, like it's magic we comin' on that ass massive
Better tap in or get your ass kicked
And if you plannin' on rushin', better stomp fast
'Cause in the flat, I snatch a badge out you mark ass
Ayo, spark, split fifty niggas
They should give us motherfucker some of that real shit
Ill shit they keep holes on the deals nigga
Attackin' niggas like shit list with quick hits
So fuck a rhyme if ya feel what I want for tacs
Watch ya back, nigga, 'cause we ain't quitter

Thoro Headz motherfucker
Big Malcolm, motherfucker indo boy
Them niggas can't be fucked with
So when I keel over and die they gon take the shit
'Cause my niggas ain't afraid of flexin' you feel me
Young niggas, young niggas




You may remember hearing about a murder
In Las Vegas 2 months ago
In which a popular and controversal performer
Was shot
Gang land style and killed
It's a murder that hasn't yet been solved
But the investigation has invited closer scrutiny
Of the music industry

Them same mother fuckers wanta murder me
Them same mother fuckers
Them same mother fuckers wanta murder me

Crazy
I got a work with what you gave me
Claiming I'm a criminal
When you the one that made me
They got me trapped in this slavery
Now I'm lost in this holocaust
Heading for my grave G
I told Sam he can fuck the war
& got a busted jaw
For saying fuck the law
And if you wonder why I'm Mad check the records
What's a nigga got a do to get respected
Sometimes I think I'm Getting tested
& if I dont say yes a nigga's quick to get arrested
That's the reason I stay zested
I keep a vest on my chest
Incase the cops are getting restless
Walk around ready to light shit up
& since my life is fucked
Some say I'm slighty nuts
Buck buck is the sound as i mooova
Other niggas pay attention when a fool bust
They make a nigga be a killer
I used to be a dealer
But they wanted to see whooo's realer
Now them same motherfuckers want a murder me
& i wonder if the lord ever heard of me

Chorus
Them same mother fuckers want a murder me
Them same mother fuckers want a murder me
& i wonder if the lord ever heard of me
I need loot so I'm doing what i do
& don't say shit
Until you've walked in my shoes





Bad boy killa, untouchable
Die, West Side, outlaw, thuglife, M.O. muthafuckin B
L.B. muthafuckin C
What it be like, what it see like

Smooth criminal, individual suffer
Went to jail, made bail, seein' hell, made me rougher, gettin' money
Funny it seems, young black teens
Triple beam dreams make 'em, fiend for crack scenes
Maybe I'll fuckin' make a million
Bustin' from on top of the buildin', a victim addicted to killin'
I can see it in my eye sight
Yo what's the Hassa?
It's a pig that don't fly right, you die tonight
Get me high I'm a killa
Lyrics raise drug dealers
Turn 'em to muthafuckin' thug niggas
L.B.C. come and bare with me
Hang with the same niggas go to jail with me
Bang, with the Outlaw clique
Sick since I came out
Pull out my pistol, aim blow your brains out
Pull it, my every word like a bullet
Hollow point style, murder niggas 'til they feel it
I'm untouchable

I'm that bottom rock, thinkin' bout no limitation
They get the gat smack, cracks how my gun goes
Holes in your body and blood all over your clothes
'Cause money makes earth
What it's worth, gettin' hurt
Doin' dirt to stay spendin'
You can borrow, I mean it
Any, all confrontation on the currency
Here in '96, fine chips
Stackin' while I'm mackin' no mo'
It's L.B.C. and it's a no no
Talkin' what you don't know and won't know
Heat hold me down, my chips hold me down
'Cause I'm quick to rush and what
Nigga we bust 'em up
Cock it back, ready to blow your block off the map
Thug Life niggas ride wit us
Cops tryin' to get us but they can't
We untouchable


When you're in the fast lane havin' money and fame
You got to, always, check, your game
Look here mayne, maintain
Cause this game is a cold thing
Can you dig it mane?
Fo sho' mayne, I wish I had your game
Look here young dog, do your own thing
Them bitch ass niggas in your clique, buck 'em no
Stay real with yourself and untouchable
See that's what's wrong with you niggas now
But uh, me and my dawgs from the Thug Pound
We just paper chasin', we know nay-thing
Are you relatin' to the shit we creatin'?

Comin' through colder then Nova Scotia
Makaveli the Don, coast to post it, make sure it's Kosher
Now we have peeped the scene, it's called the lay out
Devised a plot, ease the walls, we gotta take out, shit
So now it's time to execute, aim for the chest it's you
Nothing's cool, when you die, knowin' you kept it true
But if you didn't, broken wings
Let it be written, we ain't kiddin' to quit and
My missions smellin' my menace
Sittin' back, stacked off, spittin' and sippin' yak
These fakers play us, gettin' papers so blackjack
Perhaps, it's what we all, wanna do
Dreamin' and schemin' on livin', Untouchable

Well it's the O.U.T.L.A.W's
And we untouchable
Bringin' the ruckus
To all you fuckin' bustaz bubble crews
'Cause now a days spots we blaze
With dirty nines and Glocks on Yak's waistline always
The crime on these streets of this world is like a maze
Searchin' for more stunts, and blunts to blaze
Hustlin' to get paid,, many different ways
Bodies drop on the other side, and the guns smokes haze
Fuckin' wit' outlawz, it's crazy
These pause don't break me
They cut like sissies
Who is it, it's Yaki Kadafi
The grand wizard trump tight
To exquisite, to fuck with cowards
Best to duck quick, and run for safety
If you're shaky, heard about me lately
But ain't no jail to straight me
We untouchable



Good Evening
I'm reporting live from Sunset Boulevard
Where many excited fans have gathered with candles
Awaiting the much anticipated release, of 2Pac Shakur's latest album, Better Dayz
This is yet another posthumous release by 2Pac
Which, raises the question
Where are these songs coming from?
It's interesting how, the message in these songs
Is still relevant today
Even in his death, he's touching people with his lyrics
I can feel the energy in the air, as they count down to midnight
When the album will officially be released
Oh, hold on, I, think they're starting to countdown now

5, 4, 3, 2, 1 ...




Trapped like a prisoner, fantasize of kissin' her
Treat you like a queen but other guys is dissin' ya
Thinkin' of ya nightly thigh so hold you tightly
Visualizin' figure, damn that excites me
I wonder if you know how much I think of you
If I can throw you water, then I sink in you
It's for eternity, this feelings are burnin' me
It's like a fire, this desire yearns to be pullin' me
Closer, until your chest is close to mine
Feelin' you heart beat, our arms are intertwined
Wantin' to kiss you, the passion raisin'
But don't wanna rush you, so I'm still waitin'
What if we were lovers, what a night that be
Cause we be raidin' undercover like the savage beast
Close my eyes and visualize, it's you I feel
Then wake up and realize, it was not real
It was just my heart, playin' tricks on me
Its tryna to make my fantasy a reality
Cause just thinkin' about ya baby, makes you want ya more
These feelings make me crazy but I can't ignore
What you mean to me, you're a dream to me
No matter how realistic it seems to be
Gotta get a grip on myself, because I'm dissin' myself
I wake up, I realize that I be kissin' myself
I just have to find this girl in my fantasy
And hope that someone in this world is who meant for me
But if I find her, will I have the nerve to speak?
Or will me ego overrob makin' my heart to greed?
I gotta do it, I gotta tell her how I feel
It's the only chance to make my fantasy turn real
Now my heart beats fast, I sweat feat on my thumb
Gotta get myself together cause here she come
Tried to speak another word but my tongue was tied
Damn, I can't explain it, the state I'm in
Every time I try to speak, I stutter again
Feel like I'm ready to cry, embarrassed outof  my mind
She smiles and gives me her number and says call her sometime
But she walks away, almost as quick as she came
And it hit me, I never even knew her name
So when I turned around, I felt my heart broke
She was gone, so was the number she wrote

It was a fantasy
Nothin' but a fantasy
I fell in love with a fantasy

But check this out man I just coming from the crib man, oh man
Check this out

I woke up this Thursday mornin' in a terriful mood
Went straight to the kitchen cause I needed some food
Step inside, the kitchen door had tell me what I would see
A giant stackin' dirty dishes are waitin' for me
I didn't really wanna do it so I accepted the facts
Spill out all my funky tequila swisher and my feline hat
Sat in my yard, then I noticed it was nice outside
Rollin' down the avenue chillin' my way
I see my homie on the corner, "What's up, Terry T?"
"Yo check this out," is what he said to me
Told me that he knew a lady that I needed to meet
Super fine like wine and she couldn't be beat
But when she opened the door, I couldn't open my mouth
I mean damn there she was, right in front of my face
And here I am cold fuzzin' like I'm in disgrace
She had a beautiful smile, eyes greener than grass
And god damn, homeboy you shoulda see that well
I don't wanna get explicit, but you know what I mean
The type of girl that don't recover of a magazine
She said her name is Limay, I didn't know what to say
Except my name is Ryan D. and it's beautiful day
We went outside and had a drink, conversated a bit
Terry said we had to leave, but then she told me to sit
When she said this to my homie I just started to smile
She says she wanted to talk, so she can know me some more
I said, "Cool"
Terry left and then she locked door
Now I'm a cool type of fellow, really mellow with her
And when she came and step beside me I had sweat in my palms
I mean she was so fine, I can't explain to my brothers
Finer than the dilla Ice T's album cover
I said, "Well, here we are. What we can do now?"
She looked me deep in my eyes and broke it all down
She said, "Ryan D., as hard as this may seem, I wanna make love to you, you're the man of my dreams"
She said she saw me before, and then she knew that day
She had to get me, had to have me somehow, some way
I said, "Baby, don't you worry, cause I think I'm in love. You're the angel of my life, sent from heaven above"
Without a moment's hesitation, we were deep in the groove
Bodies tight and touched together as we started to move
Only with persistent movements, I removed her clothes
She was heavy as the kiss she began to moan
First she start, twist me back I really don't know how
She put her arms around my neck and said, "I want you now"
She was already hot, I had began to sweat
I knew that this would be a moment I would never forget
She told me lay on my back so she can get on the top
She said, "Make it last, please, and just don't stop"
I had my eyes closed now that she felt so soft
But when I open my eyes, my alarm went off
I got up, rubbed my eyes
"What's goin' on?" I said
It was then I realized that I was home in my bed
I said, "Damn," to myself, as hard as it may seem
Imagination had to go but it was only a dream

It was a fantasy
Nothin' but a fantasy
I fell in love with a fantasy

Damn, man. That's hard, man
Man, it was bugged out
Ain't that weird, though? We both felt like that?
Man, it was sort of a trip, man
Just remember that shit, man
Word
I don't know what to tell you, man
Yo, see you later on, dude
Alright. Know what it was, though?
Peace man. Yo, what?

It was a fantasy
Nothin' but a fantasy
We fell in love with a fantasy
We fell in love with a fantasy
We fell in love with a fantasy



Love within a storm

First it was nothing, not even, a fake echo of a song
Loneliness was a daily for me, until you came along
There was a gleam of a star in your eyes
Thought I'd never feel this way again
And you were supposed to reach my heart
And find love within, love, love

This sweet, wonderful ghetto love
This sweet, wonderful love that you give me
Wonderful

I could not ignore the magnetism, when I felt you near
Any problems plaguing my mind, would suddenly dissapear
It was rebirth of my heart, the day that you became my friend
Because I knew for the moment I held you, that I would fall in love again
Fall in love again, in a storm

Love within a storm

Just when I thought I'd seen it all
Our paths crossed, amen
And I knew, from the first glance
That you, would be hard to forget
Your eyes, attracted me first
But you reeked of sultry confidence
I couldn't wait, to touch lips
And kiss, with my heart's intention
When we did it, was what I expected
And for that moment, we erased the tension
Of the awkwardness, of first date jitters
And the initial blind date, first impressions
We kissed again; and I felt the passion
And this, my love, was Cupid's blessing

We made love, within a storm
In the midst of passion and chaos
Somewhere, somehow, our true bond of friendship was lost
In the eye of the storm, the rain always falls harder
Those who prevail this drama
Will learn to bring their love farther
But now, the storm has past
And the seas of our friendship are gone
But as long as I live, I will remember
The love within a storm

Sweet, passionate, love-lusting love
You know that I miss you, and love you
You know that 2Pac broke my heart
We need to hear ya, hear ya voice
They say, this ghetto fabulous
On 125th street forkin' around
This village, and the village uptown
South Central, Compton, Philly
Chi-Town, Southside
It's hot in 'Lanta, hot in 'Lanta
Jersey peeps, I hear ya
Miami, South Beach, uh
Yeah, got love for you, love for you
My Brooklyn knights lovin' you, lovin' me
This open, rich city
Ya know, I got love for you



You can get your cash on
Are you alright?
You can get your cash on
Don't fall asleep
Are you alright?
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close they eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
Quit staring at me like an infrared nigga

Pictures of plenty
Sipping my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi-automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, cause' I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die with open eyes
Scared to take a nap, it's a trap, a long maze
Dreamin' of gettin' stacks, makin' scratch the wrong way
That's all I said, we murder motherfuckers daily
Black out, blow the track out, my lyrics never fail me
I inhale strong weed, then release the stress
Deliver the bomb shit from the East to West
Like Yayo
Niggas pull out, when I say so
Commence to poppin' motherfuckers copy me, it's fatal
Efficiently I delete and flee
The art of war livin' sucka free, get with me

Pictures of plenty
Sipping my glass full of Henny
Hands on my semi-automatic kill for pennies
Approach for contact, cause' I'm live I multiply
Soon as I open fire, niggas die with open eyes
Other niggas close they eyes seein' dreams in they sleep)

But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close they eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep

Learnin'
Duckin' stray shots, bullets be hot, they burnin'
Inhalin' sherm smoke, visualize the flames
Will I be smothered by my own pain?
Strange whispers, cowards conversate, so quick to diss us
Takin' pictures for the feds in desperate hopes they'd get us
Hit us off, give us plenty centuries
Forgive my sins, many penitentiaries
The best revenge is, somebody save me, lost and crazy
Scared to drop a seed hopin' I ain't cursed my babies
Maybe now feel me now, picture my pain
Embrace my words, make the world change

You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close they eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep
You can get your cash on nigga if you peep
Other niggas close they eyes seein' dreams in they sleep
But don't fall asleep
Don't go to sleep

Sleep baby from Don Makaveli
Fucking with the wicked ass nigga Nutso
Oak Town to be precise
Haha



One thing we all adore, something worth dying for
Nothing but pain, stuck in this game
Searching for fortune and fame

Though we exist to breathe some believe currency comes to g's
Stress is half the battle with success comes greed
They got me hot when they shot me
Plotted my revenge
To increase my ends
Enemies gettin' dropped
Win or lose
Red or blue
We must all stay true
Play the game nigga
Never let the game play you
And for the fame
Niggas change fast
That's a shame
What's the game
Lost souls
Who controls our brains?
Who can I blame?
The world seems strange at times
Somewhat insane
I'm hoping we can change with time
I'm living blinded
Searching for refinement
Curse, I know death follows me
But I murdered him first
And worse yet
With each breathe
Steps I take
Breathless
Is there a cure for a hustler with a death wish?
Cigar ashes
Toast with
With my ski mask
Blast it
Wrapped in plastic
Ain't nothing left now
Treated like a stepchild
Was not for me
Be rocking beats
Fake in fame


He said selling 28 and a hundred
By mail...

The notoriety
To have everybody eyeing me
Cause when I rise up my block mang
My cost is to floss
I'm making up for all the times
So on this day forth, I'mma die
Where were all these years
That I walk this Earth
Especially been cautious since birth
Will never change

We throw 'em back like hardballs
Without the gloves
I bleed to envy
Smoke and blow out they blunts
Sipping Henney
Drunk nights
And high days
Cocking my heat shooting it sideways
Unconditionally married
To my gun
Fulfillin' my destiny
Or needs
Be pulling all my cabbage like pliers
Stuck in the trance searching for something higher
Than fortune and fame
Hahaha


I don't want to live forever
It's do or die
I'd be a dead nigga
Talking gangsta S.P.I
Nggas don't want me to be up in they system
When I'm deceased
Talk shit about when I'm up in the coffin
I got a lot ridin'
Some niggas be backslidin'
Some niggas fall off and go into hidin'
Some niggas be players up in the game five years
Some niggas be making one platinum album
Then be gettin' disrepecting O.G. peers
Some niggas be laying up in them streets
Broke them off something proper
Haters may try to take your soul
Cold-hearted ass niggas
Gotta ride with two twin Glocks
Gotta sleep fingers on triggers
Niggas don't want to see you have nothing
So have something
And if a nigga run up on you
Put a slug and get to dumping nigga
Fame...



This is dedicated to the niggas that was down from day one
Welcome to Death Row

People in the ghetto, don't you know it's Death Row...

Now my people in the ghetto
I think it's about time, a new breed has arrived
So please get your groove on
And to all that's against us, we really ain't offensive
You ought to be sanctified
If you know what I know about the people stranded on Death Row
You might wanna ride


Don't never underestimate the power of brothers
Convicted fellons and gangbangers from outta the gutter
We saw our chance, so we crept slow
Me and Danny Boy stranded on Death Row, for real though
Money makin', allergic to playa haters and cowards fakin'
There ain't nuthin' left to say but brother pray
Try to keep ya head up and look for better days
On Death Row..


Just throw ya hands up and feel good with this one right here
This' your boy 'Pac, spittin' out for my homeboy Danny Boy
Let y'all know what time is it here on Death Row
We stranded but we lovin', can't understand it
Y'all need to peep how we rollin'
It ain't nothing wrong, can you see it, baby?
Can you picture me rollin' on this old Death Row track?
Can you see it? haha...
On Death Row
Ayo Danny Boy, you know you're finna go platinum and plus boy
You better keep hittin' em with that smoking heat, hehehe
I see you on tour big baby
You know what room I'm in man
I'm out

Danny Row is in the air
Yeahaeaheaeah-Yeah


Big Suge
Good luck and out
My boy 'Pac
Good lookin' baby on that track, youknowI'msayin' we do this man
To the Dogg Pound, Snoop
Michel'le, Sam Sneed
And to my father above
I'm thankful for everything
Anything that you givin' me
And to all of my inmates
We're looked down right here, right here on Death Row, that's where we at, and like Dre said..
I know your bobbin' your head, hehe
C'mon now... People in the ghetto
To the engineer Dave, what's up? Keep it goin'
Reg you know you helped me......



Like this
Blastin', dumpin'
Bitch

I got my pistol cocked and my knife
'Bout to slice this nigga windpipe
Throwin' tops, swervin' me on the dice
Nigga thought he was nice with the slickness
Respect the game, the lame niggas die slow
Hustlers fly straight like Frank feared Scarface
From the Glock, the lead waste
Diggin' out your chest plate up straight
Trimmin' you from your winge and hit the gate, I'm not waitin'
Thinking between and runnin' on my escape
Hop on the 2-10 and wait for you to retaliate
The terrorist doin' on niggas who we {​Glock cocked}​
Glock never miss, through your grill here goes my fist
When I slit yo' wrist
With the the styles of ruckus south central
I'm doin' niggas in the rap tussle
Rip out your backbone slow, you go to pieces like a puzzle
I'm hand on muzzles to you whack MC's
Black fitted cap to the back with the Gap jeans to my knees
Niggas under siege, like Seagal they fall
To my tactics chin checkin' in charge like chart, I want it all
The loot, the chronic, plus the dips
First nigga that flinches catch a bullet from my hip
In a rage, serving gauge with my Glock to your grill
Let the dump-dumps loose, now your brains is on the ceiling nigga

Murderous mindstate
Can't keep my nine straight
Sippin' on this hennessey
Waitin' for the time to break
Show up and mothafuckas bow down, recognize
West Side, Death Row, outlaw riders
Untouchable mob of pistol packers
Well known felons labeled for drug sellin' merciless jackers
Forever buzzed
Roll with thugs and dawgs
Commence to lettin' off rounds
Then escape in the fog
Who wanna see me solo?
Catch Makaveli while he's sleepin'
My mini-14 murderin' niggas while they creepin', Uhhh!
Duck or you ass out!
Ain't scared to die
Drunk drivin' in my Glasshouse
Niggas is under me
They bitches come to me
They heard the stories nigga
Now they wanna really see
Bomb first, my motto, is fully guaranteed
Niggas is playahatas
Label them my enemies then dumpin'

Look out young nigga!
Cause it's time to dump
I'm versatile ,mothafuckas
What type of rhyme we want?
Niggas got me in they sight
Now I'm runnin' for my life
Tell me!
What's that, West Side like?
West side!

I'm all about the paper chase cause the paper makes life so great
Plus, haste makes waste
And I gots the whole spot lock down, concoct styles
Realest with the microphone
Most murder masher verbal disaster
Creator, 38 stasher
In the inner zone where the hellraiser roam
There is not place like home, TEC-9s and chromes
Got the heater sequence for the heat to the disperse
Just in case worse come worst, I dumps first
So pump curt curse, it's the curse of the pump pump
The one to dump last is the first to get slumped
It's the mental temptation, mental assassination
My heart skips a beat for the heat sensation
I'm death-defying, bitches lyin' sayin' I ain't cute

One bone bitch ready to go for broke
Hittin' up your marks with my motherfuckin' 4
I'm comin' up about the Hills so feel I'm ready for the static
And niggas on my team is the full flesh automatic
Planting all you hoes in your motherfuckin' place
A bitch named Scarlo is steppin' up in your face
I'm dustin' off you chumps with the .44 slugs
And livin' from the lichter bro I'm ready to pull your plug
So, nigga, you wanna jump? You gotta jump little higher
Scarlo, nigga, the miss messiah
So bitch you better get a grip on gangs
You fuckin' with the hillside, mentally insane
Point of no return and  now my life is on the edge
Believin' in my misery I fucked her in the yeah
Giuseppe called me up and told me so
I gotta do a mission on my ass I gotta go
But I'm gonna getcha when tryna escape
You know my gat won't letcha run, hide
But I'm gonna getcha when tryna escape
You know my gat won't letcha
West side for life
Biaaaaaatch!

I'm dumpin'
Empty my gun
It's time to run
Cause here come the cops
I'll be duckin' 'em for blocks
Nigga I'm dumpin'
Empty my clip
Forever bustin'
East Coast nigga rushin'
Mothafucka, I'll be dumpin'

Killer!
Loaded them things, nigga, it's time to dump
Sneakin' on niggas that be sleepin' when they ass in the trunk
You slipped, then got crept on, now it's ride time
To the hills where niggas kill and peel your shit on skyline
It's die time, and can't any niggas save g
So kneel to your fuckin' knees and feel this 45 fade you
Aimin' for heads, pumpin' lead till I bury you
Niggas be duckin' but I swingin' low like chariot
No love, pumpin' slugs like I'm servin' dogs
Buck buck, now tell your dead homies I said, "What's up?"
Lullaby, rock-a-bye, nigga die
And rest in piece, eternal pain from this fire
My 45 smoked and broke ya
And nothin' hurt like a dick with his liquid, in his eyes wide open
Gats smokin' no jokin', Bullets to me
Deleted soul from his core, as he lay, as I was dumpin'



Stricly Dope in the house

Fumble suckers tumble, god damn I'm good
Since I was born I was strong, always knew that I could
Don't care anywhere any place I'll rock
Give me a mic to light and competition will drop
Fast or slow, I'll go and no one is gonna stop me yo
You must be kiddin', you swear you're gonna drop me no
Well sure as battlin' is bad for your health
Know you're confident my friend but don't fool yourself
My mic's a weapon, I'm steppin' with a capable rhyme
Yo, your time for playin' is over you got your crew I got mine
Not braggin', I'm bad and I could only get better
Your girl came on to me she wanted me I wouldn't let her
Don't make sense to come against me and my man "D"
How it is, how it was, that's the way it'll be
But you still think you can beat me, huh, get it together
Cause I'll never be beat, never be beat, NEVER!!

Stricly Dope in the house

Boldy, you step into the trap of the beast
Cause I'm the predator competitor and risin' like yeast
I'm the microphone musician musically I'm the most
When I rumble you tumble like a burnt piece of toast
Proceed with caution I cannot be stopped
A deadly weapon that is kept inside a sentry lock
Strong hold holdin' on but there's no holds barred
Fuck around and feel the wrath and you're forever scarred
Anybody want to battle just step the hell up
I'll toss your ass like a salad and eat you all up
You climb the rope of success but you know you can't win
You get discouraged because I hold the other end
If I let go, like all the others you will fall
The vicious vocalist consoloist will still be raw

You go in battles like a sucker but you'll never recoup
But I'm the veteran the veteran goin' like a troop
Try to stop me you can't, you puff and you pant
Try to beat me at this game, but get stomped like an ant
In the long run I'm the one that's holdin' the mic
Upset to get to me sweatin' me for the rhymes that I write
This time we're goin' at it, silly sucker, get ready
Cause I'm your worst nightmare, FUCK FREDDY!!
Where's that motherfucker that said that I was a dope
Tyin' my rhymes like a rope I'll pull it tight and you'll choke
You swear that you could beat me punk get it together
Cause I'll never be beat ya punk, NEVER!!


Hard is what you wanted, now that's what you're gettin'
I'm movin' and groovin' and proven and you're still sittin'
Got me blowin' up like a Hawalian volcano
Runnin' things like drano, lettin' you know that there ain't no
Body gonna diss me now I'm comin' exact
I'm paid I got it made, now that I'm makin' tracks
This is a lesson, at bein' dope that is
Cordless mics is mine, the wheels are his
Tons and tons of freaks I'm a Mac Daddio
Writin' def jams while I'm chillin' on my patio
You are useless as a toothless piranha
I'm ruthless now I'm gonna
Bust it and discuss it make it funky to hear
Paragraph to the people penetratin' your ear
You wanna taste of it, ooh here take a full dose
Burn you up like radiation if you get too close

Cause my mouth is like an uzi when it moves so quick
And the lyrics are the bullets that I'm loadin' it with
You wanna beat me homeboy, you will be destroyed
Get dropped like a habit and played like a toy
Never defeated not conceited, but let's face facts
Couldn't beat me with a motherfuckin' baseball bat
If I gave you a bomb that was nuclear armed
You could shoot it at me sucker and I wouldn't get harmed
Cause punk you can't stop me, bullets couldn't drop me
Stand on a mountain and still couldn't top me, huh
You think you'll beat me boy get it together
Cause I'll never be beat ya punk NEVER!!


When you hear my beat thumpin' it's a maxium charge
Cause I'm the hip-hop hood, the record leader at large
Got a PHD in hip-hop history
A deadly boy not a toy but a poetry, PRODIGY!!
Young beat conisseur hummin' like a bird
It was true when you heard I'm the wiz a word
Your eyes dilate, your ears drums expand
When my voice comes through the speaker from the mic in my hand
Woofers stompin' like thunder all about to explode
The needle on the nuance stuck in overload
Don't laugh cause I'm serious mister mysterious
Countless time after time just when you think I'm through
I let my melody stretch to make more for you
Just bust it cause I'm just too clever
And I'll never be beat ya punk, NEVER!!

Rhyme-fumble suckers tumble, god damn I'm good
Since I was born I was strong, always knew that I could
Don't care anywhere any place I'll rock
Give me a mic to light and competition will drop
Fast or slow, I'll go and no one is gonna stop me yo
You must be kiddin', you swear you're gonna drop me no
Well sure as battlin' is bad for your health
Know you're confident my friend but don't fool yourself
My mic's a weapon, I'm steppin' with a capable rhyme
Yo, your time for playin' is over you got your crew I got mine
Not braggin', I'm bad and I could only get better
Your girl came on to me she wanted me I wouldn't let her
Don't make sense to come against me and my man "D"
How it is, how it was, that's the way it'll be
But you still think you can beat me, huh, get it together
Cause I'll never be beat, never be beat, NEVER!!

Never be beat, ay Roc man, check out the competition man



I know this girl and her name is Minnie
Livin' in the projects didn't own a penny
Met her at a school dance so I took a chance
Walked her to the parkin' lot for a little romance
Got to my car, put the key in the ignition
Turned on the slow jams, I was on a mission
I was catchin' wild things like the chicken pox
I was "J" and knockin' boots right down the socks
She was freaky and wild, oh man could I call it?
But when I dropped her off, she had stole my wallet
I couldn't quite believe that why a hoocher-coocher?
But that was my first experience with MINNIE THE MOOCHER!!

Minnie the Moocher was a legend on the block I'm from
A dream girl to many brothers, but true to none
Her reputation was enormous - a real go getter
And once a brother met her, he wanted to get with her
Maybe it was her smile, her personality or
The way she shook her shimmy or the clothes she wore
But whatever it was, Minnie the Moocher was an expert
Real heart-breaker, but never get hurt
She had this boyfriend, his name was Diamond
Helpin' Minnie out with the little social climbin'
Met with Politicians, peace to many others
Suddenly and instantly, they became her lovers
She took the power that they possessed
And Minnie did it all without gettin' undressed
Minnie dissed Diamond sayin' that he could not live with her
But he wanted payment for the things he did for her
He grabbed the gun sittin' on the nightstand
Minnie held the bullets, put the pistol in her right hand
She was a legend to everyone who knew her
That's is my memory of Minnie the Moocher

Minnie had a boyfriend, a gambler
Addicted to poker, an alcoholic, a basshead, crack smoker
He took her to Harlem, and all around Chinatown
He bought some bass, a pipe a tape of hard-rap sounds
She was an addict, tired of the static and poverty
Sick of the same ghetto misery
See, Minnie was a young kid lookin' for excitement
Smokey was a hoodlum, headin' for inditement
Then one day their relationship stopped
When Smokey was killed by the M-I-C-Cops
Minnie was hurt, lost without a clue
To her, there was no chance of gettin' somebody new
So she walked home sadly, as bad as it seems
She cried herself to sleep to find the man of her dreams

She had dreams and schemes about the King of Sweden
He gave her things that this girl was much needin'
A plush house made of gold and steel
A diamond car with a platt in the wheel
Now you might think this is a lot of stuff
But to Minnie this was not enough
He bought a stable, full of thorough-bred race horses
His meal she ate was a dozen courses
She had a fortune in nickels and dimes
And she sat around and counted it a billion times
She had bank, yeah Minnie was clockin'
Had every sucker in the neighborhood JOCKIN'!!
She would walk by tryin' all to wink her eye
Then she dissin', with zero reply



Omar Epps
You're crazy man!
You know what? When you said that last time
I was kind a trippin right, but now
You're right, I am crazy
But you know what else? I dont give a fuck

Check it out
Is it, money or women to funny beginnings, tragic endings
I can make a million and STILL not get enough of spending
And since my life is based on sinnin, I'm hellbound
Rather be buried than be worried, livin held down
My game plan to be trained heavy, military
Mind of a Thug Lord, sittin in the cemetary
Cryin, I've been lost since my adolescence, callin to Jesus
Ballin as a youngster, wonderin if he sees us
Young black male, crack sales got me three strikes
Livin in jail, this is hell, enemies die
Wonder when we all pass is anybody listenin?
Got my, hands on my semi shotty, everybody's bitchin
Please God can you understand me, bless my family
Guide us all, before we fall into insanity
I make it a point, to make my peep bumpin warlike
Drop some shit, to make these stupid bitches jaws tight

Go, niggas wanna get it on, let's fight!
I got some niggas in my click that make thay mother fucking jaws tight now
Go, niggas wanna get it on, let's fight
I got some niggas in my click that make thay mother fucking jaws tight
Go, niggas wanna get it on, let's fight!
I got some niggas in my click that make thay mother fucking jaws tight now
Go, niggas wanna get it on, let's fight
I got some niggas in my click that make thay mother fucking jaws tight

The love is lost
The gloves is off so figure
What side you tryin' be on, the barrel or the trigger
A gang of niggas talking the talk
But ain't walking the straight line
They trying to hide behind the one time
Fuck being scared and constantly with security
I ain't afraid of whatever you faggots try to do to me
Shoot at me, try to corner me, orderlies try to get at me
Flip it like fake identities, sticking it to my enemies
And have you running for your motherfucking lives
Till they put me in a courtroom fighting for mine
The only reason I got foes that used to be friends
When niggas mumble under their breathe, I'm under their skin
I pray for the strength to handle what my city bring
Better stand for something, or your bound to fall for anything
The pitfalls, the pot holes, I spit flows that generate straight crack sales, we got those
One hitter quitter split a nigga like a embryo
Bring it to your crib, to your kids, to your video shoot
Give me the loot, my dudes all paid up
The half assed getting rat packed and sprayed up
You say "What?", speak up punk I can't hear you
Your transparent, Reynold's wrap, I'm seeing clear through
Pray for my down fall, talk like hoes
Mister Rap Rap the Gauge and kick in the door
And motherfuckers tryna say I can't rap no more
Like one monkey gonna stop the show
Lets go!



Niggas!

Who's afraid of the punk police?
Niggas run the streets, no justice no peace
Fuck the law, rather draw than do time
Don't fuck with mine, cross the line, my two nines
Go baya baya when I shoot 'em
Korean mothafuckers was crooked
So niggas had to burn and loot 'em
Now the streets ain't safe at night
My Niggas! Straight take his life
So don't sleep when my Jeep creep up, how we hit 'em
Empty the clip, then dip cuz we did 'em
Lickin' of shots for Latasha that's proper
Love for my niggas but a Glock for the coppers
So what the fuck you wanna do now
I packed a .9 last year, in '99 I'm packin' 2 now
And even if they pull their triggers
They can shoot one man
But nothings gonna stop the plan of true niggas

Niggas!

My dimes make the fiends go to sleep, so they call 'em bedrocks
Niggas is like photographers, all they take is head shots
Your last words'll be, "damn what's all these red dots?"
Niggas nowawadays, they worry me, my bars is therapy
As long as you usin' them thouroughly
Muah til the day that they bury me
My niggas is stronger and tighter now than they probably will ever be
And i'm a product of the '70's
The hood got niggas on punishment, that's why they never leave
If I ain't eatin' with you, i'm probably beefin' with you
If no money ain't involved ain't no need for me speakin' with you
I know you got a gun but i'm hopin' you keep it with you
Cuz unfortunately, i'm one of them rappers that keep a pistol and
You know what the llama do, Shady/Aftermath
Ruff Ryders, D-Block, and of course Amaru
Lotta people honor you
Probably cuz of the way you used to bring the drama to
Whoever you wanted to
You a leader when you can get a leader to follow you
But anyway, life goes on
So i'll see you when I art in heaven like our fathers do

Niggas!



Danger times, danger times, danger times, danger times
Danger times, danger times, danger times, danger times

It's on, a dead body found wrapped in the carpet
A healthy pretty baby found cryin' in the garbage
Walk your dog, she pees on the sidewalk
No movies no clubs, 'cause you're bound to get caught
In the mix, runnin' for your life, time to get home
See somebody fool caught a straight to the dome
For no reason, death is still the season
Everybody's scared, leave the body bleedin'
People runnin' frantic, 'cause the shots are still ringin'
These damn thugs, just won't stop the gun slingin'
Havin' fun in these days, you gotta wear a vest
1-2-5 in the summer's like the Wild West
Something jump off a nigga cap, everybody cap
Worst about it is every fuckin' body's strapped
All you can do is cross your fingers and hope you're lucky
I see you used ta wear a laugh or grab her asses chokin'
But if I'm ok when the shots stop, not layin' in blood
Hop in my ride, tryin' to slide with these scared thugs
Dangerous times, dangerous days, dangerous nights
Everywhere we go the danger's never out of sight
Junior high school in '86 and '87
They had 38's and '94 is Mack 11's
What the hell is goin' on God? Pass the indo
What the hell they killin' over Nintendo?
I think the world is endin', and AIDS is the plague
So you can die later if you don't die today
Mothers cryin', can't understand it
Their kids gone and even reach a man yet
I try to free the hip hop when I rapping lines
But every time I try, it ends up being crime time
Go to school, go to the movies, go to the club, go to the store
Turn on the news, it's like were livin' in a war
No one to trust, the cops are the fuckin' crooks
In these days, they ain't goin' by the books
Proceed with caution, if you're not you're lost
In these fucked up times they have no remorse in
Get twisted, the last thing on your mind
You got caught kid, livin' in these danger times


Yo I'm ridin' through the back streets
Bumpin' black beats, stop where the niggas sellin' crack be
Say what up to my neighbourhood dealers
Niggas rollin' cee-lo, local car stealers
Narcs cruisin' by, they wanna lock us on the way
No eye contact, we wanna lead them astray
But the niggas in the backseat lookin' like a snitch though
Cops hookin' up, lookin' like a little bitch yo
So you know I'm back dro
Can't get caught in the mix
By these fake trouble cops and they crooked ass tricks
And uh, hold up yo, niggas rollin' up, for what?
I don't know, but they was busters so I gives a fuck
Pop a man in his fuckin' dome had to yank for chrome
I forgot it, I was lurkin' in the red zone
When the smoke cleared, I see my man was dead
And the cops on the corner, then a muthafucka fled the scene
It's gotta be a dream yo I'm buggin'
I stood up the scene, lookin' mean mad muggin' muthafucka
That I be from the streets
For the first thing jump, I got my hand on my heat
Yo it's danger time


Yo, will I, live or die?
I don't know 'cause it's stranger times
I'm too high to read the muthafuckin' danger signs
Niggas all on my phone talkin' major shit
And you mad 'cause I don't wanna page you, bitch
Now quit being quick to flip
My niggas dyin' over small time triflin' shit
So I ain't got time for these you know whats
On the nuts of a nigga makin' major bucks
I'm more lost, runnin' from the police force
New York's finest, comin' right behind us
Mind flippin' off the Moet that a nigga's sippin'
Open fire on them bitches if they get to trippin'
Mob on the scene with the Squad from Queens
Drinkin' Hennessy, muthafuckin' cops are green
Plus the mini 14 for the punks wit' funk
Drop the trunk on them silly bitches, blast them punks




Cause they're bragging, telling the fuckers in jail yo, we just got pumped woo
And that's why we don't do it, I know what I'm doing, imma destroy 'em

Got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin thug niggas?
Used to love niggas now I plug niggas, and slug niggas
Am I wrong? Niggas makin songs, tryin to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I BUST! Then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin back to brighten up the sky, many die
Heard the Fugees was tryin to do me - look bitch!
I cut yo' face, this ain't no motherfuckin movie
THEN! We watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin at my motherfuckin sideshow
BAM! Set my plan in mo', time to exterminate my foes
I can't stand you hoes, uhh
Now label this my fuckin trick shot
My lyrics runnin all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we RIDE

And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
And still, we try to change the past, in vain
Never knowin if this game'll last, feelin ashamed
And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
A man of military means in my artillery
Watchin over me through every murder scene

Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain, nigga time to die, say goodbye
Watch my eyes when I pull the trigger
So right before you die you bow before a bigga nigga, now dry yo' eyes
You was HEARTLESS on yo' hits
Niggas love to scream peace after they start some shit - pay attention
Here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you then I, run a train on Mobb Deep! Don't fuck with me
Nigga you're barely livin, don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin well, hell
How many niggas wanna be involved?
See I was only talkin to Biggie, but I'll kill allay'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up, by the fuckin Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody HEARD
Know I meant, EVERY MOTHERFUCKIN WORD

And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
And still, we try to change the past, in vain
Never knowin if this game'll last, feelin ashamed
And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
A man of military means in my artillery
Watchin over me through every murder scene

I really didn't believe until I got shot that no black person would shoot me
I was their representative, they would never harm me

And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
And still, we try to change the past, in vain
Never knowin if this game'll last, feelin ashamed
And if I die by a slug, the death of a true thug
Tell me will my niggas mourn me?
The death of a true thug
A man of military means in my artillery
Watchin' over me through every murder scene



It's all about you, one time!
Haha, for the bitches that think it's all about you
With my boy 'Pizznac, you know what I'm sayin'?)
It's all about you
But you know I'm lyin' though, hah! Yeah)

You probably crooked as the last trick
Want to laugh about how I got my ass caught up
With this bad bitch?
Thinkin' I had her, but she had me in the long run
It's just my luck, I'm stuck with fuckin' with the wrong one
Wise decisions, based on lies we livin'
Scandalous times, this game's like my religion
You could be rollin' with a thug
Instead you with this weak scrub, lookin' for some love
In every club, I see you starin' like you want it
Well, baby, if you got it, better flaunt it
Let the liquor help you get up on it
I'm still tipsy from last night
Bumpin' these walls as I pause, addicted to the fast life
I try to holla, but you tell me you taken
Sayin' you ain't impressed with the money I'm makin'
Guess it's true what they tellin' me
Fresh out of jail, life's hell for a black celebrity
So that's the reason why I call, and maybe you with it
Fantasies of us sweatin', can I hit it?
Addicted to the things you do
But still true what I'm sayin', boo, ‘cause this is all about you

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho'
Yeah, nigga
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho'

I make a promise if you go with me, just let me know
I'll have you hollerin' my name out before I leave
Nobody loves me, I'm a thug nigga
I only hung out with the criminals and drug dealers
I love niggas, ‘cause we comin' from the same place
Witness me holla at a hoochie, see how quick the game takes
How can I tell her I'm a playa? And I don't even care
Creep low, weed smoke's in the air
Everywhere I go, it's all about the groupie hoes
Waitin' for niggas at the end of every show
I just seen you in my friend's video
I never put a bitch before my friends, so here we go
Follow the leader and peep the drama that I'm goin' through
It's all about you, yeah, nigga, it's all about you

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho'
Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same ho'

I see you struttin' in your miniskirt
A crooked smile with a heart that did plenty dirt
Will it work with your ass as you pass me by?
Sayin' "hey," I've been looking at you smile all day, let's parlay
Drinkin' liquor, kissin' to help you know me quicker
While I keep workin' on your zipper, my tongue kissin'
In your position I'm fortified to do the mission
Move your hips and groove to this
Too many cooks in the kitchen, nobody take the time to listen
They probably think we still dissin'
Wit' your permission, I can make you scream my name
I'm a real man, guide you through the sleazy game
Follow me, let me take you to the ecstasy
You'll have the time of your life when you next to me you'll see
Ain't no way they can stop me
When I know a true thug woman got me

Every other city we go, every other video
It's all about you
No matter where I go, I see the same..




Picture me soundin' like the world wide mob figure
Whoo-riders this Syke, call me that nigga
The wigga, connection flex from Ingle-Watts to Texas
Ridin' coast to coast heated in a Lexus
Out the gutter, born to smuggle
K-ball sag so much you can see my drawers
Let me ball if I can, I know I can-can
If somebody ask you tell 'em that you the man
Congregation expand across thug lands
Built an army, so don't ever try to harm me
Sucka free, suga flee, want it be
Please stay the hell away from me
I don't want to cheat no mo'
But you did when yo ass was broke and po'


Now when you say, "world wide," please understand it
Cause we got a whole nation of homies and Outlawz that we mash with
Cash respect, in a large abundance and the G's I roll
Come with the game to maintain the funk gets
What happened to the women's who be jaw jackin'?
Paper stackin' is accomplished by putting out bomb shit
On top of our game is where we stay forever poppin'


World wide motherfucking mob figures
Weed smoking, gun toting, drinking
Riding on our motherfucking enemies


Ever since a tod it been evident to me
Runnin' the block would be heaven sent and very relevant
That was better then, that's a won't be, never now
Don't be jealous now, I'm on a world wide level
Being told it's on after I flow across the globe
Mobbin' like Robin Hood, for my gold, like it's Oak
I hold my load down all the way like the brown
World wide mob figure on a ride me and my niggas clown


Known for doing scandalous deeds, no handlin' me
And nah, it ain't the drugs, it's the straight thug nigga in me
I swoop down and cause havoc
My rapid delivery is automatic, lettin' niggas have it
I've been labelled as a thug nigga
Since they don't sell my shit to white folks
Ship it to the drug dealers
And catch a—catch a nigga world wide
A fuckin' mob figga West coast, who-ride
When we rob niggas money make my squad bigger
But we ain't sell our souls
Bustin' on my enemies, murder my foes
At my shows I'm a nut, lights camera time for action
Now get to clappin' to my cuts, a world wide mob figga



I'm so sick of muthafuckas askin' me
How our parents feel about us
Calling these hoes bitches
So Aunt Glo
Why don't you tell them how we do it
I'm tired of these bitches calling my house
Asking for the Young Thugz
Young Thugz ain't got time for no bitches
They trying to get rich
Stop calling
Baby!
Now it's been a long, day
I'm straight hustling to getting pay
But now it's evening, and I'm scheming of play
I got a call, from that Dogg nigga K

And I was bored, so nigga I'll be on my way
Who got the hoes? Young Hollywood? I think he might
And I suppose, nigga we up in the night

That's right them bitches be staring
With Lil Moo in the cut and that nigga all in

So what the fucking drink had me tripping
But I'll be damned if I let another motherfucker catch me slipping
We in the car nigga

Be in the drive way
Because the night is young and I'm ready to hit the highway
And now we all for that
These night call's we strapped
You know how niggas be black

Now we smoking weed that we need it
So let's get the game right
And baked tight in the late night

Preoccupied with
Straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling
I'm sick of hoes nigga fuck 'em all
Everyday is a bit of play
Getting paid, thug nigga 'til I see my dying day
Preoccupied with
Straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling
I'm sick of hoes nigga fuck 'em all
Everyday is a bit of play
Getting paid, thug nigga 'til I see my dying day
Who the fuck I'm having sex with
Gaming these cousin's in the Lexus from Texas

Expect to last past 6 'cause I'm restless
My head blasted off this Sess that I mess with

The best, click is who we choose so we making moves
Ain't in no mood for no faking moves
So is it true?
I'm asking now
'Cause if not, you and your crew could be stashed and out

Without a doubt
These bitches know we do it right
Fuck and bust a nut
That's how we do it on the late night
I keep up with my scandalous crew
Boxes of blunts and brew, well can you handle this too?
Step up and let me put this pimping in your ear
The game is clear
This place is packed, let's disappear
Now we can hit the highway and go to my place
But be cautious
Once we arrive can I toss it?
No hesitation, this fornication and situation
Fucking these hoes up to the attic, back down to the basement
No replacement, I hit you with a piece then I flee
Back to the streets is how I do it, ain't no peace for a G
And my motto, a blunt some coochie and a cold bottle
I'm fucking them hoochies and the supermodels
The game is deep, I can't sleep 'cause there's cum on my sheets
Sampling bitches like a break beat, the liquor makes me
And when it's late I'm like a convict that just escaped
Hitting these hoochies 'til they break, in the late night

Straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling?
Preoccupied with
Straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling?
I'm sick of hoes nigga fuck 'em all
Everyday is a bit of play, getting paper, thug nigga 'til I see my dying day
Preoccupied with
Straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling?
I'm sick of hoes nigga fuck 'em all
Everyday is a bit of play, getting paper, thug nigga 'til I see my dying day
Preoccupied with, straight balling, can you hear the liquor calling?
I'm sick of hoes nigga fuck 'em all
Everyday is a bit of play, getting paper, thug nigga 'til I see my dying day

Thug life nigga
Young thugz, Young Thugz, thug sisters
The whole muthafuckin' thug nation
You know see, keep your head up
Keep your motherfuckin money in you pocket
No muthafuckin' mercy, no muthafuckin' mercy



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

Mmmmmmmmmmmmm..

In the event of my demise, when my heart can beat no more
I hope I at least died for a principle, or a belief I've lived fo'
And if I die before my time, when I'm not fast enough to catch my breath, oh no
Give my apologies to the man upstairs, let him know I tried my best

And as I'm movin on
No I've come to grips with this old sayin goodbye thing
And though my body's gone
Rest assured that my kids will know that daddy's never far from home
I'll be seein you
On the other side of that yellow brick road, we've been told so much about
No doubt, no doubt
I'm gonna miss y'all, miss y'all, miss y'all

Before I reach my death y'all there's still some things I wanna see
Got dreams of havin a wife, fat as hell, carryin my seed
Got other dreams of growin old
But from what I've been told that's just wishful thinkin
So I sayyyy, {?}
This body's no longer, breathin


'Pac, 'Pac, Lyfe, Lyfe
Lyfe, Lyfe
'Pac, Lyfe, Lyfe
'Pac, 'Pac, 'Pac
'Pac, Lyfe



In my mind I'ma fighter, my heart's a lighter
My soul is the fluid, my flow sparks it right up
Arsenic writer, author with arthritis
Carpel tunnel, Marshall will start shit-itis
Hard headed and hot headed, bull headed and pig headed
Dick headed, a prick, a big headache I'm sick
Quick witted, for every lyric spitted there are 6 critics
Who wait for me to slip with it, so quick
This dynamite stick buried the wick, it's gonna explode any minute
Some lunatic lit it and it's not Nelly
Do not tell me to stop yelling, when I stop selling I quit
So stop dwelling an I am not felling
You fuckers are not ready, cause I got jelly, like Beyonce's pot belly
This is Destiny, yes money I'm of running
So get off of me, I'm not slowing or softening

They sendin armies out to bomb me, Constantly armed
The only DJ that can calm me is Constantly armed
My firepower keep me warm I'm Constantly armed
And fuck the world til I'm gone, Constantly armed
They sendin armies out to bomb me, Constantly armed
The only DJ that can calm me is Constantly armed
My firepower keep me warm I'm Constantly armed
And fuck the world til I'm gone Bitches be warned

I will not fall
I will stand tall
Feels like no one can beat me

Follow me tell me if you feel me
I think niggas is tryin to kill me
Picturin pistols, spittin hollow points til they drill me
Keepin it real, and even if I do conceal
My criminal thoughts, preoccupied with keepin steel
See niggas is false, sittin in court, turned snitches
That used to be real, but now they petrified bitches
I'm tryin to be strong, my firepower keep me warm
I'm trapped in the storm, and fuck the world til I'm gone, Bitches be warned
Word is bonb, you'll get torn
I'm bustin on Guiliani, he rubbin my niggas wrong
And then it's on, before I leave picture me
I'm spittin at punk bitches and hustlin to be free
Watch me set it, niggas don't want it, you can get it
Bet it make these jealous niggas mad I said it
This Thug Life nigga, we don't cater to you hoes
Fuck with me, have a hundred motherfuckers at yo' do', with fo




Ahhh

Another story of the territorial
Only difference from that one is this one is a-blazin' more of you
Have it and be ready

'fore to confrontation
I stand in attack formation
Find the borderline and bring together One Nation

It's time to flash back to tre bags
Buddha smoking Lambs bread
Need another case like I need bullets in my damn head
What's that you speakin' on
Fly-rican get your freakin' on
Brothers get to blastin' when they realize that the weekends gone
Your speakers blown cause my base blows
Those lyrics how I lace them when I brake foes
Now, we maintainin' players go through basic trainin'
Outlawz, bow down best-a recognize the game, set it off

Set it off on the West y'all
The party's guaranteed to be like habitable
Most of all last call for alcohol that last all night
We got beats so it's all right, we all tight

Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set if off, s-set it off, Set if off, s-set it off
Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set if off, s-set it off, Set if off, s-set it off

One Nation under a group
Gettin' down just for the smoke of it
One Nation under a group
Nothing can stop us now

I'm dealin' with that bullshhh
That off the wall shhh
That make that transmission start shhh
Well I was thinkin' along the lines
Ghetto rhymes, frontin' asses of all kinds
I ain't got the time for the Versace designs
Fakes ass crews claiming they controllin' crime
I think I'm finna show them what time it is
Greg Nice lets show them what time it is
Come on boy

I collect the dough like Reuben Kincaid
Been a Hip-Hop junkie ever since fifth grade
Early to rise, we gotta get paid
Sometimes I rock a 'fro sometimes I rock a fade
Send them hugs and kisses to the girls across the map
Don't be shy baby lay on my lap
Keep my eye open just in case of booby-trap
Slap me baby I slap you back, back

Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set if off, s-set it off, Set if off, s-set it off
Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set if off, s-set it off, Set if off, s-set it off

One Nation under a group
Getting down just for the smoke of it
One Nation under a group
Nothing can stop us now
Ha, ha, ha, ha

Set it off from the sun rise
'Til the skies turn red like the Beady Eyes
And the bees realize the allies
Reflect bullets like alloys
P-p-p-port-port
Yo G, D-O-G raisin' the flag for pen's who brag
But keep the heat up in the back
But they quick to get jet lagged
They lag when they jet, when the G in the formation of a formed set
But the flame was tossed
To the boss dedicated to givin' the boys horse
Of course, take it out of proportion
If you with the course dedicated to floss the invincible force
Set it off

Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set it off, come on now , set it off come on
Set it off on the West y'all
Set it off on the East y'all
Set if off, s-set it off, s-set if off, set it off

One Nation under a group
Gettin' down just for the smoke of it



They went and did it, so mash out and get a glass
Don finally got his own drink, call it thug passion
Introducing a special brew, made for a chosen few
I'm thugged out, while Snoop Dogg sippin' Blue
-berry but don't be scary, cause it's naturale
Catch it while it's *hot*, get every drop, cause we runnin' out
Plus the party need this flavor, no need to ask
Forever mashin', people ain't ready for this thug passion

The new drink provided by the St. Ides
Blueberry is my flavor and I know you wonder why
I'm tellin' all my peoples from the vesre off Gin and Juice
Cause this new taste is guaranteed to get you all loose
So dip down, or skip down however you get it
Blueberry is my flavor, let me know if you wit' it



Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?

When I was young, me and my mama had beef
17 years old, kicked out on the streets
Though back at the time I never thought I'd see her face
Ain't a woman alive that could take my mama's place
Suspended from school and scared to go home, I was a fool
With the big boys breaking all the rules
I shed tears with my baby sister, over the years
We was poorer than the other little kids
And even though we had different daddies, the same drama
When things went wrong we'd blame mama
I reminisce on the stress I caused, it was hell
Huggin' on my mama from a jail cell
And who'd think in elementary, hey
I'd see the penitentiary one day?
And running from the police, that's right
Mama catch me, put a whoopin' to my backside
And even as a crack fiend, mama
You always was a black queen, mama
I finally understand
For a woman it ain't easy tryna raise a man
You always was committed
A poor single mother on welfare, tell me how you did it
There's no way I can pay you back, but the plan
Is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated

Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?

Now ain't nobody tell us it was fair
No love from my daddy cause the coward wasn't there
He passed away and I didn't cry, cause my anger
Wouldn't let me feel for a stranger
They say I'm wrong and I'm heartless, but all along
I was looking for a father he was gone
I hung around with the thugs, and even though they sold drugs
They showed a young brother love
I moved out and started really hangin'
I needed money of my own so I started slangin'
I ain't guilty cause even though I sell rocks
It feels good putting money in your mailbox
I love paying rent when the rent's due
I hope you got the diamond necklace that I sent to you
Cause when I was low you was there for me
And never left me alone because you cared for me
And I could see you coming home after work late
You're in the kitchen trying to fix us a hot plate
You just working with the scraps you was given
And mama made miracles every Thanksgivin'
But now the road got rough, you're alone
You're trying to raise 2 bad kids on your own
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan
Is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated

Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?

Pour out some liquor and I reminisce, cause through the drama
I can always depend on my mama
And when it seems that I'm hopeless
You say the words that can get me back in focus
When I was sick as a little kid
To keep me happy there's no limit to the things you did
And all my childhood memories
Are full of all the sweet things you did for me
And even though I act crazy
I gotta thank the Lord that you made me
There are no words that can express how I feel
You never kept a secret, always stayed real
And I appreciate how you raised me
And all the extra love that you gave me
I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if you hold on
It's a struggle every day, gotta roll on
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan
Is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated

Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Wouldn't be a damn thang without a woman
What'd you say about my mother, man?

Mama told me there'd be days like this
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Mama told me there'd be days like this
What'd you say about my mother, man?
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Dear mama
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Dear mama
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Dear mama
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Mama told me there'd be days like this
Mama told me there'd be days like this



What time is it?
Shit, it's early nigga
Hand me some of that liquor
Fuck it
Ayo im gonna go get some more of that shit
Yeah it's time!
Yeah
Thug life nigga!
What time is it?
Ah yeah time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Yeah, time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on baby!
Yeah, time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Yeah, time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Yeah, time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on babe!!!
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Time to get my drink on baby!!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on yeah
Time to get my drink on baby!!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Yeah nigga
Time to get my drink on
Time to drink baby!!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Get my drink on nigga
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on baby!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on baby!
How ya livin?
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Time to get my drink on baby!
Time to get my drink on
Time to get my drink on yeah!
Time to get my drink on baby!



Thug life is the only thing up in 90s
Thug life I mean like a little bit then thug life like a lot
These is my thug life niggas and we finna do this like this
While I roll the blunt ya'll keep talking you know what I'm sayin'
If they ask you, you tell em, these my niggas
Fuckin' niggas up fuckin' nigggaz real bad
Two times quick in the night even drinking or smoking weed all the time
We high till I die you know what I'm sayin'
Can't nobody fuck with us either



With me, whoa

Yo I can rock it on a slow tip
Don't flip, cause I can do this
No shit, won't trip, ain't nothin' to this
2Pacalpyse, now jack you better brace
Cause I'm thumpin' it up and pumpin' it up with hellafied bass
If the comp rolls, throw blows until they back down
They sweat, no threat, suckers I smack down
No joke, I smoke any and all punks
They step, mic check and then they get done
What's next? I flex and rock the dope TEC's
Get drunk, then run through crews like group sex
Get sprung, it's fun, I love to hear the hoe's homeboys
Make noise from back to front row's
Cause yo, I flow and go continually
2Pac, non stop rippin' up scenery
So now, you know how I be rockin' shit
When I flow, same hoe with the 2Pacalypse

You don't wanna battle, down with me
Nobody

Time to crunch and munch, your pussy ass see I had a hunch
You couldn't punch, I eat you for lunch
And go through, your sorry crew, I thought you knew?
You punk motherfucker's could never do
The things I, The R the Y, the A the N Daz D did bitch, you couldn't ever fade me
I'm not a sucker, I treat you like a serious trick
You little dummy, you need to stop talkin' shit
You got nerve, I give you credit, to think you hang
But brother we're not all in the same gang
The punks, the suckers, the phonies, the perpetrators like you
Would never even fit in a crew
Without suckin' a dick, or maybe robbin' a bank
You see you don't got talent and your breathe straight stank hoe, Now step in line before I'm mad at you
You silly sucker ha, I thought you knew

Who would wanna battle, down with me?
Nobo-dy

Hit dropper, shit stopper with the strength to motivate
Give me a break, and then it's time to illustrate
2Pac will terminate, cause niggas like to perpetrate
Rhymes I create, yo you best believe they're worth the wait
So here I go, I'm about to throw a dope flow
And let them know 2Pac will hit you with a death blow
But you say no because you wanna battle blow for blow
I'm nothin' nice and my advise is just to let it go
I would just battle you but somehow I don't think it's fair
I'm not an amateur, I'll damage ya and leave you there
Anyway nigga I'm the one they want to hear from
Fuck that pussy shit that you be boppin' in they eardrum
Cause in the 90's boy, 2Pac is comin' through
I'm in effect, snappin' necks, I thought you knew

Who would wanna battle, down with me?
Nobo-dy

You wanna talk about a battle?
Well I'mma talk about a massacre
You soft sucker, I'm tryin' not to laugh at ya
You and your posse, just stepped into the circle of death
You thought I wouldn't but the gauge, was in effect
I'm not a killer but I'm not exactly pro-life
Keep actin' stupid I'mma stab you with my girls knife
I'm not a coward punk I'll walk into your livin' room
Change the channel, and make you watch a cartoon
And if you step, I hope you pack a serious nine
Cause if you don't, your sorry ass will be all mine
Cause I'm a warrior, I'll make a fire out of a stick
Life in the jungle, but never comin' less than thick
You sorry maggot, you need to learn a lesson from me
The funky brother causin' trouble chief R Y D
Cause I'm no sucker, I'm laughin' at you and your crew
You'll never hang 2Pac, I thought you knew

Who would wanna battle, down with me?
Nobo-dy
Who would wanna battle, down with me?
Nobo-dy
Who would wanna battle, down with me?
Nobo-dy



Thug life, microphone check
Outlaw, microphone check
Where you bitch niggas coming from?
You don't know, look like you a seed
From Makaveli The Don....
I can hear your style, sounds like Makaveli The Don
2Pac, my nigga
So much trouble in the world nigga
These niggas can't feel your pain
Thug life, outlaw, forever
Oh you bitch niggas....
The hardest nigga
Ever to touch this microphone
Got you bitch niggas trailin' his tail
I don't know if you catch up, but yet and still
Keep trying nigga, keep trying nigga
Thug life, Outlaw forever nigga
Eternity, infinity
So remember Makaveli The Don
His thug life lives on



When I was comin' up rough, wasn't even what you callin'
That's why I smoke blunts now, and run with alcoholics
That will explain the way I came, here we go
Just give me my dough and do the show then I'm outtie yo!
Runnin' in the back seat, sippin' on the Guinness
Fuckin' with a MAC-10 ready to be a menace
Time to hit the projects that's where the ballers dwell
In case a motherfucka wanna bust through
I'm rollin' through the projects loc'd, where they at, where they at, there they go
Them bitch ass niggas hold down the block
The one that told  the cops I gotta Glock
Ay yo it don't stop - pop pop pop
And hit the pedal, one less motherfucker in the ghetto
That's how we do it in the Oaktown, G
Fuck around and get smoked down, see
Niggas on my tail so I'm ghost
One way ticket to the East Coast
This kid was loose and unmajor
Woudn't hesitate to blaze ya

The hell raiser
Hahaha
The hell raiser

Strapped with gats at a young age
Gotta hole of a gauge, and make a motherfucker front page
High attack to the block like a cop
Hopin' open operation slangin' rocks
First I gotta get a crew full of hustlers
And fuck motherfuckers, them niggas can't touch us
And now we gotta problem come , you know my ammo
Dead bodies fillin' the Bronx
The other dealers wanna do me , I'm popular
Got the Glock cocked , sucker don't jack me up
Fuck a drive by, nigga take dead aim
Load him up on a frame and knock his ass out the game
Boom boom! was the headlines
Young nigga turn killa if the deadline
Team tucked was some niggas from Queens
Now we're the loudest motherfuckers on the scene
Gettin' paids at a mad rate
Runnin' up on the face
And hit the snakes in a bad way
Them niggas don't wanna, stack
Fuck around and breathe your last breath
Run on me or get your ass capped
With a 12 gauge blast to your back
I'm not your average nigga, untouched
Shootin' motherfuckers within ruff

The hell raiser
The hell raiser

Everybody freeze, niggas on they knees , hush
First nigga talk and I bust , trust
Run up on your stupid ass , gimme that
Peelin' caps back quicker than a snap from my jimmy hat
Picture that now, picture this I'm on foot now
Runnin' through the streets with my hit list
Pistol cockin' and jackin' them bustas
Niggas want funk but the punks can't touch us
And now they got me trapped better kill me
Payback's a motherfucker, nigga feel me?
We runnin' on the niggas in the dark
This is where the punch starts nigga wasn't checkin'
Now them niggas, gotta go, gotta go, gotta go go
Hit the floor and feel the fury of my 44
Them niggas I don't trust tryna bust me
Buck buck double line in your guts G
And when I die there'll be another hell raiser crazy motherfucker
I came up with my criminal behavior, wouldn't hesitate to blaze ya

The hell raiser
The hell raiser
The hell raiser



Holler if ya hear me
Yeah, it’s on
Muthafucking Live Squad in the house
We gonna set this shit off for these old square ass punk muthafuckers
It’s on, it’s on, it’s on
Holla if ya hear me

I got a nine thing ready to go BANG BANG!
On the first crooked cop that even comes near me
I beg your pardon, call the guards in, Chief Gates
Can’t wait to see your face, better move to another state
BOOM BOOM rebelistic slugs are realistic
The 12 gauge will leave you twisted
The government is getting shadier
And therefore, niggas getting crazier
Huh, and 5-0 can’t fade the havenotz
Shoulda learned when them OGs trashed Watts
Move on, move on, move on
Still wicked, learned to kick it, get my groove on
And you can say no to drugs, but you can’t say no to the thugs with slugs
Tell the president it’s evident he's lost
Wouldn’t know a gangbanger from a fucking horse!
Rather read the Source, flip through rap pages, black pages, speaking on black rages
We don’t even know the scoop, and the truth is the troops can’t hold the youth
Send em down with they tanks and AK-47s, what the fuck you niggas drinking?
Now tell me what you’re thinking?
You can roll through the hood and not get a spankin’
Niggas got they strap on
When they pop a cap it ain’t never black on black
They watching where they shoot, and they careful where they loot
Check the fields and you'll find proof
Black business staying 'til the end
Fooled a nigga one time won’t work again
Let's get along with the Mexicans, and we can all have peace on the sets again
And I love it when they fear me
If I’m spittin’ to you clearly
Nigga holla if ya hear me

Holla if ya hear me
Yeah, nigga holla if ya hear me
Holla if ya hear me, yo

To the preacher in the pulpit peep it
If you’re gonna preach about "turn the other cheek" you can keep it
In ’92 niggas don’t need it
They beating brothers in the streets and you’re talkin’ bout peace
Now ain’t that some fly shit
Just sit, be quiet, wait to die quick
Listen to y’all, we lost Malcolm and Hampton
Instead of an army we was marching and chanting;
“We shall overcome”
But we can’t do shit with a rock and a stick
Niggas better learn to shoot a fucking gun
And I’ve done heard enough from
The racist bitch ass judge and the white trucker
He shoulda kept his mouth on shut
Wanted to kick dust 'til some niggas rolled his ass up
And when I see the first full moon
I’m coming after Koon, watch a nigga go BOOM BOOM!
Then I want Briseno
Two to the head, now he’s headed out to Reno
And stuff Powell in the trunk let him ride
Tie him up nigga, watch his friend Wind die
Young Guns, niggas better fear me
Mothafuck the cops
You’re best to holla if ya hear me

Yeah, holla if you muthafuckin’ hear me
It’s on once a-muthafucking-gain
Young Guns International
All across this muthafuckin’ country
Yo Maj, spark that shit

It’s a miracle, I was born to amaze
Put 'em in a daze, in the morgue is where I’ll make em stay
Undeniable kid I’m coming through
With authority, ever since I was a tot I was disorderly
Puff a blunt, roll a clip, make dough
Grab a ho, but move her slow, gotta do it quick, then she gotta go
We’re thuggadon kingpins, your Majesty nigga
Springfield, Young Guns causing tradegy nigga
We got him in a smash, for his life he just begged
But I chopped his ass up and sent his mama his god damn legs
Black mafia, huh, this is organized crime
That's how it is where I’m from, if you don’t know the time
Impact from the blast, breaking down walls
A five feet killer with no sense at all
Inner city, ain’t it a pity, seems it will never end
Then they killed my friend, now to Hell I'm gonna send
A lot of motherfuckers, and that’s how it goes
'Til another nigga puts me down below. Yeah, so holla if ya hear

Move something muthafucker

Yeah, Maj, spit on that nigga man, shoot that nigga
Yo Stretch drop the bomb, yo Stretch drop the bomb
Yeah muthafucker

God Damn, uh!
Let a nigga clear my throat
Niggas blowing up shit, gotta flow in the smoke
So if ya hear me, holla, don’t fear me
But when I drop the mic don’t want no groupie niggas near me
Rockin the squad, the big shots is where the marks is
What they don’t know is that they fuckin’ with the Heartless
Reigning supreme, it’s not a dream, nigga listen
When the YGz roll cops start pissing
So holla if ya hear me



Engineered by Tony Pizarro

Engineered by Eric Lynch

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by

Engineered by




Mastered by Brian Gardner at Bernie Grundman Mastering

2Pac Amaru Shakur Foundation
17711 W. Strack Drive
Spring, Texas 77379
The 2Pac Amaru Shakur Foundation is a 501c3 organization
TASF.org





Tell me about these fake ass bitches

Break em off somethin'

It's like I tell my niggas, keep your eyes on these bitches
They love to G a nigga young dumb and gettin' riches
What the fuck you think a trick is nigga
Nigga thinking with his dick
And then get tricked out all his riches by a -- BITCH!
I'm here to school you to the rules of the game, it'll cost ya
Think you all of that just cause she let a nigga toss her
It's like a motherfuckin' privilege
So don't give up your conversation, give that bitch your 7 digits
When she call ya, ask that tramp whassup
And if she hesitate, nigga hang up, worrrd up
And let that bitch meditate to the dial tone
And call me when you're ready to bone, and it's on
A motherfuckin' mack tonight
Stay that stay strapped cause my raps is tight
You fuckin' punks, I hate you snitches
Went against the grain and the game to be fake ass bitches

Punk motherfuckin' ass
Fuck that punk ass nigga he ain't about shiiit
Trick ass motherfucker
Kiss my motherfuckin' ass
You ain't about sheiiiiiiiit!

I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'

Time to show these bustas who's boss
Run up on a real motherfucker and get tossed
The game is deep, and thicker than a motherfuckin' jimmy
Broke hoes runnin' round yellin' "Gimme!"
I can't stand it, hoes talkin' bout they got a man
Shit all I wanted her to do is suck my DICK
So how about hittin' a motherfucker on my pager
Busy now bitch but you can give me the pussy later
Fly how I fade her, played her like a game of Sega
Fuckin' with the player that done made her, huh
And I ain't sleepin' caught you creepin' for my money
She get the bozack, knockin' hoes back, keep my dough stacked
So where the motherfuckin' hoes at?
Punk niggas can't fade the mack, livin' fat
Gettin' paid to rap, it's like that, you motherfuckin' bitches

Fuck that nigga he ain't about shit
Do the shit, fuck em all

Break em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
I can't stand fake ass bitches
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'
Lyin' ass niggas and you punk ass snitches
Break 'em off somethin'



M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

Now I been known to bust on sight
God bless my crazy life la vida loca homie livin' that thug life
Been raised in violence homicide's my lullaby
Hang with the homies and learned to kick it until we die
Boss players you wonder why
I live the life of a ghetto kingpin, just let me ride
Bitches and niggas in penitentiary suits
I send 'em letters and money orders and make 'em my troops
As for these females, I got no time, I gotta get mine
You cannot blind me addicted to a life of crime
My time as shorty was full of car chases
While runnin' with John Gotti's and Scarface's
Niggas knew, I'd be the Don in my own crew
A million niggas with automatics who swarm through
You wonder who shot me here's a clue, stay alert
Cause we comin' for you, and keep it money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

I blow you up on the spot, these Glocks hot 'til you drop
All you wannabe cops, you don't wanna see shots
I beef deep with the police peep what these streets do to me
Actin' all new to me I creep on you like puberty
You don't wanna see the bad image of this scrimmage
From here to East Greenwich through every state with a sentence
Frozen weight in the cooter, ten plates to soup ya
1 2's we oughta cruise right by the state troopers
When I'm drinkin' Cristal, start thinkin' 'bout Al
Bacardi coverin' my body at the wink and a smile
Bag a hottie or two, cause butter shotties for you
I got more bodies then Drew, I drink Mynotti on New, fuck your crew
This type of shit I do for a petty hobby
Fuck the world it's Fatal dog against everybody

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

My shit's phenomenal, droppin' like domino
Comin' with the real yo and fuck what you feel yo
This is not for all the freaks in short skirts
This is for my niggas nationwide doin' work, get your feelings hurt
Lose mo' faith than a composure, money and the doja
Bitches is a cobra with deadly venom
Move as smooth as I get 'em, stackin' G's
My niggas crosstown got ki's
Hoes get diseased and fleas, for these enemies money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

I'm hittin' sixteen switches, my money over bitches
The struggle continues I'll miss you on my road to riches
I'm contribed to strive never laggin'
Disappear in the night with my 64 dragon, rag flaggin'
As I get 'em up and leave 'em stuck
Pager blowin' up but I don't give a fuck
I'm fully stocked on the block, pockets full of rocks sellin'
Loc'ers and smokers engaged twenty-fo'/seven
So what can you do for me and what can I do for you
But stay true, and do the things that we do
Blinded evil-minded no option for my offspring
Reminded can't find it complications what the future brings
Losin' my mind why you sweatin' me all the time
I'm caught in a bind, quality time on my grind
Rather be lonely honey and dodge you like snitches
I'm 'bout my riches, money over bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

That's from the time a nigga close his eyes I'm hopin', I hope he awoken
Payin' my own that's tokin' chokin' off-a Glocks smokin'
Money and power watch these bitches cause they scandalous
Gettin' niggas fucked 'n stuck from Timbuk' to Los Angeles
Ain't a nigga ruggeder than this grimy Heine' guzzler
Cowards better duck before my calibers start rubbin' ya
Me and my troops play blocks in groups, runnin' in flocks
Deuce-deuce in my socks keepin' a watch out for cops
Gettin' kicked, I keep my mind on my riches
While uncontrolled schemes keep me choosin' my money over all my bitches

M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches
M.O.B., nigga cause we mob on you tricks
And you know we keep it money over bitches

That's right nigga
Money over motherfuckin' bitches
M.O.B. on 'em nigga
Keep your motherfuckin' mind on your money, fuck these hoes
You need some motherfuckin' money
Get your mind right nigga, keep your game tight
Play right play by the rules and you'll get paid fuck the fools
We up out of this bitch here
BIATCH!



Here we go; we gonna send this one out to the old school
All these motherfuckers in the Bronx, and Brooklyn, and Staten Island
Queens, and all the motherfuckers that laid it down, the foundation
Ya know what I'm saying? Nothing but love for the old school
That's who were going do this one for, ya feel me?
BVD’s and shit
Ain’t nothin’ like the motherfuckin’ old school, nigga
And I know you kinda like reminiscin’ when I just freak it to ya like that
So why don’t you flip that shit for these motherfuckers and like, you know
Really just let them see how you picture the old school
Cause it ain’t the same for every motherfucker, you feel me?
So, uh, take us back, nigga

I remember back when I was younger
I mean back when a nigga was still wearin’ Pampers
I would listen to Nas and Lauryn Hill
“If I Ruled the World”, that shit was so surreal
“Keep Ya Head Up” wasn’t really advice I would listen to
Cause niggas would talk about me
And I was so misconstrued about what I’m supposed to do
Everyday, makin’ so many mistakes
Cruisin’ down that ride, listen to mixtapes
I remember Christmas Day, my first boombox
A li'l kid blastin’ loud music
Boondocks
I listened to 2Pac, Snoop Dogg, Dr. Dre
And niggas my age wasn’t doin’ the same thing
They steady listenin’ to new millennium music
They were good, but now they all just abusin’ hip-hop
And I just won’t stand for it
That’s why I make real music to pamper it

Come with me
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La da da da, la la la la

I remember Mr. Magic, Flash, Grandmaster Caz
LL raising hell but, that didn't last
Eric B. & Rakim was, the shit to me
I flip to see a Doug E. Fresh show, with Ricky D
And Red Alert was puttin in work, with Chuck Chill
Had my homies on the hill getting ill, when shit was real
Went out to steal, remember Raw, with Daddy Kane
When De La Soul was puttin Potholes in the game
I can't explain how it was, Whodini
Had me puffin on that buddha gettin buzzed, cause there I was
Them block parties in the projects, and on my block
You diggy don't stop, sippin on that Private Stock
Through my speaker Queen Latifah, and MC Lyte
Listen to Treach, KRS to get me through the night
With T La Rock and Mantronix, to Stetsasonic
Remember "Push It" was the bomb shit, nuttin like the old school
Remember popping and locking to Kurtis Blow, the name belts
And Scott LaRock the Super Ho back in Latin Quarters
When Slick Rick was spittin La Di Da Di
Gaming the hoochies at the neighborhood block parties, I remember
Breakdancing to Melle Mel
Jekyll and Hyde, LL when he Rocks the Bells
Forget the TV, about to hit the streets and do graffiti
Be careful don't let the transit cops see me
It ain't nothing like the old school!

Aye, on the real though, ain’t nothin’ like the old school
Aye, I was at Latin Quarters, nigga, when Eric B. and Rakim did “I Ain’t No Joke” for the first time
Aye, remember motherfuckers used to get they gold chain snatched? Remember that shit?
Remember seeing Brooklyn go crazy up in the motherfucking party?
Remember how fuckers used to go, "Is Brooklyn in the house?"
And motherfuckers would lose they God Damn Mind!
That's the old school to me; that's what I'm sayin’
I remember goin’ places that motherfuckers was scared to say
They was from anywhere but Brooklyn; that shit was the bomb
Back in the motherfucking old school, nigga
Remember skelly, nigga? Knocking niggas out the box, popping boxes?
Remember stickball? Member niggas to run that shit like that?
Remember the block? Remember screaming up at your moms from the window?
The ice cream truck, remember all the mother-
Member the italian icey's yo?
Yo remember the italian icey's the spanish niggas comin down
With the coconut icey's and shit?



I'm smokin' these niggas like they...

2Pac, 2Pac

I'm smokin' these niggas like they...

2Pac, 2Pac, 2Pac, go ahead and rock

I'm smokin' these niggas like they indo
Breakin' em' like they windows, and still they with
Until they get a whiff of this shit that I kick
And if they ever had a notion to stop me
Get cha' best shot and get dropped with ya posse

Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me

Nigga I got the Motts
I'm takin' em' out a lot, I got
More than you can hot
I'm rockin' the spot so now you jock
Come, come and get dropped
2Pac ain't tryin' to hear it
I can swing at cha' rock
I'm swingin' at cha' knots, so hot
Static is the last thing ya need when ya see me
Better have a bat or a gat to defeat me
Nigga, I'm a whole posse rolled into shot
Takin' all ya got, while ya girl gets hot and rocks the spot


Bringin' that funky flavor, with the gift that only God gave
Bringin' that funky flavor, with the gift that only God gave
Bringin' that funky flavor, with the gift that only God gave
All the way to my grave
I'd rather die than be a slave
Slaves come as dope dealers, some come as addicts
Some come to run, while the others call static




Shit, tired of gettin shot at
Tired of gettin chased by the police and arrested
Niggas need a spot where WE can kick it
A spot where WE belong, that's just for us
Niggas ain't gotta get all dressed up and be Hollywood
Y'knahmean? Where do niggas go when we die?
Ain't no heaven for a thug nigga
That's why we go to thug mansion
That's the only place where thugs get in free and you gotta be a G
... at thug mansion

A place to spend my quiet nights, time to unwind
So much pressure in this life of mine, I cry at times
I once contemplated suicide, and woulda tried
But when I held that 9, all I could see was my momma's eyes
No one knows my struggle, they only see the trouble
Not knowin it's hard to carry on when no one loves you
Picture me inside the misery of poverty
No man alive has ever witnessed struggles I survived
Prayin hard for better days, promise to hold on
Me and my dawgs ain't have a choice but to roll on
We found a family spot to kick it
Where we can drink liquor and no one bickers over trick shit
A spot where we can smoke in peace, and even though we G's
We still visualize places, that we can roll in peace
And in my mind's eye I see this place, the players go in fast
I got a spot for us all, so we can ball, at thug's mansion

I'll see you when you get there
If you ever get there
See you when you get there
I'll see you when you get there
If you ever get there
See you when you get there

Will I survive all the fights and the darkness?
Trouble sparks, they tell me home is where the heart is, dear departed
I shed tattooed tears and couldn't sleep good
For multiple years, witness peers catch gunshots
Nobody cares, seen the politicians ban us
They'd rather see us locked in chains, please explain
Why they can't stand us, is there a way for me to change?
Or am I just a victim of things I did to maintain?
I need a place to rest my head
With the little bit of homeboys that remains, cause all the rest dead
Is there a spot for us to roll, if you find it
I'll be right behind ya, show me and I'll go
How can I be peaceful? I'm coming from the bottom
Watch my daddy scream, "Peace," while the other man shot him
I need a house that's full of love when I need to escape
The deadly places slingin drugs, in thug's mansion


Dear momma don't cry, your baby boy's doin good
Tell the homies I'm in heaven and they ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night, it had me shook
Drippin peppermint Schnapps, with Jackie Wilson, and Sam Cooke
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin there kickin it with Malcolm, 'til the day came
Little Latasha sho' grown
Tell the lady in the liquorstore that she's forgiven, so come home
Maybe in time you'll understand only God can save us
When Miles Davis cuttin lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past
That passed on, they in heaven, found peace at last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in heaven
So right before I sleep, dear God, what I'm askin
Remember this face, save me a place, in thug's mansion





Got me thinking about better days...


Time to question our lifestyle, look how we live
Smoking weed like it ain't no thang
So even kids wanna try now
They lie down and get ran through
Nobody watched 'em clockin the evil man do
Faced with the demons
Addicted to hearin victims screaming
Guess we was evil since birth
Product of cursed semens
Cause even our birthdays is cursed days
A born thug in the first place, the worst ways
I'd love to see the block in peace
With no more dealers and crooked cops
The only way to stop the beast
And only we can change
It's up to us to clean up the streets
It ain't the same
Too many murders
Too many funerals and too many tears
Just seen another brother buried
Plus I knew him for years
Passed by his family, but what could I say?
Keep yo' head up and try to keep the faith
Try to keep the faith



Who would've guessed that in my future years
I'd be stressing, some say the ghetto's a sick and corrupted
Plus my P.O. won't let me hang with the brothers I grew up with
Try to keep my head up and stay strong
All my homies slangin yayo all day long
But they wrong, so I'm solo and so broke
Saving up for some Jordan's cause they dope
I got a girl and I love her but she broke too
And so am I. I can't take her to places she wanna go to
So we argue and play fight, all day and night
Makin passionate love 'til the daylight
Plus we about to get evicted, can't pay the rent
Guess it's time to see who really is yo' friend
Tell me you pregnant and I'm amazed
So many blessings while we stressin
But what can I say, keep yo' head up and
Try to keep the faith
Try to keep the faith
Try to keep the faith



Square fools, since back in high school
We was true, me and you hardly parted or separeted
We stayed faded
Affiliated with gangbanger and still made it
Up in the gym, mess with me, gotta mess with him
Still dressing like grown men when rolling
I went to dark, smoking Newports, gaming marks
Got a place in my heart, homie stay smart
Locked you up in the penn'
And gave you three to ten
I send you letters with naked flicks of old friends
Hoping you well, I know it's hell doing time in the cells
You need mail, when you in jail
And me I'm doing cool
I settled down, had a family
Working in night school
Every once in a while
I reminisce and wonder how we ever came to this



Ha ha!

This is only for the righteous
Too hot too hot too hot too hot too hot too hot
C'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon
This is only for the righteous
Too hot too hot too hot too hot too hot too hot
C'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon

I'm down with the Strictly Dope so
That means I'm more than you can handle
I'm, hotter than the wax from a candle
Him? That's 'Rock'
He's my microphone companion
Lyrics, full of the knowledge wisdom truth and understandin
Hobbies? Rappin, is my only recreation
Retire? What? You must be on some kind of medication
Why? Because I never loosen up my mic grip
Drugs? Never, cause I'm livin on the right tip
Sex? Only with my man cause I love him
Babies? Maybe one day I'll have them
Bored? Rarely cause I keep myself busy
Scratch? Nah, I leave the cuttin up to Dizzy
Dizzy who's that? He's my DJ, he's the greatest
Word nah, he just pays me to say this
The mind, is something that I cultivate and treasure

This is only for the righteous
Too hot too hot too hot too hot..
Yo c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon
This is only for the righteous
It's too hot too hot too hot too hot too hot
Yo c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon c'mon

Shakur.. Shakur.. Shakur.. Sh-sh-Shakur.. Shakur
Shakur.. Shakur.. Shakur.. Sh-sh-Shakur.. Shakur
Shakur.. Shakur.. Shakur.. Sh-sh-Shakur.. Shakur
{*to fade*}



Fugees! Fugees and Mobb Deep tryin to diss now too huh?
Hahaha! Well I ain't prejudiced, I don't give a fuck
This is what it sounds like - when we ride on our enemies
BEYOTCH! When we ride on our enemies

HEYYYY! Got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin thug niggas?
Used to love niggas now I plug niggas, and slug niggas
Am I wrong? Niggas makin songs, tryin to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I BUST! Then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin back to brighten up the sky, HOW many die
Heard the Fugees was tryin to do me - look bitch!
I cut yo' face, this ain't no motherfuckin movie
THEN! We watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin at my motherfuckin sideshow
BAM! Set my plan in mo', time to exterminate my foes
I can't stand you hoes, uhh
Now label this my fuckin trick shot
My lyrics runnin all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we RIDE - on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
I bet you motherfuckers die, when we ride, on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies
Bet all you motherfuckers die, when we ride, on our enemies

They think they're crazy, but they ain't crazy, let's face it
Shit, basically they're just playing sick
They ain't shit, they ain't saying shit, spray 'em 50
A to the K, get in the way I'll bring Dre and them with me
And turn this day into fucking mayhem, you staying with me?
Don't let me lose you, I'm not trying to confuse you
When I let loose with this Uzi and just shoot through your Isuzu
You get the message? Am I getting through to you?
You know what's coming, you motherfuckers don't even know, do you?
Take some Big and some Pac and you mix em up in a pot
Sprinkle a little Big L on top, what the fuck do you got?
You got the realest and illest killers tied up in a knot
The juggernauts of this rap shit, like it or not
It's like a fight to the top just to see who'd die for the spot
You put ya life in this, nothing like surviving a shot
Y'all know what time it is, soon as 50 signs on this dot
Shit what you know about death threats, cause I get a lot
Shady Records was eighty seconds away from the towers
Some cowards fucked with the wrong building, they meant to hit ours
Better evacuate all children, it's nuclear showers
There's nothing spookier
You now about to witness the power of fucking 50


Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain, nigga time to die, say goodbye
Watch my eyes when I pull the trigger
So right before you die you bow before a bigga nigga, now dry yo' eyes
You was HEARTLESS on yo' hits
Niggas love to scream peace after they start some shit - pay attention
Here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you then I, run a train on Mobb Deep! Don't fuck with me
Nigga you're barely livin, don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin well, hell
How many niggas wanna be involved?
See I was only talkin to Biggie, but I'll kill allay'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up, by the fuckin Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody HEARD
Know I meant, EVERY MOTHERFUCKIN WORD
When we ride on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
Make sure everybody die, when we ride, on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies, hehe
I make sure everybody die, when we ride, on our enemies



The St. Ides commercial went fine thank you.. fuck that

I want to make it something that we can live by.
I felt like there's no way I can stop calling myself a nigga,
Just as sure as there was no way that motherfuckers was gon' stop calling me a nigga
so instead of taking it, letting them take that away from me
I took it from them, niggas now mines and when they say nigga they give me strength, so say it, say it!


I still see Tom & Jerry's you know
and Popeye with black Sambo babies and shit they ain't bleeping that shit up
so I'll be damned if I bleeped out nigga

just like we can do anything... we can do that.. not not I'm not saying this.
I gotta say this again It's not black against white
when I say "we", it's the good against evil
and what I mean we can take anything we want, we can take..
We can have anything, because it belongs to you
If you're right and you got, good on your side, I really truly believe that nothing can stop you
and I'm using the same thing as America taught me
that's what I'm using the tools of this country, Capitalism and imperialism, colon-ism, I'm using all those against them, and that's what they hate
they hate to see a little black kid sit in a first class with a gang in gold chains, gold rings you know what I'm saying
the stewards staring at me .. they hate that.. they hate that shit so bad
they hate that; when they see me in the restaurant or something wit a girl it's a black woman and I'm sitting next to
they hate that.. they hate.. they really hate when it's a white woman, but they won't see it.. they won't.. not from Tupac
so they hate that they see me with black woman they hate I don't say bitch, you know what I'm saying?, to black females
I say bitch to white cops and the crooked cops that's who I say bitch to that's who is a bitch they hate that
they hate that; they can't limit me and hold me in one circle
they hate; every time they tryna put me in gangsta category
I flip, do summer song and end up in a juice category and I love that
I love that about myself, and I love that about black people
and If I can love... I'm loving myself
I remember when I was poor I hated myself, now I love myself
so I see what the curse can do, and I see what it takes to get it off you
it just takes a little confidence, and that's what we missing as black people
we let, them make us feel like you know, a quiet again
just being a quiet, you know what I'm saying, telling you that when good chains is hoochie
and that's played out, cause they make jokes about it
you know boohubhubahubhuba, really!, they ain't got no rhythm,
so what they can tell me, how can they joke about buhubahuba and they ain't got no rhythm, you know what I'm saying
how they gon' joke about me wearing gold chains
and they wearing a fuckin cougar skin, they wearing animal skin
and it's 20 you know it's hot, they wearing animal's furs and shit

"Tupac"
Uhm, my mother, you know when she gave birth to me
folk story about this  a true life Peruvian revolutionary named "Túpac Amaru"
we wanna meet with Túpac Amaru
he came and they met and when they so he wanna cease the fighting
would you please cease the fighting too many people are dying we gon' give you what you asked for
he said okay, told them to cease fire























A picture of perfection
The object of a nigga affection
Partners in passionate sex, a place to put my erection
Fantasies of you in submission, freaky positions
Pushin', pullin' and twistin' I’m on a mission, got me on the mash
Tried to dig, you was screamin' when I did
Steady, yellin' out spots for me to hit, and "aw shit"
Soon as I seen her, saw us playin' hide the weiner'
Want a "Freak Like Me", fuck Adina
Up and down is the object, side to side
Make you holler out my name when a thug nigga ride, "Can I cum inside?"
Say you don't feel it, that's a lie
You just scared to get this penitentiary dick, the trot caught your eye
When I walked by, I said "Hi"
But you were so shy, I can't lie, damn-near stuttered when you walked by
You want me to lick it, and even worse
Got your heart set on me going first, and that ain't no fair exchange!


Open your legs
Got me marchin' like it's a million, you tremble from the feelin'
Look up, cause I got mirrors on the ceilin'
And if you willin', then we can ride until the sun shine
And just for fun, I betchu I can make you cum 61 times
Close your eyes, let me heat it up
Cause when we fuck I refuse to bust a nut until I beat it up
Drop the top, time to fuck while the wind blow
Baby throw your legs out the window
Remember on the balcony? Bend over baby, bounce on me
And let me hit it where it counts and flee
Remember me? "I Get Around," and I'm haunted by my "Temptations"
Sexual participation, my motivation
Even though I like the way you work it
You don't deserve it cause you walk around actin' like you're perfect
Took a while but I finally got it, and like a boss player
Bitch you ain't doin' me no favors, fair exchange!

Fair exchange, fair exchange ain't no robbery
Fair exchange, fair exchange ain't no robbery

Now your attitude ain't realistic
Yeah it's true, I'm gettin' pussy, but baby you're gettin' dick
And since you're bein' laced with the penetration
It's only right to show a form of appreciation
In bed naked you're so twisted think your legs breakin'
You said take it so I'm blind in my passion, how long will I last
Doggy style steady pumpin' on that ass, until I blast
And then I laugh as we lay back
See I wait until you asleep and that's the payback
Cause you're actin' like you did somethin', givin' me a piece
I had you mufflin' your screams in the sheets, fuckin' with me
A true digger that love triggers, a thug nigga
Hustlin' bitches like drug dealers
Before I say goodbye, put an end to all the games
Here's my number for another fair exchange

Fair exchange, fair exchange
It ain't no robbery, it ain't no robbery



Expect me nigga like you expect Jesus to come back
Expect me nigga! I’m comin'!
Expect me nigga like you expect Jesus to come back
Expect me nigga! I’m comin'!







And I guess you know, tell us like a little bit of his adventure that he goes on?







it's a long, it's a long he learn that in acting class, they pass on seniors





and conflict and redemption, you know things like that. So I feel like I've always been an actor and acting is my first love
I never got a chance to leisurely study acting with great teachers and you know fine into my craft.

that you can put out there?










*Interviewer laughs*





























Feat. Eminem

So what I wanna do, hopefully is... I wanna be, uhm not a wannabe I am 2Pac Shakur!

2Pac!
2005!
Guess who's back? G-G-Guess who's back
G-G-Guess who's back? G-G-Guess who's back
Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Posse deep as I role through the streets
Motherfuck the police as we creep, in our Jeeps
Layin so long you think I'm asleep
But at the slightest beef, I'm robbin niggas through the teeth
And OPD can get the dick if they play tuffy
Last time them niggas rushed me, I ain't bust but now I'm touchy
Trust me, ain't nothing jumpin but these buck shots
Them niggas got enough knots, I'm poppin corrupt cops
Ya motherfuckaz catch a hot one
You wanted to start a problem, now you coward cops have got one
And there's no prison that can hold a
Motherfuckin soulja, ready to role and take control
So now I jack 'em while they sleepin
Role to the door, through a grenade in the precinct
Some people panic, brothers bugged out
I had to keep poppin, cuz wouldn't stop until they rugged out
And they vest don't protect from the head wounds
Reload ammunitions and them bitches will be dead soon
Smoke rising from the barrel of my shotty
I finally got revenge, now count the bodies
20 cops, one for every year in jail
Tryin to keep a nigga down, but ya failed
Before I let ya take me, I told ya
Fuck being trapped, I'm a soulja

I betcha that I got something you ain't got, that's called courage
It don't come from no liquor bottle, it ain't scotch, it's not bourbon
I don't walk around like no G, cuz that ain't me, I'm not that person
I don't try to act like you do, cuz that ain't you, you just frontin
You ain't?

It's 2Pac in the mad bitch
In them six-'fo, rag on them thangs, that's a bad bitch
Gettin ghosts on them bitches in the town
Bustin out the backseat, nigga when we clown
Homie is you down?
B got the strap and she anxious
Hurry up 'fo she spank shit
Commin round the corners, spittin rounds
They payin homie down
Caught them sucka ass bitches outta bounce
Now tell me how that sound?
A double date laced with hate, make 'em pray for the judgement day
Now tell me how that sound?
A double date laced with hate, make 'em pray for the judgement day
Stinkin BIATCH!

I betcha that I got something you ain't got, that's called courage
It don't come from no liquor bottle, it ain't scotch, it's not bourbon
I don't walk around like no G, cuz that ain't me, I'm not that person
I don't try to act like you do, cuz that ain't you, you just frontin

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me

Everywhere I see, a soulja a soulja
Everywhere I see, a soulja like me




Come on, break em off somethin'
Come on break em off somethin'

Red light, green light, one, two, three
Tell me why O.P.D. sweatin' me
Is it for the major Crip that I'm makin'
Is it for the fact that 'Pac don't be fakin'
Think before you talk black
I ain't the one to bite my tongue, 2Pacalypse will smoke back
And I don't need a posse, my Glocks like a pocket full of rockies
Takin' out the cop team
Don't mock me, sucka just jock me
Fifty to the first that can drop me
Better talk it like we walk it when we swing 'em
Yea little square we can sling 'em
Got a posse you can bring 'em
Watch me
Pop, pop, bang, boom, ping 'em
Big D's in the house, pass the crazy
Of course cause them suckaz can't fade me
Yea!

Come on, break em off somethin'
Kill a nigga kill a nigga
Come on break em off somethin'

Now make a make a way here I come with a clip
Dub-C and they got me on some freestyle type shit huh
So nigga go and run hard as you can and take cover
Mad circle mutilate motherfuckers
Fuck a dancer, I'm hoopin' cuz my crew don't dance
Khakis and them steel toe boots is how we roll
Madder than a serial killer on a hoe stroll
And I don't know about y'all but I'm down to rep
Packin' all these niggas who be dissin' the underground
Motherfuck god, I diss 'em on wax
Catch 'em slippin' backstage start fadin' they ass
Oops there goes that ghetto mentality
The same reason you never see my video on your T.V
Cuz we don't say what they want us to say
Fuck rhythm and blues and the police too fool
You niggas can't stop me if i gave ya a free steel to the jaw, you still couldn't drop me
So don't try to sneak on that creep tip
Cuz you'll get that ass kicked quick bitch
So go in the house y'all here comes that crazy nigga flippin' on the mailman and innocent bystanders
Suckers will get knocked down
Dub-C bringin' noise from the mother fuckin' underground

Kill a nigga kill a nigga
Come on, break 'em off somethin'
Kill a nigga, kill a nigga
Come on break 'em off somethin'

Wicked wicked, in that Oak Town fashion
Wicked wicked, in that Oak Town fashion
Wicked wicked, in that Oak Town fashion
Wicked Money B, I am that odical dodge

I'm the worst-est wicked as I wanna be
Stand if you want to, but don't you dare stand in front of me
Daddy Mack trickin', what you did then all fuckin' shit up
Well here's a little more dick for you to suck
And all these years that I be rappin'
Styles that I'll be flashin'
Kind of like Nike, I never have to ask questions
All it takes, is a place, and a place, and a time and a rhyme
If I find ya, you'll be hidin' in my face
Stingin' like a bumble
Out the trunk with this funky attitude
Fuck the humble
Got this stamina to be on the mic
Mashin' in the stance with the stylist boots
I'm a bout to catch a bulge in my pants
And the bigger the butt, the bigger the nut
That I mistrust
I can catch a bum rush
Layin' in the cut, like a panther on the prowl
So agile
Don't ask scoop
You're not a now
But I'll tellin' MC how, we should
Take ya time, take ya, take ya, take ya time
Mc's take ya time, before ya start the rhyme
Yes!
Take ya time, take ya, take ya, take ya time
MC's take ya time, before ya start the rhyme
So are you Filthy McNasty?, rappin' too fast
Ask me, I say we slow and flow and roll ya ass
Peace to Down W, Big D, 2Pac, and Mack
Sideways to your mommas house

Kill a nigga kill a nigga
Come on, break 'em off somethin'
Kill a nigga, kill a nigga
Come on break 'em off somethin'

I shift the nigga no respect 'fore he plays me
Come off that bullshit fool you can save these
And if you think I'm fuckin' around, hear the gun pop
Gotta break your ass off, some of that reality
Niggas don't know about the D to the E to the B
The shit on the microphone motherfuckers can't fuck with
You want something to play with?
Warm your ass like gum
As I push in the clip pump pump
From a woman's perspective
Live from the motherland, here's my objective
Let this microphone pump
As I pump and stomp huh
To make a fly guy gotta shake they rumps
Money B and W.C. the D.E.B down with the motherfuckin S.T




Sometimes it's hard to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear 'em anymore
Got me heartbroken, fine, so many babies screaming
Cause they seeing destruction before they a see human being
So they start smoking weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families in shape
Cause they all broke & why do ghetto birds die?
Before we learn to fly, somebody else's child caught in guns smoke
We can all make a change
So I'm told but I haven't seen the change unfold
I keep hoping please, if you prefer to breathe
Communities in need of people that will lead
Keep your eyes open I can only say I'll try
Until the day I die....
Until the day I die.....

Though half our problems can be based on economical greed
A dying breed, addicted to weed to get G's
With my heart open, greed brings only misery
A way to tragedy, so I stay sucker free
Only a few chosen rise, my ghetto queens, rise
Don't be afraid to try, too many of us die
For the door to open wide, my brothers be wise
Stay focused on the prize, though everybody dies
We continue growing, one day at a time

We continue growing, one day at a time...


Cause all I see is terror
I hate the man in the mirror
Cause his reflection makes the pain turn realer
Times of Armageddeon, murder in mass amounts
In this society where only gettin the cash counts
I started out as a beginner
Entered the criminal lifestyle became a sinner
I make my money and vacate, evade prison
Went from the chosen one to outcast, unforgiven
And all the Hennessy and weed can't hide, the pain I feel inside
You know, it's like I'm livin just to die
I fall on my knees and beg for mercy, not knowing if I'm worthy
Living life thinking no man can hurt me...

We continue growing, one day at a time...
We continue growing, one day at a time...
We continue growing, one day at a time...



The Conspiracies
after Tupacs death several deveral people reported they saw him in Jamaica

Suge Knight killed Tupac














Fuck
I ain't got no motherfuckin friends
That's why I fucked yo' bitch, you fat motherfucker
Bad Boy killers

First off, fuck your bitch and the clique you claim
West side when we ride come equipped with game
You claim to be a player but I fucked your wife
We bust on Bad Boy niggas fuck for life
Plus Puffy tryin ta see me weak, hearts I rip
Biggie Smallz and Junior M.A.F.I.A. some mark ass bitches
We keep on comin' while we runnin for ya jewels
Steady gunnin, keep on bustin at the fools, you know the rules
Little Ceaser, go ask ya homie how I leave ya
Cut your young ass up, leave you in pieces, now be deceased
Lil Kim, don't fuck around with real G's
Quick to snatch yo' ugly ass off tha street, so fuck peace
I let them niggas know it's on for life
So let the West side ride tonight hahahah
Bad Boy murdered on wax, and killed
Fuck wit' me and get yo caps peeled, you know ... see ...

Grab ya Glocks, when you see 2Pac
Call the cops, when you see 2Pac, uhh
Who shot me, but ya punks didn't finish
Now ya bout to feel the wrath of a menace
NIGGA, I hit em' up...

Check this out, you muthafuckas know what time it is
I don't even know why I'm on this track
Ya'll niggas ain't even on my level
I'ma let my little homies ride on you
Bitch made-ass bad boy bitches, feel it!

Get out the way yo, get out the way yo
Biggie Smallz just got dropped
Little Moo, pass the Mac, and let me hit him in his back
Frank White need to get spanked right, for settin traps
Little accident murderer, and I ain't never heard-a ya
Poisonous gats attack when I'm servin ya
Spank ya shank ya whole style when I gank
Guard your rank, cause I'ma slam you ass in the paint
Puffy weaker than the fuckin block I run on you nigga
And I'll smoke ya junior mafia in front of you nigga
With the ready power tuckin my Guess under my Eddie Bauer
Ya clout, pretty sour I get packages every hour
And hit em up

Chorus
Grab ya Glocks, when you see 2Pac
Call the cops, when you see 2Pac, uhh
Who shot me, but ya punks didn't finish
Now ya bout to feel the wrath of a menace
NIGGA, we hit em' up...

Peep how we do it, keep it real, it's penitentiary steel
This ain't no freestyle battle, all you niggas gettin
Killed with ya mouths open
Tryin to come up offa me, you in the clouds hoping
Smokin dope it's like a sherm high
Niggas think they learned to fly
But they burn muthafucka, you deserve to die
Talkin bout you gettin money, but its funny to me
All you niggas living bummy, why you're fuckin' with me
I'm a self made milionare
Thug Livin out a prison, pistols in the air, hahaha
Biggie, remember when I used to let you sleep on tha couch
And beg the bitch to let you sleep in the house, ahh
Now its all about Versace, you copied my style
Five shots couldn't drop me, I took it, and smiled
Now I'm bout to set the record straight, with my AK
I'm still the thug that you love to hate
Motherfucker, I hit em up

I'm from N-E-W Jerz, where plenty murders occur
No point to comment , we bringin drama to all you herbs
Knuckle check the scenario, Little Cease
I bring you fake G's to your knees
Coppin pleas in de janeiro
Lil Kim, is you coked up, or doped up?
Get ya lil Junior whopper clique smoked up, what the fuck
Is you STUPID?!?! I take money, crash and mash through Brooklyn
With my clique lootin, shootin and pollutin ya block
With 15 shots cocked Glock to your knot
Outlaw mafia clique movin up another notch
And you bast stops squaws get mopped and dropped
All your fake-ass east coast props brainstormed and locked

You is a, b writer, a Pac style taker
I'll tell you to ya face you ain't shit but a faker
Softer than Alizee with a chaser
Bout to get murdered for the paper
Idi Amin approach the scene of the caper
Like a loc, with little ceaser in a choke hold
Totin smoke, we ain't no muthafuckin joke
Thug Life, niggas betta be known, we approachin
In the wide open, guns smokin
No need for hopin its a battle lost, I got em crossed
Soon as the funk is poppin off
Nigga I hit em up

Now you tell me who won
I see them, they run
They don't wanna see us
Whole Junior M.A.F.I.A. click dressin up tryin ta be us
How the fuck they gonna be the mob when we always on our job
We millionaires, killin ain't fair but somebody gotta do it
Oh yeah, Mobb Deep, you wanna fuck with us?
You little young ass motherfuckers
Don't one of you niggas got sickle cell or somethin?
You fuckin with me nigga you fuck around
And have a seizure or a heart-attack
You better back the fuck up, before you get smacked the fuck up
That's how we do it on our side
Any of you niggas from New York that wanna bring it, bring it
But we ain't singin, we bringin drama
Fuck you and your motherfuckin mama
We gonna kill all you motherfuckers
Now when I came out I told you it was just about Biggie
Then everybody had to open their mouth with a motherfuckin opinion
Well this how we gonna do this
Fuck Mobb Deep
Fuck Biggie
Fuck Bad Boy as a staff record label
And as a motherfuckin crew
And if you wanna be down with Bad Boy
Then fuck you too
Chino XL, fuck you too
All you motherfuckers, fuck you too

Alla y'all motherfuckers, fuck you die slow motherfucker
My fo'-fo' make sure all y'all kids don't grow
You motherfuckers can't be us or see us
We the motherfuckin Thug Life riders West side till we die!
Out here in California nigga we warn ya we'll bomb on you motherfuckers
We do our job
You think you mob, nigga we the motherfuckin mob
Ain't nuttin but killers and fa'real niggas
All you motherfuckers feel us
Our shit's going triple and four-quadruple
You niggas laugh coz our staff got guns in they
Motherfuckers belt, you know how it is
When we drop records they felt
You niggas can't feel it
We the realest, FUCK EM, we Bad Boy killaz *echoes*



Lord help me, save me, mama keep praying
For a young motherfucker trying to duck an early grave
In the city where ya can't tell the fakes from the snakes
And the snakes from the phonies, enemies of homies
Around the corner there's another nigga waiting to jack
He don't know I got a Glock 'til his ass get shot
Just like a motherfucking thug disease
Craving beats like they motherfucking drugs to me, hey
What's up with bitches trying to screw me? Do me I did a movie
Throw the pussy to me but before they never knew me
Rather die then let ya play me for a, buster
And with my Glock I'm a plotting ass rotten motherfucker, huh
Don't let the movie fool ya, let me school ya
Screaming Thug Life nigga when I do ya
I'm going crazy, getting dizzy
And then I snap again, a motherfucking breather bring me back
I'm telling ya I'm losing it
Hahahaha losing it!
Yeah

You wanna play rough? okay
Okay surrender ha?
I'm going crazy, niggas can't fade me
On the real I kill when I step to ya fucking grill
So let me kick it let me flip it, let me get wicked
I'm not a buster from the hood selling wolf tickets
I hang with G's flipping keys and smoking weed
I get the cash and dash and never learn to read
So fuck a bitch, fuck a ho and I let ya know
Because they come and go like the wind blows
What am I giving how I'm living what I'm giving up
You can take my life and I don't give a fuck
'Cause I'm the trouble most coming from the west coast
Where the niggas is banging 'til the overdose
Killers and murderers, psychos and lunatics
Nobody knows what makes my mind clicked
Is it the demons, screaming inside of me?
Hell no it's just the Thug Life mentality
I'm going crazy shit don't phase me
I'm living like a thug 'til six niggas carry me
Death is on the trigga so pull it
I can't take it no more, nigga, I'm losing it

you wanna play rough okay
Okay stop ha?
Shit was talking to me, my gat screamed fire
The bullet told me shoot that motherfucker he's a liar
I talked to me 3-80 like a bitch on a stroll
When niggas try to dig me, I hold off and let a hoe
Nigga, I can't get fucked in this game I'm a psychopath
My AK told me to shove him up some niggas ass
I'm having long conversations with Mr. Millimeter
He's one of my best friends bitch ass nigga eater
And Miss Mossberg love it in the back trunk
You know that old school bitch she like to get it funked
And spitting motherfuckers by the seems
My grand daddy Mr. AR-15
By the evil motherfucker
Talked me into taking over a dope turf and shooting cluckers
Said he was my only family
Shoot straight, and please don't jam me
Got in a fight at the club my gat started talking
Told me to shut the fuck up and let him do the talking
I woke up and it was sick to see the guts hang
I'm going nuts man
Shit was talking to me

Yeah, foo' I'm going nuts straight gat shit up
Motherfucker livin' a thug life
Yeah motherfucker, Spice 1, nigga




They stole the mic i grip
I'm feelin' tired and sick
My Microphone was gone
I put the cops on the case
Without a clue or a trace
So as sure a smoking cigarettes is bad for your health
If i want my microphone back i'll do it my self
Lets get Busy
Before I told Dizzy what I wanted to Do
He was over at my house with the TMS crew
Now that its gone its not long 'til your beat)
I got a battle at 6
With out my microphone
I'm guaranteed to get whipped
Ya might think its unbelievable
But word to the strength
When it comes to rockin rhymes
Im a musical nimth
They Gave me other mics
But yo it wasn't no use
But I couldn't get loose
I said forget it
Ya microphone or not
And I got to do this
It'd be the first time I lost
But if I beat 'em it'd finally prove that I'm the boss
I grabbed my leather jacket
Walked through the streets
Was hopin and payin
Strictly dope won't get beat
I begin to get hyped
I was ready to fight
Yo I was confident that I win
To hell with the mic!
I hop on to the stage
Dizzy started the beat
The sucka shivered
Because he tasted defeat
Then I signaled to Dizzy
Bust a rhyme wit my head
And then he was dead
I was happy as hell
Cause I was lucky that night
Put my hand in my pocket
And there was my mic
Haha

The case of the misplaced mic


I'm down with Strictly Dope



Pac you saved me when I was fifteen
Without even being here

Let me take a minute to re-check myself
I been going through a lot and I been praying for some help
I feel the fire burning deep in my chest
Cuz you passed the torch and I know that I've been blessed
With ability, I can do what I do
I can't complain cuz I got a new attitude
If you change the game I can change it too
I did enough chilling now I'm making my moves

Thank you to the ones who made this for me
I'm trying to be everything you want me
And when I'm done no matter what or where I been
You know I'm down to do it all again
Put my mind to the depths of my soul
I yearn to achieve all my goals
And all my time will be spent
On the ones I miss, I will lament

All the things you taught me made me who I am
I here my people talking about the things that need to change
For this new generation but nobody's taking action
We can't keep fighting and forever struggling
But you were the one, you left the to's
And now it's time for us to, to bring a new
You could've saved the world but you did saved your girl
Yes you did and I am here to let you know that I thank you, thank you


I will miss you forever
No one will ever take your place
For the ones I miss, eternally
I will lament

I know that I've been blessed with ability, I can do what I do
I can't complain cuz I got a new attitude
If you change the game I can change it too
I did enough chilling now I'm making my moves


I yearn to achieve all my goals
And I yearn to achieve to all my goals
Yeah, oh



Ladies and gentle men
Right here on tonight's stage
We're gonna have two savage minds
Two ruthless battlers
Two gruesome souls
Go live, right here
In this corner, MC Ryan D
And up next is 2Pacalypse

Yo I can rock it on a slow tip
Don't flip, cause I can do this
No shit, won't trip, ain't nothin' to this
2Pacalpyse, now jack you better brace
Cause I'm thumpin' it up and pumpin' it up with hellafied bass
If ya comp rolls, throw blows until they back down
They sweat, no threat, suckers I smack down
No joke, I smoke any and all punks
They step, mic check and then they get done
What's next?, I flex and rock the dope TEC's
Get drunk, then run through crews like group sex
Get sprung, it's fun, out to hear the hoes
Homeboys, make noise from back to front row's
Cause yo, I flow and go continually
2Pac, non stop rippin' up scenery
So now, you know how I be rockin' shit
When I flow, same hoe with the 2Pacalypse

Ooohh that's very good
Remember the last to have the challenger from the phone ringing
Eat the package mayn

Two it's time to crunch and munch, your pussy ass see I had a hunch
You couldn't punch, I eat you for lunch
And go through, your sorry crew, I thought you knew?
You punk motherfucker's could never do
The things I, The R the Y, the A the N, Daz D did bitch, you couldn't ever fade me
I'm not a sucker, I treat you like a serious trick
You little dummy, you need to stop talkin' shit
You got nerve, I give you credit, to think you hang
But brother we're not all in the same gang
The punks, the suckers, the phonies, the perpetrators like you
Would never even fit in a crew
Without suckin' a dick, or maybe robbin' a bank
You see you don't got talent and your breathe straight stank
Hoe, now step in line before I'm mad at you
You silly sucker ha, I thought you knew

Ooohh that was very good
Ryan D, very good
But let's give 2Pac a counter attack
2Pac, step to the stage
And may the best man win

Hit dropper, shit stopper with the strength to motivate
Give me a break, and then it's time to illustrate
2Pac will terminate, cause niggas like to perpetrate
Rhymes I create, yo you best believe they're worth the wait
So here I go, I'm about to throw a dope flow
And let them know 2Pac will hit you with a death blow
But you say no because you wanna battle blow for blow
I'm nothin' nice and my advise is just to let it go
I would just battle you but somehow I don't think it's fair
I'm not an amateur, I'll damage ya and leave you there
Anyway nigga I'm the one they want to hear from
Fuck that pussy shit that you be boppin' in they eardrum
Cause in the 90's boy, 2Pac is comin' through
I'm in effect, snappin' necks, I thought you knew

Very good, very good
It's time for Ryan D
Once more to come
And meet 2Pac halfway
It's been a gruesome fight
Here's your last chance

You wanna talk about a battle?
Well I'mma talk about a massacre
You soft sucker, I'm tryin' not to laugh at ya
You and your posse, just stepped into the circle of death
You thought I wouldn't but the gauge, was in effect
I'm not a killer but I'm not exactly pro-life
Keep actin' stupid I'mma stab you with my girl's knife
I'm not a coward punk I'll walk into your livin' room
Change the channel, and make you watch a cartoon
And if you step, I hope you pack a serious nine
Cause if you don't, your sorry ass will be all mine
Cause I'm a warrior, I'll make a fire out of a stick
Live in the jungle, but never comin' less than thick
You sorry maggot, you need to learn a lesson from me
The funky brother causin' trouble chief R Y D
Cause I'm no sucker, I'm laughin' at you and your crew
You'll never hang 2Pac, I thought you knew

Aww we're havin' a good fight here tonight
Ladies and gentlemen
Ryan D almost got points taken away for a low blow
2Pac
Step to the stage
It's on

Shall I say I'm beatable?
Now out of the silent, I think conceded
But what more can I say, I've never been defeated
By a half steppin' mutha fucka clutchin' on the microphone
Sucker I'll break ya bones better leave 2Pac alone
I ain't no trick
I'll drop you and I'll drop you quick
It makes you sick
Because your bitch is on my dick
But who's to blame, the brotha with the strange name
I show no shame, cause god gave the me the gift of game
Now who are you?
Mutha fuck you and your crew
You think of drive by's, nigga I will drive through
You and your crew, you fuck around your girl too
The bitch is scandalous
She's fuckin' me and duckin' you
So fuck unbeatable, dope is what ya need to call it
If rap was liquor, I'd be a fuckin' alcholic
This ain't a threat
Just showin' em how dope it gets
When suckaz sweat
It's time to rock the roof, let's jet
I go for broke
Cause like I said the rhymes are dope
You're on the ropes, cause mutha fucka I'm no joke
It's like I'm brain-locked, when I hit the tempo
Kick the intro, then it's time to get loc'd
Ya got beef g
Step up 'fore it get swoll up
It's like a hold up
Drop 'em or get rolled up
I give a fuck
It's time to set the record straight
What more can I say?

Alright alright man, peace man
Just wanna send a shout out to all my homeboys in
The J town, my DJ Clark Gable
Everybody else y'all know you down with the
Drank avenue posse, don't stop

Ayo peace to my homie Treach, Latifah
The whole flavor unit posse
My girl Yo-Yo, the whole Lench Mob posse
Crazy shout outs to Ice Cube, Shock G, Money B
Peace to the jungle
Peace to my crew
Peace to my homies
We out



* Poems written by Shakur as ~ interpreted by other artists

What's in ya hand nigga, y'all listenin'
Do you understand nigga revolution, what's ya plan nigga {*gunshot*}
Since my transition I've been misquoted, disrespected, turnin' over in my grave
Watchin' y'all behave as if I should be proud or something
The I hear you speak my name like I had a devine strides or something
But relgions are seldom followed and all those sould back slide easy
My life is tarnished so the whole world sees me as a menace
But I implement that hate for me with love for y'all
I look from above for y'all but I can't find my soldiers
Who's holdin' the weight of the world on they shoulders since I left
Who caught my last breath as I exhaled
Derailed from the tracks, who's ridin'
Make sure they don't destroy the art form
If they can stop me they can stop thirty more emcees before they even born
So I sacrifice the longevity in life
To make sure you got the message the way you needed it
Existence turns into a lesson to be taught
Told, confessed, to be heard and heeded this
Kids walkin' these dirty roads and it's your job to pave it
You see niggas dyin' cuz of what you sayin'
Don't matter if you ain't kill 'em
If you ain't do shit to save 'em you in the way nigga
Save the day nigga or stopy playin' with 'em
I been yellin' and screamin' from my grave for ten years now
But y'all don't hear me though
Which one of you niggas is gonna step up and say, Pac I got you
GOD DAMN IT WHO SHOT YOU!?



Just when I thought I'd seen it all
our paths crossed and met
and I Knew from the First glance
that u would be hard 2 4get
your eyes attracted me First
but you reeked of sultry confidence
I couldn't wait 2 touch lips
and kiss with my Heart's intentions
when we did it was what I expected
and 4 that moment we erased the tension
of the awkwardness of First Date Jitters
and the initial Blind Date First impressions
we kissed again and I felt the passion
and this was CUPID's blessing



So mandatory my elevation my lyrics like orientation
So you can be more familiar with the nigga you facing
We must be patient nothing better than communication
Known to damage and highly flamable like gas stations
Sorry I left that ass waiting
No more procrastination give up to fate, and get that ass shaking
I'm busting and making motherfuckers panic
Don't take your life for granted put that ass in the dirt
You swear the bitch was planted
My lyrics motivate the planet
It's similar to Rhythm Nation
But thugged out, forgive me Janet
Who's in control I'm activating your souls
You know, the way the games get controlled
Yo, two years ago, a friend of mine
Told me Alize and Cristal blows your mind
Bear witness to the dopest fucking rhyme I wrote
Taking off my coat, clearing my throat

I got my mind made up, come on
Give it, got it good
It's time to ride nigga
Tonight's the night, listen

It's the name game same thang
Everywhere gang bang
Gang bang anywhere Hussein ain't changed man
Dirty South, East to West
Even on chain Gangs
But ain't the way I was trained, somehow remain sane
Can't change the calibers aim so feel my pain man
Love me for how I made it with Pac
But woulda liked me dead in a box, only when he gave me the shots
Yeah right, things just ain't the same for gangsters
Hardcore artists this year to change to wanksters
Me I dont worry I just aim the stainless
Niggas talk so I walk like there's something on my mind
Really ain't nothing on my mind
Just a greedy motherfucker with a fuckin' greedy delivery
The last of the last dying breed balling with me

Walk a mile in my timbs, better yet, take a ride on my rims
So you can see for yourself I was destined to win
I went from baggin' them niggas to serving them fiends
To writing them hits and livin' my dreams
So speak for those who ain't got no voice
We reaching those who ain't got no choice
Listen, criminal mind all the time waiting for Judgement Day
Trying hard nigga looking at the sun don't pay
He added fuel to the fir, I refuse to retire
Coming up, I guess I seen too much, I'm young with an old soul
Young Noble a black rose, E.D.I, Young Cap, Hussein and Kastro
Homie, this ain't nothing but a soldier's story
You bitches, take pictures of our road to glory
I'm a outlaw, ain't no denying that

I got my mind made up, come on
Give it, got it good
It's time to ride nigga
Tonight's the night, listen

I got my mind made up, come on
Get it, get into it, get on
I got my nickel and nine

Animal instinct cannibal handheld
Devour multitudes from rapid fire on
Cowards, listen I'm try'na tell ya
Shell shimmy, a rickashay bouncing like solid
Freshly and start violence
Flee between the end scene
Take a flight like college green
From Kansas to Staten Island
I shot the monkey on my back
And its back in the Guiness Book of World Records
I'm in this
The most hated but most loved menace from here to Venice
The Grinch came to steal your money and your better day
Christmas and your little spinach got eaten
Smoke smoke smoking away all day
Any way that you say it nigga just break me off half
Many years ago
A friend of mine taught me everything about the game
Gave me a nine
So I went straight to the block
Started my grind





Was it the liquor, that makes me act blind, times that I'm with her
Anonymous pictures of other niggas tryin to kiss her
Will I love her or shall I diss her?
I'm sick of this scandalous shit I deal wit
Tryin to paint a perfect picture
My memories of jealousy no longer carefree
Cause so much bullshit your girlfriends keep tellin me
I'm on tour, but now my bedroom's an open door
So it got me thinkin, what am I tryin for?
When I was young I was so very dumb, eager to please
A lil', trick on a mission tryin to get in my P's
Me and my niggas is thug niggas, former known drug dealers
We don't love bitches and believe, they don't love niggas
I gotta blame my attraction
But you became a distraction, a threat to my paper stackin
I thought you changed but now I know
Can't turn a ho into a housewife, baby, and there you go

Baby there you go, actin like a ho
There you there you go, actin like a ho
Baby there you go, actin like a ho
Actin like a ho, actin like a ho
HOE! See the word on the streets you're a
HOE! Just a groupie on a world tour
HOE! Now I found out for myself you're a
HOE! Girl you need to check yourself

These silly bitches got this game twisted
So I don't claim 'em, just bang 'em
Papa raised a player, so player, I play 'em
I got hoes that got more, hoes than me
So how I look, gettin hooked, like I ain't got G?
Truly cutie booty big, but that ain't enough
And the head make me beg, still that just ain't enough
When I don't trust her, the bitch be lyin too much
When she be dyin to fuck me you be buyin her stuff, ho

See girlfriend I know, your whole M.O.'s preoccupied with mostly
Gettin clown after clown, town coast to coast - see
I been tryin to stay away from sluts like you
Got me turned off completely by that sheisty shit that you do
Knew from jump yo' aim, straight through them spandex, don't front
Just name, spots on yo' body for me to touch while you clutch this game
I keep flowin like H20 it ain't nuthin for me to say
Why you keep actin like a ho? But there you go




we could never take the stands which is our true stands to be straight soldiers, straight warriors until hip hop came
when hardcore hip hop came, it was all right for a nigga to say fuck y'all you know we gon' do the fuck we want you know bang bang you know
it was cool for a nigga to do that, other than that
it was never heard of even back in 'em Jim Brown days them niggas was dying at the end of the pictures you know
you would still pride you would still self defense and everybody got the right of self defense

gang bangin' and is there reality popping right now



but it's really like you can't tell a nigga not to do that
because gangs ain't nuttin but tribes
and nigga could not survive out here by his self
so all I say the gang is all black
be down for all black
but shit you can survive out here by yourself, the police ain't nuttin but a gang your national guard is a gang
we learn all that gat shit from the government
we learn all this gun shit from the government you know
they get somebody get a gun the gov get bigger gun
how they gon show us that we can't pick up, so I'm picking up feel me





affect the youngsters making 'em cold hearted
it make it like to whereas they're cold and they heartless you know, I can said it cause I'm heartless
I grew up panther wise you know I'm sayin
and nowadays nigga is like fuck that we gotta survive
I'm screaming black like the next man but when the first shot lick off you know it's all good everybody is all in
cause niggas will kill you quicker than some of these crackers
and then they'll kill you but won't kill some of these crackers which kills me
cause we worse than anything they talked about it


it ain't no stretch for me to be talking the shit I be talking
and they didn't do it screaming let's go move the White— they was screaming African liberation
I'm talking about straight motherfucking G's
and niggas ain't gonna see it till the last second but now this ain't no shit that just happening in this Cent'— you know in this little 10 years
this shit been goin' on for a gang of time, everybody been talking about it
everybody been making song about. it's just for real you know what I'm saying
and we runnin' out of niggas to bury


partying and fucking and all of that type of shit


the good part it just some rappers who took that shit seriously like me
gotta do the same thang but it ain't like that
they screaming they soldiers but they not being soldiers in reality so it's like that what's the bad part
cause some of these kids really believe you you know they really doing that shit
niggas be listening to tapes and knocking cop off and shit you know what I'm sayin and that shit is deep you know what I'm sayin


ain't nuttin wrong with that we say this just for blacks
can't nobody say shit if you sayin we strictly for niggas
can't nobody I am being racist I ain't saying fuck all the crackers
I'm just saying still strictly for my niggas that's all niggas thang
you know and when I'm down mexicans all that wanna be down but if that shit really it's for niggas




but they keep fucking mixing business and pleasure that a nigga can't really be a fan of that
I can't really get in into boss' music if she's hardcore I'm gon' stay hardcore cause I can be down for that
liking this nigga tape
nah I won't buy this bitch tape
I buy this nigga tape
but if she start flip flopping it's a difference
anybody start flip flopping it's a difference


besides that every record that came out that 2Pac did I did high and drunk in the studio while they was making the beat like laying the beat down
and that's why I be soundin' little sloppy
but that's all
it be like fuck it I feel as though niggas drunk and high when they gon' still listen to it you gon' like it or not
and I don't even picture myself to be as like Dre
I just picture myself to be like me
you know if you just signed with Death Row that's gon' be cool too, they gon' be doing my nigga up
it's all cool shit
and I said "hell yeah"
Dre wanna do shit on my music, my next album
I can't really ask him nuttin more than that really in '93


thug life and death row ain't that a bitch


I didn't always think that so I'm not being cocky
I was scared in L.A. to whereas I didn't know nuttin about the game thang
that's the only thing I was scared of
just ignorance not knowing we're not to go
shit if I been there long enough they can smoke me
I really don't care, it's all good, cause I'm in here, I'm in here
Watts, this is Compton there's no place that I won't go
and I feel as though if you got love and if you putting out real shit you can do that
if you kicking that shit from your heart you can go wherever your heart want you to go
if you kicking that shit from the white folks office them white folks gon' have to bring you through the hood
if you they tell you when you be a g
shit they gon' have to tell you when you come to the hood
so it's cool like this, since I got big nuts, my big nuts take me wherever I wanna go and I love that
I like that I like that
I went to Chicago, we was fucking with them gang niggas out there
so it's true niggas can unite you know
Mo hand me that 40 ammunition , 40 millimeter ammunition
I show you how to trick, this a 10 millimeter but I'm loading it with 40 millimeter bullets cause it would work watch






uhm shit the hood
everywhere I been I done live in New York that's where I was raised that's where I came up you know
and I done move to I done live in Harlem, The Bronx just in New York if you know that's two different cultures
then I done live to Baltimore, Marlon that's a whole another type culture that's that the Washington, D.C. scene I didn't live there for 4 years
I didn't live in Oakland for 4 years
I didn't came out to L.A. and here I be
it's like you moving all them ghettos you gon' pick up the slang and all them towns, you gon' pick up one common thing which is dope dealing
and that's what everybody do, everywhere I went that was the common thread you know dope everybody gotta make it you know what I'm saying
no matter how bad we look down on that that the no. 1 career for young black male in America in the real America


I was first and foremost that where I am, it shows
when I'm meeting niggas I like I show it ain't no on that bullshit
cause I got big nuts, I don't care I like them niggas
but now I like "Beat It" I like all the hardcore niggas
any day any car I on anywhere I go
you can check my pockets or anything it's tapes hip hop
and I don't listen -- it ain't got to be the nigga that is platinum
it could be some underground tape I got from Chicago
And if you keep it hardcore that's how it is
but if we always talking about the good time shit
when a nigga having a bad time he gotta turn his deck off
and listen to keep sweating it's not like, shit
hip hop should go through every single emotion that we have you know


when people used to ask me last year what you call your music hardcore I didn't even put it in that position I said it was
soul music cause that's what it is to me
a rapper that you know that you seen and the music fit and the words fit that shit is like you know get you through
because you listen to all the fathers so you be like Ice Cu..


let me show ya
you know rifle bullets go through the vest by they self they could go through the vest right
so by me having hollow point on it
that's for niggas the'd be wearing vest like me
listen for the police
if they ever come get me for some bullshit
I ain't going to jail
not at less I want to, not at less I did some I go but I finna go for nothing you know what I'm saying, so if they come for me
I'm putting a 90 rounder in they *ass*


so really a 90 rounder, with some hollow point and 223's, a glock, a MAC-11, a 9 millimeter, 357
gotta 12 gauge Mossberg over there.. sensational
I'm telling some niggas could pack what I pack in a bags little bullets
talking about 9's 45's all the shit that I got
and bullets how you gon' do all that killing nigga with no bullets
niggas be having 3 bullets in they guns
check you niggas check you niggas that got gun and I betcha
have the niggas got 3 bullets in they guns?
cause they don't go to the range, they don't buy bullets, I gotta bag of bullets and I'm dead serious about this shit and I can shoot
half of these niggas came to shoot it's a range test I did this to set a precedent
now let's see what other niggas is doing all that other shit
now you know I'm talking it like I welcome it
now all I really gotta do is shoot at a live target
but it ain't got that deep yet and I'm not really tryna prove nuttin, so it's all good until then I keep shootin in purpose
so don't get pistol whips



Yeah! ha ha yeah.... thats right!
The F.A's comin striaght from the wild wild west

Look at baby girl born in 19-7-deuce
Pop's on his fix, Mom's stuck on that crazy juice
Went to school, It's all cool but in Junior Hiiigh
Little hooker in the bathroom getting hiiigh
What she doing and what she smoking, nobody knows
Is she addicted or just slipping into melbose
A bad ass broad running with the girl gang
Just got some tat's,Talking all that girl slang
First one to slap, because La vida dont matter
Wip out a cuete watch your brains get splattered
Selling them doves, hanging with thugs and all that
Beating up fools with a baseball bat
Started having sex at only 14
Imagine O.G. wears his clothes all crisp and clean
Got pregnant had a baby in December
She won't see the daddy till next September
Mom's and Pop's gave her the boot
Kicked her out La Casa, Now what Raza
With the money she got, She bought a spot of the block
Started paying the rent by slangin' phat ass coca rocks
Now shes 23 her four kids all alone, and loc'ed out
And plus shes all smoked out,the base face
You could see it in her eyes, it could also tell the tears
Of a life long cries
They was headed for self destruction
Her own kids gotta healp, 'cause they knew she was slippin'
Took the devil away homegiiirl, You was Slippin'

Slipping into Darkness
When you slip you trip and fall
Slipping into Darkness
Ain't no sense to give ya'll no love at all

They say we're slipping, as a whole one race
So, what we gonna choose, Don't want the blues
I turn to the news and what do I see
We got blacks against blacks, browns against browns
Whites against whites,from governments to undergrounds
So, Peep the sound as it bumps through your stereo
Ear to your brain now check out the scenerio
Cali got quakes, Mudslides, and Floods
Hustlas, Pimps, Shot Callers, and Killas
O.G. , Macks, and the big Coca Dealers
We got homeboys who just like kicking it
And Vato's like me who grab the mic and start splitting it
So get closer to the funk and slip into the backseat

CHORUS X2

They wanna band me cause a brothas makin noise a lot
Ill shoot they ass in a sec wit a poisin dart
They got me runnin down the street gettin hotter
Runnin from the cops as i try to clock my Glock
The war won't stop
Thats why they wanna band the music
You ever notcie how the cops can't stand the music
See a black man coolin wit a mexican
We can all have peace, the sun sets again
They try to shove us in the pen
But we clown and we frown every time we hit the top ten
Once again, its your friend outta oakland,hopin
To keep the hip hop clubs open
Now we can lay back and let them close'm
Or we can have beef and show that we control'em
Now ain't nobody gettin paid, its a damn shame
Why gang bang brothas in the same gang?
They say securitys to blame, cause they lettin it off
Brothas come to have fun but they settin it off
One time, make it worse when they sweat us
Send an army of pigs to come get us
Now im runnin outta time and im cool down with the aztecs
This is sorta like soul food




You ready Gov?

Yeah

Don't let them niggas gaffled

Naaw

Hehe, run that shit

Yeah bitches, thanks to get worse
So meet 2Pac and Rich , each to go worse
To let ya know there how it really feel
And that these bitches can't fence with them river peals
I got news for ya baby
Thinking you can fade me
You're running games
And I know what's happening
Punk bitchez you're all about gaffle


Yeah Nigga and jacked by the homicide
Plead the fith, when they begin the mission
A young buck got smoked in a east
And there was rumors me and him had beef, say what?
I jumped back a few steps
I had a car pull me due to The House Reps
Your choke man is on
The piggies got me jacked in these brogues in this telephone
So don't say too much
I'm on the alias
Burst out on a bail tip
Back on the streets with my homies, fittin to kick it
I shoulda told 'em it was the Gov
And with The House Rip I would got much love
And it's an absolute fact

Damn!

Yo Pac, gonna run that shit, yaknowImsayin'?

Yo gov

What's up, man

I never got gaffled like that
In fact I stay strapped
When niggas try to jack
I caps back
The 9 Millimeter on the punk bitch
They don't want no fuck Rich
To these punk police
They don't know me
You're fucking with the Oakland OG
And yo it's true I wasn't raised here
And what about these bitchez on the bozak
Heard him makin' dough, so you know where the hoes at
They all know the nigga'z nuts
Now tell me who's the biggest slut
Come take a sip, and let a nigga fuck
And to these bitches that be swearing they seeing me
Hit the Hennessy
Now she's g ing me
I flip her ass like a flapjack

And I means that shit yo
Yo Rich

Young Niggas out to jack for a livin'
They thought they called the double slippin'
I'm right and tight on Thanksgiving
I'm in my set to drop your cutlass on GOLDS
Horns with a white topand
I watch them busterz fucking use it
Since I'm to the head I guess they that think that they can use me
But let me tell you what's real there
I stay strapped with my gap even when I'm in a fil mo
I'm trying to get my eats on
It's Thanksgiving and my cousin said he had a fat feast on
I'm picking seeds out my back dope
I got some broke-ass-niggas trying to jack me from my gold ...
I'm going out to fund what
Sideways to the next life
Nigga on the one way
And going in the wrong direction
But it won't even that deep
I got ghost on the marks and a frisco pd
5 Niggas in the L.T.D. trying to jack
Straight salad? for '92

I never got gaffled by a hoe
Since I'm the one so close
I'm riding bitches like bows
They govern me yet
That I move on a bitch real quick
So young hoes peep this
Bitches like you get steam row, mucked up
Beat down and slapped with the mobile phone
Straight dick cause I'm short on the bubble gum
Young knuckle head bitch if you troublesome
Trying to put a nigga head on the chopping block
Telling me to come to get the cuts, say what?
I had to take this from yo, yo
Bitch no you can play with the yoyo
Trying to send a nigga out to get hisself a nickname
He getting slapped with the big thang
I'm the G to the O to the V
The cock was cool but now the game ain't that deep
And this how I'ma end the track
I never got gaffled like that

Yeah, send this out to my partner Young D
Couldn't be able to make this thang
What's up B-Baby?
What's up lou
I'm in a hoe for '92
Big Gov's stompin
That's it....




World wide better understand us
We comin' with thugs from LA to Atlanta
Put ya hands up
Nuttin but love from all sides for my thug clique
Outlaw riders them haters ain't touchin' this
Hittin' them up in two double O 2
I got dank, drank, bang, what you wanna do?
Move out the way you see us comin' through
It ain't game it's true, we about to act a fool
You know the history
All out, ball out picture me
Ballin' and holding all grands for the victory
E.D.I. Mean you know the name don't remember me
Since it's not sense world wide


Known for doin' scandalous deeds, no handlin' me
And nah, it ain't the drugs, it's the straight thug nigga in me
I swoop down and cause havoc
My rappin' delivery is automatic, lettin' niggas have it
I've been labeled as a thug nigga
Since they don't sell my shit to white folks
Ship it to the drug dealers
And catch a, catch a nigga world wide
A fuckin' mob figure West coast who-ride
When we rob niggas money made my squad bigger
But we ain't sell our souls
Bustin' on my enemies, murder my foes
At my shows I'm a nut, lights camera time for action
Now get to clappin' to my cuts


It's so hard on me, girl pardon me
I got the same spirit Pac had in him in me
When I mob on the dancefloor, I'm humpin' on floor
It's world wide mob thang and that's for sure
Got money in my pocket now drivin' in a rocket now
Never hear me rap about ice, I keep it underground
O-U-T,-L-A-W-Z for sheeze
"Y'all tryna start the East West beef again?" Girl, please
Get your money young soldier, time steady wastin'
I been around the world before I mean Jamaica
TO, BO, Bahamas plus Cuba


I be the Young N-O, to the B-L-E
Last name O-U-T-L-A-W-Z
And I'm still dirty dirt reppin' Outlaw records
Get your dough up, dog, get your flow up
'Pac and Yak live on, don't be surprised if they show up
At ya front door with a loaded "OH NO!"
Young Noble hit the block, what's poppin' homie?
You can hate but you know Pac watchin' homie
So get some love up, we stay thuggin' it up
Little homie, is you thuggin' or what?
Throw yo dubs up, put 'em real high
East, West, dirty South, North side, Outlaw pride




Ain't nothing but another calculated scheme/
To get us locked up shot up back in chains/
To deny us of the future rob our names/
Kept my history a mystery but now I see/
The American Dream wasn't meant for me/
Cause lady liberty is a hypocrite she lied to me/
Promised me freedom, education, equality/
Never gave me nothing but slavery/
And now look at how dangerous you made me/
Calling me a mad man cause I'm strong and bold/
With this dump full of knowledge of the lies you told/
Promise me emancipation in this new nation/
All you ever gave my people was starvation/
Fathers of this country never cared for me/
They kept my ancestors shackled up in slavery/
And Uncle Sam never did a damn thing for me/
Except lie about the facts in my history/
So now I'm sitting hear mad cause I'm unemployed/
But the government's glad cause they enjoyed/
When my people are down so they can screw us around/
Time to change the government now panther power//


Go toe to toe with a panther and you just can't win/
Self proclaimed best suppressed the rest/
The rich get richer and the poor take less/
The American Dream was an American nightmare/
You kept my people down and refuse to fight fair/
The Ku Klux Klan tried to keep us out/
Besides drew they know no blacks allowed/
With intimidation and segregation was a way for our freedom/
But now we’re impatient/
Freedom, equality, then I'll yell out/
"Don't you ever be ashamed of what you are/
It's ya panther power that makes you a star”/
Panther power//


Hoping I was set free chains never put on me/
Wanted to be more than just free/
Had to know the true facts about my history/
I couldn't settle for being a statistic/
Couldn't survive in this capitalistic/
Government cause it was meant to hold us back/
Using ignorance, drugs, and sneak attack/
In my community think of a unity/
But when I charged them, tried to claim immunity/
I strike America like a case of heart disease/
Panther power is running through my arteries/
Try to stop me oh boy you'll be clawed to death/
Cause I'll be fighting for my freedom with my dying breath/
Do you remember that is what I'm asking you?/
You think you're living free don't make me laugh at you/
Open your eyes realize you've been locked in chains/
Said you wasn't civilized and stole your name/
Cause some time has passed seem to all forget/
There is no liberty for you and me we ain't free yet/
Panther power//



Shit, tired of gettin' shot at
Tired of gettin' chased by the police and arrested
Niggas need a spot where we can kick it
A spot where we belong, that's just for us
Niggas ain't gotta get all dressed up and be Hollywood
Y'knahmean? Where do niggas go when we die?
Ain't no heaven for a thug nigga
That's why we go to thug mansion
That's the only place where thugs get in free
And you gotta be a G, at thug mansion

Born thuggin'
Heartless and mean, muggin at sixteen
On the scene watchin' fiends buggin
Kickin up dust with the older G's
Soakin up the game that was told to me
I ain't never touched a gat that I couldn't shoot
I learned not to trust the bitch from the prostitutes
Taught lessons, a young nigga askin' questions
While other suckers was guessin', I was gangsta sexin'
Elementary wasn't meant for me, can't regret it
I'm headed for the penitentiary and cuttin' classing
I'm buckin blastin, straight mashin
Mobbin through the overpass laughin
While these other motherfuckers try to figure out, no doubt
They jealous of a nigga's clout, tell me Lord
Can ya feel me? I keep my finger on the trigger
Cause some nigga tried to kill me
And mama raised a hellraiser, everyday gettin paid
Police on my pager, straight stressin
A fugitive my occupation is under question
Wanted for investigation, and even though
I'm marked for death, I'mma spark til I lose my breath
Motherfuckers, every time I see the paper
I see my picture, when a nigga's gettin richer
They come to get ya, it's like a motherfuckin trap
And they wonder why it's hard bein black
Dear Lord can ya feel me, gettin major, unhh

Dear Lord can ya hear me, it's just me
A young nigga tryin to make it on these rough streets
I'm on my knees beggin please come and SAVE ME
THE WHOLE WORLD done made a nigga crazy!
I got my three-five-seven can't control it
Screamin die motherfucker and he's loaded
Everybody run for cover, aww shit
Thug Life motherfucker, duck quick
Now am I wrong if I am don't worry me
Cause do or die gettin high till they bury me
Dear Lord if ya hear me, tell me why
Little girl like LaTasha, had to die
She never got to see the bullet, just heard the shot
Her little body couldn't take it, it shook and dropped
And when I saw it on the news how she bucked the girl, killed Latasha
Now I'm screamin fuck the world, in the end
It's my friends, that flip-flop
Lip-locked on my dick when my shit drop
Thug Life motherfucker, I lick shots
Every nigga on my block dropped two cops
Dear Lord can ya hear me, when I die
Let a nigga be strapped, fucked up, and high
With my hands on the trigger, thug nigga
Stressin' like a motherfuckin' drug dealer
And even in the darkest nights, I'm a thug for Life
I got the heart to fight now
Mama raised a hellraiser why cry
That's just life in the ghetto, do or die



When thugs cry
God, forgive us thugs
This go to my nigga Kato
My nigga Mental
When thugs cry
From all your homeboys
Wild ass place, know what I mean
The world ain't ready for us homie, the world ain't ready

Born thuggin', and lovin' the way I came up
Big money clutchin', bustin' while evadin' cocaine busts
My pulse rushin', semi clutchin' into insanity
They shot at my cousin, now we bustin' at they whole family
The coppers wanna see me buried, I ain't worried
I got a line on the D.A. ‘cause I'm fuckin' his secretary
I black out and start cussin', bust 'em and touch 'em all
They panic, and bitches duckin', I rush 'em and fuck 'em all
I'll probably be an old man before I understand
Why I have to live my life with pistols close at hand
Kidnapped my homie's sister, cut her face up bad
They even raped her, so we blazed they pad
Automatic shots rang out, on every block
They puttin' hits out on politicians, even cops
I ain't lyin', they got me sleepin' with my infrared beams
And in my dreams I hear motherfuckers screamin'
What is the meanin' when thugs cry?

Battle scars and closed caskets are multiplied
Motherfuckers die, don't ask why
When thugs cry, we don't shed tears, we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry!
Battle scars and closed caskets are multiplied
Motherfuckers die, don't ask why
When thugs cry, we don't shed tears, we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry!

Maybe my addiction to friction got me buggin'
Where is the love?, never quit my ambition to thug
Ain't shed a tear since the old school years of elementary
Niggas I used to love, enclosed in Penitentiaries
But still, homie, keep it real, how does it feel
To lose your life, over something that you did as a kid?
You all alone, no communication, block on the phone
Don't get along with your pop, and plus your moms is gone
Where did we go wrong? I put my soul in the song
To help us grow in time, but now our minds are gone
We went from brothers and sisters to niggas and bitches
We went from welfare livin' to worldwide riches
But somethin' changed in this dirty game, everything's strange
Lost all my homies over cocaine, mayne
See, they ask me if I shed a tear, I ain't lie
See, you gotta get high or die, ‘cause even thugs cry

Battle scars and closed caskets are multiplied
Motherfuckers die, don't ask why
When thugs cry, we don't shed tears, we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry!
Battle scars and closed caskets are multiplied
Motherfuckers die, don't ask why
When thugs cry, we don't shed tears, we shed blood
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry!

Paranoid bitches, illegal adventures
Bustin' motherfuckers with uppercuts, I leave 'em with dentures
‘Cause in my criminal mind, nobody violates the Don
I write your name wit' a piece of paper, now your family's gone
Why perpetrate like you can handle my team?
So merciless in my attack I take command of your dreams
Leavin' motherfuckers drownin' in they own blood
Clownin', takin' pictures later
Laugh 'bout them punk bitches that turned snitches
Regulate my area, the terror I represent
Makin' your people disappear, you wonderin' where they went
Am I cold, or is it just I sold my soul?
Addicted to these streets, never find true peace I'm told
Come take my body, God, don't let me suffer any longer!
Smoke a pound of marijuana, so I know it ain't long
Where is the end to all my misery, is there a close?
I suppose that's why I murder my foes; when thugs cry

I'm makin' all you motherfuckers die
When thugs cry
Gotta get high or die
When thugs cry
I'm makin' all you motherfuckers die
When thugs cry
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry

This'll be the the eulogy for every thug nigga
That ever put it down in this  motherfucker
Rest in piece my nigga
God bless the dead, fuck the feds
When thugs cry!
I send this out to all my dead homeboys
All the niggas that put it down
May they rest in peace now
All the niggas that watch me from heaven to hell
Hahaha
When thugs cry!
And most definitely, most importantly
Most truly, most dearest
I put this down for Mu grandmother
Rest in peace
God take you, let the angels let you fly
We'll be down here riding' for you, no doubt
I got that nigga
Do you still wanna be a thug?
When thugs cry

Ayy Nas, remember that shit you said?
I don't know what magazine you said it in
Some shit about how it wasn't nobody saying thugs until whoever, whoever, whatever
Nigga you better really go to the record store
Go check out some of the albums we've been putting out motherfucker
We've been spitting this thug shit for a while now
And I know you've been listening cuz you've been biting this shit
So, uh recognize and realize before your ass get rolled on
When thugs cry



I remember when you were lost
and your soul was in the wind
It was at this awkward moment
that you and I become friends
But then your soul was found
and you discovered celibacy
But with this you forgot about me
and our bond was a memory
And now I seyou u felt it
that bond we made before
I pray to God it stands
and severs never more



Yeah Nigga!
I like girls
They like me
Want you to be the one
And my only
I want to be faithful
But I can't keep my hands out the cookie jar

My hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my hands out the cookie jar

Now I could make miracles with pimp hoes
It's instrumental, waiting for the nymphos, that's the intro
Shoot when you rush me
Walked up and touched me
Why do you want to fuck me?
Just cause I'm paid in the worst way? True!
Looking kind of good in your birthday suit
I wonder if you're wild and you act shy?
Do you like to be on top or the back side?
Watch me while you lick your lips, shake your hips
Goddamn, I love that shit!
Yo, let's stop faking and be real now
I got a room and a hard-on. Still down?
Met you standing at a bar full of black dudes
Said you wanna see my scars and my tattoos
When we head for my hideout, act right
Boss player when I ride out, that's right
What's ya phone number?

I like girls
They like me
They look so cute in their 7 Jeans
Want you to be the one
And my only
I want to be faithful
But I can't keep my hands out the cookie jar

My hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my hands out the cookie jar

I got a thing for Milano biscotti Italianos
And I'll never turn down some Oreos if you got them
Butter pecan Puerto Rican
Or them oatmeal raisin Asians
Hazelnut Brazilians, macadamia Caucasians
Double Stuf or Thin Mint
It don't matter, you gettin' it
'Cuz I got a sweet tooth
That'll never come loose
And the fact of the matter is

I like girls
They like me
They look so cute in their 7 Jeans
Want you to be the one
And my only
I want to be faithful
But I can't keep my hands out the cookie jar

My hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my hands out the cookie jar

I'm a monster for these cookies
I'm a beast for they're treats
I'm an animal for they're crackers
Head to feet, they're so damn sweet
Can't keep my hands, my hands, my hands out the cookie jar



I mean what?
People going crazy over this?
It don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Now I been called crazy, to fade me it's not possible
I give a fuck, what you thought, or who you brought witchu?
A Bad Boy killer, Biggie annihilator
They wonderin' why he breathin', but bitches is dyin' later
Better laugh now, then cry when I come to get you
I hit you with two Glocks, and leave you with scar tissue
On some loco shit, my pistol smoke yo' shit
Let's go for dolo bitch, and watch me flow yo' shit
Mr., Makaveli movin' pieces like telekinesis
It's like a chess game, let's play wit' real pieces
Shots rang and niggas brains was spilled
Another Bad Boy affiliator nigga was killed
I hit the funeral and busted his folks
And leave the scene like a shadow in a blaze of smoke
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Shit, still grindin for the chips
I come from the clear but you can find him in the bricks
Me, I was the diamond in the sticks
And him, he hatin' and still whinin' 'cuz I'm grindin' with his bitch
Out shinin' with the sixth, I'ma blind him with the fifth
He still sellin' nicks, what he tryin' to throw a disc?
I promise you'll be lyin' on your strip
'Cuz copyin' my style, whippin' any 9 you can get
No crime on the strip, just dimes of the pit
No gimmicks to my music, you be lyin' when you spit
Outta line you get gripped, I'ma find you a ditch
Right next to your OG, do your time with a snitch
And I tell 'em all the time you a bitch
A real life pussy, hit the strip, go and find you a dick
Man this nigga outta line who is this?
I'm tempted to put his mind on his kicks
Let the 9 do the trick, yeah
Don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'
Don't stop, don't stop, don't stop, keep goin'
It don't stop, keep goin'



Big Lock!

What The fuck iz up wit ya my Homie!
I Know It took me awhile 2 Reach back
2 U but I'm sure U know how hectic
Timez have Become lately, but just recognize
The fact that not a day passes that I
Don't reminisse about that spot & the
True & Fakez I came across. Az 4 me
My record sold 5 Million so I love it like that
I'm Doing a record now called ONE NATION
Its a group album with me, greg nice, Buckshot
Smiff & wesson, outkast, the outlaws, Scarface, & E40
It'll be out in the late Summer. What Tapez
U need? I'll try 2 get some new material
2 U when i can. Stay on point, playa. Keep
The faith, Shit gets better Don't even Sweat
The Bitch made Niggas that try 2 Playa Hate
Me becuz thy can't C me. Tell my Real
Doggz my real true Niggas "One Love"
Stay Alive! I got that gardener job
Waiting 4 U and the benefitz R rerfect so
When U get here I'm witcha! Let a Nigga
Know what U Need!

THE WORLD IS OURZ

WESTSIDE IV LIFE

2PAC



What'z Ya Phone #
2Pac
The greatest ode to phone sex ever written read more »
What's your phone number?

Now, I could make miracles to tempos
It's instrumental, waiting for the nymphos; that's the intro
Shook when you rush me, walked up and touched me
Why? Do you want to fuck me?
Just ‘cause I'm paid in the worst way? True!
Lookin' kinda good in your birthday suit
I wonder if you're wild and you act shy
Do you like to be on top or the back side?
Watch me while you lick your lips
Shake your hips, goddamn, I love that shit
Yo, let's stop fakin', be real now
I got a room and a hard-on; still down?
Met you standing at a bar full of black dudes
Said you wanna see my scars and my tattoos
When we head for my hideout, act right
Boss player when I ride out, that's right
What's ya phone number?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

Oh shit, baby is a dime piece, more than just fine
She's personally blessed from the gods
If I seen her right now, she could get me hard
Didn't want to talk to me 'til she see my car
Never had sex with a rich rap star
'Til I got her in the back of my homeboy's car
Tell me, why do we live this way?
Money over bitches, let me hear you say
What's your phone number?
Are you alone? Got a pocket full of rubbers, let's bone!
Time for your girlfriend to take you home
I had fun, but baby, gotta leave me alone
Picture in my rhyme
Take time to rewind these words I say
If you open your mind bet in a minute you'll find
It's time let the Outlawz play
What's ya phone number?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

If you really wanna fuck with me, I'm ready
Baby, let me give you a call
How long will it take to break you off?

‘Cause a motherfucker hop that shit like I got hydraulics
Fixed in me, you feel me? I be hittin' switches, baby
Heh, get some pussy, hah, hah



That's right.. Rest in peace to all the motherfuckers that past away
Makaveli in this.. Thats how you do that shit..

They got a nigga
Shedding tears, reminiscing on my past fears
Cause shit was hectic for me last year
It appears that I've been marked for death, my heartless breath
The underlying cause of my arrest, my life is stressed
And no rest forever weary, my eyes stay teary
For all the brothers that are buried in the cemetery
Shit is scary, how black on black crime legendary
But at times unnecessary, I'm getting worried
Teardrops and closed caskets, the three strikes law is drastic
And certain death for us ghetto bastards
What can we do when we're arrested, but open fire
Life in the pen ain't for me, cause I'd rather die
But don't cry through your despair
I wonder if the Lord still cares, for us niggas on welfare
And who cares if we survive

They tell us that we hopeless and hell bound
This for the brothers in penetentiaries jailed down
Homies in every city definition of power
Its a thugs wrath. Can you feel me now?

Now shit's constantly hot, on my block, it never fails to be gunshots
Can't explain a mother's pain, when her son drops
Black males living Hell when will we prevail
Fearing jail but crack sales got me living well
And the system's suicidal with this Thug's Life
Staying strapped forever trapped in this drug life
God help me, cause I'm starving, can't get a job
So I resort to violent robberies, my life is hard
Can't sleep cause all the dirt make my heart hurt
Put in work and shed tears for my dead peers
Mislead from childhood where I went astray
Till this day I still pray for a better way
Can't help but feel hopeless and heartbroke
From the start I felt the racism cause I'm dark
Couldn't quit the bullshit make me represent
Hit the bar and played the star, everywhere I went

They tell us that we hopeless and hell bound
This fo the brothers in penetentiaries jailed down
Homies in every city definition of power
Its a thugs wrath. Can you feel me now?

And I can't help but wonder why, so many young kids had to die
Caught strays from AK's and the driveby
Swollen pride and homicide, don't coincide
Brothers cry for broken lives, mama come inside
Cause our block is filled with danger
Used to be a close knit community but now we're all cold strangers
Time changes us to stone them crack pipes
All up and down the block exterminating black life
But I can't blame the dealers
My mama's welfare check has brought the next man chrome wheels
Shit's real, I know ya feel, my tragedy
A single mother with a problem child, daddy free
Hanging out picking up game, sipping cheap liquor
Gamin the hoochies hoping I can get to sleep with her
It's a man's world, staying strapped
Fantasies of a nigga living phat, but held back

They tell us that we hopeless and hell bound
This fo the brothers in penetentiaries jailed down
Homies in every city definition of power
Its a thugs wrath. Can you feel me now?



Yeah, close four! Comin' down!
Close five! Comin' down!

My homeboys in Clinton and Rikers Island
All the penitentiaries
Mumia, Mutulu, Geronimo, Sekon
All the political prisoners
I'm with you

Yeah
You're listenin to the sounds of one, thuuug
You're listenin to the sounds of..

I wake up early in the mornin, mindstate so military
Suckers fantasizin pictures of a young brother buried
Was it me, the weed, or this life I lead
If daytime is for suckers then tonight we breathe
Out for all that, knowin that this world bring drawbacks
Look how they shiver once I deliver these raw raps
Meet me at the cemetery dressed in black
Tonight we, honor the dead, those who won't be back
So if I die, do the same for me, shed no tears
An Outlaw, thug livin in this game for years
Why worry, hope to God, get me high when I'm buried
Knowin deep inside only a few love me
Come rush me to the gates of heaven, let me picture for a while
How I lived for my days as a child; I wonder now
How do we outlast, always get cash
Stay strong if we all mash, hold ya head

Livin fast, too fast..

Hahaha, yo
These felonies be like prophecies beggin me to stop
Cause these lawyers gettin money everytime they knock us
Snatchin pockets lyrically, suckers flea when they notice
Switched my name to Makaveli, half the rap game ghost
Exposed foes with my hocus pocus flows they froze
Now suckers idolize my, chosen blows
And mo' money mean litigatin, mo' playa hatin
Got a cell at the pen for me waitin – is this my fate?
Miss me with that misdemeanor thinkin, me fall back?
Never that, too much tequila drinkin, we all that
Make them understand me? hell nah, this ain't my posse
Everyone with me is family, cause everybody's got me
Watch me paint a perfect vision, this life we livin
Got us all meetin up in prison..
Last week I got a letter from my road dog, written in blood
Saying, "Please show a playa love" - hold ya head!
Hold it


The weed got me tweakin in my mind, I'm thinkin..
God bless the child that can hold his own
Indeed, enemies bleed when I hold my chrome
Let these words be the last to my unborn seeds
Hope to raise my young nation in this world of greed
Currency means nothin if you still ain't free
Money breeds jealousy, take the game from me
I hope for better days, trouble comes naturally
Running from authorities 'til they capture me
And my, aim is to spread mo' smiles than tears
Utilalize lessons learned from my childhood years
Maybe Mama had it all right, rest yo' head
Straight converstions all night, bless the dead
To the homies that I used to have that no longer roll
Catch a brother at the crossroads..
Plus nobody knows my soul, watchin time pass
Through the glass of my drop-top Rolls, hold ya head!


No matter how hard it get, feel me
Get the weed, drink a drink, read a book
Watch the stars, get some pussy, whatever..






If I could recollect before my hood days
I'd sit, reminisce thinking a bliss of the good days
I stop and stare at the younger
My heart goes to 'em
They tested it was stress that they under
We never really went through that
Cause we was born B.C. - you and me before crack
And nowadays things changed
Everyone's ashamed of the youth cause the truth look - strange
And for me it's reversed
We left them a world that's cursed and it - hurts
Cause any day they'll push the button
And all condemned like Malcolm X and Bobby Hutton died for nothing
Don't it make em get teary
The world looks dreary
But when you wipe your eyes see it clearly
There is no need for you to fear me
If you take the time to hear me
Maybe you can learn to cheer me
It ain't about black or white cause we're human
I hope we'll see the light before it's ruined
My Ghetto Gospel

Who ever said that this trouble would stop today
A lot of niggas get locked away
Teenage women growing up with AID's
Cause that's the life when your living in the
Ghetto
Ohh eating in the
Ghetto
Ohh sleeping in the
Ghetto
That's the life when your living in the
Ghetto
Ohh eating in the
Ghetto
Ohh sleeping in the
Ghetto


Tell me do you see that old lady ain't it sad
Living out of bags but she's glad for the little things she has
And over there there's a lady, crack got her crazy, well guess who's giving birth to a baby
I don't trip to let her fade me
From outta the frying pan we jump into another form of slavery
And even now I get discouraged
I wonder if they take it all back will I still keep the courage?
I refuse to be a role model
I say ghost take control drink out my own bottles
I make mistakes but learn from everyone
And when it's said and done
I bet this brother will be a better one
If I upset you, don't stress, never forget that God isn't finished with me yet
I feel his hand on my brains when I write rhymes I go blind and let the Lord do his thing
But am I less holy?
Cause I choose to puff a blunt, and drink a beer with my homies
Before we find world peace
We gotta find peace there's a war in the streets
My Ghetto Gospel

Who ever said that this trouble would stop today
A lot of niggas get locked away
Teenage women growing up with AID's
Cause that's the life when your living in the
Ghetto
Ohh eating in the
Ghetto
Ohh sleeping in the
Ghetto
That's the life when your living in the
Ghetto
Ohh eating in the
Ghetto
Ohh sleeping in the
Ghetto
Gun shot every night in the
Ghetto
Crooked cops on side in the
Ghetto
Everyday is fight in the
Ghetto
Oh oh oh oh oh
Ghetto
Got kids to feed in the
Ghetto
Sellin coke and weed in the
Ghetto
Everyday somebody bleed in the
Ghetto
Oh oh oh oh oh
Ghetto



Perhaps I was addicted to the dark side
Somewhere inside my childhood witnessed my heart die
And even though we both came from the same places
The money and the fame made us all change places
How could it be? Through the misery that came to pass
The hard times make a true friend afraid to ask
For currency, but you could run to me when you need
And I'll never leave, honestly
Someone to believe in, as you can see
It's a small thing to a true, what could I do?
Real homies help you get through
And come to knew he'd do the same thing if he could
‘Cause in the hood, true homies make you feel good
And half the times we be actin' up, call the cops
Bringin' a cease to the peace that was on my block
It never stops, when my mama ask me will I change?
I tell her "Yeah," but it's clear
I'll always be the same; until the end of time

What's in me, that's got me actin' so crazy?
Don't be afraid, keep hopin' for a better day

Please, Lord, forgive me for my life of sin
My hard stare seem to scare all my sister's kids
So you know, I don't hang around the house much
This all night money making got me outta touch
Shit, ain't flashed a smile in a long while
An unexpected birth worst of the ghetto childs
My attitude got me walking solo
Ride out alone in my lo-lo
Watching the whole world move in slow-mo
For quiet times, disappear, listen to the ocean
Smoking 'Ports, think my thoughts, then it's back to coastin'
Who can I trust in this cold world?
My phony homie had a baby by my old girl
But I ain't trippin', I'm a player, I ain't sweatin' him
I sexed his sister, had her mumble like a Mexican
His next of kin, no remorse, it was meant to happen
Besides rappin' the only thing I did good was scrappin'
Until the end of time…

What's in me, that's got me actin' so crazy?
Don't be afraid, keep hopin' for a better day

What's in me, that's got me actin' so crazy?
Don't be afraid, keep hopin' for a better day

Now who's to say if I was right or wrong
To live my life as an outlaw all along?
Remain strong in this planet full of player haters
They conversate, but Death Row full of demonstrators
And in the end, drinking Hennessy
Made all my enemies envy me
So cold when I flow, eliminatin' easily
Falls to they knees, they plead for they right to breathe
When I conceive closer to achieve
In times of danger, don't freeze, time to be a G
Follow my lead, I'll supply everything you need
An ounce of game and the training to make a G
Remember me as an outcast Outlaw
Another album out, that's what I'm about, more
Getting raw 'til the day I see my casket, buried as a G
While the whole world remembers me, until the end of time

What's in me, that's got me actin' so crazy?
Don't be afraid, keep hopin' for a better day

2Pac



There's, never a good day
Cause in my hood they
Let they AK's pump strays where the kids play
My homies dyin' 'fore they get to see they birthdays
These is the worst days
Sometimes it hurts to pray
And every Halloween
Check out the murder scene
Can't help but duplicate the violence seen on the screen
And even God turned his back on the ghetto youth
I know that ain't the truth
Sometimes I look for proof
I wonder if heaven got a ghetto
And if it does
Does it matter if you blood or you cuz
Remember how it was
And facin me now, what do I do?
These thangs that a Thug goes through
And still I rise
So keep ya head up
And even though I had
Pain in my heart, I was hopeless from the start
So keep ya head up
And make ya mind strong
It's a struggle every day...
Holla if ya hear me!!

Cops and sirens,niggas open fire
Buncha thug life niggas on the rise
Until I die
Ask me why I'm a Boss Player gettin high
And when I'm rollin by
Niggas Can't C Me!!

Give me my money in stacks
And lace my bitches with 9 figures
Real niggas fingers on nickle plated 9 triggas
Must see my enemies defeated
I catch them
While they coughed up and weeded
Open fire
Now them niggas bleedin'
See me in flesh
And test
And get your chest blown
Straight out the west, don't get blown
My adversaries cry like ho's
Open and shut like doors
Is you a friend or foe ?
Nigga you ain't know ?
They got me stressed out on Death Row
I've seen money
But baby I got to gets mo'
You scream and go
'2Pac'
And I ain't stopping'
Till I'm well paid
Bails paid
Now nigga, look what hell made
Niggas know me, player
I gotta stay true
Don't be a dumb motherfucker
Because it's crazy after dark
Where the true Thug niggas see ya heart
Niggas Can't C Me!!


California love.....
Now let me welcome everybody to the wild, wild west
A state that's untouchable like Elliot Ness
The track hits ya eardrum like a slug to ya chest
Pack a vest for your Jimmy in the city of sex
We in that sunshine state where that bomb ass hemp be
The state where ya never find a dance floor empty
And pimps be on a mission for them greens
Lean mean money-makin-machines servin fiends
I been in the game for ten years makin rap tunes
Ever since honeys was wearin sassoon
Now it's '95 and they clock me and watch me
Diamonds shinin lookin like I robbed Liberace
It's all good, from Diego to tha Bay
Your city is tha bomb if your city makin pay
Throw up a finger if ya feel the same way
Dre puttin it down for
Californ-I-a

Shake it shake it baby
Shake it shake it baby
Shake it shake it shake it shake it...
Shake it shake it mama
Shake it Cali...


Out on bail fresh outta jail, California dreamin
Soon as I stepped on the scene, I'm hearin hoochies screamin
Fiendin for money and alcohol
The life of a west side playa where cowards die and it's all ball
Only in Cali where we riot not rally to live and die
Dressed in Locs and khaki suits and ride is what we do
Flossin but have caution we collide with other crews
Famous cause we program worldwide
Let'em recognize from Long Beach to Rosecrans
Bumpin and grindin like a slow jam, it's west side
So you know the row won't bow down to no man
Say what you say
But give me that bomb beat from Dre
Let me serenade the streets of L.A
From Oakland to Sacktown
The Bay Area and back down
Cali is where they put they mack down
Give me love!

But you better know try to play 'cause the game is over
We takin' over

You can't break me, never make me busta soft the beats
This Outlaw style got a brother off the streets
Miss Delores Tucker sue me I won't stop
'Til we get justice for these crooked cops on my block
Time Warner full of sissies
Tell 'em all to miss me
A bunch of hypocrites whistling Dixie
Good riddance cause you never should of touched me
You cowards knew you couldn't take the pressure I'ma make you sorry
Trust me
Tryna sell 4 million copies
If I wasn't spitting it'd be prison or death
This rap game all we got left
So try to comprehend where we coming from
Life as an Outlaw, ain't meant for everyone
So here we come
Recognize how we organize
Strategize now we unified brothers on the rise
And we don't stop

I see you trying on, 'cause we do it better
But you better know try to play 'cause the game is over
We takin' over

I came to get in that ass, Bigg Di-Dogg, push the big hid-ogg
You're hoppin' and poppin', how bout you hop up off my bid-alls
Got dirt on my pid-aws, I broke a few lid-aws
It really don't matter cause I'm only here to spit on
And get on and shit on niggas
Do it to 'em D-O-double, right on nigga
I'm saggin' it, baggin' it, slangin' dubs
You motherfuckas think The Wash is all soap and suds?
What's up cuz?
If you tryin' to get a dub sack page me
The hoes say "D-Loc, you so crazy"
Poppin' that shit don't faze me
I need my chips and the dip, it's like gravy

Now back to the lecture at hand
Perfection is expected and I'm feelin' that demand
Los Ang', broad day gunnin'
That ain't no earthquake it's just Dre comin'
If this shit ain't played, the party ain't bumpin'
If I don't show up, the hoes ain't fuckin'
Just don't stop at stop signs with bullet holes in it
All-Star League, you ridin' benches
I handles my business, fuck fake niggas
I sell game a quarter million a track
Snoop and the Good Doc back with a brand-new sack
Shit's wrong, money gone, I'll blast
Out of town, out of bounds, no pass
Runnin' up, talkin' shit, get smashed


Now I've got task on a nigga's ass
Tell me will they blast me
I think of an alias in case these crooked bitches ask me, now
It's gettin crazy after dark
These narcs be like trying to shut me down but I'm too smart
Now picture me scared of the penitentiary
I've been moving these things since the days of elementary
Now tell me what ya need when ya see me
I'm stacking Gs buying all the things on TV, believe me
I got some killers on my payroll and they know
When it's time to handle business nigga lay low
Although I'm young I'm still coming up
I'm gettin paid pulling razors on niggas when they running up
The first to pull the strap when theres drama
Buster you ain't heard?
I been slicing motherfuckers since I lost my mama
There ain't a cop that can stop me
My posse is cocky and they don't wait until they drop me
I'm loyal to the game


Now picture me scared of the penitentiary
I've been moving these things since the days of elementary
Now tell me what ya need when ya see me
I'm stacking Gs buying all the things on TV, believe me

Until I Die...



Y'all ain't never just tripped and pictured
And just looked at the whole situation
Cause once u look at it
You know

They don't give a fuck about us
They don't give a fuck about us
They don't give a fuck about us
If I choose to ride
Thuggin' till the day I die
Nobody give a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in they children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

Some say niggas is hard headed cause we love to trick
Equipped with game so we bang wit this thuggish shit
I see you trying to hide, Hoping that nobody don't notice
You must always remember you're still a member of the hopeless
See ya black like me, So you snap like me
When these devils try to plot, Trap our young black seeds
Look it, Cops are just as crooked as the niggas they chasin'
Lookin' for role models, Our father figures is bases
Some say they expect Illuminate take my body to sleep
Niggas at the party with they shotties, Just as rowdy as me
Before I flee computer chips, I gotta deal wit brothas flippin'
I don't see no devils bleedin', Only black blood drippin'
We can change, whatcha now say?
Whatever it takes to switch places wit the bustas on top
I'm bustin' shots make the world stop
They don't give a fuck about us

And if I choose to ride
Thuggin' till the day I die
Cause they don't give a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in they children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us
And if I choose to ride
Thuggin' till the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in they children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

It's the morning after and now all the laughter is gone
Time to reflect on what you did cause they saying you wrong
I'm sure you had your reasons dawg, I don't doubt you
See the simple fact of the matter is they don't give a fuck about you
No including yourself, All you want is wealth they perceiving itas greed
So as you loaded up that mack and continue to buck 'em
I was on paper, Thinking they don't give a fuck about us

I'm seeing it clearer
Hating the picture in the mirror
They claim we inferior
So why the fuck these devils fear ya?
I'm watching my nation die, genocide the cause
Expect a blood bath, The aftermath is y'alls
I told ya last album, we need help cause we dying
Give us a chance, help us advance cause we trying
Ignore my whole plea, watching us in disgust
And then they beg when my guns bust
They don't give a fuck about us

And if I choose to ride
Thuggin' till the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in they children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us
And if I choose to ride
Thuggin' till the day I die
Nobody gives a fuck about us
But when I start to rise
A hero in they children's eyes
Now they give a fuck about us

Now all my homies got love for me
Down to catch a slug for me
Guaranteed to bleed deeply
Now that's love, Shit
Nobody else could give a fuck
If I'm tore down, from the floor down
Six-feet deep in the cut
What the fuck done went wrong
How long will I be mourned?
When I'm gone, same song
Ain't gave a fuck all along
And who am I to blame 'em?
Just do or die through the rainin'
Since they don't give a fuck
I don't, feel what I'm saying?

Now thug niggas die but multiply in doubles
Wrapped in plastic, Or closed casket for our troubles
Present times, We busted like bubbles
With the police, This nation's peace sent here to run you
Now look at what this crooked world has come to
I grew up on the other side of perfect, a life of hurtin'
Man I still hustle, so I'm dyin' certain
So I spent your time in poor and working
I see no reason, So I stay ballin' season to season
Why you stuck thinking that they give a fuck?

You tell me my world is in peace, but nigga your lying
Cause half of my niggas, long gone
Buried in the dirt just for trying
Sometimes I think my block is dying, And that it's awful
To wake up to another day, shit ain't change that awful
I wake up sweatin', dreamin', coughin'
Seein' me upside down backwards head twisted
While I'm layin' in the coffin
The shit comes around so often, So tell me something
Before I take it out on the world, and get to dumpin'
Nigga I been so through pain go through the struggle
Doin the same thing you did at my age and that's hustlin'
On the edge of straight bustin'
Well since you don't give a fuck, you frontin'
And I'ma drink my Hennessey like it ain't nothin'

Now if I choose to ride, thuggin' till the day I die
They don't give a fuck about us
While I'm kickin' rhymes, getting to their children's minds
Now they give a fuck about us

They wanna see us die, they kick us every time we try
They don't give a fuck about us
So while I'm getting high, I'm watching as the world goes by
Cause they don't give a fuck about us

Now if I choose to ride, thuggin' till the day I die
They don't give a fuck about us
While I'm kickin' rhymes, getting to their children's minds
Now they give a fuck about us

They wanna see us die, they kick us every time we try
They don't give a fuck about us
So while I'm getting high, I'm watching as the world goes by
Cause they don't give a fuck about us

Get your money nigga get your money!
Rise my nation rise
They don't give a fuck about us...rise
Get your asses on the right path nigga
They don't give a fuck about us
Get your money nigga get your money!



Big Lock!
What the fuck iz up wit ya my homie!
I know it took me awhile 2 reach back
2 u, but I'm sure u know how hectic
Timez have become lately, but just recognize
The fact that not a day passes that that I
Don't reminisce about that spot & the true
& fakez I came across. Az 4 me
My record sold 5 million, so I love it like that
I'm doing a record now called ONE NATION
It's a group album with me, Greg Nice, Buckshot
Smif-n-Wessun, OutKast, The Outlawz, Scarface & E-40
It'll be out in the late summer. What tapez
U need? I'll try 2 get some new material
2 u when I can. Stay on point, playa. Keep
The faith, shit getz better. Don't even sweat
The bitch made niggas that try 2 playa hate
Me becuz they can't c me. Tell my real
Doggz, my real true niggas "One Love"
STAY ALIVE! I got that gardener job
Waiting 4 u and the benefitz r perfect, so
When u get here, I'm witcha! Let a nigga
Know what you need!

The world iz ourz
Westside IV Life
2Pac



Hahhahahha
Get him, shoot that nigga {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Can you feel it, we gon' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Oaktown in the house
Ricky Town in the house
Motherfuckers goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
South Central's in the house
Motherfuckers goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Springfield, Queens in the house
Can ya feel it motherfuckers go {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Thug life, thug life we goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Mack 10 go {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Rated R in the motherfuckin' house look out, look out {​​gun shot}​​
D-Lo smoke 'em {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Sergio uh get down nigga {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Big Syke in the motherfuckin' house go {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Lil' Corey grow strong nigga and go {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Madman in the motherfucker {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Feel me! {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Bay's in this motherfucker {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Madness you Bad Boy huh why enemy I'm comin', I'm comin', I'm comin' ah ah they goin' {​​gun shot}​​
I need a gangsta bitch 'less they kept it go {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Can you feel it? boo yaaaa they go {​​gun shot}​​
Ayo fuck the police we goin' {​​gun shot}​​
In 93 you find 'em dead {​​gun shot}​​ huh
And all my niggas huh in the pen we goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
I said my niggas in the pen we goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
See you when you get out nigga we goin' {​​gun shot}​​ huh
Thug life in the motherfuckin' house, we goin' {​​gun shot}​​
Yeah! nigga, don't you knew



One, two
To a nigga nature, haha..

No need to cry now, go wipe your tears, be a woman
Why you actin' surprised? You saw the bullshit comin'
Fake hair, fake nails, fake eyes too
So why you, bound to fuck wit fake guys too
Ain't nothin' hard about it why you lookin' sad? Shoulda thought about it
Say you learned, I truly doubt it
I guess you got a problem with affection, kinda loose with the love
Gettin' freaky with the thug niggas up in the club
Ask to buy you a drink, you holla Dom Pérignon
Knowin' I'm a cash getter still I remain calm
Let you chill with me; plus you be smilin' 'til the bill miss me
That's what you get for tryin' to dick me
Missed me with that "buy me this, buy me that" syndrome shit
Bitch get a job if you wanna be rich
Gettin' mad cause I cursed and I scream I hate'cha
Introduced you to a nigga nature, feel me?

Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's  nature
Why cry, when he do you that way

I'm probably too nice at first, I let you kiss me where it hurts
Me and you gettin' busy, slingin' dick in the dirt
Met you at a pool party it was cool to kick it
See us, tounge-kissin', you was truly with it
Little ecstacy, Hennesey, mix with me
Picture me pay for pussy when the dick's for free
Hey now, where my niggas at? Tell these hoes
Before I pay; I jerk off, word to Moses
Visions of you sittin' there sweaty and wet
Pointin' to the places that you want me to hit
Give me room all up in the womb, call the cops
Nigga, hittin' walls 'til them bastard drop
Label me Makaveli, thug nigga with pipe
Livin' life like a rock star's Friday night
Make money, get pussy, always keep a pager
Cell phone in the ride to complete my nature now!

Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's  nature
Why cry, when he do you that way

Haha.. started as a seed from the semen; straight outta papa's nuts
Lustin' for creamin' bitches with big butts
Curves make a nigga cry, tits and shit
When I'm locked down beggin' you for porno flicks
Sneak weed in, help a nigga pass the time
Put my name tattoo'd so that ass is mine
Tell everybody; 'Pac put it down for good
A local legend through the whole hood, follow me
I got a gun on me, goin' for none on the run baby
You know a nigga need some, is my son crazy?
Why I cry, when I be thuggin' 'til I die
Picture a nigga in heaven, high off weed I fly
Got me missin' dead homies wishin' phonies would die
Hit the weed and hope it get me high; dear God
Understand my ways, livin' major
Blessed with a thug's heart.. and a real live nigga nature

Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's nature
Why cry, when he do you that way
Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's nature
Why cry, when he do you that way
Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's  nature
Why cry, when he do you that way
Why cry, knowin' that's the nigga's  nature
Why cry, when he do you that way



I feel ya.. baby don’t…
But you can’t, you can’t give up

Baby don’t cry, I hope you got your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up
Baby don’t cry, I hope you got your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up

Now here’s a story ’bout a woman with dreams
So picture perfect at thirteen, an ebony queen
Beneath the surface it was more than just a crooked smile
Nobody knew about her secret so it took a while
I could see a tear fall slow down her black cheek
Sheddin’ quiet tears in the back seat; so when she asked me
“What would you do if it was you?”
Couldn’t answer such a horrible pain to live through
I tried to trade places in the tragedy
I couldn’t picture three crazed niggas grabbin’ me
For just a moment I was trapped in the pain
Lord come and take me
Four niggas violated, they chased and they raped me
Even though it wasn’t me, I could feel the grief
Thinkin’ with your brains blown that would make the pain go
No! You got to find a way to survive
'Cause they win when your soul dies

Baby please don’t cry, you got to keep your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up
Baby don’t cry, you got to keep your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up
Baby don’t cry, I hope you got your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up
Baby don’t cry, I hope you got your head up
Even when the road is hard, never give up
Baby don’t cry



I'm telling you


....































































the pigs they ain't get me no toilet sheets, you know you come there you get that cock shit, it was bloody cot, no nothing
he left me in population for like two hours, in two hours I had everything I needed, niggas gave me two stakes, two





















but I'm telling you some lyrics man















T nah nah







Get up and wash my ass and damn, she was just another One Night Stand
For big dick daddy, 'case you heard
'cuz she was just another One Night Stand, 'cuz she was just another one
Get up and wash my ass and damn, she was just another One Night Stand
For big dick daddy, 'case you heard
'cuz she was just another One Night Stand. 'cuz she was just another one
Get up and wash my ass and damn, she was just another One Night Stand
For big dick daddy, 'case you heard

Remember when you're all alone, my cellular phone
Was turned off, smokin' burners with my dogs, and it's all good baby
Everyone who steal the flow, all y'all some hoes
Shermed out, let's make some mo' money
I'm kinda hungry, it's all good, haters
I don't wanna rock 'em if they study another Bone role
Will they do the run in when their comin', when I'm rollin' in my home
A son of a bitch, I gotta cough, cough in the summer
Love of thug nigga, from my calico, I felt I was losin' my mind
There was some other kind, really wanna smoke the weed, after you swallow me
And try not to follow me, blind, find me 69
Real lit, smokin', the finest vintage wine, talkin' bout time with me
And you wanna to be something, more than just a dime to me

The bitch can cut me, fuck my homies
Be a dyke and spike my Hennessy
Come and pretend she wanna be grinned
They probably, wanna send me to the end of the cliff
Inherit all of my chips and then go spend it with another nigga
Well, in my shit and lickin' my lick, nobody does it better than the Rip
That's the shit, welcome the widow, keeping the pistol grip
Under my pillow, well, when you peep out the window, it's so cold
Get in 'fore the wind blow
No hoes allowed -lowed -lowed. Get in 'fore the wind blow
No hoes allowed, no hoes allowed, no hoes allowed
That bitch can cluck and fuck my homies
Be a dyke and spike my Hennessy
Have babies by one of my enemies, then, then, then
Man the chicks can cut me, fuck my homies
Be a dyke and spike my Hennessy
Have babies by one of my enemies, then, then, then, then, then

I woke up early in the mornin' with my Glock, you're fine, yawnin'
Smellin' like last night's Hen, 'til the crack of dawn we get it on
Then again, nigga reel it down from me, just 'cuz we're T-H-U-Gs
But the money was abundant, start up my family tree
Eager to move, we live and we die in Cleveland
That same week or sell speakers
Bid for insurance, and that ass won't free my people with warrants
Over there, come call us, all this over a hoe
My homeboy has no dough and wants to force it, let me know
What a crazy ass life, play me right, don't play me twice
Damn, I'm a grown man, getting in big fights, It'd be nice to settle down
Yeah right, yeah right, yeah right, yeah right, yeah right, yeah right
Man, a bitch can't cut me
Have babies by one of my enemies
Eventually, you're gonna remember me



I be a hustler til it's over, motherfucker
The motherfuckin' dust kicker, who can you trust?
Do you have the heart to see a nigga, before you bust?
My name is spoken on the tongues of so many foes
Bustin' motherfuckers out the box, I ain't even go!
Now how the hell do you explain, my claim to fame?
From doin' flicks to bustin' tricks out the fuckin' frame
Got these bitches on my jock, niggas on my block
Jealous ass suckers got 'em duckin' from my smokin' Glock
And bustin' niggas asses to stay alive
Skinny ass player watchin' bigger motherfuckers fry
They ask me how I’m livin? Haaah I’m a hustler
Buckin' busters 'til they die

Lord Forgive me
The Hennessy got me not knowin' how to act
I'm fallin' and I can't turn back
Until my death
You walkin' with your head down, scared to look
God bless my soul

They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target
They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target, oh shit!

We got the illest combination of this right here man
Ha-ha, uh man, y'all runnin' out of steam already?
That's all y'all got man?
That's all y'all got man?!

It go one, two, three to the fourth
That nigga P-Double got that shit for y'alls
Peoples to rock to, stirrin' up pots of brew
In hell's kitchen, I chef the impossible
To serve hot plates all across the Unified States
Sit down and sup with the top rap reps
We the streets that's watchin', boy, move diligent
You better walk like a nigga on a tightrope do
Infamous
Might catch me in a burgundy chair, my shirt blockin'
Fresh with my bandanna and Timbs, we outta there
Pushin' to the limit like Montana did
Army bags full of money, bullet proof this
And that too, put some in the roof
Niggas be shootin' from windows, we untouchable
Yea we is rich thugs, that shoot up clubs
Make albums that click more than little drugs

They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target
They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target, oh shit!

Niggas know I ain't the one to sleep on, I'm under pressure
Gotta sleep with my piece, an extra clip beside my dresser
Word to God I've been ready to die since I was born
I don't want no shit but niggas trip and, yo, it's on
Open fire on my adversaries, don't even worry
Better have on a vest aim for the chest and then you buried
It's a man's world, niggas get played, another stray
Hope I live to see another day, hey!
I'm gettin' sweated by these undercovers
Who can I trust, got my mama stressin', thinkin' it's a drug bust
Gotta get paid but all the drama that's attached
We livin' a drug life, THUG LIFE, each day could be my last
Will I blast when it's time to shoot? Don't even ask
That's the consequences when ya livin' fast
Don't turn around I ain't givin' up, cause they don't worry me
Pussy ass bitches better bury me, bury me!

They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict
I'd rather fire on my target
They got me runnin' from the police, nowhere to go
With the lights out, rollin' down a dirt road
But I ain't goin' alive, I'd rather die than be a convict



HA HA HA HA HA
You got St. Ides?
Our friends getting it though
It's it..
St. - Ides

Nobody knows the trouble that brother sees
Mobbing with the homies cause they're true Gs
Count cash and, hands on the Ides cold glass
And yet.. waiting for my homie to pass me
The S-T-Crooked-Ides
Took the sipping out, had to take another
Before I pack a ten for my brother
Thug for life, a G 'til they bury me
Busting, I don't be trusting these tricks
So they done worry me
Now, I'm a well known figure, getting paid
Came a long way from the old days
I gotta get mine, cause in my mind;
Pour some liquor on the curb for my dogs

St. Ides
Right?




Hey Junior Mafia I got something for your mothafuckin’ ass

Fuckin’ lil homies
Everybody duckin’, fuckin’ lil homies
Lil homies
Everybody duckin’, fuckin’ lil homies

Just pay attention, here's a story 'bout my lil' homies
Straight thuggin', lil' bad young motherfuckers, gotta love 'em
You could catch him in his G ride clutchin' his Glock
Screamin', "Outlaw!" bustin' on my enemy's block
Educated on these cold streets
Gettin' money, makin' dummies out the police
Ain't no peace for an adolescent nigga too wild to be a thinker
Bud smokin' 24/7, everyday drinker
Got my diploma, but I never learned shit in school
Mo' money, mo' bitches, mo' murder, fool!
Always the young niggas gettin' in shit
She wouldn't stop to conversate, so you called her a bitch
Bustin' on paper thin motherfuckers
Drinkin' gin before you get to sinnin' on them busters
Emptied his clip, passed by like he didn't know me
Everybody duckin', my fuckin' lil' homies


Lil homies on the rise, niggas gonna die tonight
Lets get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets
Lil homies on the rise, niggas gonna die tonight
Lets get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets

I remember.. when you was just a lil’ G
Flirting with death, playin Russian Roulette, screamin KILL ME!
Hey there young nigga, what you smokin on?
Mad at the world cause you came from a broken home
Love to squad plus your mob is sick
A bunch of adolescent niggas spittin major shit
Tell me, young nigga if ya die let me know
Would your heart feel pain, watchin as your mother cries?
Will all your homies ride?
Or will they all get high, and talk about how you died?
Young niggas on a mission to compete
Gettin G’s, packin heat, bringin havoc to the fuckin streets
Nobody knows why he took a fo’-fo’
And loaded up on the whole front row
Try to tell him but he act like he don’t know me
Pull out his pistol and show me, my lil’ homies

Lil homies on the rise, niggas gonna die tonight
Lets get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets
Lil homies on the rise, niggas gonna die tonight
Lets get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets

"First 2 Bomb," "16 On Death Row"
Bustin' on them phony motherfuckers ‘cause the big homie said so
Niggas knew I was a nutcase, quick to blast
Livin' underage, but he'll blaze on your bitch-ass
Is there a heaven for a G?
And if it is, will I finally get to be at peace?
On these streets ain't no peace, shell-shocked souls
Makin' money off of crack sales
Young black male unable to change ‘cause it's a cycle
Plus nobody knows the evil that they might do
Lil' Moo, Big Yak, K. Kastro
Big Malcom, Hussein, call 'em Outlawz
Tellin' the world to be equipped
When these young motherfuckers rip shit, they don't quit
Drew down on me, pulled a pound on me
Bust like he didn't know me; my lil' homies

Lil homies on the rise
Niggas gonna die tonight
Let's get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets
Lil homies on the rise, niggas gonna die tonight
Lets get high tonight
Lil homies on the mash, runnin on these punk police
Cuz lil niggas run these streets

Whassup nigga let’s do this shit! My lil’ homies!
Lil’ bad-ass motherfuckin adolescent niggas! My lil’ homies!
What the fuck you niggas wanna do? WHAT NIGGA? My fuckin lil’ homies
Sixteen, fifteen, thirteen, my fuckin lil’ homies
Juvenile delinquents ready to BUST on you motherfuckers
What the fuck you niggas wanna do nigga?!
Nigga take yo’ shit off, lil’ homies!
We robbin motherfuckers nigga, Thug Life, Outlawwwwz
Westside! Deathrow nigga
You know what time it is, my lil’ homies
You know what the fuck you gotta do nigga, Outlawz nigga
My lil’ homies..
Yaki Kadafi, Hussein Fatal, Napolean, E.D.I. Amin, K. Kastro, Big Muthafuckin Syke, Boniti, Makaveli, my fuckin lil homies
What the fuck you niggas wanna do nigga
Double Glocks on you bitch made niggas
I open fire on these new deadly streets
Closed casket, fuck you bastards
My muthafuckn lil homiez don’t give a fuck about none of you niggas
Fuck your famlies, fuck your kids nigga
Bad Boy killa, fuck all you niggas, hey LL meet my lil homies
LL Cool J, say what nigga
I’ll rock your muthafuckin bells, me and my muthafuckin outlawz, my lil homiez
Who want to get with this old wild shit, my lil homiez
Muthafuckin mack 11, mini 14s, A.R. 15s on you bitch made niggas
I’m up in this muthafucka, you niggas don’t want it, my lil homies
Mothafuckin police nigga get into the car, nigga we fin to ride



SN-O-OP thats me kinda hard being Snoop Do-g-g but somehow some way keep coming up making those chicks like every single day
Got so much ladys in the place to be kinda hard being Snoop Do-g-g but somehow some way keep coming up making those chicks like every single day

Now, I could make miracles to tempos
It's instrumental, waiting for the nymphos; that's the intro
Shook when you rush me, walked up and touched me
Why? Do you want to fuck me?
Just ‘cause I'm paid in the worst way? True!
Lookin' kinda good in your birthday suit
I wonder if you're wild and you act shy
Do you like to be on top or the back side?
Watch when you lick your lips shake your hips got damn i love that shit, Yo, let's stop fakin', be real now
I got a room and a hard-on; still down?
Met you standing at a bar full of black dudes
Said you wanna see my scars and my tattoos
When we head for my hideout, act right
Boss player when I ride out, that's right
What's ya phone number?

Lights, camera, action, show-time
We bust shit back in no time
Yo kind can't fuck with my kind
You must be losin' yo mind
Lights, camera, action, show-time
We bust shit back in no time
Yo kind can't fuck with my kind
You must be losin' yo mind

Oh shit, baby is a dime piece, more than just fine
She's personally blessed from the gods
If I seen her right now, she could get me hard
Didn't want to talk to me, just to see my car
Never had sex with a rich rap star
'Til I got her in the back of my homeboy's car
Tell me, why do we live this way?
Money over bitches, let me hear you say
What's your phone number?
Are you alone? Got a pocket full of rubbers, let's bone!
Time for your girlfriend to take you home
I had fun, but baby, gotta leave me alone
Picture in my rhyme
Take time to rewind these words I say
If you open your mind bet in a minute you'll find
It's time let the Outlawz play

Lights, camera, action, show-time
We bust shit back in no time
Yo kind can't fuck with my kind
You must be losin' yo mind
Lights, camera, action, show-time
We bust shit back in no time
Yo kind can't fuck with my kind
You must be losin' yo mind

We still rhime tho

Westside



Dear mama don't cry, Your baby boy's doin' good
Tell the homies I'm in heaven and it ain't got hoods
Seen a show with Marvin Gaye last night
It had me shook
Drinking peppermint schnapps with Jackie Wilson and Sam Cook
Then some lady named Billie Holiday sang
Sittin there kickin it with Malcolm till the day came
Lil' Latasha sure grown, tell the lady in the liquor store that she's forgiven
So come home
Maybe in time you'll understand, only God can save us
Where Miles Davis cutting lose with the band
Just think of all the people that you knew in the past that passed on
They in heaven found peace at last
Picture a place that they exist, together
There has to be a place better than this, in Heaven
So right before I sleep dear God what I'm asking
Remember this face, save me a place

Sometimes its hard to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear them anymore
Got me heartbroken,fine, so many babies screaming
Cause they seeing destruction before they a see human being
So they start smoking weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families in shape
Cause they all broke. and why do ghetto birds die
Before we learn to fly, some bodies else's child caught in guns
Smoking weed, can all make a change
So I'm told, but I haven't seen the change unfold
I keep hoping please, if you prefer to breathe
Communities in need of people that will lead
Too many of us died to the door to open wide
My brother be wise, stay focused on the prize
And we continue growing....
...One day at a time





get problems in relationship with this control issue












any way




gotta movie called  Jingle All the Way  coming out with Arnold Schwarzenneger, where I played Santa Claus
very funny coming out in November out here
there another movie from this company called Retroactive
just kinda recite fire action movie, very funny, very funny role, very serious, funny, crazy, action, unusual piece I really like it
I did little part in the movie called Gold in the Streets
and doing this and  The Blues Brothers Animation
and the TV series




we just open up the Atlanta house of blues
so don't push me cause I'm close to the edge





watch this control free



















*Jim laughing*

it's great, it's great but I could never tell you what is like


*2Pac laughs*








I feel like I'm in jail I gotta turn to my friends




like we're for real close friends
but it's not like a  regular relationship in the movies
where it's based on the movie
I never had a co-star that really gave a fuck
what did it takes to get me to do my job
and that's all I ever wanted
long as you can take  away these small things
that you might able to handle that I can't handle
but there major things that I can't handle that some people can handle
I take care of the major things, you handle this little things that I just got..
so he is been able to like to erase those hurdles so it makes it easy and that's a first
so now when I go to another set I can go
here's Jim's number call him find out what Jammy do

*Jim and 2pac laughing*

in the scene, he's so.. Tupac is so present
and so alive with energy and music, that is like a joy
you don't know just makes it just like eating a great pasta
*2Pac laughing*
it's just a joy, but he is a liar



like on TV late capable, as this guy as this guy
I gotta shovel in my throat, we been doing this for 13 hours
I'm totally tired, he'll tell you a dirty joke that is just brings energy to the scene, you know that whats tired
he 's not like.. he's not does he like acting tricks that get you ready
he just does normal people things like you know in the middle of the nights he's telling you dirty jokes that you only hear in college
you know what I mean?









is the dirty american


*2Pac laughs*



about "hey man I'm tired of chasing that bitch fucking guy"




we gon' on the second answer



starts January 1st


but then in the next day I'm not interested in doing another 300
I fell like, well that's good for 3 days you know what I mean
I had to get to the average just doing this
I really wanna push for the next generation of actors, people, rappers, entertainers whatever
we need to be more physical fit
not slim, not buff, just physically fit
with ever you have exercise it, so that you can use it

we're real conscious that way because our instrument is us



you could be fit in look and act tired
but you can't be tired and act fit
like I said I'm not on the kick let's be skinny, let's be fit
right now I can outrun everybody at this table


now Marathon
I never knew what the hell they were doing in marathon anyway
these guys is straight gay, get out of here








but I get another sense of, just like asking a woman what do you get out off motherhood but you don't get out off your career you know what I mean
so another satisfaction, it's a whole another joy
it's similar, because it's both creative, but it's fun, you do the same thing, at the high school thing

oh yah that's true cause I gotta banned



in the morning, we're on the set











all of us is a human beings is having dominant and a quiet side
I happened to be a Gemini




but I'm an artist, and I'm hungry for knowledge
so they'd rather just make it looked like I'm crazy
that's the biggest misconception




























































































































I'm reporting live from Sunset Boulevard
Where many excited fans have gathered with candles
Awaiting the much anticipated release, of 2Pac Shakur's latest album, Better Dayz
This is yet another post-humous release by 2Pac
Which, raises the question
Where are these songs coming from?
It's interesting how, the message in these songs
Is still relevant today
I can feel the energy in the air, as they count down to midnight
When the album will officially be released
Oh, hold on, I, think they're starting to countdown now


5, 4, 3, 2, 1 ...






Dedicated to those people that uhh
For some reason look at us like role models
You do know that things change
It might not look like its a cool world right now
It's cool though, things get better
Believe me things change
Tell em about it

Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind

Now, can you picture, young niggas in a rush to grow
Till hard timers in the pen, had to crush his throat
Probably never even saw him comin' - too busy bullshittin'
Caught him with his mouth runnin'; ain't this a bitch
They got me twisted in this game
The Feds and the punk Po-lice pointin' pistols at my brain
I wonder if I'm wrong cause I'm thugged out
My homies murdered execution style runnin' in the drug house
What was supposed to be a easy hit - now shit is flipped
Cause niggas died over bullshit - it's not my dream
I'm seein' pictures of a broken man, no witnesses
Only the questions of who smoked the man, young adolescents
In our prime live a life of crime, though it ain't logical
We hobble through these tryin' times, livin' blind
Lord help me with my troubled soul
Why all my homiez had to die before they got to grow
And right before I put my head on the pillow, say a prayer one love
To my thugs in heaven I'll see you there
It's written for the young and dumb that wasn't warned
Help you make it through the storm
My words to my firstborn, feel me
While trying to maintain through the pressure
Hustlers trying to make life better, for you and me
Nobody loves you when your stuck in the game
But maintain, because all things change, feel me

Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind

Ever since my very first day on this earth I was cursed
So I knew the birth of a child would make my life worst
And though it hurt me, there was no distortion
Cause wild seeds can’t grow, we need more abortions
Quiet your soul
Cause you know what you had to do
And so they victims of the world that never came to
I understand there is a better day coming
Sometimes catch me slipping with the car runnin'
Driving at a dead end blinded
Ain’t no love in the hood only hearts torn
Love letters to the innocent and unborn
All the babies that died up on the table
Wasn’t able to breathe cause the family wasn’t able
Can’t blame her I would do the same
All I could give it was my debt and my last name
Cause in the game things change living up and down
Hard life got me walking with my head down
Wearing frowns was it meant to be, was I wrong
But i’ll never get to know so I carry on
It’s written for the young and dumb that wasn’t born

This for all the babies that died on the abortion tables
You know, all the mothers that didn’t have a choice
Things change

Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind
Things are changing, all the time
Some things you must leave behind



Young Playa
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Heyy
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Heyy
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder
Heyy
Kill, kill, kill, murder, murder, murder

Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin like a G

Travel through my mind am, I blind it's a shame
Young brothas gettin murdered straight took out the game
As I sit here puffin on a cigarette
You gotta be ready, never know who's plottin on a niggas death
Cuz these are the rough times, best to hurry up
And duck muhfucker 'fore I buck mine
It's gettin crazy and everybody's strapped
Surrounded by niggas but nary motherfucker down to watch your back
These are the bitch made niggas, you been played nigga
While you starvin and broke they pullin six figures
Oooh, what can you do
When you can't trust your crew, time to bust out the twenty-two
Boo-yaow!
Ran out of weed, so I'm sippin' on this Hennessey
Tell me, do you feel me?
Heyyy, I have no remorse
As I take another sip of my liquor, I spit my sick thoughts, hehehe

Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Thuggin' to the fullest, got my strap, I'ma pull it
On the first motherfucker that can outrun a bullet
It's them Thug Life niggas, and we don't like tricks
Got these punk wannabes and they jockin' like bitches
Now my riches is gettin' hoes on its own
Fuck a mystery, do you wanna get with me, then let's bone
Time to take her to my hideout, cause I'm smokin' that spinach
I'm stayin' strong to the finish and then I ride out
See you on the freeway, sorry baby
But I gotta call my homey see what he say
I ain't got no time, I gotta get mine
I keep my mind on my loot, I'll shoot everytime
And ain't no way I'ma let bitch made nigga worry me
Catch me slippin', empty the clip and bury me
Hell nah, homie, have to plug me twice
Cuz  ain't no stoppin when you Thug for Life...

Now tell me do you see, tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G

Never bow down let these other bitches crawl
I'm a Thug motherfucker and thugs only ball
Ain't no half steppin' here, from the cradle to the grave
I'm a motherfuckin' fool, but I choose to get paid
Now my pockets gettin' empty, so I'm panicked in a fright
Me and my bitch named Nina are fiendin' tonight
Ain't nobody livin' safe, got a Glock, and I'm stressin'
All I want is my money, motherfucker ain't no question
Don't try to stall, cause I hit
So bring me the scissors and get to clippin' at his dick
I'd rather die young than die old and broke
That's why I stay drunk, and I constantly smoke
My memories as a youngsta, hangin' with the homies
But now I'm doin' bad and them bitches don't know me
But playa haters can't fade me
Cause this is thug life nigga and we're crazy, tell me do you see?

Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
Life's so hard on a nigga when you livin' like a G
Tell me do you see
....Hard on a nigga ....
Tell me do you see
....Hard on a nigga ....
....Hard on a nigga ....
....Hard on a nigga ....
....Hard on a nigga ....
I'ma pull it
Out run a bullet
Don't like tricks
Freeway
See what he say






Lookin’ for these better days
You ain’t lyin to me, who dat
O.F.T.B. up in this bitch

Better days, heyy, better days
Got me thinkin’ bout better days
Better days,  better days, better days, heyy, better days
Got me thinkin’ bout better days

Time to question our lifestyle, look how we live
Smokin weed like it ain’t no thang, so even kids
Wanna try now, they lie down and get ran through
Nobody watches the clockin’ the evil man do
Faced with the demons, addicted to hearin victims screamin’
Guess we was evil since birth, product of cursed semens
Cause even our birthdays is cursed days
A born thug in the first place, the worst ways
I’d love to see the block in peace
With no more dealers and crooked cops, the only way to stop the beast
And only we can change
It’s up to us to clean up the streets, it ain’t the same
Too many murders, too many funerals and too many tears
Just seen another brother buried plus I knew him for years
Passed by his family, but what could I say
Keep yo’ head up and try to keep the faith
And pray for better days

Better dayz, better days, better days, heyyy
Better dayz, better days
Got me thinkin’ bout better days

Heyy, it seems like yesterday, I used to play
Around the way, those were the better dayz
Growin up as a child carefree
Mama said I was wild by 3
Even pops showed me love he was there
I remember hangin out playin truth or dare
Cowboys and Indians when your belly run
When the only thing we sprayed was water guns
We didn’t have much so we made the best of
What we could afford but we had love
Tryna be grown might sneak and curse
One T.V. set got, to cut it on the first
Back in the good times and the Jeffersons
When your next door neighbour was your best friend
Those are the days I miss and reminisce
So I steady wish..

Down memory lane, I walk and stalked the streets
Searchin for real to leave the past behind me
It’s ’96 ain’t nothing change but the years
I shedded some tears, I had it up to here
See I want something more in life
3 strikes ain’t no joke, these white folks
Got us on the tight rope
Knowin we down to fall
Us niggas we ball, we want it all
Kill each other over somethin small
It’s time to wake up, yo I’m callin all those
That want to listen, take a look around
Observe your position, do you like what you see
Poverty and frustration, aggravation, temptation
They bought a bottle posse mo’termination
They kept the real and keep it real
That’s why I say, heyy
Got me thinkin bout better dayz

Better days, better days, better days, heyyy
Better days, better days
Got me thinkin’ bout better days

It’s mad to get out of the ghetto and get some
And when you get it, don’t forget where you came from
Sleepin with the enemy, livin on they block
And neighbourhood watch go to cops
Sayin you settin up shop
A kingpin from the slums, ain't that about nuttin
They can’t stand to see a black man havin somethin
Stereotype, television got em twisted
Check the statistics, black folks with businesses
Legitimate investments, yea we comin up
And they scared of us, for many years they mistreated us
Beaten us, left us swingin from the rope
Now ask yaself who’s supplyin the dope
Who be keepin us down, in these fucked up scoop
Whoever said it so good, must be a muthafuckin fool
Now when we do it, Armageddon come
Are they willin to die for they unlawful acts
It’s goin to leave a lot of muthafuckaz stunned
It’ll take a nation of million to hold us back
It’s time for a homie reuinion
We gotta stop meetin at these muthafuckin funerals
Let’s show some love in the right way
So we can all live and see better days, dayyys
Thinkin bout better days

Better days, better days, better days, heyyy
Better days, better days
Got me thinkin’ bout better days

Now after so many years, ain’t shit changed
That’s why we hang, where we bang
That goes to slang
Waitin on the day for us to overcome
All the obstacles set forth to keep us dumb
Everybody got a destiny they gotta control
Spend your life behind bars and the rest on parole
We know nobody gives a fuck about the boys on the bottom
Wanna see us in a cell somewhere, where you can rot
So you do what you gotta do to stay alive
Survival is a must so I kill to survive
I see moms on her knees every night she prays
Beggin the Lord to bring better dayz
Better days



There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go


Was it the liquor, that makes me act blind, times that I'm with her
Anonymous pictures of other niggas tryin' to kiss her
Will I love her or shall I diss her?
I'm sick of this scandalous shit I deal wit', tryin' to paint a perfect picture
My memories of jealousy no longer carefree
Cause so much bullshit your girlfriends keep tellin' me
I'm on tour, but now my bedroom's an open door
So it got me thinkin', what am I tryin' for?
When I was young I was so very dumb, eager to please
A lil', trick on a mission tryin' to get him a piece
Me and my niggas is thug niggas, former known drug dealers
We don't love bitches and believe they don't love niggas
I gotta blame my attraction
But you became a distraction, a threat to my paper stackin'
I thought you changed but now I know
Can't turn a ho into a housewife, baby, and there you go

There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go

I should have never trusted you, from the jump
You disgust me so much, you make me look like Willy Lump
With your ready made plans, did you shake your man, yet?
Did you resell him, did you tell him how I make you wet?
I can't forget when we met conservative but freaky
Irresistible, critical, positive but sneaky
It's a shame we played games so many nights
You squeeze me tight but in my mind I knew it wasn't right
But out of sight, is out of mind is how I thought of you
I can't compare with no sentimental value
Your nig' would wig if he knew the things you done to me
His little sweetie scooped up so easily but never me
I was lost in the things you did
Hidin' my cigs, tellin' me how much you wanted my kids
But love don't love nobody feelings change
Guess you had to rearrange, and there you go

There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go

These silly bitches got this game twisted
So I ain't really tryin' to claim bitches
Niggas who don't hang come put your "D" on the same bitches
That be the main bitches who say they loyal
Promise to do some thangs before you, kill for you, but maintain your spoils, truly
Cutie, booty big, but that ain't movin' nothing in my crib
When I could see from the door she sure ain't shit
But you in love with her, want to go to the club with her
And when you stuck, she up like an ordinary thug nigga

See girlfriend I know, your whole M.O's preoccupied with mostly
Gettin' clown after clown, town coast to coast, see
I been trying to stay away from sluts like you
Got me turned off completely by that sheisty shit that you do
Knew from jump your aim, straight through them spandex
Don't front, just name
Spots on yo' body for me to touch while you clutch this game
I keep flowin' like H20, it ain't nothing for me to say
Why you keep actin' like a hoe
But there you go

There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again, there you go, there you go
There you go actin' like a ho
Again



Hey uh I like that beat that MC Lyte got
Johnny J flip that shit, let's do that shit over
Let's do that shit like you know Death Row style, you feel me?
Yeah that type of shit
You know what time it is
Maybe it's the thug in me

By age thirteen I was buckwild, good at my knuckle game
Made it through a tough childhood never be the same
Walked in my daddy's shoes
No time to be a peaceful man had to shatter fools
That's 'til I put my eyes on you
God damn, sweetheart you got some thighs on you
Now I can't wait to get you home, get you all alone
In my bedroom, baby can we bone, and get it on
Tell me lady how you like me
And if you want it harder baby, come and bite me
But do it lightly
Cause that excites me to lay the pipe
And if you lick me right, I'll do it all night
Only got fucked by a drug dealer
Never felt the real passion of a thug nigga
Though I like the way you scream when you lovin' me
I'm goin' deep, it's the thug in me
So whatchu sayin' girl?

I like what I'm doing to you
It's just the thug in me
I like what you're doing to me
I like the thug in you

Moan baby when we bone it's on
It's so strong niggas in the next room'll cum
I got ya head swingin'
Tongue kissin', as I hit it from the back with the bed ringin'
Give me space, as I lick ya face, stick the place
Synchronize so I grind when they kick the bass
Love fuckin' in tha mo'nin'
I get ya wet and bust a sweat, then I'm gone
Left you on yo' own girl
Tell me what you feel like
Blindfolded, I'm cold do it real nice, that's if it feel right
Maybe it's the thug in me
I pull ya hair while we fuckin' in the chair, when ya lovin' me
Up against the wall, you can have it all; just try
Bet my kiss, to get you high, don't pass by
Grab me by my nuts when I'm lovin' you
Now open up and let me put the thug in you

You like me rough, you like me tough
Making love real freaky baby
You like the thug in me
I like it rough, I like it tough
Real hard and smooth
I like the thug in you

Say baby what's your phone number?
Be warned, I'm like a storm with my own thunder
I make the room rumble, in and out long stroke
Hold ya breath now, close your eyes deep throat
Did you like it?.. Oooh I'm excited!
Cause it's a party in my bedroom, you're invited
C'mon now, let me see ya shake your rump
Tell me, how long will it take to cum
Havin' fun, do it one on one and we can all get involved
First y'all do me, then I'll fuck y'all
When you call me the next day
To get sexed by a nigga in the best way
Yeah baby it's a price to pay
Only play in the fast lane
When you a hustler, motherfuckin' cash came
I gotcha goin' wild, 'cause I'm lovin' you
Drugged out with this motherfuckin' thug in you

I like what I'm doing to you
It's just the thug in me
I like what you're doing to me
I like the thug in you
I like what I'm doing to you
It's just the thug in me
I like what you're doing to me
It's just the thug in you

I don't wanna talk, I don't want no explanations
I don't got no motherfuckin' explanations, ya know what I'm sayin?
It's the thug in me
Don't be askin' why I'm pullin' your hair
And why I fuck so motherfuckin' thuggish
That thug passion, ya know what I mean?
Bitch, no mercy
What you scared of?
Didn't you come over here to get fucked?
You ain't come over here for me to be
Strokin', and all that bullshit
You came over here to get fucked
Shit, if I ain't fuck you thug style
Bitch you'd leave my house talkin' bout, "2Pac can't serve me"
Won't have me crossed up in that bullshit, hahaha
Turn over!
Maybe it's the thug in me
Couple of you hoes heard
Couple of you bitches heard What's Ya Phone # and thought y'all could fuck with me in the bedroom
This is just to tell you it ain't happening, it ain't going down
As long as they make ginseng and condoms bitch you out of luck, you're gonna get fucked
My motherfucking explanation
My motherfucking motto
Maybe it's the thug in me
I'm out this bitch
Hey Johnny J on the strength for real on my momma I think we rocked this one harder than MC Lyte
I think we rocked that one harder than Michael Jackson, man fuck that
We up out this bitch
You know how we do it on Death Row
BIATCH!



The police comin' nigga
Get out of there!

If you a bad boy then you die
Westside outlawz when we ride, get me high
They fucked up when they robbed me
Put another contract on Mobb Deep
If you a bad boy then you die
Westside outlawz when we ride, get me high
They fucked up when they robbed me
Put another contract on Mobb Deep

Runnin' through these niggas like a runnin' back
With my Outlaw pack
Don’t make me handle your head, so I proceed
Young and learn how to act
We on the mad for this cash, I left some dead in the back
We leave 'em burnt in our path, we put them holes to they head
The game turned on ’em, we got the word, then we rolled on ’em
Did him so bad, he thought Jesus took his soul from ’em
We cold on ’em, told him we gon’ mash this way
S.O.S., shoot on sight, might take the pressure away

Yo, believe I'm a broad, breaking the front lawns
My army if you wit me, battle positions
They got the rookies holdin' quickly
Ride for me deep and dirty, copyin is sloppy
You got to drop me ‘fore stop me, push the crucial to lock me
Ain't a street that you Kadafi, with my mission beside
Born to die a thug soldier, still ridin for Pac
The war ain’t over, raise your guns high
They say it’s peace? That’s a lie
So my homies die, now tell me why?

Now ever since momma got fucked and papa ducked out
Look at us, murderous thugs showin' less love in the drug house
Similar to savages, it's a wonder we manage
Bring chaos causin' damage on our quest for cabbage
They ask my style similar to cash we flaunt it
Most wanted by the population murdered you for it
Exploit your weakness revenge flow deep without release
Criminal orders across the waters bringin' the war to the streets
Why fear me, fear the shit I speak
Once this shit drop it's heard on every fuckin' street
Like the sound of police
Who run the streets really?
In every hood legends grow
From the hustlaz up at Harlem to shot callers in O'
And though, Congress, don't want us to progress, we stressed
My homie buried at an early age, hustled to death
His last breath, a lesson I possess like jewels
Stay thugged out keep it movin'

Heavyweight thugs don't budge when we stalk the streets
Sort of like chalk and narcotics when they walk the beat
You speak the beef pussy draw down and drop it
Hit you with 6 shots lay the law down and throw the shells in my pocket
Gettin' mines with nine cocked extortin'
Blocks pop with 22's in my socks with the butt hangin' out the chocolate
You never seen time, I travel across dream crime
My rolls like a million dollar bill, folded with green lines
With my foes erased, drink my Henney straight no chasin'
Catch my body like cases, 5 minutes from the station

I hit the hole like Allen Iverson with confidence
No finger prints that mean there was no evidence or proof that I was present
At the scene of the crime around 10 niggas bleed
After they made this punk fag motherfucker bleed
Money was bloody as shit, y’all niggas shoulda seen it
Bust a cap and freak with, bow down on your knees shit
The Glock to your head nigga, don’t let inside action
Hit innocent by-standers when you blasted, shot fuckin backwards
Little homies puttin work for stripes
But is it worth your life, g-rides runnin red lights
I wish somebody would have told me then
Since I’m an outlaw like Napolean ain’t no cell they can hold me in
Caucasian, crazy like Arabians
Hold this spot like some niggas fade me in
Havin’ the fiend’s page me
When they want the product nigga I got the smoke
What you working with I’m on some immortal shit
Outlawz we straight hurtin shit use artillery to murder with
Put on the block gangsta party like Pac
Lifes hard from the OX me, and my niggas on top, top

I know the law hate me dearly, comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, they comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E
I know the law hate me dearly, they comin' for me
We outlaws, thugged out, niggas runnin' on E

With my Glock, quick to let it pop, fuck the law
Carry steel cause I live on the nigga side of the law
Ridin' foes 'cause I can't let hoes catch me slippin'
Quick to blow and dispose if you block on hittin'
Ridin' high, blazin', kryptonite got a nigga dazin'
Burpin' and smurkin' got on enemies before I grave 'em
Ride 'em, look behind him, I see him, he slipped
Had to stop light in a slowly night, this motherfuckin' trick
Slide over so I can dump and put it in em
Damn, I guess this motherfucker know that I sent it
Hit the pedal now we high speedin'
With the metal tryin' to make these motherfuckers die speedin'
Up the way I seen him slow down
Shit!! I think I done bucked these hoes down
Caught them runnin' on e, it's kind of funny to me
They know they was fuckin' with me but they dumb to see

Open up fire watch 'em expire when my shells split 'em
Plus all them trick niggas basically can go to hell with 'em
Fuck 'em they phony claimin' they homies but they foes
Speakin' on thug niggas daily, while we nailin' they hoes
Explode boldly at my stage shows and formation
Words are known to spray blaze as I raise my thug nation
A crooked thought, cops get bought, no longer caught
Out on bail, raisin' hell, nigga fuck what you thought
Did you cry when my girl died?
Put out the hit, politic niggas worldwide, grabbin' my dick
I’ll never learn, take away the pain with sherm
Throwin' gas on my enemies watchin' 'em burn
Kamikaze, I’m shootin' up the casket take the body
Whip the corpse like a piñata and party
His last breath, a straight lesson I possess like jewels
Stay thugged out keep it movin'
Runnin' on E..
Stay thugged out keep it movin'
Runnin' on E

One time, one time for the niggas that stayed down for us
Smiff and Wessun
The Cocoa Brovaz
Buckshot, B.D.I
Heltah Skeltah
Boot Camp Click



It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end
It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end

Now shit's constantly hot, on my block, it never fails to be gunshots
Can't explain a mother's pain, when her son drops
Black male slipping in hail when will we prevail
Fearing jail but crack sales got me living well
And the system's suicidal with this Thug's Life
Staying strapped forever trapped in this drug life
God help me, cause I'm starving, can't get a job
So I resort to violent robberies, my life is hard
Can't sleep cause all the dirt make my heart hurt
Put in work and shed tears for my dead peers
Mislead from childhood where I went astray
Till this day I still pray for a better way
Can't help but feel hopeless and heart-broke
From the start I felt the racism cause I'm dark
Couldn't quit the bullshit make me represent
Hit the bar and played the star, everywhere I went

It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end
It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end

And I can't help but wonder why, so many young kids had to die
Caught strays from AK's and the drive-by
Swollen pride and homicide, don't coincide
Brothers cry for broken lives, mama come inside
Cause our block is filled with danger
Used to be a close knit community but now we're all cold strangers
Time changes us to stone them crack pipes
All up and down the block exterminating black life
But I can't blame the dealers
My mama's welfare check has brought the next man chrome wheels
Shit's real, I know ya feel, my tragedy
A single mother with a problem child, daddy free
Hanging out picking up game, sipping cheap liquor
Gamin the hoochies hoping I can get to sleep with her
It's a man's world, staying strapped
Fantasies of a nigga living phat

It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end
It's just another murder
It's when we ride on our own kind
It's just another murder
Watchin' our own downfall, witness the end



One time, one time, nigga, one time!
Runnin' from the police
No matter what I do, they got a nigga
Still runnin' from the police

I ain't got nuttin' on my mind, but gettin' in some trouble
Licking shots to they block, leavin' bloody blood puddles
For some ridah's delight, now we in a gunfight
I can shoot the gauge pebbles at the devils or die tonight
It's on me, but if I die, bury me a motherfucking G
A open casket on them bastards so they all remember me
With my vest on my chest, my tools and my piece
Thug life motherfucker, got me runnin' from the police

They got me runnin' from the police
Nigga, you know that's true
Catch a nigga like K-Dog, chillin' with a crew
Every damn day parlay with my glass of Re
The O.J. and it's all okay
To that fuckin' fake cop, got to play the man
Ran me down the block with my glass in my hand
Damn, I hope it don't spill
Nigga chill, shit is real, cock back my steel

Still runnin' from the police, I gets no sleep
I got you peepin' in my window, while I'm smokin' indo
But I ain't no motherfucking track star, pigs got a jeep
Like Big Malcolm, runnin' through motherfucker's backyards
So I grabs my piece before I flee
And instead of me runnin', these bitches is runnin' from me
Lick shots, hit spots off on my piece
Cause a nigga like Big Malcolm is through runnin' from the police

????

Yo I was, schemin' and fiendin' for loots
And took the crooked route to
Ghetto fame I felt the pains and now I run the game
The insane brain, cold gettin' fly like a plane
On them suckers with my nigga Biggie Smalls causin' ruckus

Check it, I grew up, a fuckin' screw-up
Got introduced to the game, got a ounce and fuckin' blew up
Choppin' rocks overnight
The nigga Biggie Smalls tryin' to turn into the black Frank White

And we got the workers choppin' rock, fiends by the flock
And we gettin' it, the dirty cop is jealous so they sweatin' it
I'm lettin' off smoke, hope they don't play me for no joke
And provoke the homicide, so just let the drama slide
We keepin' it real, fuck how you feel, Biggie pass the steel
Let's serve these motherfuckers, slugs as a fuckin' meal

We had to grow dreads to change our description
Two cops is on the milk box missin'
Show they toes you know they got stepped on
A fist full of bullets a chest full of Teflon
Run from the police picture that, nigga, I'm too fat
I fuck around and catch a asthma attack
That's why I bust back, it don't phase me
When he drop, take his Glock, and I'm Swayze
Celebrate my escape, sold the Glock, bought some weight
Laid back, I got some money to make, motherfucker

????

But still I'm havin' memories of high speed when the cops crashed
As I laugh, pushin' the gas when my Glocks blast
We was young and we was dumb, but we had heart
In the dark, will we survive through the bad parts?
Many dreams is what I had, and plenty wishes
No hesitation in extermination of these snitches
Envious bitches, they still continue to pursue me
A couple of movies, now the whole world's tryna screw me
Even the cops tried to sue me, so what can I do?
But stay true, sippin' 22's of brew
And now media is tryna test me
Got the press askin' questions, tryna stress me
Misery is all I see, that's my mind state
My history with the police will shake the crime rate
My main man had two strikes, slipped, got arrested, and flipped
He screamed "Thug Life!" and emptied the clip
Got tired of runnin' from the police

????




God bless the dead, and buried
Nigga, don't worry
If you see God first
Tell him shit got worse
I ain't mad
I know you representing the crew
And I can picture you in heaven with a blunt and a brew
Fuck the world, pain was a part of the game
If you a baller, money went as quick as it came
My role models - gone or they locked in the pen
Straight hustlers, caught up in the whirlwind
The other day, I thought I seen my homeboy Biggy
Saying shit don't stop nigga no pity
We all hoods, and all we ever had was dreams
Money making motherfuckers plot scandalous schemes
In the gutter, you learn to have a criminal mind
I was addicted to trying, never meant to do time
My epitaph, will read, was the last of G's
Kicked the shit to make the white man bleed
God bless the dead

I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one's there
Is there a heaven for a killer? I change my ways
And every day, I'm a hustler, getting paid
I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one cares
Is there a heaven for a G?
I'm telling you now, you motherfuckers don't know me

The motherfucking dust kicker, who can you trust?
Do have you the heart to see a nigga
Before you bust?
My name is spoken on the tongues of so many foes
Busting motherfuckers out the box, I ain't even gone
Now how the hell do you explain, my claim to fame
From doing flicks to busting tricks out the fucking frame
Got these bitches on my jock, niggas on my block
Jealous ass suckers, got em ducking from my smoking Glock
And busting niggas asses to stay alive
Skinny ass player watching bigger motherfuckers fry
They ask me how I’m living? I’m a hustler
Bucking busters, 'til they die
Now it's on in the ghetto, you ain't heard?
Niggas got they AK’s heading for the burbs
Aiming at them skin-head bitches let it rain
Giving em a wet welcome to the house of pain!

I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one's there
Is there a heaven for a killer? I change my ways
And every day, I'm a hustler, getting paid
I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one cares
Is there a heaven for a G?
I'm telling you now, you motherfuckers don't know me

But still I'm having memories of high speed when the cops crashed
As I laugh, pushing the gas while my Glocks blast
We was young and we was dumb, but we had heart
In the dark, will we survive through the bad parts?
Many dreams is what I had, and plenty wishes
No hesitation in extermination of these snitches
Envious bitches, they still continue to pursue me
A couple of movies, now the whole world's trying to screw me
Even the cops tried to sue me, so what can I do?
But stay true, sipping 22's of brew
And now media is trying to test me
Got the press asking questions, trying to stress me
Misery is all I see, that's my mind state
My history with the police will shake the crime rate
My main man had two strikes, slipped, got arrested and flipped
Two- Two strikes slipped got arrested and flip
He screamed "thug life"

I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one's there
Is there a heaven for a killer? I change my ways
And every day, I'm a hustler, getting paid
I see visions of me dead, lord are you there?
A closed casket at my funeral, and no one cares
Is there a heaven for a G?
I'm telling you now, you motherfuckers don't know me



Pawhoo hoo hoo hoo
I don’t wanna be your man, bitch
What you crazy
I don’t wanna be your fuckin' man
You stupid you fuckin' idiot
I wanna be
Yo let me fuck that nigga down
What’s that?
My ghetto love song hahaha
Let’s be friends
I know you wanna fuck
Let's be friends
Where my niggas, where my niggas
Hahahaha yeeeah
Let’s be friends
There’s no need to front
Let's be friends…

Approach you and post a minute, arm on my double-R tinted
As you pass bye, winkin' my eye, freshly scented
What's the haps, baby? Come get with me and perhaps, lady
You can help me multiply my stacks, baby
Currency seems small, I need companionship
Through with that scandalous shit, I bet your man ain't shit
So why you hesitatin', actin' like yo' shit don't stink?
Check out my diamonds, bitch, everyone gonna blink
This be a thug thang, Outlaw nigga with riches
Cream dreamin', motherfucker, on a mash for bitches
Check my résumé, sippin' on Cristal and Alize
Smokin' on big weed, keyed the Cali way
Don't like trickin', but I'll buy you a fit
I can't stand no sneaker-wearin' nappy head bitch
Let my pedigree, read briefly, this O.G
Puttin' bitch-made bustas to sleep with no grief
Mash on my so-called car, who the man?
While I'm tuggin' on your main bitch head
He broke and I smoke daily, baby, let's be

Friends
There's no need to front, let’s be friends
I know you want to fuck
Let’s be friends
There's need to front, let’s be friends
I know you want to fuck

I met you and I stuttered in passion
Though slightly blinded by that ass
It was hard to keep my dick in my pants
Every time you pass got me checkin' for you
Hardcore, starin' and watchin'
Me and you, one on one, picture countless options
Was it prophecy? Clear as day, visions on top of me
Erotic, psychotic, would possess my body
Far from a crush, I wanna bust your guts and touch
Everything inside you from my head to my nuts
You got me sweatin' like a fat girl goin' for mine
Just a skinny nigga fuckin' like she stole my mind
Back in time, I recall how she used to be
I guess money and fame made you used to me
What's up in 9-6? Fine tricks in drag
Fuck Dre! Tell that bitch he can kiss my ass!
Back to you, my pretty ass caramel queen
Got my hands on your thighs
Now let me in between as

Friends
There's no need to front, let’s be friends
I know you want to fuck
Let’s be friends
There's need to front, let’s be friends
I know you want to fuck

Can you imagine me in player mode, rush the tricks
I got her ready for a booty call, I fucked your bitch
Was it me or the fame, my dick or the game
Bet I scream 'Westside' when I came, Westside
Scream my name because, baby, it's delicious
Got a weak spot for pretty bitches
Up and down, similar to switches
My movement, baby, let your back dip into it, make it fluid
In and out, all around when a nigga do it
You've got me high, let me come inside!
I love it when you get on top, baby let me ride!
Who wanna stop me? Am I top notch?
Fuck player hatin' niggas cuz they cockblock
You probably hate to see a real thug with vision, what's the game?
Rather see a nigga up in prison, why you change?
Made a living out of cuss words, liquor and weed
A bad seed turned good in this world of G's
Baby's got me fantasizin', seein' you naked
It's a fuck song, now check the record
Let's be friends!

Hey we fin to do this shit long stroke style
Baby long strokes
Let's be friends
Westside in this mother fucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker
Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker
Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker
Westside in this motherfucker right here
Westside in this motherfucker
Be friends, tell me where my niggas at
Be friends, tell me where my bitches at
Be friends, tell me where my people at
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Make money, take money
Come on, get your cash on
Let's get paid



Fugees! Fugees and Mobb Deep
Tryin' to diss now too, huh?!
Hahaha! Well, I ain't prejudiced
I don't give a fuck
This is what it sounds like
When we ride on our enemies
Biatch! When we ride on our enemies

Hey, got some static for some niggas on the other side of town
Let my little cousin K roll, he's a rider now
What they want from us motherfuckin' thug niggas?
Used to love niggas, now I plug niggas, and slug niggas
Am I wrong? Niggas makin' songs, tryin' to get with us
Must be gone on stress weed, in the West we trust
To the chest I bust, then we ride 'til the sun come
Shinin' back to brighten up the sky; how many die?
Heard the Fugees was tryin' to do me
Look, bitch, I'll cut your face, this ain't no motherfuckin' movie
Then, we watch the other two die slow
Castrated entertainin' at my motherfuckin' sideshow
Bam! Set my plan in mo'
Time to exterminate my foes, I can't stand you hoes
Uh, now label this my fuckin' trick shot
My lyrics runnin' all you cowards out of hip-hop
When we ride on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
I bet you mothafuckas die
When we ride on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies
Bet all you mothafuckas die
When we ride on our enemies

Come take a journey through my mind's eye
You crossed the game, don't explain, nigga, time to die
Say goodbye, watch my eyes when I pull the trigger
So right before you die, you bow before a bigger nigga
Now dry your eyes, you was heartless on your hits
Niggas love to scream "peace" after they start some shit
Pay attention, here's a word to those that robbed me
I murder you, then I run a train on Mobb Deep—don't fuck with me!
Nigga, you're barely livin', don't you got sickle cell?
See me have a seizure on stage, you ain't feelin' well
Hell, how many niggas wanna be involved?
See, I was only talkin' to Biggie, but I'll kill all of y'all, then ball
Then tell Da Brat to keep her mouth closed
Fuck around and get tossed up by the fuckin' Outlawz
Before I leave, make sure everybody heard
Know I meant every motherfuckin' word
When we ride on our enemies

When we ride on our enemies
Make sure everybody die
When we ride, on our enemies
When we ride on our enemies
I make sure everybody die
When we ride, on our enemies



Murder and pain come wit the game if you choose to roll
Kickin doughs, puttin holes in mothafuckas leavin hoes disposed of
Nigga lay ya down when I creep, on a mission to send ya 6 feet
Nigga don’t sleep


It don’t quit it don’t stop
You pay a bitch
I’ll pay a crooked cop
Then hustle on the block, and stack my money that
I future plot, young Napolean
Napoleon, it’s on it’s on again
Liquor shit touch my liver, tell me will it ever end
I’m tired a’ mournin
Wake up to anotha dead in the mornin
Pray ‘fore I went to bed, still woke up dreamin lead
Bitches and vultures that surround my group
They wanna talk and drink a brew and claim they
Thug Life too


Murder and pain come wit the game if you choose to roll
Kickin doughs, puttin holes in mothafuckas leavin hoes disposed of
Nigga lay ya down when I creep, on a mission to send ya 6 feet
Nigga don’t sleep


I blast first they body
Like my guns in varieties
Runnin wit the real big willies you silly punks try to be
But front, doin my walk-bys rollin blunts
Hands on my nuts in a getaway car full’a stunts
Addicted to my nine, movin like crime through time
Poppin niggas like pimples nigga nuttin simple bout mine
Etch a sketch it, dumpin on all you punks at intersections
Day in and day out ain't no easy way out no easy exits
Don’t sleep


Walkin dead
In the back passed out
My head talkin to my damn self
Stretched vexed in my bed
And if I rest
How much I wanna bet how fast I fall over
The edge on my face flat
But fuck that I’m a souljah
Wide open tired of livin lies got me locin
On mama’s eyes the drama side won’t stop ’til I smoke ’em, potent
So I’m chokin, floatin, on my feet, since these bitch niggas creep
Why the fuck should I sleep?

Dumpin on mothafuckas at random
Rapidly, wit accuracy, they shouldn’t a’ talked bad to me
It had to be, a mothafuckin murda
I’m glad to be, the nigga that did the murder
So sad to see, another mothafucka dead, layin in red
Wit a big ass hole in his head, recieved by a thug nigga, no love
As I bloodied up his mothafuckin mug picture, snatched him up off the asphalt
Then drove off to the hills, positioned him on his knees
And blew the back off, twisted his cap off, wrapped him up in plastic
Slid to the edge and dumped his ass off, then notified his whole family, of this tragedy
Murdered ”em without askin me, who did it
Catastrophe, is how I left it and you won’t see the last of me nigga
And I betcha, he got wet up, dont sleep cuz you fuckin wit realest nigga
You jeopardisin lives when you fuckin wit souljahs
It’s game ova


When I
Enter the first zone
Worst known mic hold up
My hummer roll up
Evacuatin strapped soldiers, inside strategy
Manifesting military styles casualty tragedy
When niggas battle me, my prophesized prediction, switch and move positions
Separated from his gun and bitch, and watch ’em start snitchin
I keep spittin, still stupid niggas fail to listen
I personify this thug living, hell or prison
My ammunition varies, my voice carries
Watch me invite the whole world, me and the mob getting married
It seems horrifying screams pierce the dark, just as expected
A trick bitch, where is your heart
You mark, watch niggas fall when I call they name
We Outlawz on yo head, niggas all the same
Except, some want more outta life than stress
We still thuggin ’til there’s none left
Don’t sleep


Murder and pain come wit the game if you choose to roll
Kickin doughs, puttin holes in mothafuckas leavin hoes disposed of
Nigga lay ya down when I creep, on a mission to send ya 6 feet
Nigga don’t sleep



This ain't livin'
Nigga

I hear even the smaller G's be dippin' Chevy Impalas
While flossin' their gold D's, O.G.'s, is who they follow
We swallow tomorrow's seed, what we leave is hollow
We feed violence and greed, let 'em lead tomorrow
In time, they grip a nine, sippin' wine, they rap
Still I be starin', watch the parents sacrifice their child
The love's gone, a thug's home, with no love
Feelin' so strong, make young boys into drug dealers
Now one for adolescents, now dos for those
Keep your friends by your side, even close your foes
Now three for Johnny Law tryin' to take my chips
I never pulled the trigger, didn't touch that bitch
Throw your hands in the air, it's a robbery
It's Snoop Dogg, nigga 'Pac, would you ride with me?
Let's go see what our enemies talkin' 'bout
When G's enter the house nobody's walkin' out
This ain't livin', it's similar to prison, we're trapped
My homies jealous plus they tell us that the phones is tapped
I watch my back twenty-fo' seven
And never let a busta send a G to ghetto heaven, you know
This is how it goes when we floss with flows
Before I toss your hoes, it'll cost you mo'
I do shows, make a lot of dough, murder my foes
But I'd give it all up, if it would help you grow
This ain't livin'

Shit, this ain't livin'

Peep it --gunfire is produced at alarmin' rates
Today's youth, quick to shoot, get in the car and break
"It Takes a Nation of Millions" if we intend to stop the killin'
Just search your feelings, participatin' should be appealin'
They're our seeds and when they bleed, we bleed
That's what becomes of lonely children, they turn to G's
Heavenly father can you rescue
My young nation, rest the Lord will protect you, respect due
Not a threat as I step in blue, and check those
That oppose when I froze them fools
And who are you, to watch me fall farther?
I disappeared, reappeared as the doggfather
Follow me now
Skippin' class, and livin' fast, will get your ass
Stuck in the Pen', doin' life plus ten
Young brother pump your brakes for me
Before you choke, won't you soak up some game from your big homie
This ain't livin', we givin' you jewels, use 'em as tools
Explode on they industry and fade them fools
You know the rules, gotta be a rider
You can run the red lights but read the street signs, hey
This for all of y'all that keep on raisin' hell
Put a pistol in your hand and let you fade yourself
It ain't right, what you put your momma through, young G
Gotta change your life, take the game from me
This ain't livin'

This ain't livin'



Everybody needs to chill
Player haters want to see me killed
Only real niggas stay on top
All these niggas is mad at me
Cause they can’t live like Pac

Started with five shots, niggas plottin' to kill him
Never figured that that same nigga sell five million
Hit the charts like a madman, nothin' but hits
Court cases got a nigga facin' multiple digits
Dodgin' cop cars, look at how we come so far
Picture a high school drop-out rollin a double R
House full of happiness, weed and drank
Way out, so when trouble tried to find me – can't
Never visioned livin' longer than my twenty first
Thought I'd be locked down, cracked out, or in the dirt
And though it hurts to see the change, it comes with the fame
Watch for gossip and the silly games
To all the motherfuckers speakin' down on me, this is the night
Why's everybody caught up in Pac's life?
To all y'all niggas
Why y'all conversatin' in my life?

This is Pac’s life
And everybody needs to chill
Cause this is Pac’s life
Player haters want to see me killed
Pac’s life
Only real niggas stay on top
Now all these niggas is mad at me
Cause they can’t live like Pac



There's no way to survive in the city it's a shame
Niggas die from my hollow-point bullet to the brain
Will I survive or will I die is what I wonder
Puffin on blunts and gettin' drunk to keep from goin' under
Gettin' lost in the madness, blunted gettin' tipsy
Got my pistol out the window screamin', "Lord come and get me"
Am I sick, or am I just another victim?
Unloadin' my clip, I'm watchin' every bullet spit when I kick 'em
Niggas die from automatic gunfire
Your time to expire, nobody cry every man gotta die
When they bury me, they bury me a G
Rest in peace, to all the homies got to heaven before me
Pour some liquor on the curb for the niggas that's caught
Had a motherfuckin' warrant but he didn't go to court
God damn, and one day we'll all be together
Until then I'm ready for whatever, c'mon

Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
Goin' to hell with my finger on the trigger
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!

If I could capture the rage of today's youth and bottle it
Crush the glass with my bare hands and swallow it
And spit it back in the faces of you racists
And hypocrites who think the same shit but don't say shit
You Liberaces, Versaces, and you Nazis
Watch me, 'cause you figured you got me in this hot seat
You motherfuckers wanna judge me 'cause you're not me
You'll never stop me, I'm top speed and you pop me
I came to save these new generations of babies
From parents who failed to raise them 'cause they're lazy
To grow to praise me, I'm makin' them go crazy
That's how I got this whole nation to embrace me
And you fugazi if you think I'ma admit wrong
I cripple any hypocritic critic I'm sicked on
And this song is for any kid who gets picked on
A sick song to retaliate to

Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
But don't blame me
Nigga go in the hell with my finger on the trigger
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!
Bullet to the brain!

Dear Lord can ya hear me, it's just me
A young nigga tryin' to make it on these rough streets
I'm on my knees beggin' please come and SAVE ME
THE WHOLE WORLD done made a nigga crazy!
I got my three-five-seven can't control it
Screamin' die motherfucker and he's loaded
Everybody run for cover, aww shit
Thug Life motherfucker, duck quick
Now am I wrong if I am don't worry me
Cause do or die gettin' high 'til they bury me
Dear Lord can ya hear me, when I die
Let a nigga be strapped, fucked up, and high
With my hands on the trigger, thug nigga
Stressin' like a motherfuckin' drug dealer
And even in the darkest nights, I'm a thug for Life
I got the heart to fight now
Mama raised a hellraiser why cry
That's just life in the ghetto, do or die



Catchin feelins
Did y'all read what Puffy and Big said in Vibe?
Didn't they sound like suckaz?
Outlawz got them on the run
Going for none
Oh this part two of the beef
Part two of the war

Cross this nigga here, now Biggie tell me who do you fear?
Ain't a livin' soul breathin' shall pump no fear here
My last foe flashed then I mashed his ass
Bastard, fuck with me, bet I blast your ass
So many follow but can't reach me, caught in the maze
Catch them, mimickin' my style tryin' to walk this way
Impossible my posse droppin' you, we Death Row riders
No need to beg, motherfucker, ain't no mercy inside us
Feelin' blessed, the richer I get, the more I stress
Smokin' lye watchin' time fly, waitin' for death
Dear God I been feelin' like I'm close to Jesus
Paranoid with my pistols close, smokin' trees
Keep my eyes on my foes, those close to me
Watchin' niggas catch strays, shake, choke and bleed
Me, a mercenary for the streets, check my pedigree
Bustin' motherfuckers it's the thug in me
Now niggas talk a lotta Bad Boy shit, then get to squealin'
Bitch made catchin' feelins

Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Outlaw niggas, are you ready to clown?
My homeboys might squabble but we don't fall down
Screamin' bye bye bitches, untouchable sound
Niggas hide like hoes when we hit your town
Catchin' feelins



Sometimes its hard to wake up in the morning
Mind full of demons, I don't wanna hear them anymore
Got me heartbroken,fine, so many babies screaming
Cause they seeing destruction before they a see human being
So they start smoking weed, we'll never get our day
Until we learn to pray, keep our families in shape
Cause they all broke. and why do ghetto birds die
Before we learn to fly, some bodies else's child caught in guns
Smoking weed, can all make a change
So I'm told, but I haven't seen the change unfold
I keep hoping please, if you prefer to breathe
Communities in need of people that will lead
Keep your eyes open, I can only say I'll try
Until the day I die, I promise to be wise
With my heart open, greed, brings only misery
A way to tragedy, so I stay sucker free
Too many of us died to the door to open wide
My brother be wise, stay focused on the prize
Though everybody dies
We continue growing
One day at a time

Take time, it's gonna take time
Ya'll try not to be anxious and bless our way
Take time, it's gonna take time
Take it one day at a time and live longer days
Take time, it's gonna take time
The only way to make it is if we pray
One day at a time

No matter how much money you make, Please listen
It ain't no life without struggling kid
Running, ducking a bid
Feeling like there's nothing to live for
We're all diamonds in the eyes of the Lord
They say the good die young on the road to glory
I guess God spared some of us to tell a story
The death of the past is the life of the future
We Outlaw soldiers, the voice of the people

Everybody talking bout the game like they can't see the casualties
Living in this world of animosity
And jealously got em after me
Lord don't let em capture me
I'm paranoid and I'm looking for somewhere to go
And I feel like I'm bout to blow
And I don't wanna be broke no mo
I don't wanna be broke no mo

You know it takes time to free your body and your mind
Get up on your grind
Change the situation
No sense of crime, cause we're all God's child
Don't lose your mind, gotta have patience
Every day is a test
Every day your breathing you're blessed
Another day to succeed and be the best
For the Prince, Kadafi and Makaveli the Don
We gon keep your name living on
One day at a time




To the young mothers
I feel ya, I know how it is
Don't nobody understand
I feel ya

She was born a heavy set girl with pigtails and curls
A heart full of gold, still it won't change the world
Though she could never understand why
Some underhanded plans witnessed a man die
Was only fifteen, should have been a beauty queen, still
See her cryin' by the caskets when her parents got killed
Little girl don't cry, cuz even though they died
You can best believe they're watchin' over thee from the sky
Never asked for this misery, but look at what you're gettin'
It's a blessin' in disguise when you find out you're pregnant
No money, no home, and even though you're all alone
You gots to do this on your own, so baby gone
I wish you luck and if you need me, call
Just come to me and let me feed you all
I can understand the way it feels when you're fightin' the world
Facin' all this drama when Mama's just a little girl

And mama's just a little girl

At sixteen
What a beautiful thing, the very essence of a jet-black ebony queen
And who could tell she'd get pregnant at an early age?
She didn't listen, had sex, watch her belly raise
Hey, got violated by someone she dated
If this is fate, I'd hate to see the seeds she created, and so we waited
Though it takes time to build a body and a mind
She reclines nine months then finally it's time
What do we find?, little growin' boy of mine
With a tortured soul, addicted to a life of crime
Had no time for the growin' stage
He learned his values on the streets at an early age
Watch for police, don't come home, why?
Cuz Mama's actin' crazy at the hospital
'Bout to have another baby
Like a rose from the concrete, growin' within
Blessed with twins how the hell can Mama raise three men?
So we began, closest family, such insanity
A happy home, from one act of inhumanity
Plus Mama said the seed was corrupted
Used to rub her belly, beggin' us to breathe and she'd loved us
Now, Mama, sits quiet, sippin' peppermint Schnapps
How could Mama bring a thug like me in this world?
She ain't the cause of all the drama
Cause Mama's just a little girl

Mama's just a little girl

Now, will she remain in the same spot?
The gunshots rang, they came from the 'caine spot
Now, look here, I see her clutchin' her son in her arms, she's hurt
Her heart bleeds, now she watched her seed die in the dirt
Fulfilled prophecy
But who could stop the grief I walk around, tryin' to hold the world, up on top of me
I'd probably be an innocent man, still I'm the victim of a curse
What could be worse?, nothing but pain, since my birth
Only functions at the Pen', cuz everybody's in
Payin' back society, I'm guilty of a life of sin
I watch the drama occur, my eyes blur before I jetted
I wonder why we all have to die 'fore we get it
Though we shed tears, so many peers I've done buried
Worried and scared, knowin' I'ma see the cemetery
Must be prepared, in this cold world, no one cares
No! It ain't fair, but we all bear and do our share
In this land of the underhanded schemes and plans
Vivid dreams of a nigga havin' G's in hand
Mama told me not to be a punk
There ain't a thing I wouldn't do for my Mama in this world
Cause you know I ain't mad at cha, you're just a little girl

See mammas just a little girl
Mama's just a little girl
Facing all this drama, cuz mama's just a little girl

They ask us why we mutilate each other like we do
They wonder why we hold such little worth for human life
To ask us why we turn from bad to worse
Is to ignore from which we came
You see, you wouldn't ask why the rose that grew from the concrete had damaged petals
On the contrary, we would all celebrate its tenacity
We would all love its will to reach the sun
Well, we are the roses
This is the concrete
And these are my damaged petals
Don't ask me why
Thank God, nigga
Ask me how
You see, Mama's just a little girl



Hey 'Pac, it's yo' boy Quik
Man so far I've been listenin' to your album
And I ain't heard nuttin you could just kick back and smoke a beadie to
You know what I'm sayin'?

Yeah like that
Some of that old smooth shit
Some of that shit that make niggas drink
Make bitches think
And help you check a fat-ass bank, hahah
So why don't you do a favor nigga and uh...
Drop that shit only you know how
Hahahah, feel me?

I'm barely standin', and plus my secondhand say it's midnight
Some Alize and Cristal guaranteed to get right
Like misdemeanors it's a small thang
With DJ Quik in this bitch, I let my balls hang
Runnin' through the street lights, cause we like
Yo' nigga get your mob on show 'em what a G like
Around the corner it's like Vegas, or better yet like Reno
Niggas poppin', welcome to our casino, cause you and me know
Hundred percent like a C-note
Lookin' for a bitch that's half-black and Filipino
And when I meet her I'ma offer her some Indo
Tongue-kissin' out the window of a pearl white limo
Don't wanna be your man, I'm your nigga
Touch me here, I'll get bigger
While I'm diggin' I'll get deep into your liver
I'm game type
Love fuckin' bitches in the same night
My words are aphrodisiacs if you say 'em right
The club be poppin' so I'm stoppin' at the Fat Burger
Look through the paper it's another black crack murder
The city's full of surprises, you can live or you can die
You can fuck on the first night, or try
In the late night

"Last night.. last night changed it all"
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"
"Last night.. last night changed it all"
"Last night.."
"I don't give a fuck, where you gon' be. Be home by eleven!"

Now that my nigga ‘Pac is out I’ma have to hit him
Swoop him up in the coupe
With the window’s tinted, wait a minute
Nigga you got the bud I got the Henney
Don’t worry about the pussy cause there’s plenty
Now in the city of L.A
I’m the mayor to the player’s
Suede to the gators, millionaires baby no haters
Now we up in the mix
From ’91 to ’96
Stackin’ the hit’s and fuckin' tricks
It’s a G thang, baby I’m the AM
From the Bay to L.A
This is how we play ’em
We get around, fuckin’ hoes then we dick ’em down
Death Row is the name, DJ Quik the sound
Ballin’ for day’s but you never catch us slipping’ nigga
I got old and wise and now I’m gettin’ richer
Picture a nigga in the villa gettin’ fame again
All you hoes better know what game I’m in
From L.A.X. to Laguardia, the late night partiers know
Who got the pussy and the Indo
Me and 2Pac and Quik makin’ niggas sick
Hookers ridin’ the dick
And want to join in the clique
In the late night

“Last night.. last night changed it all”
“Last night..”
“I don’t give a fuck, where you gon’.. be”
“Last night.. last night changed it all”
“Last night..”
“I don’t give a fuck, where you gon’.. be”

Now I’m kickin’ it at the top of my tree house
I’m runnin’ outta beady so I gotta get down and be out
Now on my way to the store
I see bitches galore that say they never ever been to a studio before
Now it’s a golden opportunity for me to get tossed
I got work to be done, and bitches to floss
She say she *Nikki with 2 K’s, i’m dickin' with 2 balls
And all we need it Hen’ to set it off
Now gone are the days of my ways of my horny and rugged adolescent
Fuckin’ bitches with no rubber’s today is a lesson
Now we stop to get lifestyles because of my gin
Yo, what’s ya’ flovour baby
Hope it’s nutty peppermint
Fuckin’ bitches on a weekly basis I’m lovin’ to play
But tell me why always turns out this way?
She be alright when you meet her
Fine when you drunk and fuckin’ and ugly as hell the next day
Now, in ’96 this is how it’s goin’ down
Player’s like 2Pac and AMG up
And them hoes down
And baddies, no need to feel sorrow
Just tune in, same Bat channel tomorrow
But in the late night

Last night.. last night changed it all”
“Last night..”
“I don’t give a fuck, where you gon’.. be”
“Last night.. last night changed it all”
“Last night..”
“I don’t give a fuck, where you gon’.. be”



Something for my niggas to ride to
Something to keep your confidence up
Something to get your money by
Hey, yo this going out to Mu grandmother
Definitely going out to Mu's grandmother
One love, rest in peace, let the angels take you
One love

Ain't nothin' wrong with a nigga gettin' his papers
Don't hate us, listen to the song
Still waitin' on the world to come save us
How they made us, every time it's on
No matter who did it they blame us, they hate us
Gotta be strong, no matter what they do they can't break us
They hate us
Ain't nothin' wrong with a nigga gettin' his papers
Don't hate us, listen to the song
Still waitin' on the world to come save us
How they made us, every time it's on
No matter who did it they blame us, they hate us
Gotta be strong, no matter what they do they can't break us
Cuz they hate us

Verse continues to repeat throughout song



Did you hear about the rose that grew
from a crack in the concrete?
Proving nature's law is wrong it
learned to walk with out having feet.

Funny it seems, but by keeping it's dreams,
it learned to breathe fresh air.
Long live the rose that grew from concrete
when no one else ever cared.



Te quiero
Te quiero cojer, te quiero cojer
I'll let your ass have it, te quiero cojer
Te quiero cojer, for real?
Te quiero cojer

Now you've been actin' like you want it for a long time
All up in a nigga face, givin' me them strong vibes
Look in my eyes and you'll find peace
A Gemini, so you really blow my mind freak, come on
I got my clothes off, hard as a nigga in jail
Skinny niggas throw the dick well
Everybody get their condoms, brother cause it's time to fuck
Hurry up and put it on nigga, time is up
What's next? Got my mind on some group sex
Where you goin', baby? I ain't even through yet
Do it like a true vet, love it how I threw it to ya
In and out make it good to ya, remember me?
I love fuckin' slow with the lights low
Black, Puerto Rican, even White hoes; bellisimo
Que Linda, dame beso, come to Papi
Fuck until the shit is sloppy, if you really want it

If you can do what I do
Why don’t you come on and give it to me
Meeeeeeeee
If you can do what I do
Why don’t you come on and give it to me

Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
If you really want it, if you really want it
If you really want it, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, we came to
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock it baby
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body
Rock, your body body, rock your body body
Rock, your body body, rock your body

Come on let’s take a three day mission
Of sex wishes and body conditioning
I rub you here, you lick me there, we get to tongue kissing
Picture my body in a silhouette, all yours
You freaking me, I’m freakin you, inside my sugar walls
I want it all, don’t hold back, come to me
Tell me what you want to do with the pussy
I got fantasies, you and me deep in the bubbly
You killin softly, won't you take me
Passion in the makin'
Sexual ratifications
You be my freak, I’ll be your sneaky situation


If you can do what I do
Why don’t you come on and give it to me
If you can do what I do
Why don’t you come on and give it to me


See, it all started simple, turned into me lickin' the nipples
Fuckin' you doggie style to this instrumental
Hands up, all up inside ya, hell I can stand ya
Eyes open I don't plan to bust, just hold on
Baby let me zone in, what do you mean?
Can you scream let it go beotch, how does it feel?
Got a nigga like steel in ya, to keep goin'
Now I'm fuckin' like I'm killin' ya, let's go another round
Baby is you down really, two shots of ecstasy
Lick a nigga down silly, your body next to me
I could touch you inside, and you'll cry
So good when a nigga leave, you'll die
My mama told me baby be a man put it on her
Hittin' bitches like, switches comin' around the corner
I want her let me get my ride on
It's yo' dick baby but it's my song
Now if you really want it

You should not play hard to get
We have not done nothin yet
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You should not play hard to get
We have not done nothin' yet
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You should not play hard to get
If you really want it, come and get it
It's here for you
You should not play hard to get
We have not done nothin yet
Don't you end up like the stupid one
We have not done nothin yet
You should not play hard to get
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You should not play hard to get
We have not done nothin yet
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You have not done nothing yet
You should not play hard to get
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You should not play hard to get
We have not done nothin yet
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You have not done nothing yet
You should not play hard to get
Don't you end up like the stupid one
You have not done nothing yet



Pac's story














Oh man
Yeah
Let’s turn this house into a happy home
Let’s turn this house into a happy home
Let’s turn this house into a happy home

Now we've been kickin' it for quite some time
Remained beside me through my trials in this life of crime
We done fought so many times I forgot to count
I never hit you, not a coward, rather leave your house
Remember back in December when we was tight?
Sippin' Alize and Cristal, wildin' every night - in my bedroom!
Promised that I commit to you soon
Tongue-kissed me every time you seen me step inside a room
Straight out the hood
We promised to be good to each other, plus I love you
So I know you gon' make a good mother
Just try to understand if I change in time
It's only 'cause I never owned anything that's mine
So I'm tryin, you can stay with my momma but keep the drama to a low
Never call the police, I never call you bitch or ho'
We were all born hungry in this world alone
Finally moved out my mom's house, and got a happy home

Let's stick together, forever
To make a happy home
Together, forever
To make a happy home


Born through hard times, ghetto child of mine
I wonder if you have to suffer for your father's crimes
To be honest it's a hard road
Just keep your faith in God, knowin' you'll get scarred though
Look at him walkin' and talkin', a lil' child with my eyes and mouth
Father watch over lil' seeds, help me guide them out
Had to change my whole lifestyle, married my baby's momma
Made her my wife now, I'm tryin' hard y'all
Maybe in time I'll be a better man
Watchin' the older couples, handle it like veterans
Show me the meanin' of forever and together we rise
If it would help our child grow, then together we'd die
Why - question my love, it's so easy to see
Without my family all I'm left with is a shadow of me
After all the arguments, and the nights alone
Now it's time to live the good life, inside a happy home

Let's stick together, forever
To make a happy home
Let's stick together, forever
To make a happy home



It's the same murder!
You made out streets into what these people call the 'killing field!'

The motherfuckin' dust kicker, who can you trust?
Do you have the heart to see a nigga, before you bust?
My name is spoken on the tongues of so many foes
Bustin' motherfuckers out the box, I ain't even go!
Now how the hell do you explain my claim to fame?
From doin' flicks to bustin' tricks out the fuckin' frame
Got these bitches on my jock, niggas on my block
Jealous ass suckers got 'em duckin' from my smokin' Glock
And bustin' niggas asses is to stay alive
Skinny ass player watchin' bigger motherfuckers fry
They ask me how I'm livin', I'm a hustler
Buckin' busters 'til they die
Now it's on in the ghetto you ain't heard?
Niggas got they AKs headin' for the 'burbs
Aimin' at them skin headed bitches let it rain
Givin' 'em a wet welcome to the house of pain

"Our city is a war zone."

Yo I'm hunting down this nigga and he know so he stressin'
He better count his blessings and get ready for this lesson
The Stretch 'bout to teach him when I reach him with the MAC
And lay that ass down on his motherfucking back, Jack
Slack is something that a nigga don't take
His mom run the church so I'mma see her at his fucking wake
Make way, the nigga paid me the other day
I'm fucking with my son and the nigga got somethin' to say
Hey! The nigga tried to diss, boy he got it twisted
He shoulda watched America's Most, I'm listed
For killing motherfuckers like him
So I'mma bring him to the House of Pain and kill him with a grin
Flim flam, god DAMN I'm not the one
Before I choke him and smoke him
I'm gonna smack him with my fuckin' gun
Son, you made your last mistake and I don't know your name
But welcome to the House of Pain


Coughing
Huh, the country bud got me chokin'
I'm on a mission to the point that motherfuckers think I'm smokin'
Yea that sick nigga Biggie wit the 8-shot fifth
Wit the extra clip for that extra shit
Don't you know that a killing is thrilling
All the blood spilling, is all a part of drug dealing
A born gangsta my daddy was a thug
Had a .38 wit the hollow point slug
So when he licked shots
Niggas dropped quicker than a bootlegger sells his liquor
A little nigga tried to squeeze .22's in my Reebok shoes
Payin' dues, while kids was on their one's and two's
Now I'm much older, colder, fuck a holster
Got the MAC-11 swingin' from my shoulder
It's a damn shame I got to put my momma through the strain
I'm livin' in a house of pain

"He reportedly tried to hide behind a parked car and then beg for his life before he was killed."
"A hostage in Brooklyn rather suggests we have--"
"Grant said this morning he was kidnapped and held for ransom and strangled to death."
"They hurt us, humiliated us, took stuff for granted, stole from our--"



They wanna bury me, I'm worried -- no need to lie
I pray to God I don't scream when it's time to fry
Nowhere to rest, I'm losin' homies -- ain't that a bitch?
When I was rich I had clout, now a nigga's lonely
I put the pistol to my head, and say a prayer
I see visions of me dead, Lord, are you there?
Then tell me, am I lost? ‘Cause I'm lonely
I thought I had friends, but in the end a nigga dies lonely
Nowhere to run, I'm in terror, and no one cares
A closed casket at my funeral and no one's there
Is there a future for a killer? I change my ways
But still that don't promise me the next day
So I stay thuggin' with a passion, forever blastin'
I'm bustin' on these motherfuckers in my madness
They wonder if I'm hellbound
Well, Hell can't be worse than this, ‘cause I'm in Hell now
Don't make me hurt you, I don't want to, but I will
Seen motherfuckers killed over phone bills
Never will I die, I'll be back
Reincarnated as a motherfuckin' MAC
-11, ‘cause in Heaven there's no shortage on G's

Never was a thug, just infatuated with guns
Never was a gangsta, 'til I graduated to one, and
Got the rep of a villain, for weapon concealin'
Took the image of a thug, kept shit appealin'
Willin' to stick out my neck, for respect if it
Meant life or death, never live to regret what I
Said, when you're me, people just want to see, if
It's true, if it's you, what you say in your
Rap's, what you do, so they feel, as part of your
Obligation to fulfill, when they see you on the
Streets, face to face, are you for real, in
Confrontation ain't no conversation, if you feel
You're in violation, any hesitation'll get you
Killed, if you feel it, kill it, if you conceal
It, reveal it, being reasonable will leave you
Full of bullets, pull it, squeeze it, till it's
Empty, tempt me, push me, pussies, I need a good
Reason to give this trigger a good squeeze
I'm a soldier, these shoulder's hold up so much
They won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up, I'm
A soldier, even if my collar bone's crush or
Crumble, I will never slip or stumble, I'm a
Soldier, these shoulder's hold up so much, they
Won't budge, I'll never fall or fold up, I'm a
Soldier, even if my collar bone's crush or
Crumble, I will never stumble
I love pissin' you off, it get's me off, like my
Lawyer's, when the fuckin' judge let's me off, all
You motherfuckers gotta do is set me off, I'll
Violate and all the motherfuckin' bet's be off
I'm a lit fuse, anything I do brings in news
Pistol whippin' motherfuckin' bouncers, six-two
Who needs bullets, soon as I pull it, you sweat
Bullets, an excellent method to get rid of the
Next bully, it's actually better cause instead you
Murderin', you can hurt em' and come back again
And kick dirt at 'em, it's like pourin' salt in



Who should I call?
No I ain't callin' her
No I ain't callin' her
Oh yeah, her

Dear baby you the picture of perfection
Straight from your million dollar smile
To my attraction to your complexion
No hesitation needed; you got me
Inhalin' the aroma of your perfume, and feelin' heated
I move closer to drop the lines of my introduction
Hold out my hand, and grab yo' hand, now we touchin'
My lyrics are poetry, so baby get a ticket to go with me
Thugged out so you know it's me
It's a positive attraction; see pictures of us
Layin' butt-naked on the beach kickin back relaxin'
And only you can calm, the savage beast
Look in my eyes are you surprised, that it's me?
I wanna make you mine
I'm so lonely in my bedroom, lookin' at the walls
Withcha number in my hand, wonderin' should I even call her tonight

When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up
When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up

Been gettin' nuttin' but bad news, ever since the day you left me
I sit and wonder is there a way, you could forget me
Remember my phone calls, my late visits
Us havin' breakfast in bed, then we straight kick it
Me and you in satin sheets, 'til after two
Come take a walk on the wild side, enjoy the view
Whenever we collide; it's bound to be a pleasurable time
Makin' love 'til the early light
Sweetheart don't fight the feelin'
Come get a shot of this playa dealin' and concentrate on the ceiling
It's my intention to rush up
Beware of the fireworks, cause every time we touch..
.. it's bound to be, so relax, clown with me
As if you're down with me, get around and see
The brother with tattoos and no fears
Runnin' my fingers through your hair
If you call me

When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up
When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up

Pardon me, but let's be specific
Baby cause if you down with me, nigga we can kick it
And let's take trips and ride airplanes
A hundred thousand dollar car on dem gold thangs, so can you hang?
I got a big suite at the Hyatt , if it feel right
My only wish is to be witcha
You got me steady strivin' to getcha
Fantasizin' of friendly pictures
The pressure's gettin' major
I wonder will you answer my call, if I page ya
Got me goin' wild with anticipation
Face to face with us locked up in strange places
What will it take? cause the heartache be heatbreak
Is my prediction when you falsify and start fake?
In my position I'm a careful man, but a player when I ball
Got my eyes on you baby, can I call?

When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up
When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up
When the road get's rough
You can call me up
When it's all too much
You can call me up
When the road get's rough
You can call me up



You say you scared to ride in my car
'Cause you, you think niggas gon' be blastin' at it
It ain't even that deep baby

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes
You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes

Repetitive blows are thrown, to my foes
No love shown get disposed of blasted full blown
My unknown tendencies to mash my comp
Gettin' wicked with my ski-mask, find the stash and dump
While niggas run I'm the last one standin', the rest die
Victims of my lethal chrome cannon, westside
Though it's worldwide no one can deny my views
Tracked it to my very fabric once the plastic blew
Five shots changed my whole life, throats were slit
Niggas died by my orders when I wrote this shit
Though we go back like wild knights at Latin Quarters
Niggas tried to kill me, and I fed their wife and their daughters
Blazed the weed, draped they seeds, gave 'em cash
Pass the fame and let the game go rollin' past
Why you change, it's a cold world taught me life
Retaliation proves niggas never caught me right
Say they shot me in my nuts, out of luck
Quit bullshitin' nigga 'cause I'm still fuckin' yo' bitch
Niggas got me twisted in a bad way, why you change?
Fuck with me, all this shit pay, nigga fuck the fame

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, they Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes
Let them punks know
One love
One nation
One love
One nation

Now outlaw immortals is the clique, boss player Mr. Makaveli
I be that Bonnie putting pretty gauge to your belly
Now can you tell what's my next move
Say you're in the game but you don't know the rules fool
You call my name in vain as I proceed to issue the pain
Immortally insane, so I gives a goddamn
Trigger hand kinda twitchy, niggas actin' kinda bitchy
But they pass on by cuz I got killers with me
Deep in the midsts no snitches or witnesses
Just a gangsta party with the deadliest constituents

This Outlawz bitch, what the fuck you didn't know?
Kizza-Kastro, Young Noble with the criminal flow
You nervous nelly ass niggas belly up in the river, no dizoubt
My niggas couldn't fade me with some clippers
We put it down, look all around, 'til we find you we hound
Penitentiary bound, to remind you

Kadafi I bring the lingo to the clique
Tasty like a Pringle, sneakin' through your chimney like Kris Kringle
On some shit, get me fee to let my ice click
Ka-pling, ka-plow I been a thug shootin' slugs since a child
And still wild

You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, we Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes, let them punks know
You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, we Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes, let them punks know
You don't have to worry you can ride with me now
Niggas are quick to scream how they die for me now
Only got one clique, we Outlawz on the Row
Fair exchange when we fuck them hoes, let them punks know



In this motherfuckin' life I lead, shit
A hell of motherfucking road blocks
And crooked cops
We still ride though
What side? Westside

I want money in large amounts
My garage full of cars that bounce
Movin' my tapes in major ways, ‘cause every dollar counts
Busters is jealous and half these niggas is punks
They runnin' off at the mouth 'til I fill it up with my pump
They jump, my automatic keep 'em wary
Why you frontin' like you Billy Badass? Nigga, you scary
I've been knowin' you for years
We was high school peers, in junior high
I was itchin' to kill, and you was ready to die
While you bullshittin', niggas was dyin' and catchin' cases
Bustin' my automatics at motherfuckers in foreign places
Leavin' no trace, they see my face and they buried
Them bitches die in a hurry, still I ride, I'm never worried
Mr. Makaveli tell me to ride, and I'ma ride
Pick my enemies out the crowd, and motherfuckers die
It's not the way I wanna live, my nigga, it's how it is
Homie got into a fight last night that killed his kids

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

I stopped to think, rolling a Philly up full of dank
Pouring the remaining of my Remy Martin down the sink
Back to get dressed, grab my strap in case I'm tested
Chronic and Stress, await the bitch to clean my mess
Wishing I was sober not fucked up, with a hangover
The homie just released, so the whole hood came over
The west side bash, they're piecing on dime bags
Macking in the living room, shaking that ass
Talking fast to whores, we pros at what we do
It's on and popping once we get this bitch full of brew
I knew some shit might crack so we strapped and all thick
Swerving the niggas I see, who ain't invited to this shit
Give a Fuck! the life I live, that's how it is
Fuck around you will be crying, missing your kids
HUH! My destiny in this motherfucking game;
Is either to get rich or die

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

When they see that nigga Daz they say I'm dangerous
In this strange world; believe who just don't give a fuck
I mean I stroke with the intentions, cuttin' it up like I supposed to
My job is to protect and rob and serve you
Who hold the genius? - we done left, Death Row is breathin'
Heaters gotta get served til none has left breathin'
What I'm achieving, smoking weed and fucking hoes
Ain't going nowhere, no man is going to strive, be on a stroll
I gotta make it happen everyday and all day
I gotta make my hustle and come back with big pay
Tear up the spot lay, creating ruckus when I touch down
Who got my back when they put the attack down?
So I lay out cold, petrified, terrified
Barely alive, come again when niggas start to ride
With the Outlawz and Pounders, blast, I'm clownin' on three
Nigga you're my motherfuckin' enemy

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers
'Til we die, in this life I lead

That's right! - that's right! Terrordome, where it's on
From selling dope, coke, to crack
Young Gotti, entered the party from the back
Instant pay; I gots to do it my way
Deserve to swerve on the highway
Cause the spot is sewn from Monday to Friday
Nigga try me, I like the Indica and Ty Weed
Defy me, Young Gotti, when I be high as the sky be
Verbal homicide, be ready to rupture
Making moves to touch ya, disassembles your whole structure
I makes money, cause that's all I know how to make
That's all I learned when I was young, no hesitation or mistakes
I see a pot, filled with nothing but rocks and knots
Midnight complexion, Glocks to shake spots
They see my people, so they already assume I live illegal
But they assume too soon
I got a treat for every bitch on the street
I role with beat, I got a problem, I got a fixation for heat

The life I live is treacherous, no one stands next this
But still motherfuckers be trying to fetch this
Nutty nigga that brings heat to your set
Unloading two two threes until your ass breathes death
Nigga, East Side, Oakland, no joking, we kick up dust
No remorse, so you and your boys can suck these Nuts
Extended clips left his nose sanded, I'm right handed
But when it comes to the pistol bumping; I'm both handed

In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!
And watch 'em ride, Outlaw motherfuckers 'til we die
In this life I lead, fiend for currency, get high off weed
Collect G's, make my enemies bleed
When you see me, nigga, holla my set!



Nina,


Eternal love.
2PAC
Tupac Shakur



Soyons logiques
Si je sais que dans cette chambre d'hôtel ils ont de la nourriture tous les jours!
Et je frappe à la porte, tous les jours pour manger et ils ouvrent la porte me laissant voir la fête
Me laissant voir qu'ils lancent du salami de partout, qu'ils s'amusent avec de la nourriture tout en me disant qu'il n'y a pas de nourriture..
Tous les jours !

"Nous avons faim, s'il vous plaît laisser nous entrer, nous avons faim, s'il vous plaît laissez nous entrer..."

"Nous avons faim, nous avons besoin de nourriture !"

"Donne-moi à manger ou je casse la porte!"

"Je crochète la serrure, m'introduis dans la pièce et je tire !"

Tu vois ce que je veux dire ?
Tu as faim, quoi, tu as atteins un niveau où tu n'attends plus rien !
Nous avons demandé ça il y a 10 ans, nous revendiquions avec les Black Panthers
Nous étions dans cette configuration avec eux ! Mouvements des droits civiques, etc...
Nous demandions !
Aujourd'hui, tous ces gens qui demandaient sont tous morts ou en prison

Alors maintenant, que pensez-vous que nous allons faire ?... Demander ?



I'm going in to this not knowing what I'll find
but I've decided to follow my heart and abandon my mind
and if there be pain I know that at least I gave my all
and it is better to  have loved and lost than to not love at all
In the morning I may wake to smile or maybe 2 cry
but first to those of my past I must say goodbye



He'll 4 a hustle




Callin' all dogs and phony rap stars
Who think they got me
I'm on some Superman shit now
They shouldn't have shot me
Cause I'm convinced that my squad is real
And God has blessed me with the power to be hard 2 kill
I got a mind that's full of murderous thoughts
When unleashed
I make them niggas bow
Feel me now or be deceased
I ain't choosing sides
Hell no
Fuck everybody
It's Westside when I ride watch 4 dead bodies
Lyrics are colorful words and anesthetics
Problems are getting worked out faster than calisthenics
I'm bullet proof
Blazed up on top of my man's roof
Hands on a fully AK so what'chu plan to do
Moon motherfuckaz 'til they feel me
It's West Coast nigga fuck New York
Now did everybody hear me?
You shot at my homies now Imma blast
Screamin' Thug Life muthafucka when I pass

NY '87
NY '87
NY '87
NY '87

Dance floor's dangerous
Packed in like a briefcase
Rhyth with ral rough rhyme
Beats with deep bass
Girls with tight pants
Maybe they might dance
Tonight if the Rs on the mike
There's a slight chance
The crowd is crucial
M.C.'s grounds are neutral
Now that you're here let me introduce you
Get ready
I'm hard read like graffiti but steady
Science I drop is real heavy
Radiant energy, that'll be the penalty
Touch the third rail on the pain of remedy
The prescription's one every hour
Now it's a HABIT
Ya need another hit from the freestyle fanatic
Keep out of reach of children
Beware of overdose
Too many milligram
NO ONE made a iller jam
My rhyme is the rhythm of thoughts
That kill a man
Ideas for the ear to fear
Might split 'im
He'll never forget 'im
He'll rest in peace wit' 'em
At least when he left he'll know what hit 'im
The last breath of the words of death
Was the rhythm
NY '87







As soon as I leave the house you want to page me
See you got me trapped I'm going crazy this is slavery
You act like it's outrageous give me space it won't get better
And maybe we will argue and be through with all these sorry letters
Soon as I come home it's like I get the third degree
Where ya been and who you with I get no room to breathe It makes me want to leave
I'm sick of these tricks up your sleeve
Your suspicious I deceive give me grief without belief but to me
If you really trust me then it's pitiful
Question me about my whereabouts that's so trivial
Let me live my life and you can live yours
Just be there to help me and support that's what your here for
Not to give me stress and add to pressure
Home is where I go the rest I go to pass the test
I'm sorry if I left you all alone
But I couldn't make it home so we argue on the phone
Don't you trust me?



I grew up a fuckin' screw-up
Got introduced to the game, got a ounce and fuckin' blew up
Choppin' rocks overnight. The nigga Biggie Smalls trying to turn into the black Frank White
We had to grow dreads to change our description
Two cops is on the milk box missin'
Show they toes, you know they got stepped on
A fistful of bullets, a chest full of Teflon
Runnin' from the police, picture that
Nigga, I'm too fat, I fuck around and catch a asthma attack
That's why I bust back, it don't phase me
When he drop, take his Glock, and I'm Swayze
Celebrate my escape, sold the Glock, bought some weight
Lay back, I got some money to make, motherfucker


Now everything's good in my hood, and it's on and poppin'
Eazy-muthaphukkin'-E from east side south Compton
Straight givin' up the real
On how a nigga feel talk that shit, mothafuckers' caps get peeled
Layin' low in the cut
Gettin' high than a motherfucker - Niggas know what's up
I'm that gangsta-gangsta, is that what they're still yellin'?
Nigga G to a T saggin' and bailin'
So I guess I'll die by that motherfucker then
So when I die, niggas bury me
Make sure my shit reads Eazy-muthaphukkin'-E
And it's a fact, to be exact, my tombstone should read
'He put Compton on that map'
And that's how a nigga feel
When I'm givin' up the motherfuckin' real



JayZ come out & play
Ayo Assassin give me one of them tracks
So i can ride on them motherfuckers
Mobb Deep , motherfuckers talking about
We can't rap

I'm gettin' suspicious of this bitch
The line's busy everytime I call her
Now she's tellin' me to visit, who else is home?
I check the house before I bone, so we all alone
After I nut I hit the highway -- see ya later!
To all the players, watch the fly way a nigga played her
The bitch is tellin' all her homies
That I can fuck her like no other
Now them other bitches wanna bone me
I'm under pressure, gettin' drunk, somebody help me
I drink a fifth of Hennessy, I don't think it's healthy
I see my enemies, they creepin', don't make me blast
I watch the 5-0's roll, the motherfuckers pass
By me like they know me, smilin' as they laugh
I put up my middle finger, then I dash
Niggas don't like me, ‘cause I'm thuggin'
And every day I'm a hustler lookin' to get paid

Niggas don't like me, ‘cause I'm thuggin'
Are you afraid to die, or do you wanna live forever?
Tell me, which one?
Niggas don't like me, ‘cause I'm thuggin'
Are you afraid to die, or do you wanna live forever?
Tell me, which one?
Niggas don't like me, ‘cause I'm thuggin'

Fallin' to pieces, am I guilty? I pray to the Lord
But he ignores me, unfortunately, ‘cause I'm guilty
Show me a miracle, I'm hopeless
I'm chokin' off marijuana smoke
With every toke it's like I'm losin' focus
Fallin' to sleep while I'm at service, when will I die?
Forever paranoid and nervous, because I'm high
Don't mention funerals, I'm stressin' and goin' nutty
And reminiscin' 'bout them niggas that murdered my buddy
Flashbacks of bustin' caps, anything for money
Where am I goin'? I discovered, can't nothin' save me
My next door neighbor's havin' convo with undercovers
Put a surprise in the mailbox, hope she get it
Happy birthday, bitch, you know you shouldn't have did it
Everybody's dyin', am I next? Who can I trust?
Will they be G's, and they look at me before they bust?

